this is called the discrimination of meaning …
and on hearing “phassā, vedano,” etc., he knows that that is not the individual-essence language.
particularly in that of Magadha.
Questioning is questioning about defining the meaning of even a single stanza.
In arisings of consciousness with two root-causes i.e. with non-greed and non- hate but without non-delusion, or without root-cause, understanding does not occur.
Just as pleasure is not invariably inseparable from happiness, so perception and consciousness are not invariably inseparable from understanding.
But just as happiness is invariably inseparable from pleasure, so understanding is invariably inseparable from perception and consciousness.
A phenomenon’s own essence or existing essence is its individual essence 
Knowledge that is classified under meaning as capable of effecting the explanation and definition of specific characteristics of the meaning class is called attha-paṭisambhidā;
and so with the other three
I.e. the four paths with the first jhāna and those with the second, third, and fourth, out of the five
The ‘Chapter of Similes’ is the Chapter of Twin Verses in the Dhammapada , they say. Others say that it is the Book of Pairs in the First Fifty .
 HOW IS IT DEVELOPED? Now, tHE THINGS CLASSed as aggregates, bases, elements, faculties, truths, dependent origination, etc., are the soil of this understanding,
and the first two purifications, namely, purification of virtue and purification of consciousness, are its roots,
Consequently, one who is perfecting these should first fortify his knowledge by learning and questioning about those things that are the “soil” after he has perfected the two purifications that are the “roots,” then he can develop the five purifications that are the “trunk.”
This is in brief.
The detail is as follows. 33.When it was said above “the things classed as aggregates, bases, elements, faculties, truths, dependent origination, etc., are the soil,” the aggregates here are the five aggregates, that is to say, the materiality aggregate, the feeling aggregate, the perception aggregate, the formations aggregate, and the consciousness aggregate.
while the five purifications, namely, purification of view, purification by overcoming doubt, purification by knowledge and vision of what is the path and what is not the path, purification by knowledge and vision of the way, and purification by knowledge and vision, are the trunk.
Having understood this, again as regards these same aggregates:
Knowledge of aggregates is classed As to order, and distinction,
As to neither less nor more, And likewise as to simile,
And twice as to how to be seen, And as to good for one seeing thus—
This is the way of exposition That a wise man should rightly know.
Herein, as to order: order is of several kinds, namely, order of arising, order of abandoning, order of practice, order of plane, order of teaching.
Herein, “First there comes to be the foetus in the first stage, then there comes to be the foetus in the second stage” , etc., is order of arising.
“Things to be abandoned by seeing, things to be abandoned by development” , etc., is order of abandoning.
“Purification of virtue … purification of consciousness” , etc., is order of practice.
“The sense sphere, the fine- material sphere” , etc., is order of plane.
“The four foundations of mindfulness, the four right efforts” , etc., or “Talk on giving, talk on virtue” , etc., is order of teaching.
Of these, firstly, order of arising is not applicable here because the aggregates do not arise in the order in which they are successively dealt with, as is the case with “the foetus in the first stage,” etc.,
for there are those people who, while teachable, have fallen into assuming a self among the five aggregates owing to failure to analyze them; and the Blessed One is desirous of releasing them from the assumption by getting them to see how the seeming compactness of mass in the five aggregates is resolved; and being desirous of their welfare, he first, for the purpose of their easy apprehension, taught the materiality aggregate, which is gross, being the objective field of the eye, etc.;
and lastly, consciousness, which these things beginning with feeling have as their support, and which dominates them.78 This, in the first place, is how the exposition should be known as to order.
2. As to distinction: as to the distinction between aggregates and aggregates- as-objects-of-clinging.
But what is the distinction between them? Firstly, aggregates is said without distinguishing.
Aggregates as objects of clinging is said distinguishing those that are subject to cankers and are liable to the clingings,
“Bhikkhus, I shall teach you the five aggregates and the five aggregates as objects of clinging. Listen …
And what, bhikkhus, are the five aggregates? Any kind of materiality whatever, bhikkhus, whether past, future or present … far or near: this is called the materiality aggregate.
Any kind of feeling whatever … Any kind of perception whatever … Any kind of formations whatever … Any kind of consciousness whatever … far or near: this is called the consciousness aggregate.
These, bhikkhus, are called the five aggregates.
And what, bhikkhus, are the five aggregates as objects of clinging?
Any kind of materiality whatever … far or near, that is subject to cankers and liable to the clingings: this is called the materiality aggregate as object of clinging.
Any kind of feeling whatever … Any kind of perception whatever … Any kind of formations whatever … Any kind of consciousness whatever … far or near, that is subject to cankers and liable to the clingings: this is called the consciousness aggregate as object of clinging.
These, bhikkhus, are called the five aggregates as objects of clinging” .
Now, while there is feeling, etc., both free from cankers and subject to them,79 not so materiality.
However, since materiality can be described as a simple aggregate in the sense of a total, it is therefore mentioned among the simple aggregates.
And since it can be described as an aggregate that is the object of clinging in the sense of a total and in the sense of being subjected to cankers, that same materiality is therefore mentioned among the aggregates as objects of clinging too.
But feeling, etc., are only mentioned among the simple aggregates when they are free from cankers.
When they are subject to cankers, they are mentioned among the aggregates as objects of clinging.
And here the meaning of the term “aggregates as objects of clinging” should be regarded as this: aggregates that are the resort of clinging are aggregates of clinging.
But here all these taken together are intended as aggregates.
As to neither less nor more: but why are five aggregates, neither less nor more, mentioned by the Blessed One?
 Because all formed things that resemble each other fall into these groups, because that is the widest limit as the basis for the assumption of self and what pertains to self, and because of the inclusion80 by them of the other sorts of aggregates.
 When the numerous categories of formed states are grouped together according to similarity,81 materiality forms one aggregate through being grouped together according to similarity consisting in materiality;
feeling forms one aggregate through being grouped together according to similarity consisting in feeling;
So they are stated as five because similar formed things fall into groups.
 And this is the extreme limit as the basis for the assumption of self and what pertains to self, that is to say, the five beginning with materiality.
For this is said: “Bhikkhus, when matter exists, it is through clinging to matter, through insisting upon matter, that such a view as this arises: ‘This is mine, this is I, this is my self.’
When feeling exists … When perception exists … When formations exist … When consciousness exists, it is through clinging to consciousness, through insisting upon consciousness, that such a view as this arises: ‘This is mine, this is I, this is my self’”.
So they are stated as five because this is the widest limit as a basis for the assumption of self and what pertains to self.
 And also, since those other sorts of aggregates stated as the five aggregates of things beginning with virtue82 are comprised within the formations aggregate, they are included here too.
Therefore they are stated as five because they include the other sorts. This is how the exposition should be known as to neither less nor more.
As to simile: the materiality aggregate as object of clinging is like a sick-room because it is the dwelling-place, as physical basis, door, and object, of the sick man, namely, the consciousness aggregate as object of clinging.
The feeling aggregate as object of clinging is like the sickness because it afflicts.
The perception aggregate as object of clinging is like the provocation of the sickness because it gives rise to feeling associated with greed, etc., owing to perception of sense desires, and so on.
The formations aggregate as object of clinging is like having recourse to what is unsuitable because it is the source of feeling, which is the sickness;
The consciousness aggregate as object of clinging is like the sick man because it is never free from feeling, which is the sickness.
Also they are like the prison, the punishment, the offence, the punisher, and the offender. And they are like the dish, the food, the curry sauce poured over the food, the server, and the eater.83 This is how the exposition should be known as to simile.
Twice as to how to be seen: the exposition should be known twice as to how to be seen, namely, in brief and in detail.
In brief that is, collectively the five aggregates as objects of clinging should be seen as an enemy with drawn sword in the Snake Simile, as a burden according to the Burden Sutta, as a devourer according to the To-be-devoured Discourse, and as impermanent, painful, not- self, formed, and murderous, according to the Yamaka Sutta .
In detail that is, individually, matter should be regarded as a lump of froth because it will not stand squeezing,
In particular, even sublime internal materiality84 should be regarded as foul ;
As to good for one seeing thus: good comes to be accomplished in one who sees in the two ways thus in brief and in detail. And the way of definition should be known according to that,
that is to say, firstly, one who sees the five aggregates as objects of clinging in the form of an enemy with drawn sword, etc., is not worried by the aggregates, but one who sees materiality, etc.,
And in particular, one who sees internal materiality as foul fully understands nutriment consisting of physical nutriment.
He abandons the perversion of perceiving beauty in the foul , he crosses the flood of sense desire, he is loosed from the bond of sense desire, he becomes canker-free as regards the canker of sense desire, he breaks the bodily tie of covetousness. He does not cling with sense-desire clinging.
One who sees feeling as pain fully understands nutriment consisting of contact. He abandons the perversion of perceiving pleasure in the painful. He crosses the flood of becoming. He is loosed from the bond of becoming. He becomes canker-free as regards the canker of becoming. He breaks the bodily tie of ill will. He does not cling with rules-and-vows clinging.
One who sees perception and formations as not-self fully understands nutriment consisting of mental volition. He abandons the perversion of perceiving self in the not-self. He crosses the flood of views. He is loosed from the bond of views.
He breaks the bodily tie of interpretations that “This is the truth.” He does not cling with self-theory clinging.
One who sees consciousness as impermanent fully understands nutriment consisting of consciousness. He abandons the perversion of perceiving permanence in the impermanent. He crosses the flood of ignorance. He is loosed from the bond of ignorance. He becomes canker-free as regards the canker of ignorance. He breaks the bodily tie of holding to rules and vows. He does not cling with false- view clinging.
Such blessings there will be From seeing them as murderers and otherwise,
Therefore the wise should see The aggregates as murderers and otherwise.
in the Path of Purification composed for the purpose of gladdening good people.
in the Treatise on the Development of Understanding
nor is order of abandoning applicable, because the profitable and indeterminate are not to be abandoned;
nor is order of practice, because what is unprofitable is not to be practiced;
nor is order of plane, because feeling, etc., are included in all four planes.
Order of teaching is appropriate however;
then formations, which form volitionally through the means of perception;
and after that, feeling, which feels matter as desirable and undesirable;
then perception, which apprehends the aspects of feeling’s objective field, since “What one feels, that one perceives” ;
according as it is said:
and so with perception and the other two.
for it is said: “Feeling as feeling is the formed that they form” ,
and likewise: “Because of unprofitable kamma having been performed and stored up, resultant body-consciousness has arisen accompanied by pain” .
feeling as a bubble on water because it can only be enjoyed for an instant,
perception as a mirage because it causes illusion,
formations as a plantain trunk because they have no core,
and consciousness as a conjuring trick because it deceives .
feeling should be regarded as painful because it is never free from the three kinds of suffering ;
perception and formations as not-self because they are unmanageable;
and consciousness as impermanent because it has the nature of rise and fall.
in detail as a lump of froth, etc., is not one who sees a core in the coreless.
called The Description of the Aggregates
The fourteenth chapter
Consciousness dominates because of the words, ‘Dhammas have mind as their forerunner’ , ‘Dhammas that have parallel turn-over with consciousness’ , and ‘The king, lord of the six doors ’
When all formed dhammas are grouped together according to similarity, they naturally fall into five aggregates.
Herein, it is the items that are the same owing to the sameness consisting respectively in ‘molesting,’ etc., that are to be understood as ‘similar.’
Among them, those that are strong in the volition whose nature is accumulating with the function of forming the formed, are called the formations aggregate.
And the others, that is, contact, etc., which are devoid of the distinguishing characteristics of ‘being molested,’ etc., may also be so regarded under the generality of forming the formed. But the similarities consisting in touching are not describable separately by the word ‘aggregate,’ and so that is why no aggregates of contact, etc., have been stated by the Perfect One who knows the similarities of dhammas.
‘Bhikkhus, whatever ascetics or brahmans there are who are asserters of eternity and declare the self and the world to be eternal, all do so depending and relying on these same five aggregates or on one or other of them’ , and so on.
Consciousness is like the offender because it is afflicted by feeling. Consciousness is like the eater because it is helped by feeling
The formations aggregate is like the punisher because it is a cause of feeling. The formations aggregate is like the server because it is a cause of feeling;
and service is included since one who is taking a meal is usually served.
Perception is like the offence because owing to perception of beauty, etc., it is a cause of the punishment, which is feeling. Perception is like the curry sauce because, owing to perception of beauty, etc., it hides the food, which is feeling.
The matter of the body is like the prison because it is the site of the punishment. Again, matter is like the dish because it bears the food.
The “faculties” listed next to the elements are the twenty-two faculties, namely, eye faculty, ear faculty, nose faculty, tongue faculty, body faculty, mind faculty, femininity faculty, masculinity faculty, life faculty, bodily pleasure faculty, bodily pain faculty, mental joy faculty, mental grief faculty, equanimity faculty, faith faculty, energy faculty, mindfulness faculty, concentration faculty, understanding faculty, “I-shall-come-to-know-the-unknown” faculty, final- knowledge faculty, final-knower faculty.
Herein:
 As to meaning, character and so on, Order, should be known.
divided and undivided, Likewise function, and also plane— The exposition.
1. Herein, firstly, the meaning of eye, etc., is explained in the way beginning: “It relishes , thus it is an eye ” .
But as regards the last three, the first is called the “I-shall-come-to-know-the-unknown” faculty because it arises in the initial stage of the stream-entry path moment in one who has entered on the way thus “I shall come to know the deathless state, or the Dhamma of the Four Truths, not known,”1 and because it carries the meaning of faculty .
The second of them is called the final-knowledge faculty because of knowing finally, and because it carries the meaning of faculty.
The third is called the final-knower faculty because it arises in one who has destroyed cankers, who possesses final knowledge, and whose task of getting to know the four truths is finished, and because it carries the meaning of faculty.
But what is this meaning of faculty that they have?
 The meaning of being the mark of a ruler is the meaning of faculty .
 The meaning of being taught by a ruler is the meaning of faculty,
 The meaning of having been fostered by a ruler is the meaning of faculty.2
The Blessed One, Fully Enlightened, is a ruler because of supreme lordship.
And so is kamma, profitable and unprofitable; for no one has lordship over the kinds of kamma.
So here, the faculties , which are created by kamma, are the mark of profitable and unprofitable kamma.
And since they are prepared by it, they are faculties in the sense of being the mark of a ruler and in the sense of having been prepared by a ruler.
But since they have also been correctly made evident and disclosed by the Blessed One, they are all faculties in the sense of being taught by a ruler and in the sense of being seen by a ruler.
And since some of them were cultivated by the Blessed One, Ruler of Sages, in his cultivation of domain and some in his cultivation of development, they are faculties in the sense of being fostered by a ruler.
Furthermore, they are faculties in the sense of lordship called predominance.
For predominance of the eye, etc., is implied in the occurrence of eye-consciousness, etc., because of the keenness when that faculty is keen and slowness when it is slow.
This, firstly, is the exposition as to meaning.
2. As to character and so on: the meaning is that the exposition of the eye and so on should be known according to characteristic, function, manifestation, proximate cause, and so on.
But these characteristics, etc., of theirs are given above in the Description of the Aggregates .
For the four beginning with the understanding faculty are simply non-delusion as to meaning.
The rest are each given there as such.
As to order: this too is only order of teaching .
Herein, the noble plane which is the stage of stream-entry, etc. is attained through the full- understanding of internal states, and so the eye faculty and the rest included in the selfhood are taught first.
Then the femininity faculty and masculinity faculty, to show on what account that selfhood is called “woman” or “man.”
Next the bodily- pleasure faculty, etc., to make it known , and that all feeling is ultimately suffering.
Next, the faith faculty, etc., to show the way, since these things are to be developed in order to make that suffering cease.
Next, the “I-shall-come-to-know-the-unknown” faculty to show that the way is not sterile, since it is through this way that this state is first manifested in oneself.
Next, the final-knowledge faculty, because it is the fruit of the last-mentioned faculty and so must be developed after it.
Next, the final-knower faculty, the supreme reward, is taught last to make it known that it is attained by development, and that when it is attained there is nothing more to be done. This is the order here.
4. As to divided and undivided: here there is only division of the life faculty;
for that is twofold as the material-life faculty and the immaterial-life faculty.
There is no division of the others. This is how the exposition should be known here as to divided and undivided.
As to function: what is the faculties’ function?
Firstly, because of the words “The eye base is a condition, as faculty condition, for the eye-consciousness element and for the states associated therewith” the eye faculty’s function is to cause by its own keenness, slowness, etc., the occurrence of eye- consciousness and associated states, etc., in a mode parallel to its own,3 which is called their keenness, slowness, etc., this function being accomplishable through the state of faculty condition.
So too in the case of the ear, nose, tongue, and body.
But the function of the mind faculty is to make conascent states subject to its own mastery.
That of the life faculty is to maintain conascent states.
That of the femininity faculty and the masculinity faculty is to allot the modes of the mark, sign, work and ways of women and men.
That of the faculties of pleasure, pain, joy, and grief is to govern conascent states and impart their own particular mode of grossness to those states.
That of the equanimity faculty is to impart to them the mode of quiet, superiority and neutrality.
That of the faculties of faith, etc., is to overcome opposition and to impart to associated states the mode of confidence and so on.
That of the “I-shall-come-to-know-the-unknown” faculty is both to abandon three fetters and to confront associated states with the abandonment of them.
That of the final-knowledge faculty is both to attenuate and abandon respectively lust, ill will, etc., and to subject conascent states to its own mastery.
That of the final-knower faculty is both to abandon endeavour in all functions and to condition associated states by confronting them with the Deathless. This is how the exposition should be known here as to function.
As to plane: the faculties of eye, ear, nose, tongue, body, femininity, masculinity, pleasure, pain, and grief are of the sense sphere only.
The mind faculty, life faculty, and equanimity faculty, and the faculties of faith, energy, mindfulness, concentration, and understanding are included in the four planes.
The joy faculty is included in three planes, namely, sense sphere, fine-material sphere, and supramundane.
The last three are supramundane only. This is how the exposition should be known here as to plane.
The monk who knows the urgent need To keep the faculties restrained
By fully understanding them Will make an end of suffering.
This is the section of the detailed explanation dealing with the faculties.
 The meaning of being seen by a ruler is the meaning of faculty,
And all that applies here in one instance or another.
 The meaning of having been prepared by a ruler is the meaning of faculty,
Next, the life faculty, to make it known that although that selfhood is twofold, still its existence is bound up with the life faculty.
that there is no remission of these feelings as long as that selfhood continues
In the noble path moment’s initial stage
Let a wise man with mindfulness So practice that he may begin
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at SavatthI in Jeta’s Grove, Anathapindika’s Park.
There he addressed the bhikkhus thus: “Bhikkhus.”
- “Venerable sir,” they replied.
The Blessed One said this: 2. “Bhikkhus, I shall teach you the character of a true man and the character of an untrue man.1064
- “Yes, venerable sir,” the bhikkhus replied.
The Blessed One said this:
Here an untrue man who has gone forth from an aristocratic family
So he lauds himself and disparages others because of his aristocratic family.
This is the character of an untrue man.
“But a true man considers thus: ‘It is not because of one’s aristocratic family that states of greed, hatred, or delusion are destroyed.
Even though someone may not have gone forth from an aristocratic family, yet if he has entered upon the way that accords with the Dhamma, entered upon the proper way, and conducts himself according to the Dhamma, he should be honoured for that, he should be praised for that.’
So, putting the practice of the way first, he neither lauds himself nor disparages others because of his aristocratic family.
This is the character of a true man.
“Moreover, an untrue man who has gone forth from a great family…from a wealthy family…from an influential family
So he lauds himself and disparages others because of his influential family.
This too is the character of an untrue man.
“But a true man considers thus: ‘It is not because of one’s influential family that states of greed, hatred, or delusion are destroyed.
Even though someone may not have gone forth from an influential family, yet if he has entered upon the way that accords with the Dhamma, entered upon the proper way, and conducts himself according to the Dhamma, he should be honoured for that, he should be praised for that.’
So, putting the practice of the way first, he neither lauds himself nor disparages others because of his influential family.
This too is the character of a true man.
“Moreover, an untrue man who is well known and famous
So he lauds himself and disparages others because of his renown.
This too is the character of an untrue man.
“But a true man considers thus: ‘It is not because of one’s renown that states of greed, hatred, or delusion are destroyed.
Even though someone may not be well known and famous, yet if he has entered upon the way that accords with the Dhamma, entered upon the proper way, and conducts himself according to the Dhamma, he should be honoured for that, he should be praised for that.’
So, putting the practice of the way first, he neither lauds himself nor disparages others because of his renown.
This too is the character of a true man.
“Moreover, an untrue man who gains robes, almsfood, resting places, and requisites of medicine
So he lauds himself and disparages others because of gain.
This too is the character of an untrue man.
“But a true man considers thus: ‘It is not because of gain that states of greed, hatred, or delusion are destroyed.
Even though someone has no gain, yet if he has entered upon the way that accords with the Dhamma, entered upon the proper way, and conducts himself according to the Dhamma, he should be honoured for that, he should be praised for that.’
So, putting the practice of the way first, he neither lauds himself nor disparages others because of gain.
This too is the character of a true man.
“Moreover, an untrue man who is learned…
So he lauds himself and disparages others because of his being a one-session eater.
This too is the character of an untrue man.
“But an untrue man considers thus: ‘It is not because of being a one-session eater that states of greed, hatred, or delusion are destroyed.
Even though someone may not be a one-session eater, yet if he has entered upon the way that accords with the Dhamma, entered upon the proper way, and conducts himself according to the Dhamma, he should be honoured for that, he should be praised for that.’
So, putting the practice of the way first, he neither lauds himself nor disparages others because of his being a one-session eater.
This too is the character of a true man.
“Moreover, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, an untrue man enters upon and abides in the first jhana, which is accompanied by applied and sustained thought, with rapture and pleasure born of seclusion.
He considers thus: ‘I have gained the attainment of the first jhana; but these other bhikkhus have not gained the attainment of the first jhana.’
So he lauds himself and disparages others because of his attainment of the first jhana.
This too is the character of an untrue man.
“But a true man considers thus: ‘Non-identification even with the attainment of the first jhana has been declared by the Blessed One;
So, putting non-identification first, he neither lauds himself nor disparages others because of his attainment of the first jhana.
This too is the character of a true man.
“Moreover, with the stilling of applied and sustained thought, an untrue man enters upon and abides in the second jhana…With the fading away as well of rapture…he enters upon and abides in the third jhana…With the abandoning of pleasure and pain…he enters upon and abides in the fourth jhana
“Moreover, by completely surmounting the base of infinite consciousness, aware that ‘there is nothing,’ an untrue man enters upon and abides in the base of nothingness
So he lauds himself and disparages others because of his attainment of the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception.
This too is the character of an untrue man.
“But a true man considers thus: ‘Non-identification even with the attainment of the base of neither-perception-nor-non- perception has been declared by the Blessed One;
So, putting non-identification first, he neither lauds himself nor disparages others because of his attainment of the base of neither- perception-nor-non-perception.
This too is the character of a true man.
“Moreover, by completely surmounting the base of neither- perception-nor-non-perception, a true man enters upon and abides in the cessation of perception and feeling.1067
This bhikkhu does not conceive anything, he does not conceive in regard to anything, he does not conceive in any way.”
That is what the Blessed One said.
The bhikkhus were satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
When he has quite cleared up his discerning of materiality, then the immaterial states become evident to him through one of three aspects, that is, through contact, through feeling, or through consciousness.
How?
1. When he discerns the four primary elements in the way beginning, “The earth element has the characteristic of hardness” , contact becomes evident to him as the first conjunction. Then the feeling associated with that as the feeling aggregate, the associated perception as the perception aggregate, the associated volition together with the aforesaid contact as the formations aggregate, and the associated consciousness as the consciousness aggregate.
 Likewise when he has discerned them in this way, “In the head hair it is the earth element that has the characteristic of hardness … in the in- breaths and out-breaths it is the earth element that has the characteristic of hardness” , contact becomes evident as the first conjunction. Then the feeling associated with it as the feeling aggregate, … the associated consciousness as the consciousness aggregate.
This is how immaterial states become evident through contact.
 To another who discerns the four primary elements in the way beginning “The earth element has the characteristic of hardness,” the feeling that has that as its object and experiences its stimulus as pleasant, etc., becomes evident as the feeling aggregate, the perception associated with that as the perception aggregate, the contact and the volition associated with that as the formations aggregate, and the consciousness associated with that as the consciousness aggregate.
 Likewise to one who discerns them in this way “In the head hair it is the earth element that has the characteristic of hardness … in the in-breaths and out-breaths it is the earth element that has the characteristic of hardness,” the feeling that has that as its object and experiences its stimulus becomes evident as the feeling aggregate … and the consciousness associated with that as the consciousness aggregate.
This is how the immaterial states become evident through feeling.
 To another who discerns the four primary elements in the way beginning “The earth element has the characteristic of hardness,” the consciousness that cognizes the object becomes evident as the consciousness aggregate, the feeling associated with it as the feeling aggregate, the associated perception as the perception aggregate, and the associated contact and volition as the formations aggregate.
 Likewise to one who discerns them in this way “In the head hair it is the earth element that has the characteristic of hardness … in the in-breaths and out-breaths it is the earth element that has the characteristic of hardness,” the consciousness that cognizes the object becomes evident as the consciousness aggregate … and the associated contact and volition as the formations aggregate.
This is how the immaterial states become evident through consciousness.
In the case of the ways of discerning materiality as consisting of the forty- two aspects of the elements beginning with the head hairs that is, thirty-two aspects of the body, four aspects of the fire element and six aspects of the air element, either by these same means given above or by means of the method beginning, “In the kamma-originated head hairs it is the earth element that has the characteristic of hardness—and also in the case of the methods of discerning materiality as consisting of the eye, etc.—by means of the four primary elements in each, the construing should be done by working out all the differences in each method.
Now, it is only when he has become quite sure about discerning materiality in this way that immaterial states become quite evident to him in the three aspects.
Therefore he should only undertake the task of discerning the immaterial states after he has completed that, not otherwise.
If he leaves off discerning materiality when, say, one or two material states have become evident in order to begin discerning the immaterial, then he falls from his meditation subject like the mountain cow already described under the Development of the Earth Kasiṇa .
But if he undertakes the task of discerning the immaterial after he is already quite sure about discerning materiality thus, then his meditation subject comes to growth, increase and perfection.
He defines the four immaterial aggregates that have thus become evident through contact, etc., as “mentality.” And he defines their objects, namely, the four primaries and the materiality derived from the four primaries, as “materiality.”
So, as one who opens a box with a knife, as one who splits a twin palmyra bulb in two, he defines all states of the three planes,9 the eighteen elements, twelve bases, five aggregates, in the double way as “mentality- materiality,”
and he concludes that over and above mere mentality-materiality there is nothing else that is a being or a person or a deity or a Brahmā.
‘All states of the three planes’ is said all-inclusively owing to the necessity not to omit anything suitable for comprehension. .
For it must be fully understood without any exception, and greed must be made to fade away absolutely so that the mind may be liberated by the fading away of greed.
That is why the Blessed One said:
‘Bhikkhus, without directly knowing, without fully understanding all, without causing the fading away of greed for it, without abandoning it, the mind is incapable of the destruction of suffering.
Bhikkhus, it is by directly knowing, by fully understanding all, by causing the fading away of greed for it, by abandoning it, that the mind is capable of the destruction of suffering’ .
If all the states of the three planes are taken as mentality-materiality without exception, then how should one deal with what has been conceived by those outside the Dispensation as verbal meanings, such as the Primordial Essence , etc. e.g. of the Sāṃkhya, the substance , etc. e.g. of the Vaiøeåika, the soul , etc., and the body , etc. ?
Since these are like the hallucination of lunatics and are taught by the not fully enlightened, what other way of dealing with them is there than to ignore them?
Or alternatively, their existence or non-existence can be understood as established by their inclusion within mentality- materiality.
Wherever the verbal meaning of self is expressed by some such metaphor as world-soul , self , soul , etc., these being themselves conceived in their various ways on the basis of mere mentality-materiality, are mere mentality-materiality, too.
After defining mentality-materiality thus according to its true nature, then in order to abandon this worldly designation of “a being” and “a person” more thoroughly, to surmount confusion about beings and to establish his mind on the plane of non-confusion, he makes sure that the meaning defined, namely, “This is mere mentality-materiality, there is no being, no person” is confirmed by a number of suttas.
For this has been said:
As with the assembly of parts The word “chariot” is countenanced,
So, when the aggregates are present, “A being” is said in common usage .
Again, this has been said: “Just as when a space is enclosed with timber and creepers and grass and clay, there comes to be the term ‘house,’ so too, when a space is enclosed with bones and sinews and flesh and skin, there comes to be the term ‘material form’ ” .
And again this has been said:
It is ill alone that rises, Ill that remains, ill that departs.
Nothing rises else than ill, And nothing ceases else than ill .
So in many hundred suttas it is only mentality-materiality that is illustrated, not a being, not a person.
Therefore, just as when the component parts such as axles, wheels, frame poles, etc., are arranged in a certain way, there comes to be the mere term of common usage “chariot,” yet in the ultimate sense when each part is examined there is no chariot—
The vision of one who sees in this way is called correct vision.
But when a man rejects this correct vision and assumes that a permanent being exists,
If he concludes that it does not come to be annihilated, he falls into the eternity view.
If he concludes that it does come to be annihilated, he falls into the annihilation view.
Why?
Because the assumption precludes any gradual change like that of milk into curd.
So he either holds back, concluding that the assumed being is eternal,
Hence the Blessed One said:
And how do some hold back?
Deities and human beings love becoming, delight in becoming, rejoice in becoming.
When Dhamma is taught to them for the ceasing of becoming, their minds do not enter into it, become settled, steady and resolute.
Thus it is that some hold back.
And how do some overreach?
Some are ashamed, humiliated and disgusted by that same becoming, they are concerned with non-becoming in this way: ‘Sirs, when with the breakup of the body this self is cut off, annihilated, does not become any more after death, that is peaceful, that is sublime, that is true.’
Thus it is that some overreach.
And how do those with eyes see?
Here a bhikkhu sees what is become as become. Having seen what is become as become, he has entered upon the way to dispassion for it, to the fading away of greed for it, to its cessation.
This is how one with eyes sees” .
Therefore, just as a marionette is void, soulless and without curiosity, and while it walks and stands merely through the combination of strings and wood,
This is how it should be regarded.
Hence the Ancients said:
The mental and material are really here,
But here there is no human being to be found,
For it is void and merely fashioned like a doll—
Just suffering piled up like grass and sticks.
And this should be explained not only by means of the simile of the marionette, but also by means of the analogies of the sheaves of reeds and so on. For just as when two sheaves of reeds are propped one against the other, each one gives the other consolidating support, and when one falls the other falls, so too, in the five-constituent becoming mentality-materiality occurs as an interdependent state, each of its components giving the other consolidating support,
and when one falls owing to death, the other falls too.
Hence the Ancients said:
The mental and material Are twins and each supports the other;
When one breaks up they both break up Through interconditionality.
And just as when sound occurs having as its support a drum that is beaten by the stick, then the drum is one and the sound another, the drum and the sound are not mixed up together, the drum is void of the sound and the sound is void of the drum, so too, when mentality occurs having as its support the materiality called the physical basis, the door and the object, then the materiality is one and the mentality is another, the mentality and materiality are not mixed up together, the mentality is void of the materiality and the materiality is void of the mentality; yet the mentality occurs due to the materiality as the sound occurs due to the drum.
Hence the Ancients said:
The pentad based on contact comes not from the eye,
Or from things seen, or something that is in between;
Due to a cause it comes to be, and formed as well.
Just as the sound that issues from a beaten drum.
The pentad based on contact comes not from the ear.
Or yet from sound, or something that is in between; Due to a cause …
The pentad based on contact comes not from the nose
Or yet from smells, or something that is in between; Due to a cause …
The pentad based on contact comes not from the tongue,
Or yet from tastes, or something that is in between; Due to a cause …
The pentad based on contact comes not from the body,
Or yet from touch, or something that is in between; Due to a cause …
Being formed, it does not come from the material basis.
Nor does it issue from the mental-datum base;
Due to a cause it comes to be, and formed as well.
Just as the sound that issues from a beaten drum.
Furthermore, mentality has no efficient power, it cannot occur by its own efficient power. It does not eat, it does not drink, it does not speak, it does not adopt postures.
And materiality is without efficient power; it cannot occur by its own efficient power.
For it has no desire to eat, it has no desire to drink, it has no desire to speak, it has no desire to adopt postures. But rather it is when supported by materiality that mentality occurs; and it is when supported by mentality that materiality occurs. When mentality has the desire to eat, the desire to drink, the desire to speak, the desire to adopt a posture, it is materiality that eats, drinks, speaks, and adopts a posture.
But for the purpose of explaining this meaning they gave this simile as an example: a man born blind and a stool-crawling cripple wanted to go somewhere. The blind man said to the cripple, “Look, I can do what should be done by legs, but I have no eyes with which to see what is rough and smooth.”
The cripple said, “Look, I can do what should be done by eyes, but I have no legs with which to go and come.”
The blind man was delighted, and he made the cripple climb up on his shoulder.
Herein, the blind man has no efficient power; he is impotent; he cannot travel by his own efficient power, by his own strength. And the cripple has no efficient power; he is impotent; he cannot travel by his own efficient power, by his own strength. But there is nothing to prevent their going when they support each other. So too, mentality has no efficient power; it does not arise or occur in such and such functions by its own efficient power.
And materiality has no efficient power; it does not arise or occur in such and such functions by its own efficient power. But there is nothing to prevent their occurrence when they support each other.
Hence this is said:
They cannot come to be by their own strength,
Or yet maintain themselves by their own strength;
Relying for support on other states,
Weak in themselves, and formed, they come to be;
They come to be with others as condition.
They are aroused by others as their objects,
They are produced by object and condition,
And each by something other than itself.
And just as men depend upon A boat for traversing the sea.
So does the mental body need The matter-body for occurrence.
And as the boat depends upon The men for traversing the sea.
So does the matter-body need The mental body for occurrence.
Depending each upon the other The boat and men go on the sea.
And so do mind and matter both Depend the one upon the other.
The correct vision of mentality and materiality, which, after defining mentality-materiality by these various methods, has been established on the plane of non-confusion by overcoming the perception of a being, is what should be understood as purification of view.
Other terms for it are “defining of mentality- materiality” and “delimitation of formations.”
in the Path of Purification composed for the purpose of gladdening good people.
in the Treatise on the Development of Understanding
in the ultimate sense there is only mentality-materiality.
so too, when there are the five aggregates as objects of clinging, there comes to be the mere term of common usage “a being,” “a person,” yet in the ultimate sense, when each component is examined, there is no being as a basis for the assumption “I am” or “I”;
just as when trunk, branches, foliage, etc., are placed in a certain way, there comes to be the mere term of common usage “tree,” yet in the ultimate sense, when each component is examined, there is no tree—
with surrounding walls, houses, states, etc., “city”—
with elephants, horses, etc., “army”;
with body and strings, “lute”;
and just as when the fingers, thumb, etc., are placed in a certain way, there comes to be the mere term of common usage “fist,”—
and just as when the component parts of a house such as wattles, etc., are placed so that they enclose a space in a certain way, there comes to be the mere term of common usage “house,” yet in the ultimate sense there is no house—
he has to conclude either that it comes to be annihilated or that it does not.
or he overreaches, concluding that it comes to be annihilated.
“There are two kinds of view, bhikkhus, and when deities and human beings are obsessed by them, some hold back and some overreach; only those with eyes see.
yet it seems as if it had curiosity and interestedness, so too, this mentality- materiality is void, soulless and without curiosity, and while it walks and stands merely through the combination of the two together, yet it seems as if it had curiosity and interestedness.
Sitting on the blind man’s shoulder the cripple spoke thus, “Leave the left, take the right; leave the right, take the left.”
called “The Description of Purification of View”
The eighteenth chapter
The knowledge established by getting to know the path and the not- path thus, “This is the path, this is not the path,” is called “purification by knowledge and vision of what is the path and what is not the path.”
One who desires to accomplish this should first of all apply himself to the inductive insight called “comprehension by groups.1”
Because knowledge of what is the path and what is not the path appears in connection with the appearance of illumination, etc. in one who has begun insight.
For it is after illumination, etc., have appeared in one who has already begun insight that there comes to be knowledge of what is the path and what is not the path. And comprehension by groups is the beginning of insight.
That is why it is set forth next to the overcoming of doubt.
Besides, knowledge of what is the path and what is not the path arises when “full-understanding as investigation” is occurring, and full-understanding as investigation comes next to full- understanding as the known . So this is also a reason why one who desires to accomplish this purification by knowledge and vision of what is the path and what is not the path should first of all apply himself to comprehension by groups.
Here is the exposition: there are three kinds of mundane full-understanding, that is, full-understanding as the known, full-understanding as investigation, and full-understanding as abandoning,
with reference to which it was said: “Understanding that is direct-knowledge is knowledge in the sense of being known.
Understanding that is full-understanding is knowledge in the sense of investigating.
Understanding that is abandoning is knowledge in the sense of giving up” .
Herein, the understanding that occurs by observing the specific characteristics of such and such states thus, “Materiality has the characteristic of being molested ; feeling has the characteristic of being felt,” is called full- understanding as the known.
The understanding consisting in insight with the general characteristics as its object that occurs in attributing a general characteristic to those same states in the way beginning, “Materiality is impermanent, feeling is impermanent” is called full-understanding as investigation.2
Herein, the plane of full-understanding as the known extends from the delimitation of formations up to the discernment of conditions ;
The plane of full-understanding as investigation extends from comprehension by groups up to contemplation of rise and fall ;
The plane of full-understanding as abandoning extends from contemplation of dissolution onwards ;
for from there onwards the seven contemplations that effect the abandoning of the perception of permanence, etc., predominate thus: Contemplating formations as impermanent, a man abandons the perception of permanence. Contemplating them as painful, he abandons the perception of pleasure. Contemplating them as not-self, he abandons the perception of self. Becoming dispassionate, he abandons delighting. Causing fading away, he abandons greed. Causing cessation, he abandons originating. Relinquishing, he abandons grasping .3
So, of these three kinds of full-understanding, only full-understanding as the known has been attained by this meditator as yet, which is because the delimitation of formations and the discernment of conditions have already been accomplished; the other two still remain to be attained.
Hence it was said above: “Besides, knowledge of what is the path and what is not the path arises when full-understanding as investigation is occurring, and full-understanding as investigation comes next to full-understanding as the known. So this is also a reason why one who desires to accomplish this purification by knowledge and vision of what is the path and what is not the path should first of all apply himself to comprehension by groups” .
Here is the text:
“How is it that understanding of defining past, future and present states by summarization is knowledge of comprehension?
“Any materiality whatever, whether past, future or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near—he defines all materiality as impermanent: this is one kind of comprehension.
He defines it as painful: this is one kind of comprehension.
He defines it as not-self: this is one kind of comprehension.
Any feeling whatever … Any perception whatever … Any formations whatever … Any consciousness whatever … He defines all consciousness as impermanent: … He defines it as not-self: this is one kind of comprehension.
The eye … … ageing-and-death, whether past, future or present, he defines it as impermanent: this is one kind of comprehension.
He defines it as painful: this is one kind of comprehension. He defines it as not-self: this is one kind of comprehension.
“Understanding of defining by summarization thus, ‘Materiality, whether past, future, or present, is impermanent in the sense of destruction, painful in the sense of terror, not-self in the sense of having no core,’ is knowledge of comprehension.
Understanding of defining by generalization thus, ‘Feeling … … Consciousness … Eye … … Ageing-and-death, whether past …’ is knowledge of comprehension.
“Understanding of defining by summarization thus, ‘Materiality, whether past, future, or present, is impermanent, formed, dependently arisen, subject to destruction, subject to fall, subject to fading away, subject to cessation,’ is knowledge of comprehension.
Understanding of defining by generalization thus, ‘Feeling … … Consciousness … Eye … … Ageing-and-death, whether past, future, or present, is impermanent, formed, dependently arisen, subject to destruction, subject to fall, subject to fading away, subject to cessation’ is knowledge of comprehension.
“Understanding of defining by summarization thus, ‘With birth as condition there is ageing-and-death; without birth as condition there is no ageing-and- death,’ is knowledge of comprehension.
Understanding of defining by generalization thus, ‘In the past and in the future with birth as condition there is ageing-and-death; without birth as condition there is no ageing-and-death,’ is knowledge of comprehension.
Understanding of defining by generalization thus, ‘With becoming as condition there is birth … With ignorance as condition there are formations; without ignorance as condition there are no formations,’ is knowledge of comprehension.
Understanding of defining by generalization thus, ‘In the past and in the future with ignorance as condition there are formations; without ignorance as condition there are no formations’ is knowledge of comprehension.
“Knowledge is in the sense of that being known
Hence it was said: ‘Understanding of defining past, future, and present states by summarization is knowledge of comprehension’” .
Herein, the abbreviation, “The eye … … Ageing-and-death,” should be understood to represent the following sets of things elided: 1. The states that occur in the doors of consciousness together with the doors and the objects. 2. The five aggregates. 3. The six doors. 4. The six objects. 5. The six kinds of consciousness. 6. The six kinds of contact. 7. The six kinds of feeling. 8. The six kinds of perception. 9. The six kinds of volition. 10. The six kinds of craving. 11. The six kinds of applied thought. 12. The six kinds of sustained thought. 13. The six elements. 14. The ten kasiṇas. 15. The thirty-two bodily aspects. 16. The twelve bases. 17. The eighteen elements. 18. The twenty-two faculties. 19. The three elements. 20. The nine kinds of becoming. 21. The four jhānas. 22. The four measureless states. 23. The four immaterial attainments. 24. The twelve members of the dependent origination.
For this is said in the Paṭisambhidā in the description of what is to be directly known:
And what is all that is to be directly known?
Eye is to be directly known;
Ear … Mind … feeling, pleasant or painful or neither-painful-nor- pleasant, that arises due to mind-contact is also to be directly known.
“ Materiality is to be directly known … consciousness is to be directly known. Eye … mind … Visible objects … mental objects … Eye-consciousness … mind-consciousness … Eye-contact … mind-contact … (
7) Eye-contact-born feeling … mind-contact-born feeling … Perception of visible objects … perception of mental objects … Volition regarding visible objects … volition regarding mental objects … Craving for visible objects … craving for mental objects … Applied thought about visible objects … applied thought about mental objects … Sustained thought about visible objects … sustained thought about mental objects …
Since all this detail is given there it has been abbreviated here.
But what is thus abbreviated includes the supramundane states. These should not be dealt with at this stage because they are not amenable to comprehension.
And as regards those that are amenable to comprehension a beginning should be made by comprehending those among them that are obvious to and easily discernible by the individual meditator.
Here is the application of the directions dealing with the aggregates: “Any materiality whatever, whether past, future, or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near— he defines all materiality as impermanent: this is one kind of comprehension.
He defines it as painful: this is one kind of comprehension. He defines it as not-self: this is one kind of comprehension” .
At this point this bhikkhu takes all materiality, which is described without specifying as “any materiality whatever,” and having delimited it in the eleven instances, namely, with the past triad and with the four dyads beginning with the internal dyad, he “defines all materiality as impermanent,” he comprehends that it is impermanent.
How?
In the way stated next.
For this is said: “Materiality, whether past, future or present, is impermanent in the sense of destruction.”
Accordingly, he comprehends the materiality that is past as “impermanent in the sense of destruction” because it was destroyed in the past and did not reach this becoming;
And he comprehends the materiality that is internal as “impermanent in the sense of destruction” since it is destroyed as internal and does not pass on to the external state.
And he comprehends the materiality that is external … gross … subtle … inferior … superior … far … And he comprehends the materiality that is near as “impermanent in the sense of destruction” since it is destroyed there and does not pass on to the far state. And all this is impermanent in the sense of destruction.
Accordingly, there is “one kind of comprehension” in this way;
but it is effected in eleven ways.
So this is also painful in the sense of terror. Accordingly, there is one kind of comprehension in this way too;
but it is effected in eleven ways.
And just as it is painful, so too all that materiality is “not-self in the sense of having no core.”
Hence it is said, “Bhikkhus, were materiality self,
So this is also not-self in the sense of having no core. Accordingly, there is one kind of comprehension in this way too,
but it is effected in eleven ways.
The same method applies to feeling, and so on.
But what is impermanent is necessarily classed as formed, etc., and so in order to show the synonyms for that impermanence,
or in order to show how the attention given to it occurs in different ways, it is restated in the text thus: “Materiality, whether past, future, or present, is impermanent, formed, dependently arisen, subject to destruction, subject to fall, subject to fading away, subject to cessation” .
Why?
The understanding consisting in insight with the characteristics as its object that occurs as the abandoning of the perception of permanence, etc., in those same states is called full-understanding as abandoning.
for in this interval the penetration of the specific characteristics of states predominates.
for in this interval the penetration of the general characteristics predominates.
and understanding is in the sense of the act of understanding that.
“Bhikkhus, all is to be directly known.
visible objects are to be directly known; eye-consciousness … eye-contact … feeling, pleasant or painful or neither-painful-nor-pleasant, that arises due to eye-contact is also to be directly known.
The first jhāna … the fourth jhāna … The mind-deliverance of loving- kindness … the mind-deliverance of equanimity … The attainment of the base consisting of boundless space … the attainment of the base consisting of neither perception nor non-perception … Ignorance is to be directly known … ageing- and-death is to be directly known” .
The sense-desire element … the fine-material element … the immaterial element … Sense-desire becoming … fine-material becoming … immaterial becoming … percipient becoming … non- percipient becoming … neither percipient nor non-percipient becoming … one- constituent becoming … four-constituent becoming … five-constituent becoming …
The eye base … the mental object base … The eye element … the mind-consciousness element … The eye faculty … the final-knower faculty …
The earth element … the consciousness element … The earth kasiṇa … the consciousness kasiṇa … Head hairs … brain …
and he comprehends the materiality that is future as “impermanent in the sense of destruction” since it will be produced in the next becoming, will be destroyed there too, and will not pass on to a further becoming;
and he comprehends the materiality that is present as “impermanent in the sense of destruction” since it is destroyed here and does not pass beyond.
And all that materiality is “painful in the sense of terror.”
In the sense of terror because of its terrifyingness;
for what is impermanent brings terror, as it does to the deities in the Sīhopama Sutta .
In the sense of having no core because of the absence of any core of self conceived as a self, an abider, a doer, an experiencer, one who is his own master;
for what is impermanent is painful , and it is impossible to escape the impermanence, or the rise and fall and oppression, of self, so how could it have the state of a doer, and so on?
it would not lead to affliction” , and so on.
The same method applies to feeling, and so on.
Comprehension by placing together in groups the states that are differentiated into past, future and present is ‘comprehension by groups.’ This, it seems, is the term used by the inhabitants of Jambudīpa .
However, insight into states by means of the method beginning, ‘Any materiality whatever’ is ‘inductive insight.’ This, it seems, is the term used by the inhabitants of Tambapaṇṇidīpa .
That is why he said “to inductive insight called comprehension by groups’
These are apprehended as though they were attributive material instances because they have to be apprehended under the respective headings of dissolution and rise and fall, of oppression, and of insusceptibility to the exercise of mastery
Hardness, touching, etc., as the respective characteristics of earth, contact, etc., which are observable at all three instants of arising, presence and dissolution, are apprehended by their being established as the respective individual essences of definite materialness. But it is not so with the characteristics of impermanence, and so on.
‘Contemplating as impermanent’ is contemplating, comprehending, formations in the aspect of impermanence.
‘The perception of permanence’ is the wrong perception that they are permanent, eternal;
the kinds of consciousness associated with wrong view should be regarded as included under the heading of ‘perception.’
So too with what follows.
‘Becoming dispassionate’ is seeing formations with dispassion by means of the contemplation of dispassion induced by the contemplations of impermanence, and so on.
‘Delighting’ is craving accompanied by happiness.
‘Causing fading away’ is contemplating in such a way that greed for formations does not arise owing to the causing of greed to fade by the contemplation of fading away ;
for one who acts thus is said to abandon greed.
‘Causing cessation’ is contemplating in such a way that, by the contemplation of cessation, formations cease only, they do not arise in the future through a new becoming;
since one who acts thus is said to abandon the arousing of formations because of producing the nature of non-arising.
‘Relinquishing’ is relinquishing in such a way that, by the contemplation of relinquishment, formations are not grasped anymore;
hence he said, ‘He abandons grasping’; or the meaning is that he relinquishes apprehending them as permanent, and so on.
Now, when the Blessed One was expounding conformity knowledge, he asked the question: “By means of what forty aspects does he acquire liking that is in conformity? By means of what forty aspects does he enter into the certainty of rightness? ” . 4 In the answer to it comprehension of impermanence, etc., is set forth by him analytically in the way beginning:
“Seeing the five aggregates as impermanent, as painful, as a disease, a boil, a dart, a calamity, an affliction, as alien, as disintegrating, as a plague, a disaster, a terror, a menace, as fickle, perishable, unenduring, as no protection, no shelter, no refuge, as empty, vain, void, not-self, as a danger, as subject to change, as having no core, as the root of calamity, as murderous, as due to be annihilated, as subject to cankers, as formed, as Māra’s bait, as subject to birth, subject to ageing, subject to illness, subject to death, subject to sorrow, subject to lamentation, subject to despair, subject to defilement.
this meditator also comprehends these five aggregates by means of that kind of comprehension.
How does he do it?
He does it by means of comprehension as impermanent, etc., stated specifically as follows: He comprehends each aggregate as impermanent because of non-endlessness, and because of possession of a beginning and an end;
as fickle because of fickle insecurity due to sickness, ageing and death, and to the worldly states of gain, etc.;6
Now, there are fifty kinds of contemplation of impermanence here by taking the following ten in the case of each aggregate: as impermanent, as disintegrating, as fickle, as perishable, as unenduring, as subject to change, as having no core, as due to be annihilated, as formed, as subject to death.
There are twenty-five kinds of contemplation of not-self by taking the following five in the case of each aggregate: as alien, as empty, as vain, as void, as not-self.
There are one hundred and twenty-five kinds of contemplation of pain by taking the rest beginning with “as painful, as a disease” in the case of each aggregate.
So when a man comprehends the five aggregates by means of this comprehending as impermanent, etc., in its two hundred aspects, his comprehending as impermanent, painful and not-self, which is called “inductive insight,” is strengthened.
These in the first place are the directions for undertaking comprehension here in accordance with the method given in the texts.
So in order to strengthen that same comprehension of impermanence, pain, and not-self in the five aggregates,
And seeing that the cessation of the five aggregates is the permanent Nibbāna, he enters into the certainty of rightness” .
Seeing the five aggregates as impermanent, he acquires liking that is in conformity.
as painful because of oppression by rise and fall, and because of being the basis for pain;
as a disease because of having to be maintained by conditions, and because of being the root of disease;
as a boil because of being consequent upon impalement by suffering, because of oozing with the filth of defilements, and because of being swollen by arising, ripened by ageing, and burst by dissolution;
as a calamity because of having to be condemned, because of bringing loss, and because of being the basis for calamity;
as a dart because of producing oppression, because of penetrating inside, and because of being hard to extract;
as a plague because of bringing various kinds of ruin;
as disintegrating because of crumbling through sickness, ageing and death;
as a disaster because of bringing unforeseen and plentiful adversity,
as alien because of inability to have mastery exercised over them, and because of intractability;
as an affliction because of restricting freedom, and because of being the foundation for affliction;
and because of being the basis for all kinds of terror, and because of being the opposite of the supreme comfort called the stilling of all suffering;
as a menace because of being bound up with many kinds of adversity, because of being menaced5 by ills, and because of unfitness, as a menace, to be entertained;
as perishable because of having the nature of perishing both by violence and naturally;
as unenduring because of collapsing on every occasion7 and because of lack of solidity;
as no protection because of not protecting, and because of affording no safety;
as no shelter because of unfitness to give shelter,8 and because of not performing the function of a shelter for the unsheltered;9
as no refuge because of failure to disperse fear10 in those who depend on them;
as empty because of their emptiness of the lastingness, beauty, pleasure and self that are conceived about them;
as vain because of their emptiness, or because of their triviality; for what is trivial is called “vain” in the world;
as void because devoid of the state of being an owner, abider, doer, experiencer, director;
as not-self because of itself having no owner, etc.;
as danger because of the suffering in the process of becoming, and because of the danger in suffering or, alternatively, as danger because of resemblance to misery 11 since “danger” means that it is towards misery that it moves , goes, advances, this being a term for a wretched man, and the aggregates are wretched too;
as subject to change because of having the nature of change in two ways, that is, through ageing and through death;
as having no core because of feebleness, and because of decaying soon like sapwood;
as the root of calamity because of being the cause of calamity;
as murderous because of breaking faith like an enemy posing as a friend;
as due to be annihilated because their becoming disappears, and because their non-becoming comes about;
as subject to cankers because of being the proximate cause for cankers;
as formed because of being formed by causes and conditions;
as Māra’s bait because of being the bait laid by the Māra of death and the Māra of defilement;
as subject to birth, to ageing, to illness, and to death because of having birth, ageing, illness and death as their nature;
as subject to sorrow, to lamentation and to despair because of being the cause of sorrow, lamentation and despair;
as subject to defilement because of being the objective field of the defilements of craving, views and misconduct.
‘Liking that is in conformity’ in conformity with the attainment of the path.
for that is called the rightness beginning with right view and also the certainty of an irreversible trend.
The ‘certainty of rightness’ is the noble path;
liking for knowledge that is .
Actually the knowledge itself is the ‘liking’ since it likes , it endures, defining by going into the individual essence of its objective field.
While thus engaged in inductive insight, however, if it does not succeed, he should sharpen his faculties of faith, etc., in the nine ways stated thus: “The faculties become sharp in nine ways: he sees only the destruction of arisen formations; and in that occupation he makes sure of working carefully, he makes sure of working perseveringly, he makes sure of working suitably, and by apprehending the sign of concentration and by balancing the enlightenment factors he establishes disregard of body and life, wherein he overcomes pain by renunciation and by not stopping halfway.12 He should avoid the seven unsuitable things in the way stated in the Description of the Earth Kasiṇa and cultivate the seven suitable things, and he should comprehend the material at one time and the immaterial at another.
While comprehending materiality he should see how materiality is generated,13
that is to say, how this materiality is generated by the four causes beginning with kamma.
Herein, when materiality is being generated in any being, it is first generated from kamma.
For at the actual moment of rebirth- linking of a child in the womb, first thirty instances of materiality are generated in the triple continuity, in other words, the decads of physical heart-basis, body, and sex. And those are generated at the actual instant of the rebirth-linking consciousness’s arising.
And as at the instant of its arising, so too at the instant of its presence and at the instant of its dissolution.14
Herein, the cessation of materiality is slow and its transformation ponderous, while the cessation of consciousness is swift and its transformation quick ;
For the life-continuum consciousness arises and ceases sixteen times while one material instant endures.
With consciousness the instant of arising, instant of presence, and instant of dissolution are equal;
but with materiality only the instants of arising and dissolution are quick like those of consciousness,
The second life-continuum arises with the prenascent physical heart- basis as its support, which has already reached presence and arose at the rebirth-linking consciousness’s instant of arising.
The third life-continuum arises with the prenascent physical basis as its support, which has already reached presence and arose together with that second life-continuum consciousness.
The occurrence of consciousness can be understood to happen in this way throughout life.
But in one who is facing death sixteen consciousnesses arise with a single prenascent physical heart-basis as their support, which has already reached presence.
The materiality that arose at the instant of arising of the rebirth-linking consciousness ceases along with the sixteenth consciousness after the rebirth- linking consciousness.
That arisen at the instant of presence of the rebirth-linking consciousness ceases together with the instant of arising of the seventeenth.
That arisen at the instant of its dissolution ceases on arriving at the instant of presence of the seventeenth.15
Also seventy instances of materiality occur in the same way with the sevenfold continuity beginning with the eye decad of those apparitionally born.
Herein, as regards kamma-born materiality the analysis should be understood thus: kamma, what is originated by kamma, what has kamma as its condition, what is originated by consciousness that has kamma as its condition, what is originated by nutriment that has kamma as its condition, what is originated by temperature that has kamma as its condition .
Herein, kamma is profitable and unprofitable volition.
What is originated by kamma is the kamma-resultant aggregates and the seventy instances of materiality beginning with the eye decad.
What has kamma as its condition is the same as the last since kamma is the condition that upholds what is originated by kamma.
What is originated by consciousness that has kamma as its condition is materiality originated by kamma-resultant consciousness.
What is originated by nutriment that has kamma as its condition is so called since the nutritive essence that has reached presence in the instances of materiality originated by kamma originates a further octad-with-nutritive-essence-as-eighth, and the nutritive essence there that has reached presence also originates a further one, and so it links up four or five occurrences of octads.
What is originated by temperature that has kamma as its condition is so called since the kamma-born fire element that has reached presence originates an octad-with-nutritive-essence-as-eighth, which is temperature-originated, and the temperature in that originates a further octad-with- nutritive-essence-as eighth, and so it links up four or five occurrences of octads.
This is how the generation of kamma-born materiality in the first place should be seen.
Also as regards the consciousness-born kinds, the analysis should be understood thus: consciousness, what is originated by consciousness, what has consciousness as its condition, what is originated by nutriment that has consciousness as its condition, what is originated by temperature that has consciousness as its condition.
Herein, consciousness is the eighty-nine kinds of consciousness.
Among these: Consciousnesses thirty-two, And twenty-six, and nineteen too,
Are reckoned to give birth to matter, Postures, also intimation; Sixteen kinds of consciousness Are reckoned to give birth to none.
As regards the sense sphere, thirty-two consciousnesses, namely, the eight profitable consciousnesses , the twelve unprofitable , the ten functional excluding the mind element , and the two direct-knowledge consciousnesses as profitable and functional, give rise to materiality, to postures, and to intimation.
The twenty-six consciousnesses, namely, the ten of the fine-material sphere and the eight of the immaterial sphere excluding the resultant in both cases, and the eight supramundane , give rise to materiality, to postures but not to intimation.
The nineteen consciousnesses, namely, the ten life-continuum consciousnesses in the sense sphere , the five in the fine-material sphere , the three mind elements , and the one resultant mind-consciousness element without root- cause and accompanied by joy , give rise to materiality only, not to postures or to intimation.
The sixteen consciousnesses, namely, the two sets of five consciousnesses , the rebirth-linking consciousness of all beings, the death consciousness of those whose cankers are destroyed, and the four immaterial resultant consciousnesses do not give rise to materiality or to postures or to intimation.
And those herein that do give rise to materiality do not do so at the instant of their presence or at the instant of their dissolution, for consciousness is weak then.
But it is strong at the instant of arising. Consequently it originates materiality then with the prenascent physical basis as its support.
What is originated by consciousness is the three other immaterial aggregates and the seventeenfold materiality, namely, the sound ennead, bodily intimation, verbal intimation, the space element, lightness, malleability, wieldiness, growth, and continuity.
What has consciousness as its condition is the materiality of fourfold origination stated thus: “Postnascent states of consciousness and consciousness- concomitants are a condition, as postnascence condition, for this prenascent body” .
What is originated by nutriment that has consciousness as its condition: the nutritive essence that has reached presence in consciousness-originated material instances originates a further octad-with-nutritive-essence-as-eighth, and thus links up two or three occurrences of octads.
What is originated by temperature that has consciousness as its condition: the consciousness-originated temperature that has reached presence originates a further octad-with-nutritive-essence-as-eighth, and thus links up two or three occurrences.
This is how the generation of consciousness-born materiality should be seen.
Also as regards the nutriment-born kinds, the analysis should be understood thus: nutriment, what is originated by nutriment, what has nutriment as its condition, what is originated by nutriment that has nutriment as its condition, what is originated by temperature that has nutriment as its condition.
Herein, nutriment is physical nutriment.
What is originated by nutriment is the fourteenfold materiality, namely, that of the octad-with-nutritive- essence-as-eighth originated by nutritive essence that has reached presence by obtaining as its condition kamma-born materiality that is clung to and basing itself on that,16 and space element, lightness, malleability, wieldiness, growth, and continuity.
What has nutriment as its condition is the materiality of fourfold origination stated thus: “Physical nutriment is a condition, as nutriment condition, for this body” .
What is originated by nutriment that has nutriment as its condition: the nutritive essence that has reached presence in nutriment-originated material instances originates a further octad-with-nutritive-essence-as-eighth and the nutritive essence in that octad originates a further octad, and thus links up the occurrence of octads ten or twelve times.
Nutriment taken on one day sustains for as long as seven days;
but divine nutritive essence sustains for as long as one or two months.
The nutriment taken by a mother originates materiality by pervading the body of the child in gestation.
Also nutriment smeared on the body originates materiality.
Kamma-born nutriment is a name for nutriment that is clung to.
That also originates materiality when it has reached presence. And the nutritive essence in it originates a further octad. Thus it links up four or five occurrences.
What is originated by temperature that has nutriment as its condition: nutriment-originated fire element that has reached presence originates an octad- with-nutritive-essence-as-eighth that is thus temperature-originated.
Here this nutriment is a condition for nutriment-originated material instances as their progenitor. It is a condition for the rest as support, nutriment, presence, and non-disappearance. This is how the generation of nutriment-born materiality should be seen.
Also as regards the temperature-born kinds, the analysis should be understood thus: temperature, what is originated by temperature, what has temperature as its condition, what is originated by temperature that has temperature as its condition, what is originated by nutriment that has temperature as its condition.
Herein, temperature is the fire element of fourfold origination; but it is twofold as hot temperature and cold temperature.
What is originated by temperature: the temperature of fourfold origination that has reached presence by obtaining a clung-to condition originates materiality in the body.
That materiality is fifteenfold, namely, sound ennead, space element, lightness, malleability, wieldiness, growth, continuity.
What has temperature as its condition is so called since temperature is a condition for the occurrence and for the destruction of materiality of fourfold origination.
What is originated by temperature that has temperature as its condition: the temperature-originated fire element that has reached presence originates a further octad-with-nutritive-essence-as-eighth, and the temperature in that octad originates a further octad. Thus temperature-originated materiality both goes on occurring for a long period and also maintains itself as well in what is not clung to.17
What is originated by nutriment that has temperature as its condition: the temperature-originated nutritive essence that has reached presence originates a further octad-with-nutritive-essence-as-eighth, and the nutritive essence in that originates a further one, thus it links up ten or twelve occurrences of octads.
Herein, this temperature is a condition for temperature-originated material instances as their progenitor. It is a condition for the rest as support, presence, and non-disappearance. This is how the generation of temperature-born materiality should be seen.
One who sees the generation of materiality thus is said to “comprehend the material at one time” .18
hence it is said, “Bhikkhus, I see no other one thing that is so quickly transformed as the mind” .
while the instant of its presence is long and lasts while sixteen consciousnesses arise and cease.
It goes on occurring thus for as long as the recurrence of births continues.
It is first generated from kamma because the temperature-born kinds, etc., are rooted in that
‘By obtaining as its condition kamma-born materiality that is clung-to’: by this he points out that external un-clung-to nutritive essence does not perform the function of nourishing materiality.
And ‘clung-to’ is specifically mentioned in order to rule out any question of there being a ‘kamma- born’ method for ‘materiality originated by consciousness that has kamma as its condition’ just because it happens to be rooted in kamma There is no such method.
He said ‘and basing itself on that’ meaning that its obtaining of a condition is owing to its being supported by what is kamma-born.
What is intended is head hair, body hair, nails, teeth, skin, callosities, warts, etc., which are separate from the flesh in a living body; otherwise a corpse, and so on
When the generation of materiality is seen its dissolution also is seen, and so he said, ‘One who sees the generation of materiality thus is said to comprehend the material at one time’ because of the brevity of states’ occurrence;
for it is not the seeing of mere generation that is called comprehension but there must be seeing of rise and fall besides.
So too the apprehending of generation in the other instances.
And just as one who is comprehending the material should see the generation of the material, so too one who is comprehending the immaterial should see the generation of the immaterial.
And that is through the eighty-one mundane arisings of consciousness,
that is to say, it is by kamma accumulated in a previous becoming that this immaterial mentality is generated. And in the first place it is generated as one of the nineteen kinds of arisings of consciousness as rebirth-linking .
But the modes in which it is generated should be understood according to the method given in the Description of the Dependent Origination .
That same nineteenfold arising of consciousness is generated as life-continuum as well, starting from the consciousness next to rebirth-linking consciousness, and as death consciousness at the termination of the life span.
And when it is of the sense sphere, and the object in the six doors is a vivid one, it is also generated as registration.
In the course of an existence, eye-consciousness, together with its associated states, supported by light and caused by attention is generated because the eye is intact and because visible data have come into focus.
For it is actually when a visible datum has reached presence that it impinges on the eye at the instant of the eye- sensitivity’s presence.
When it has done so, the life-continuum arises and ceases twice.
Next to arise is the functional mind element with that same object, accomplishing the function of adverting.
Next to that, eye-consciousness, which is the result of profitable or of unprofitable kamma and sees that same visible datum.
Next, the resultant mind element, which receives that same visible datum.
Next, the resultant root-causeless mind-consciousness element, which investigates that same visible datum.
Next, the functional mind-consciousness element without root-cause and accompanied by equanimity, which determines that same visible datum.
Next, it is generated either as one from among the profitable –), unprofitable , or functional kinds of consciousness belonging to the sense sphere, either as consciousness accompanied by equanimity and without root-cause ,19 or as five or seven impulsions.
Next, in the case of sense-sphere beings, it is generated as any of the eleven kinds of registration consciousness conforming as to object with the impulsions.
The same applies to the remaining doors.
But in the case of the mind door-exalted consciousnesses also arise.
This is how the generation of the immaterial should be seen in the case of the six doors.
One who sees the generation of the immaterial thus is said to “comprehend the immaterial at another time” .
This is how one meditator accomplishes the development of understand- ing, progressing gradually by comprehending at one time the material and at another time the immaterial, by attributing the three characteristics to them.
This refers to determining
Another comprehends formations by attributing the three characteristics to them through the medium of the material septad and the immaterial septad.
Herein, one who comprehends them by attributing the characteristics in the following seven ways is said to comprehend by attributing through the medium of the material septad, that is to say, as taking up and putting down, as disappearance of what grows old in each stage, as arising from nutriment, as arising from temperature, as kamma-born, as consciousness-originated, and as natural materiality.
Hence the Ancients said:
“ As taking up and putting down, As growth and decline in every stage,
As nutriment, as temperature, As kamma, and as consciousness,
As natural materiality— He sees with seven detailed insights.”
Herein, taking up is rebirth-linking.
Putting down is death.
So the meditator allots one hundred years for this “taking up” and “putting down” and he attributes the three characteristics to formations.
How?
All formations between these limits are impermanent.
Why?
Because of the occurrence of rise and fall, because of change, because of temporariness, and because of preclusion of permanence.
But since arisen formations have arrived at presence, and when present are afflicted by ageing, and on arriving at ageing are bound to dissolve, they are therefore painful because of continual oppression, because of being hard to bear, because of being the basis of suffering, and because of precluding pleasure.
And since no one has any power over arisen formations in the three instances, “Let them not reach presence”, “Let those that have reached presence not age,” and “Let those that have reached ageing not dissolve,” and they are void of the possibility of any power being exercised over them, they are therefore not-self because void, because ownerless, because unsusceptible to the wielding of power, and because of precluding a self.20
2. Having attributed the three characteristics to materiality allotted one hundred years for the “taking up” and “putting down” thus, he next attributes them according to disappearance of what grows old in each stage.
Herein, “disappearance of what grows old in each stage” is a name for the disappearance of the materiality that has grown old during a stage of life.
The meaning is that he attributes the three characteristics by means of that.
How?
He divides that same hundred years up into three stages, that is, the first stage, the middle stage, and the last stage.
Herein, the first thirty-three years are called the first stage,
So after dividing it up into these three stages, he attributes the three characteristics thus: The materiality occurring in the first stage ceased there without reaching the middle stage: therefore it is impermanent;
Also the materiality occurring in the middle stage ceased there without reaching the last stage: therefore it is impermanent too and painful and not-self.
Also there is no materiality occurring in the thirty-three years of the last stage that is capable of out-lasting death: therefore that is impermanent too and painful and not-self. This is how he attributes the three characteristics.
2. Having attributed the three characteristics according to “disappearance of what grows old in each stage” thus by means of the first stage, etc., he again attributes the three characteristics according to “disappearance of what grows old in each stage” by means of the following ten decades: the tender decade, the sport decade, the beauty decade, the strength decade, the understanding decade, the decline decade, the stooping decade, the bent decade, the dotage decade, and the prone decade.
Herein, as to these decades: in the first place, the first ten years of a person with a hundred years’ life are called the tender decade; for then he is a tender unsteady child.
The next ten years are called the sport decade; for he is very fond of sport then.
The next ten years are called the beauty decade; for his beauty reaches its full extent then.
The next ten years are called the strength decade; for his strength and power reach their full extent then.
The next ten years are called the understanding decade; for his understanding is well established by then. Even in one naturally weak in understanding some understanding, it seems, arises at that time.
The next ten years are called the decline decade; for his fondness for sport and his beauty, strength, and understanding decline then.
The next ten years are called the stooping decade; for his figure stoops forward then.
The next ten years are called the bent decade; for his figure becomes bent like the end of a plough then.
The next ten years are called the dotage decade;
The next ten years are called the prone decade; for a centenarian mostly lies prone.
Herein, in order to attribute the three characteristics according to “disappearance of what grows old in each stage” by means of these decades, the meditator considers thus: The materiality occurring in the first decade ceases there without reaching the second decade: therefore it is impermanent, painful, not-self.
The materiality occurring in the second decade … the materiality occurring in the ninth decade ceases there without reaching the tenth decade;
the materiality occurring in the tenth decade ceases there without reaching the next becoming: therefore it is impermanent, painful, not-self. That is how he attributes the three characteristics.
2. Having attributed the three characteristics according to “disappear- ance of what grows old in each stage” thus by means of the decades, he again attributes the three characteristics according to “disappearance of what grows old in each stage” by taking that same hundred years in twenty parts of five years each.
How?
He considers thus: The materiality occurring in the first five years ceases there without reaching the second five years: therefore it is impermanent, painful, not-self.
The materiality occurring in the second five years … in the third … in the nineteenth five years ceases there without reaching the twentieth five years.
There is no materiality occurring in the twentieth five years that is capable of outlasting death; therefore that is impermanent too, painful, not-self.
2. Having attributed the three characteristics according to “disappear- ance of what grows old in each stage” thus by means of the twenty parts, he again attributes the three characteristics according to “disappearance of what grows old in each stage” by taking twenty-five parts of four years each.
 Next, by taking thirty-three parts of three years each, by taking fifty parts of two years each, by taking a hundred parts of one year each.
 Next he attributes the three characteristics according to “disappearance of what grows old in each stage” by means of each of the three seasons, taking each year in three parts.
How?
The materiality occurring in the four months of the rains ceases there without reaching the winter .
The materiality occurring in the winter ceases there without reaching the summer .
The materiality occurring in the summer ceases there without reaching the rains again: therefore it is impermanent, painful, not-self.
2. Having attributed them thus, he again takes one year in six parts and attributes the three characteristics to this materiality according to “disappearance of what grows old in each stage” thus: The materiality occurring in the two months of the rains ceases there without reaching the autumn .
The materiality occurring in the autumn …
2. Having attributed them thus, he next attributes the characteristics by means of the dark and bright halves of the moon thus: The materiality occurring in the dark half of the moon ceases there without reaching the bright half;
2. Next he attributes the three characteristics by means of night and day thus: The materiality occurring in the night ceases there without reaching the day;
the materiality occurring in the day ceases there without reaching the night: therefore it is impermanent, painful, not-self.
2. Next he attributes the three characteristics by taking that same day in six parts beginning with the morning thus: The materiality occurring in the morning ceased there without reaching the noon;
 Having attributed them thus, he again attributes the three characteristics to that same materiality by means of moving forward and moving backward, looking toward and looking away, bending and stretching, thus: The materiality occurring in the moving forward ceases there without reaching the moving backward;
therefore it is impermanent, painful, not-self .
 Next he divides a single footstep into six parts as “lifting up,” “shifting forward,” “shifting sideways,” “lowering down,” “placing down,” and “fixing down21.”
Herein, lifting up is raising the foot from the ground.
Shifting forward is shifting it to the front.
Shifting sideways is moving the foot to one side or the other in seeing a thorn, stump, snake, and so on.
Lowering down is letting the foot down.
Placing down is putting the foot on the ground.
Fixing down is pressing the foot on the ground while the other foot is being lifted up.
Herein, in the lifting up two elements, the earth element and the water element, are subordinate22 and sluggish while the other two are predominant and strong.
Likewise in the shifting forward and shifting sideways.
In the lowering down two elements, the fire element and the air element, are subordinate and sluggish while the other two are predominant and strong.
Likewise in the placing down and fixing down.
He attributes the three characteristics to materiality according to “disappearance of what grows old in each stage” by means of these six parts into which he has thus divided it.
How?
He considers thus: The elements and the kinds of derived materiality occurring in the lifting up all ceased there without reaching the shifting forward: therefore they are impermanent, painful, not-self.
Likewise those occurring in the shifting forward … the shifting sideways;
those occurring in the shifting sideways … the lowering down;
When he sees formations stage by stage with insight thus, his comprehension of materiality has become subtle.
Here is a simile for its subtlety.
A border dweller, it seems, who was familiar with torches of wood and grass, etc., but had never seen a lamp before, came to a city. Seeing a lamp burning in the market, he asked a man, “I say, what is that lovely thing called?”
—“What is lovely about that? It is called a lamp. Where it goes to when its oil and wick are used up no one knows.”
Another told him, “That is crudely put; for the flame in each third portion of the wick as it gradually burns up ceases there without reaching the other parts.”
Herein, the meditator’s attribution of the three characteristics to materiality delimited by the hundred years as “taking up” and “putting down” is like the man’s knowledge stated thus, “Where it goes when its oil and wick are used up no one knows.”
3–6. Having in various ways thus attributed the three characteristics to materiality according to “disappearance of what grows old in each stage,” he analyzes that same materiality and divides it into four portions as “arising from nutriment,” etc., and he again attributes the three characteristics to each portion.
Herein, materiality arising from nutriment becomes evident to him through hunger and its satisfaction.
For materiality that is originated when one is hungry is parched and stale, and it is as ugly and disfigured as a parched stump, as a crow perching in a charcoal pit.
That originated when hunger is satisfied is plump, fresh, tender, smooth and soft to touch.
Discerning that:
That arising from temperature becomes evident through cool and heat.
For materiality that is originated when it is hot is parched, stale and ugly.
Materiality originated by cool temperature is plump, fresh, tender, smooth, and soft to touch.
Discerning that: “The materiality occurring when it is hot ceases there without reaching the time when it is cool.
The materiality occurring when it is cool ceases there without reaching the time when it is hot: therefore it is impermanent, painful, not-self.” he attributes the three characteristics to it thus .
5. The kamma-born becomes evident through the sense doors, that is, the base of consciousness.
For in the case of the eye door there are thirty material instances with decads of the eye, the body, and sex; but with the twenty-four instances originated by temperature, consciousness, and nutriment, that is to say, three bare octads, which are their support, there are fifty-four.
Likewise in the case of the doors of the ear, nose, and tongue.
In the case of the body door there are forty-four with the decads of body and sex and the instances originated by temperature, and so on.
In the case of the mind door there are fifty-four, too, with the decads of the heart-basis, the body, and sex, and those instances originated by the temperature, and so on.
Discerning all that materiality, he attributes the three characteristics to it thus: The materiality occurring in the eye door ceases there without reaching the ear door;
6. The consciousness-originated becomes evident through the behaviour of one who is joyful or grieved. For the materiality arisen at the time when he is joyful is smooth, tender, fresh and soft to touch.
That arisen at the time when he is grieved is parched, stale and ugly.
Discerning that, he attributes the three characteristics to it thus: The materiality occurring at the time when one is joyful ceases there without reaching the time when one is grieved;
the materiality occurring at the time when one is grieved ceases there without reaching the time when one is joyful: therefore it is impermanent, painful, not-self.
When he discerns consciousness-originated materiality and attributes the three characteristics to it in this way, this meaning becomes evident to him:
Life, person, pleasure, pain just these alone
Join in one conscious moment that flicks by.
Gods, though they live for four-and-eighty thousand
Eons, are not the same for two such moments.
Ceased of those dead or alive
aggregates Are all alike, gone never to return;
And those that break up meanwhile, and in future,
Have traits no different from those ceased before.
No world is born if consciousness is not Produced; when that is present, then it lives;
When consciousness dissolves, the world is dead: The highest sense this concept will allow.
No store of broken states, no future stock;
Those born balance like seeds on needle points.
Breakup of states is foredoomed at their birth;
Those present decay, unmingled with those past.
They come from nowhere, break up, nowhere go;
7.Having attributed the three characteristics to that arising from nutriment, etc., he again attributes the three characteristics to natural materiality.
Natural materiality is a name for external materiality that is not bound up with faculties and arises along with the eon of world expansion, for example, iron, copper, tin, lead, gold, silver, pearl, gem, beryl, conch shell, marble, coral, ruby, opal, soil, stone, rock, grass, tree, creeper, and so on .
That becomes evident to him by means of an asoka-tree shoot.
For that to begin with is pale pink; then in two or three days it becomes dense red, again in two or three days it becomes dull red, next brown, the colour of a tender mango shoot; next, the colour of a growing shoot; next, the colour of pale leaves;
next, the colour of dark green leaves.
Discerning that, he attributes the three characteristics to it thus: The materiality occurring when it is pale pink ceases there without reaching the time when it is dense red;
the materiality occurring when it is the colour of dark green leaves … the time when it is withered foliage;
This is how, firstly, he comprehends formations by attributing the three characteristics to them by means of the material septad.
the next thirty-four years are called the middle stage,
and the next thirty-three years are called the last stage.
what is impermanent is painful;
what is painful is not-self.
for he is doting then and forgets what he does.
in the spring …
the materiality occurring in the summer ceases there without reaching the rains again: therefore it is impermanent too, painful, not-self.
in the cool …
in the winter …
the materiality occurring in the bright half ceases there without reaching the dark half: therefore it is impermanent, painful, not-self.
the materiality occurring in the noon … without reaching the evening;
the materiality occurring in the evening … the first watch;
the materiality occurring in the first watch … the middle watch;
the materiality occurring in the middle watch ceased there without reaching the last watch;
the materiality occurring in the last watch ceased there without reaching the morning again: therefore it is impermanent, painful, not- self.
the materiality occurring in the bending ceases there without reaching the stretching:
the materiality occurring in the looking away … the bending;
the materiality occurring in the moving backward … the looking toward;
the materiality occurring in the looking toward … the looking away;
therefore they are impermanent, painful, not-self.
thus formations keep breaking up, like crackling sesame seeds put into a hot pan; wherever they arise, there they cease stage by stage, section by section, term by term, each without reaching the next part:
those occurring in the lowering down … the placing down;
those occurring in the placing down cease there without reaching the fixing down;
Other told him, “That is crudely put too; for the flame in each inch, in each half-inch, in each thread, in each strand, will cease without reaching the other strands;
but the flame cannot appear without a strand.”
The meditator’s attribution of the three characteristics to materiality delimited by means of each part, namely, “moving forward,” etc., and “lifting up,” etc., is like the man’s knowledge stated thus, “The flame in each strand will cease without reaching the others.”
The meditator’s attribution of the three characteristics to materiality delimited by means of the dark and bright halves of the moon, by means of night and day, and by means of morning, etc., taking one night and day in six parts, is like the man’s knowledge stated thus, “The flame in each thread will cease without reaching the others.”
The meditator’s attribution of the three characteristics to materiality delimited by the four-month and two-month periods by classing the year as threefold and sixfold respectively according to the seasons is like the man’s knowledge stated thus, “The flame in each half-inch will cease without reaching the others.”
The meditator’s attribution of the three characteristics to materiality delimited by the periods of ten, five, four, three, two years, one year, is like the man’s knowledge stated thus, “The flame in each inch will cease without reaching the others.”
The meditator’s attribution of the three characteristics according to “disappearance of what grows old in each stage” to the materiality delimited by the third part of the hundred years is like the man’s knowledge stated thus, “The flame in each third portion of the wick ceases without reaching the other parts.”
The materiality occurring when hunger is satisfied ceases there without reaching the time when one is hungry; therefore it is impermanent, painful, not-self.” he attributes the three characteristics to it thus .
the materiality occurring in the ear door … the nose door;
the materiality occurring in the nose door … the tongue door;
the materiality occurring in the tongue door … the body door;
the materiality occurring in the body door ceases there without reaching the mind door: therefore it is impermanent, painful, not-self.
Flash in and out, as lightning in the sky23.
After it has become the colour of dark green leaves, as it follows out the successive stages of such material continuity, it eventually becomes withered foliage, and at the end of the year it breaks loose from its stem and falls off.
the materiality occurring when it is dense red … dull red;
the materiality occurring when it is dull red … the colour of a tender mango shoot;
the materiality occurring when it is the colour of a tender mango shoot … the colour of a growing shoot;
the materiality occurring when it is the colour of a growing shoot … the colour of pale green leaves;
the materiality occurring when it is the colour of pale green leaves … the colour of dark green leaves;
the materiality occurring when it is withered foliage ceases there without reaching the time when it breaks loose from its stem and falls off: therefore it is impermanent, painful, not-self. He comprehends all natural materiality in this way.
No one, not even the Blessed One, has such mastery;
for it is impossible for anyone to alter the three characteristics.
The province of supernormal power is simply the alteration of a state.
‘Because of precluding a self’ means because of precluding the self conceived by those outside the Dispensation;
for the non-existence in dhammas of any self as conceived by outsiders is stated by the words, ‘because void’; but by this expression it is stated that there is no self because there is no such individual essence
Listen and attend closely to what I shall say.”
“Bhikkhus, what is the character of an untrue man?
The headings of what was called above “the immaterial septad” are these: by groups, by pairs, by moments, by series, by removal of false view, by abolition of conceit, by ending of attachment.
1.Herein, by groups means the states belonging to the contact pentad.24
Here, “he comprehends by groups” means that a bhikkhu considers thus: The states belonging to the contact pentad arising in the comprehending of head hairs as “impermanent, painful, not-self”; the states belonging to the contact pentad arising in the comprehending of body hairs as … in the contemplation of brain as “impermanent, painful, not-self”—all these states disintegrate section by section, term by term, like crackling sesame seeds put into a hot pan, each without reaching the next: therefore they are impermanent, painful, not-self.
This, firstly, is the method according to the Discourse on Purification.25
According to the Discourse on the Noble Ones’ Heritages, however, he is said to “comprehend by groups” when by means of a subsequent consciousness he comprehends as “impermanent, painful, not-self” that consciousness which occurred comprehending materiality as “impermanent, painful, not-self” in the seven instances of the material septad given above.
As this method is more suitable we shall therefore confine ourselves to it in explaining the rest.
2. By pairs: after the bhikkhu has comprehended as “impermanent, painful, not-self” the materiality of the “taking up and putting down” , he comprehends that consciousness with which he was comprehending the materiality too as “impermanent, painful, not-self” by means of a subsequent consciousness.
After he has comprehended as “impermanent, painful, not-self” the materiality of the “disappearance of what grows old in each stage” and that “arising from nutriment,” “arising from temperature,” “kamma-born,” “consciousness-originated” and “natural,” he comprehends that consciousness too as “impermanent, painful, not-self” by means of a subsequent consciousness.
In this way he is said to comprehend by pairs.
3. By moments: after the bhikkhu has comprehended as “impermanent, pain- ful, not-self” the materiality of the “taking up and putting down,” he comprehends that first consciousness with which he was comprehending the materiality as “impermanent, painful, not-self” by means of a second consciousness, and that second consciousness by means of a third, and the third by means of a fourth, and the fourth by means of a fifth, and that too he comprehends as “impermanent, painful, not-self.”
By series: after he has comprehended as “impermanent, painful, not- self” the materiality of the “taking up and putting down,” he comprehends that first consciousness as “impermanent, painful, not-self” by means of a second consciousness, and the second by means of a third, and the third by means of a fourth … and the tenth by means of an eleventh, and that too he comprehends as “impermanent, painful, not-self.”
But both the material meditation subject and the immaterial meditation subject become familiar when the comprehending is taken as far as the tenth consciousness.
That is why it is said26 that it can be stopped at the tenth.
It is when he comprehends in this way that he is said to comprehend by series.
By removal of false view, 6. by abolition of conceit, 7. by ending of attachment: there is no individual method for any of these three.
But when he has discerned this materiality as described above and this immateriality as described here, then he sees that there is no living being over and above the material and the immaterial.
As soon as he no longer sees a being, the perception of a being is removed.
When he discerns formations with consciousness from which perception of a being has been removed, then false view does not arise in him.
When false view does not arise in him, then false view is said to be removed.
When he discerns formations with consciousness from which false view has been removed, then conceit does not arise in him.
When conceit does not arise, conceit is said to be abolished.
When he discerns formations with consciousness from which conceit has been abolished, then craving does not arise in him.
When craving does not arise in him, attachment is said to be ended. This firstly is what is said in the Discourse on Purification.
But in the Discourse on the Noble Ones’ Heritages, after setting forth the headings thus: “As removal of false view, as abolition of conceit, as ending of attachment,” the following method is set forth:
There is no abolition of conceit in one who takes it thus, ‘I see thoroughly with insight, I see well with insight’;
There is no ending of attachment in one who is pleased with insight thus, ‘I am able to see with insight’;
“There is removal of false view in one who sees thus: ‘If formations were self, it would be right to take them as self; but being not-self they are taken as self. Therefore they are not-self in the sense of no power being exercisable over them; they are impermanent in the sense of non-existence after having come to be; they are painful in the sense of oppression by rise and fall.’
“There is abolition of conceit in one who sees thus: ‘If formations were permanent, it would be right to take them as permanent; but being impermanent they are taken as permanent. Therefore they are impermanent in the sense of non-existence after having come to be; they are painful in the sense of oppression by rise and fall; they are not-self in the sense of no power being exercisable over them.’
“There is ending of attachment in one who sees thus: ‘If formations were pleasant, it would be right to take them as pleasant; but being painful they are taken as pleasant. Therefore they are painful in the sense of oppression by rise and fall; they are impermanent in the sense of non-existence after having come to be; they are not-self in the sense of no power being exercisable over them.’
there comes to be the abolishing of conceit in one who sees them as impermanent;
So this insight is valid in each instance.”
This is how he comprehends formations by attributing the three characteristics to them by means of the immaterial septad.
At this stage both the material meditation subject and the immaterial meditation subject have become familiar to him.
Having thus become familiar with the material and immaterial meditation subjects, and so having penetrated here already a part of those eighteen principal insights27 which are later on to be attained in all their aspects by means of full- understanding as abandoning starting with contemplation of dissolution, he consequently abandons things opposed to what he has already penetrated.
Eighteen principal insights is a term for understanding that consists in the kinds of insight beginning with contemplation of impermanence.
Now, as regards these: One who develops the contemplation of impermanence abandons the perception of permanence, one who develops the contemplation of pain abandons the perception of pleasure, one who develops the contemplation of not-self abandons the perception of self, one who develops the contemplation of dispassion abandons delighting, one who develops the contemplation of fading away abandons greed, one who develops the contemplation of cessation abandons origination, one who develops the contemplation of relinquishment abandons grasping, one who develops the contemplation of destruction abandons the perception of compactness, one who develops the contemplation of fall of formations abandons accumulation of kamma, one who develops the contemplation of change abandons the perception of lastingness, one who develops the contemplation of the signless abandons the sign, one who develops the contemplation of the desireless abandons desire, one who develops the contemplation of voidness abandons misinterpreting , one who develops the insight into states that is higher understanding abandons misinterpreting due to grasping at a core, one who develops correct knowledge and vision abandons misinterpreting due to confusion, one who develops the contemplation of danger abandons misinterpreting due to reliance, one who develops the contemplation of reflection abandons non-reflection, one who develops the contemplation of turning away abandons misinterpreting due to bondage .28
Now the meditator has seen formations by means of the three characteristics beginning with impermanence, and so he has therefore already penetrated among these eighteen insights the contemplations of impermanence, pain, and not-self.
And then the contemplation of impermanence and the contemplation of the signless are one in meaning and different only in the letter,
Consequently these have been penetrated by him as well.
But insight into states that is higher understanding is all kinds of insight,
Consequently, these two have been penetrated by him as well.
As to the remaining kinds of insight, some have been penetrated and some not. We shall deal with them below.29
For it was with reference only to what has already been penetrated that it was said above: “having thus become familiar with the material and immaterial meditation subjects, and so having penetrated here already a part of those eighteen principal insights, which are later on to be attained in all their aspects by means of full understanding as abandoning starting with contemplation of dissolution,
How?
After he has comprehended as “impermanent, painful, not-self” the materiality of “disappearance of what grows old in each stage” and that “aris- ing from nutriment,” “arising from temperature,” “kamma-born,” “conscious- ness-originated” and “natural,” he comprehends that first consciousness as “im- permanent, painful, not-self” by means of a second consciousness, and that second consciousness by means of a third, and the third by means of a fourth, and the fourth by means of a fifth, and that too he comprehends as “impermanent, painful, not-self.”
Comprehending thus four consciousnesses from each discerning of materiality he is said to comprehend by moments.
After he has comprehended as “impermanent, painful, not-self” the materiality of the “disappearance of what grows old in each stage” and that “arising from nutriment,” “arising from temperature,” “kamma-born,” “consciousness-originated” and “natural,” he comprehends that consciousness as “impermanent, painful, not-self” by means of a second consciousness, and the second by means of a third, … and the tenth by means of an eleventh, and that too he comprehends as “impermanent, painful, not-self.” It would be possible to go on comprehending it in this way with serial insight even for a whole day.
“There is no removal of false view in one who takes it thus, ‘I see with insight, my insight’;
there is removal of false view in one who takes it thus, ‘Only formations see formations with insight, comprehend, define, discern, and delimit them.’
there is abolition of conceit in one who takes it thus, ‘Only formations see formations with insight, comprehend, define, discern, and delimit them.’
there is ending of attachment in one who takes it thus, ‘Only formations see formations with insight, comprehend, define, discern, and delimit them.’
“Thus there comes to be the removal of false view in one who sees formations as not-self;
there comes to be the ending of attachment in one who sees them as painful.
and so are the contemplation of pain and the contemplation of the desireless,
and so are the contemplation of not-self and the contemplation of voidness .
and correct knowledge and vision is included in purification by overcoming doubt .
he consequently abandons things opposed to what he has already penetrated” .
‘Contemplation of destruction’ is the contemplation of the momentary dissolution of formations.
‘Perception of compactness’ is the assumption of unity in a continuity or mass or function or object.
‘Contemplation of destruction’ is contemplation of non- existence after having been, they say.
Contemplation of destruction is the understanding by means of which he resolves the compact into its elements and sees that it is impermanent in the sense of destruction.
Its completion starts with contemplation of dissolution, and so there is abandoning of perception of compactness then, but before that there is not, because it has not been completed.
Seeing change in the two ways through aging and through death in what is born, or seeing another essence subsequent to the delimitation of such and such an essence supervening in what was discerned by means of the material septad, and so on, is ‘contemplation of change’; by its means he abandons the ‘perception of lastingness,’ the assumption of stability.
his consciousness does not incline with craving to the occurrence of that aggregate-process of existence for the purpose of which one accumulates kamma.
The seeing of the dissolution of formations both by actual experience and by inference and the directing of attention to their cessation, in other words, their dissolution, is contemplation of fall; through it accumulation of kamma is abandoned;
– The three beginning with ‘contemplation of the signless’ are the same as the three beginning with contemplation of impermanence.
for owing to it the mind retreats and recoils from all formations, like a water drop on a lotus leaf, so by its means he abandons the ‘misinterpretation due to bondage,’ which is the occurrence of the defilements consisting of the fetters of sense desire, and so on.
Equanimity about formations and conformity knowledge are ‘contemplation of turning away’;
The knowledge of reflection that is the means to deliverance from formations is ‘contemplation of reflection’; by its means he abandons the ignorance that is ‘non-reflection’ on impermanence, etc., and is opposed to reflection on them.
The knowledge consisting in the seeing of danger in all kinds of becomings, etc., which has arisen owing to the appearance of terror is ‘contemplation of danger’; by its means he abandons the craving occurring as ‘misinterpreting due to reliance’ because he does not see any reliance or support.
by its means he abandons the ‘misinterpreting due to confusion’ that begins thus, ‘Was I in the past?’ and that begins thus, ‘Thus the world is created by an Overlord’ .
‘Correct knowledge and vision’ is a term for the seeing of mentality-materiality with its conditions;
Insight that occurs by knowing an object consisting of a visible datum, etc., and by seeing the dissolution of the consciousness that had that visible datum, etc., as its object, and by apprehending voidness through the dissolution thus, ‘Only formations dissolve, there is nothing beyond the death of formations,’ is the higher understanding, and that is insight into states, thus it is ‘insight into states that is higher understanding’; by its means he abandons the view accompanied by craving that is the misinterpretation occurring as grasping at a permanent core, and so on.
It is owing to their opposing the ‘sign,’ etc., that the contemplations of impermanence, etc., are called by the names of ‘signless,’ etc.; so they should be regarded as opposed to the apprehension of a sign, etc., just as they are to the perception of permanence, and so on.
‘Misinterpreting’ is misinterpreting as self.
‘Desire’ is longing for pleasure, or it is desire consisting in greed, and so on; it means inclinationto formations owing to craving.
‘The sign’ is the mere appearance of formations as if graspable entities, which is due to the individualization of particular functions and which, owing to perception of unity in continuity and in mass, is assumed to be temporarily enduring or permanent.
Said in the Discourse on the Noble Ones’ Heritages
Now, when he is a beginner of insight with this tender insight, ten imperfections of insight arise in him.
For imperfections of insight do not arise either in a noble disciple who has reached penetration of the truths or in persons erring in virtue, neglectful of their meditation subject and idlers.
They arise only in a clansman who keeps to the right course, devotes himself continuously to his meditation subject and is a beginner of insight.
But what are these ten imperfections?
They are: illumination, knowledge, rapturous happiness, tranquillity, bliss , resolution, exertion, assurance, equanimity, and attachment.
For this is said:
When a man is bringing formations to mind as impermanent, illumination arises in him. He adverts to the illumination thus, ‘Illumination is a Noble One’s state.’33 The distraction due to that is agitation.
When his mind is seized by that agitation, he does not understand correctly their appearance as impermanent,
he does not understand correctly their appearance as painful, he does not understand correctly their appearance as not-self.
“Likewise, when he is bringing formations to mind as impermanent, knowledge arises in him … happiness … tranquillity … bliss … resolution … exertion … establishment … equanimity … attachment arises in him. He adverts to the attachment thus, ‘Attachment is a Noble One’s state.’ The distraction due to that is agitation.
he does not correctly understand their appearance as painful, he does not correctly understand their appearance as not-self” .
1. Herein, illumination is illumination due to insight.34
When he takes what is not the path to be the path and what is not fruition to be fruition, the course of his insight is interrupted.
He drops his own basic meditation subject and sits just enjoying the illumination.
But this illumination arises in one bhikkhu illuminating only as much as the seat he is sitting on;
But in the Blessed One it arose illuminating the ten-thousandfold world-element.
This story illustrates how it varies. Two elders, it seems, were sitting inside a room with a double wall at Cittalapabbata.
It was the Uposatha of the dark of the moon that day. All directions were covered by a blanket of cloud, and at night the four-factored gloom35 prevailed.
Then one elder said, “Venerable sir, the flowers of the five colours on the lion table on the shrine terrace are visible to me now.”
The other said, “What you say is nothing wonderful, friend. Actually the fishes and turtles in the ocean a league away are visible to me now.”
This imperfection of insight usually arises in one who has acquired serenity and insight.
Because the defilements suppressed by the attainments do not manifest themselves, he thinks, “I am an Arahant,” like the Elder Mahā-Nāga who lived at Uccavālika, like the Elder Mahā-Datta who lived at Haṅkana, like the Elder Cūḷa- Sumana who lived in the Nikapenna meditation house at Cittalapabbata.
Here is one story as an illustration. The Elder Dhammadinna, it seems, who lived at Talaṅgara—one of the great ones with cankers destroyed who possessed the categories of discrimination—was the instructor of a large community of bhikkhus.
One day, as he was sitting in his own daytime quarters, he wondered, “Has our teacher, the Elder Mahā-Nāga who lives at Uccavālika, brought his work of asceticism to its conclusion, or not? ” He saw that he was still an ordinary man, and he knew that if he did not go to him, he would die an ordinary man. He rose up into the air with supernormal power and alighted near the elder, who was sitting in his daytime quarters. He paid homage to him, doing his duty, and sat down at one side.
To the question, “Why have you come unexpectedly, friend Dhammadinna?” he replied, “I have come to ask a question, venerable sir.”
He was told, “Ask, friend. If we know, we shall say.” He asked a thousand questions.
The elder replied without hesitation to each question.
To the remark, “Your knowledge is very keen, venerable sir; when was this state attained by you?” he replied, “Sixty years ago, friend.”
“Do you practice concentration, venerable sir?”— “That is not difficult, friend.”
—“Then make an elephant, venerable sir.”
“Now, venerable sir, make that elephant come straight at you with his ears outstretched, his tail extended, putting his trunk in his mouth and making a horrible trumpeting.” The elder did so.
Seeing the frightful aspect of the rapidly approaching elephant, he sprang up and made to run away.
Then the elder with cankers destroyed put out his hand, and catching him by the hem of his robe, he said, “Venerable sir, is there any timidity in one whose cankers are destroyed? ”
Then he recognized that he was still an ordinary man. He knelt at Dhammadinna’s feet and said, “Help me, friend Dhammadinna.”
—“Venerable sir, I will help you; that is why I came. Do not worry.” Then he expounded a meditation subject to him.
The elder took the meditation subject and went up on to the walk, and with the third footstep he reached Arahantship.
The elder was a bhikkhu of hating temperament, it seems.
2. Knowledge is knowledge due to insight.
As he is estimating and judging material and immaterial states perhaps knowledge that is unerring, keen, incisive, and very sharp arises in him, like a lightning flash.
Rapturous happiness is happiness due to insight.
Perhaps at that time the five kinds of happiness, namely, minor happiness, momentary happiness, showering happiness, uplifting happiness, and pervading happiness arise in him filling his whole body.
Tranquillity is tranquillity due to insight.
As he is sitting at that time in his night or day quarters perhaps there is no fatigue or heaviness or rigidity or unwieldiness or sickness or crookedness in his body and his mind, but rather his body and mind are tranquillized, light, malleable, wieldy, quite sharp, and straight.
With his body and mind aided by this tranquillity, etc., he experiences at that time the superhuman delight
with reference to which it is said:
A bhikkhu when his mind is quiet Retires to an empty place,
And his right insight in the Dhamma Gives him superhuman delight.
It is because he comprehends The rise and fall of aggregates
That he finds happiness and joy And knows it to be deathless .
This is how tranquillity, associated with lightness, etc., arises in him, bringing about this superhuman delight.
Bliss is bliss due to insight.
At that time perhaps there arises in him exceedingly refined bliss flooding his whole body.
Resolution is faith.
For strong faith arises in him in association with insight in the form of extreme confidence of consciousness and its concomitants.
7. Exertion is energy.
For well-exerted energy, neither too lax nor too strained, arises in him in association with insight.
8. Assurance is mindfulness.
For well-established , well-founded mindfulness, which is dug in and as immovable as the king of mountains, arises in him in association with insight.
Whatever subject he adverts to, consciously reacts to, gives attention to, reviews, appears to him owing to mindfulness, which descends into it,36 enters into it, just as the other world does to one who has the divine eye.
9. Equanimity is both equanimity about insight and equanimity in adverting.37
It is also equanimity in adverting in the mind door.
For whatever the subject he adverts to, his adverting works as incisively and sharply as a lightning flash, like a red-hot spear plunged into a basket of leaves.
Attachment is attachment due to insight.
For when his insight is adorned with illumination, etc., attachment arises in him, which is subtle and peaceful in aspect, and it relies on that insight;
And as in the case of illumination, so too in the case of the other imperfections that may arise, the meditator thinks thus: “Such knowledge … such rapturous happiness … tranquillity … bliss … resolution … exertion … assurance … equanimity … attachment never arose in me before. I have surely reached the path, reached fruition.” Thus he takes what is not the path to be the path and what is not fruition to be fruition.
When he takes what is not the path to be the path and what is not fruition to be fruition, the course of his insight is interrupted.
He drops his basic meditation subject and sits just enjoying the attachment.
And here illumination, etc., are called imperfections because they are the basis for imperfection, not because they are kammically unprofitable.
But attachment is both an imperfection and the basis for imperfection.
As basis only they amount to ten;
but with the different ways of taking them they come to thirty.
How?
When a man takes it thus, “illumination has arisen in me,” his way of taking is due to false view. When he takes it thus, “How agreeable this illumination that has arisen is,” his way of taking is due to pride . When he relishes the illumination, his way of taking is due to craving. So there are three ways of taking it in the case of illumination, that is to say, due to false view, to pride , and to craving.
Likewise with the rest. So they come to thirty with the three ways of taking them.
Owing to their influence an unskilful, unwary meditator wavers and gets distracted about illumination, etc.,
Hence the Ancients said:
He wavers about illumination, And knowledge, rapturous happiness,
About the tranquilness, the bliss, Whereby his mind becomes confused;
He wavers about resolution, Exertion, and assurance, too,
The adverting-equanimity, And equanimity and attachment .
“How does the mind come to be seized by agitation about higher states?
When his mind is seized by that agitation, he does not correctly understand their appearance as impermanent,
When it arises, the meditator thinks, “Such illumination never arose in me before. I have surely reached the path, reached fruition;” thus he takes what is not the path to be the path and what is not fruition to be fruition.
in another, the interior of his room;
in another, the exterior of his room;
in another the whole monastery … a quarter league … a half league … a league … two leagues … three leagues; in another bhikkhu it arises making a single light from the earth’s surface up to the Brahmā-world.
The elder made an elephant all white.
Such bhikkhus waver on account of illumination.
For equanimity about insight, which is neutrality about formations, arises strongly in him at that time.
and he is not able to discern that attachment as a defilement.
and he sees each one of them-illumination and the rest-as “This is mine, this is I, this is my self” .
‘Equanimity about insight’ is neutrality in the investigation of formations owing to the objective field having been already investigated.
But in meaning, when it occurs thus, it is only neutrality.
The volition associated with mind-door adverting is called ‘equanimity in adverting’ because it occurs in adverting as onlooking 
Illumination due to insight’ is the luminous materiality originated by insight consciousness, and that originated by temperature belonging to his own continuity.
Of these, that originated by insight consciousness is bright and is found only in the meditator’s body. The other kind is independent of his body and spreads all round over what is capable of being experienced by knowledge. It becomes manifest to him too, and he sees anything material in the place touched by it.
He adverts to it as Nibbāna or as the path or as fruition.
The agitation, the distraction, that occurs about whether or not the illumination, etc., are noble states is ‘agitation about higher states’
Friends, any bhikkhu or bhikkhunī who declares the attainment of Arahantship in my presence has always arrived there by four paths or by one of them.
What four?
Here, friends, a bhikkhu develops insight preceded by serenity. While he is developing insight preceded by serenity the path is born in him. He cultivates, develops, repeats that path.
As he does so his fetters are abandoned and his inherent tendencies are brought to an end.
Again, friends, a bhikkhu develops serenity preceded by insight … He develops serenity and insight yoked equally.
Again, friends, a bhikkhu’s mind is seized by agitation about highest states. When that consciousness settles down internally, becomes steady, unified and concentrated, then the path is born in him … his inherent tendencies are brought to an end
But when illumination, etc., arise, a skilful, wary meditator who is endowed with discretion either defines and examines it with understanding thus: “This illumination has arisen.38 But it is impermanent, formed, conditionally arisen, subject to destruction, subject to fall, subject to fading away, subject to cessation.”
Therefore it is not-self in the sense of no power being exercisable over it; it is impermanent in the sense of non-existence after having come to be; it is painful in the sense of oppression by rise and fall,” all of which should be treated in detail according to the method given under the immaterial septad .
And as in the case of illumination, so too with the rest.
Having investigated it thus, he sees the illumination as “This is not mine, this is not I, this is not my self.”
Hence the Ancients said:
So when a man of understanding has Examined these ten things and is now skilled
In agitation about higher states He no more falls a prey to wavering .
So he unravels this thirtyfold skein of imperfections without falling a prey to wavering. “The states consisting in illumination, etc., are not the path;
but it is insight knowledge that is free from imperfections and keeps to its course that is the path.” He defines what is the path and what is not the path thus .
The knowledge that is established in him by his coming to know the path and the not-path thus, “This is the path, this is not the path,” should he understood as the purification by knowledge and vision of what is the path and what is not the path.
So at this point the defining of three truths has been effected by him.
How?
The defining of the truth of suffering has been effected with the defining of mentality-materiality in the purification of view.
The defining of the truth of origination has been effected with the discerning of conditions in the purification by overcoming doubt.
The defining of the truth of the path has been effected with the emphasizing of the right path in this purification by knowledge and vision of what is the path and what is not the path. So the defining of three truths has been effected firstly by means of mundane knowledge only.
in the Path of Purification composed for the purpose of gladdening good people.
in the Treatise on the Development of Understanding
called “The Description of Purification by Knowledge and Vision of What Is the Path and What is Not the Path”
Or he thinks: “If illumination were self, it would be right to take it as self;
but being not-self, it is taken as self.
He sees knowledge … … attachment as “This is not mine, this is not I, this is not my self.”
Seeing thus, he does not waver or vacillate about the illumination, and so on.
The twentieth chapter
Now, insight reaches its culmination with the eight knowledges, and knowledge in conformity with truth1 is ninth; these are what is called purification by knowledge and vision of the way.
The eight should be understood as follows: knowledge of contemplation of rise and fall, which is insight free from imperfections and steady on its course, knowledge of contemplation of dissolution, knowledge of appearance as terror, knowledge of contemplation of danger, knowledge of contemplation of dispassion, knowledge of desire for deliverance, knowledge of contemplation of reflection, and knowledge of equanimity about formations.2
“Knowledge in conformity with truth as ninth” is a term for conformity.
So one who wants to perfect this should make these kinds of knowledge his task, starting with knowledge of rise and fall free from imperfections.
But why does he again pursue knowledge of rise and fall?
To observe the three characteristics.
The knowledge of rise and fall already dealt with, being disabled by the ten imperfections, was not capable of observing the three characteristics in their true nature;
So he should pursue it again here in order to observe the characteristics.
Now, the characteristics fail to become apparent when something is not given attention and so something conceals them. What is that?
Firstly, the characteristic of impermanence does not become apparent because when rise and fall are not given attention, it is concealed by continuity.
The characteristic of pain does not become apparent because, when continuous oppression is not given attention, it is concealed by the postures.
The characteristic of not-self does not become apparent because when resolution into the various elements is not given attention, it is concealed by compactness.
However, when continuity is disrupted by discerning rise and fall, the characteristic of impermanence becomes apparent in its true nature.
When the postures are exposed by attention to continuous oppression, the characteristic of pain becomes apparent in its true nature.
When the resolution of the compact is effected by resolution into elements, the characteristic of not- self becomes apparent in its true nature.3
And here the following differences should be understood: the impermanent, and the characteristic of impermanence; the painful, and the characteristic of pain; the not-self, and the characteristic of not-self.
Herein, the five aggregates are impermanent.
Why?
Because they rise and fall and change, or because of their non-existence after having been.
Rise and fall and change are the characteristic of impermanence; or mode alteration, in other words, non-existence after having been is the characteristic of impermanence.4
Those same five aggregates are painful because of the words, “What is impermanent is painful” .
Why?
Because of continuous oppression. The mode of being continuously oppressed is the characteristic of pain.
Those same five aggregates are not-self because of the words, “What is painful is not-self” .
Why?
Because there is no exercising of power over them. The mode of insusceptibility to the exercise of power is the characteristic of not- self.
The meditator observes all this in its true nature with the knowledge of the contemplation of rise and fall, in other words, with insight free from imperfections and steady on its course.
but once freed from imperfections, it is able to do so.
He calls conformity knowledge ‘knowledge in conformity with truth’ because it is suitable for penetrating the truths owing to the disappearance of the grosser darkness of delusion that conceals the truths
Knowledge of rise and fall that has become familiar should be understood as belonging to full-understanding as abandoning.
The contemplation of only the dissolution of formations is contemplation of dissolution; that same contemplation as knowledge is knowledge of contemplation of dissolution.
One who, owing to it, sees things as they are is terrified, thus it is terror. The knowledge that seizes the terrifying aspect of states of the three planes when they appear as terrifying is knowledge of appearance as terror.
One desires to be delivered, thus it is one desiring deliverance: that is, either as a consciousness or as a person. His state is desire for deliverance. That itself as knowledge is knowledge of desire for deliverance.
Knowledge that occurs in the mode of reflecting again is knowledge of contemplation of reflection.
Knowledge that occurs as looking on at formations with indifference is knowledge of equanimity about formations.
‘When continuity is disrupted’ means when continuity is exposed by observing the perpetual otherness of states as they go on occurring in succession.
For it is not through the connectedness of states that the characteristic of impermanence becomes apparent to one who rightly observes rise and fall, but rather the characteristic becomes more thoroughly evident through their disconnectedness, as if they were iron darts.
For when material and immaterial states have arisen mutually steadying each other, mentality and materiality, for example, then, owing to misinterpreting that as a unity, compactness of mass is assumed through failure to subject formations to pressure. And likewise compactness of function is assumed when, although definite differences exist in such and such states’ functions, they are taken as one. And likewise compactness of object is assumed when, although differences exist in the ways in which states that take objects make them their objects, those objects are taken as one. But when they are seen after resolving them by means of knowledge into these elements, they disintegrate like froth subjected to compression by the hand. They are mere states occurring due to conditions and void. In this way the characteristic of not-self becomes more evident.
‘When the postures are exposed’ means when the concealment of the pain that is actually inherent in the postures is exposed.
For when pain arises in a posture, the next posture adopted removes the pain, as it were, concealing it. But once it is correctly known how the pain in any posture is shifted by substituting another posture for that one, then the concealment of the pain that is in them is exposed because it has become evident that formations are being incessantly overwhelmed by pain.
‘Resolution of the compact’ is effected by resolving what appears compact in this way, ‘The earth element is one, the water element is another’ etc., distinguishing each one; and in this way, ‘Contact is one, feeling is another’ etc., distinguishing each one.
‘When the resolution of the compact is effected’ means that what is compact as a mass and what is compact as a function or as an object has been analyzed.
Having been, it is not, therefore it is impermanent;
it is impermanent for four reasons, that is, in the sense of the state of rise and fall, of change, of temporariness, and of denying permanence. It is painful on account of the mode of oppression;
it is painful for four reasons, that is, in the sense of burning, of being hard to bear, of being the basis for pain, and of opposing pleasure …
It is not-self on account of the mode of insusceptibility to the exercise of power; it is not-self for four reasons, that is, in the sense of voidness, of having no owner-master, of having no Overlord, and of opposing self.
As when a saucer falls and breaks
- impermanence is obvious.
but unless there is the arising of a Buddha the characteristic of not-self is not made known.
Whether Perfect Ones arise or do not arise the characteristics of impermanence and pain are made known,
the characteristic of not-self is not obvious; …
pain is obvious.
As when a boil appears in the body;
These modes, that is, the three characteristics, are not included in the aggregates because they are states without individual essence ;
and they are not separate from the aggregates because they are unapprehendable without the aggregates.
But they should be understood as appropriate conceptual differences that are reason for differentiation in the explaining of dangers in the five aggregates, and which are allowable by common usage in respect of the five aggregates.
When he repeatedly observes in this way, and examines and investigates material and immaterial states, to see that they are impermanent, painful, and not-self, then if his knowledge works keenly, formations quickly become apparent.5 Once his knowledge works keenly and formations quickly become apparent, he no longer extends his mindfulness to their arising or presence or occurrence or sign,
but brings it to bear only on their cessation as destruction, fall and breakup.6
When insight knowledge has arisen in him in this way so that he sees how the field of formations, having arisen thus, ceases thus, it is called contemplation of dissolution at that stage,7
with reference to which it is said:
“Understanding of contemplation of dissolution, after reflecting on an object— how is this knowledge of insight?
“Consciousness with materiality as its object arises and dissolves. Having reflected on that object, he contemplates the dissolution of that consciousness.
“‘He contemplates’: how does he contemplate?
He contemplates as impermanent, not as permanent; he contemplates as painful, not as pleasant; he contemplates as not-self, not as self; he becomes dispassionate, he does not delight; he causes fading away of greed, he does not inflame it; he causes cessation, not origination; he relinquishes, he does not grasp.
Contemplating as impermanent, he abandons the perception of permanence.
Contemplating as painful, he abandons the perception of pleasure. Contemplating as not-self, he abandons the perception of self. Becoming dispassionate, he abandons delight. Causing fading away, he abandons greed. Causing cessation, he abandons originating. Relinquishing, he abandons grasping.
“Consciousness with feeling as its object … Consciousness with perception as its object … with formations as its object … with consciousness as its object … with eye as its object … … with ageing-and-death as its object … Relinquishing, he abandons grasping.
“The substitution of the object, The transference of understanding,
The power of adverting—these Are insight following reflection.
“Defining both to be alike By inference from that same object,
Intentness on cessation—these Are insight in the mark of fall.
“Having reflected on the object Dissolution he contemplates,
Appearance then as empty—this Is insight of higher understanding.
“Skilled in the three contemplations, And in the fourfold insight too,
Skilled in the three appearances, The various views will shake him not.
“Knowledge is in the sense of that being known and understanding in the sense of the act of understanding that. Hence it was said: ‘Understanding of contemplating dissolution, after reflecting on an object, is knowledge of insight’” .
Herein, after reflecting on an object is having reflected on, having known, any object; the meaning is, having seen it as liable to destruction and fall.
Understanding of the contemplation of dissolution: any understanding of the contemplation of the dissolution of the knowledge arisen after reflecting on the object as liable to destruction and fall is called knowledge of insight.
How has the meaning of a question showing desire to expound.
Next, in order to show how that comes about, consciousness with materiality as its object, etc., is said.
Herein, consciousness with materiality as its object arises and dissolves: rūpārammaṇaṃ cittaṃ uppajjitvā bhijjati is the equivalent of rūpārammaṇaṃ cittaṃ uppajjitvā bhijjati;
Having reflected on that object: having reflected on, having known, that object consisting of materiality; the meaning is, having seen it as liable to destruction and fall.
He contemplates the dissolution of that consciousness: by means of a subsequent consciousness he contemplates the dissolution of that consciousness with which that object consisting of materiality was seen as liable to destruction and fall.
Hence the Ancients said: “He sees with insight both the known and the knowledge.”
He contemplates : he sees always accordingly ; the meaning is, he sees again and again in various modes.
Hence it is said: “He contemplates”: how does he contemplate?
He contemplates as impermanent, and so on.
Herein, dissolution is the culminating point of impermanence, and so the meditator contemplating dissolution contemplates the whole field of formations as impermanent, not as permanent.8
Then, because of the painfulness of what is impermanent and because of the non-existence of self in what is painful, he contemplates that same whole field of formations as painful, not as pleasant,
But what is impermanent, painful, not-self, is not something to delight in;
When he does not inflame greed thus, he causes cessation of greed, not its origination, which happens firstly by means of mundane knowledge;9
Or alternatively, having thus caused the fading away of greed, and caused the cessation of the seen field of formations, he causes the cessation of the unseen too by means of inferential knowledge, he does not originate it.
He gives attention only to its cessation,
Progressing in this way, he relinquishes, he does not grasp.
What is meant?
What is meant is that this contemplation of impermanence, etc., is also called both “relinquishment as giving up” and “relinquishment as entering into” because, by substitution of opposite qualities, it gives up defilements along with aggregate producing kamma-formations, and because, by seeing the unsatisfactoriness of what is formed, it also enters into, by inclining towards, Nibbāna, which is the opposite of the formed.
Therefore the bhikkhu who possesses that contemplation gives up defilements and enters into Nibbāna in the way stated,
Hence it was said: he relinquishes, he does not grasp.
Now, in order to show which states are abandoned by these three kinds of knowledge, contemplating as impermanent, he abandons the perception of permanence, etc., is said.
Herein, delight is craving accompanied by happiness.
The rest is as already stated.
As to the stanzas: the substitution of the object means that after seeing the dissolution of materiality, there is the substitution of another object for that first object by seeing the dissolution of the consciousness by which the dissolution of materiality was seen.
Transference of understanding is the abandoning of rise and the specializing in fall.
The power of adverting is the ability, after seeing the dissolution of materiality, to advert immediately for the purpose of seeing the dissolution of the consciousness that had that dissolution as its object.
Are insight following reflection: this is called contemplation of dissolution after reflecting on an object.
Defining both to be alike by inference from that same object: the meaning is that by inference, by induction, from the object seen by actual experience he defines both the seen and the unseen to have a single individual essence thus, “The field of formations dissolved in the past, and will break up in the future, just as it does in the present.”
And this is said by the Ancients:
“With vision of those present purified
He infers those past and future to be alike;
He infers that all formations disappear,
Like dew-drops when the morning sun comes up.”
or the meaning is rūpārammaṇabhāve cittaṃ uppajjitvā bhijjati alternative grammatical substitution.
he contemplates it as not-self, not as self.
and what is not something to delight in is not something to arouse greed for;
consequently, when that field of formations is seen as impermanent, painful, not-self, in accordance with the contemplation of dissolution, then he becomes dispassionate, he does not delight;
he causes fading away of greed, he does not inflame it.
the meaning is, he does not cause origination.
he sees only its cessation, not its origin, is the meaning.
he does not grasp defilements by causing rebirth, nor does he grasp a formed object through failing to see its unsatisfactoriness.
Intentness on cessation: after thus giving to both a single definition based on their dissolution, he thus becomes intent on cessation, in other words, on that same dissolution. The meaning is that he attaches importance to it, inclines, tends, leans towards it.
Are insight in the mark of fall: what is meant is that this is called insight into the characteristic of fall.
Having reflected on the object: having first known the object consisting of materiality, and so on.
Dissolution he contemplates: having seen the dissolution of that object, he contemplates the dissolution of the consciousness that had that as its object.
Appearance then as empty: while he is contemplating dissolution in this way, he succeeds in making formations appear as void thus, “Only formations breakup; their breakup is death; there is nothing else at all10.”
Hence the Ancients said:
“Aggregates cease and nothing else exists;
Breakup of aggregates is known as death.
He watches their destruction steadfastly,
As one who with a diamond drills a gem.” 11
Is insight of higher understanding: what is meant is that the reflection on the object, the contemplation of dissolution, and the appearance as void are called insight of higher understanding.
Skilled in the three contemplations: a bhikkhu who is competent in the three beginning with contemplation of impermanence.
And in the fourfold insight too: in the four kinds of insight beginning with dispassion.
Skilled in the three appearances: and owing to skill in this threefold appearance, namely, as liable to destruction and fall, as terror, and as void.12
The various views will shake him not: he does not vacillate on account of the various kinds of views such as the eternity view.
When he no longer vacillates and so constantly bears in mind that the unceased will also cease, the undissolved will also dissolve, then he disregards the arising, presence, occurrence and sign of all formations, which keep on breaking up, like fragile pottery being smashed, like fine dust being dispersed, like sesame seeds being roasted, and he sees only their breakup.
Just as a man with eyes standing on the bank of a pond or on the bank of a river during heavy rain would see large bubbles appearing on the surface of the water and breaking up as soon as they appeared, so too he sees how formations break up all the time.
The Blessed One said of such a meditator:
“And he who looks upon the world As one who looks upon a bubble,
As one who looks upon a mirage, Is out of sight of Death the King” .
When he constantly sees that all formations thus break up all the time, then contemplation of dissolution grows strong in him,
bringing eight advantages, which are these: abandoning of false view of becoming, giving up attachment to life, constant application, a purified livelihood, no more anxiety, absence of fear, acquisition of patience and gentleness, and conquest of aversion and sensual delight.
Hence the Ancients said:
“On seeing these eight perfect qualities
He comprehends formations constantly,
like the sage with burning turban.”
Seeing breakup in order to attain The Deathless, 
Knowledge of contemplation of dissolution is ended.
The keenness of knowledge comes about owing to familiarity with development.
And when it is familiar, development occurs as though it were absorbed in the object owing to the absence of distraction.
‘Arising’ is the alteration consisting in generation.
the appearance of formations like graspable entities, which is due to compactness of mass, etc., and to individualization of function, is the sign of formations”
‘The sign’ is the sign of formations;
‘Occurrence’ is the occurrence of what is clung to.
‘Presence’ is the arrival at presence: ageing is what is meant.
‘He contemplates as impermanent’ here not by inferential knowledge thus, “Impermanent in the sense of dissolution”, like one who is comprehending formations by groups , nor by seeing fall preceded by apprehension of rise, like a beginner of insight ; but rather it is after rise and fall have become apparent as actual experience through the influence of knowledge of rise and fall that he then leaves rise aside in the way stated and contemplates formations as impermanent by seeing only their dissolution. But when he sees them thus, there is no trace in him of any apprehension of them as permanent.
‘Causes cessation’: he causes greed to reach the cessation of suppression; he suppresses it, is the meaning.
That is why he said ‘by means of mundane knowledge.’
And since there is suppression, how can there be arousing? Therefore he said ‘not its origination’
Here in this world there is no self that is something other than and apart from the aggregates.
As a skilled man drilling a gem with a tool watches and keeps in mind only the hole he is drilling, not the gem’s colour, etc., so too the meditator wisely keeps in mind only the ceaseless dissolution of formations, not the formations.
‘The three appearances’: in the threefold appearance as impermanent and so on.
For appearance as destruction and fall is appearance as impermanent, appearance as terror is appearance as pain, and appearance as void is appearance as not-self.
As he repeats, develops and cultivates in this way the contemplation of dissolution, the object of which is cessation consisting in the destruction, fall and breakup of all formations, then formations classed according to all kinds of becoming, generation, destiny, station, or abode of beings, appear to him in the form of a great terror, as lions, tigers, leopards, bears, hyenas, spirits, ogres, fierce bulls, savage dogs, rut-maddened wild elephants, hideous venomous serpents, thunderbolts, charnel grounds, battlefields, flaming coal pits, etc., appear to a timid man who wants to live in peace.
When he sees how past formations have ceased, present ones are ceasing, and those to be generated in the future will cease in just the same way, then what is called knowledge of appearance as terror arises in him at that stage.
Here is a simile: a woman’s three sons had offended against the king, it seems. The king ordered their heads to be cut off.
She went with her sons to the place of their execution.
When they had cut off the eldest one’s head, they set about cutting off the middle one’s head.
Seeing the eldest one’s head already cut off and the middle one’s head being cut off, she gave up hope for the youngest, thinking, “He too will fare like them.”
Now, the meditator’s seeing the cessation of past formations is like the woman’s seeing the eldest son’s head cut off. His seeing the cessation of those present is like her seeing the middle one’s head being cut off. His seeing the cessation of those in the future, thinking, “Formations to be generated in the future will cease too,” is like her giving up hope for the youngest son, thinking, “He too will fare like them.”
When he sees in this way, knowledge of appearance as terror arises in him at that stage.
Also another simile: a woman with an infected womb had, it seems, given birth to ten children.
Of these, nine had already died and one was dying in her hands. There was another in her womb.
Seeing that nine were dead and the tenth was dying, she gave up hope about the one in her womb, thinking, “It too will fare just like them.”
Herein, the meditator’s seeing the cessation of past formations is like the woman’s remembering the death of the nine children. The meditator’s seeing the cessation of those present is like her seeing the moribund state of the one in her hands. His seeing the cessation of those in the future is like her giving up hope about the one in her womb.
When he sees in this way, knowledge of appearance as terror arises in him at that stage.
But does the knowledge of appearance as terror itself fear or does it not fear?
It does not fear.
For it is simply the mere judgment that past formations have ceased, present ones are ceasing, and future ones will cease.
Just as a man with eyes looking at three charcoal pits at a city gate is not himself afraid, since he only forms the mere judgment that all who fall into them will suffer no little pain;
—or just as when a man with eyes looks at three spikes set in a row, an acacia spike, an iron spike, and a gold spike, he is not himself afraid, since he only forms the mere judgment that all who fall on these spikes will suffer no little pain;—so too the knowledge of appearance as terror does not itself fear; it only forms the mere judgment that in the three kinds of becoming, which resemble the three charcoal pits and the three spikes, past formations have ceased, present ones are ceasing, and future ones will cease.
Here is the text about its appearance to him as terror:
When he brings to mind as painful, what appears to him as terror?
When he brings to mind as not-self, what appears to him as terror?
When he brings to mind as impermanent, the sign appears to him as terror.
When he brings to mind as painful, occurrence appears to him as terror.
When he brings to mind as not-self, the sign and occurrence appear to him as terror” .
Herein, the sign is the sign of formations.
This is a term for past, future and present formations themselves.
He sees only the death of formations when he brings them to mind as impermanent and so the sign appears to him as a terror.
Occurrence is occurrence in material and immaterial becoming.
He sees occurrence—though ordinarily reckoned as pleasure—only as a state of being continuously oppressed when he brings them to mind as painful, and so occurrence appears to him as a terror.
He sees both the sign and the occurrence as empty, vain, void, without power or guide, like an empty village, a mirage, a goblin city, etc., when he brings them to mind as not-self,
Knowledge of appearance as terror is ended.
But it is called “appearance as terror” only because formations in all kinds of becoming, generation, destiny, station, or abode are fearful in being bound for destruction and so they appear only as a terror.
“When he brings to mind as impermanent, what appears to him as terror?
and so the sign and occurrence appear to him as a terror.
As he repeats, develops and cultivates the knowledge of appearance as terror he finds no asylum, no shelter, no place to go to, no refuge in any kind of becoming, generation, destiny, station, or abode.
In all the kinds of becoming, generation, destiny, station, and abode there is not a single formation that he can place his hopes in or hold on to.
The three kinds of becoming appear like charcoal pits full of glowing coals, the four primary elements like hideous venomous snakes , the five aggregates like murderers with raised weapons , the six internal bases like an empty village, the six external bases like village-raiding robbers , the seven stations of consciousness and the nine abodes of beings as though burning, blazing and glowing with the eleven fires , and all formations appear as a huge mass of dangers destitute of satisfaction or substance, like a tumour, a disease, a dart, a calamity, an affliction .
How?
They appear as a forest thicket of seemingly pleasant aspect but infested with wild beasts, a cave full of tigers, water haunted by monsters and ogres, an enemy with raised sword, poisoned food, a road beset by robbers, a burning coal, a battlefield between contending armies appear to a timid man who wants to live in peace.
And just as that man is frightened and horrified and his hair stands up when he comes upon a thicket infested by wild beasts, etc., and he sees it as nothing but danger, so too when all formations have appeared as a terror by contemplation of dissolution, this meditator sees them as utterly destitute of any core or any satisfaction and as nothing but danger.
“How is it that understanding of appearance as terror is knowledge of danger?
“ Understanding of appearance as terror thus, ‘Arising is terror,’ is knowledge of danger.
Understanding of appearance as terror thus, ‘Occurrence is terror’ … ‘The sign is terror’ … ‘Accumulation is terror’ … ‘Rebirth-linking is terror’ … ‘Destiny is terror’ … ‘Generation is terror’ … ‘Re-arising is terror’ … ‘Birth is terror’ … ‘Ageing is terror’ … ‘Sickness is terror’ … ‘Death is terror’ … ‘Sorrow is terror’ … Understanding of appearance as terror thus, ‘Lamentation is terror,’ is knowledge of danger. Understanding of appearance as terror thus, ‘Despair is terror,’ is knowledge of danger.
“ Knowledge of the state of peace is this: ‘Non-arising is safety.’
Knowledge of the state of peace is this: ‘Non-occurrence is safety’ … … Knowledge of the state of peace is this: ‘Non-despair is safety.’
“ Knowledge of the state of peace is this: ‘Arising is terror; non-arising is safety.’
Knowledge of the state of peace is this: ‘Occurrence is terror; non- occurrence is safety’ … … Knowledge of the state of peace is this: ‘Despair is terror; non-despair is safety.’
“ Understanding of appearance as terror thus, ‘Arising is suffering,’ is knowledge of danger.
Understanding of appearance as terror thus, ‘Occurrence is suffering’ … … ‘Despair is suffering’ is knowledge of danger.
“ Knowledge of the state of peace is this: ‘Non-occurrence is bliss’ … …
Knowledge of the state of peace is this: ‘Non-despair is bliss.’
“ Knowledge of the state of peace is this: ‘Arising is suffering; non- arising is bliss.’
Knowledge of the state of peace is this: ‘Occurrence is suffering; non-occurrence is bliss’ … … Knowledge of the state of peace is this: ‘Despair is suffering; non-despair is bliss.’
“ Understanding of appearance as terror thus, ‘Arising is worldly,’ is knowledge of danger.
Understanding of appearance as thus, ‘Occurrence is worldly’ … … ‘Despair is worldly’ is knowledge of danger.
“ Knowledge of the state of peace is this: ‘Non-arising is unworldly.’
Knowledge of the state of peace is this: ‘Non-occurrence is unworldly’ … … Knowledge of the state of peace is this: ‘Non-despair is unworldly.’
“ Knowledge of the state of peace is this: ‘Arising is worldly; non-arising is unworldly.’
Knowledge of the state of peace is this: ‘Occurrence is worldly; non-occurrence is unworldly’ … … Knowledge of the state of peace is this: ‘Despair is worldly; non-despair is unworldly.’
“ Understanding of appearance as terror thus, ’Arising is formations,’ is knowledge of danger.
Understanding of appearance as terror thus, Occurrence is formations’ … … ‘Despair is formations’ is knowledge of danger.
“ Knowledge of the state of peace is this: ‘Non-arising is Nibbāna.”
“ Knowledge of the state of peace is this: ‘Arising is formations; non- arising is Nibbāna.’
Knowledge of the state of peace is this: ‘Occurrence is formations; non-occurrence is Nibbāna’ … … Knowledge of the state of peace is this: ‘Despair is formations; non-despair is Nibbāna.’
“He contemplates as suffering Arising, occurrence, and the sign,
Accumulation, rebirth-linking— And this his knowledge is of danger.
“He contemplates as bliss no arising, And no occurrence, and no sign,
No accumulation, no rebirth-linking— And this his knowledge is of peace.
“This knowledge about danger has Five sources for its origin;
Knowledge of peace has also five— Ten knowledges he understands.
“When skilled in these two kinds of knowledge The various views will shake him not.
“Knowledge is in the sense of that being known
Hence it was said: ‘Understanding of appearance as terror is knowledge of danger’” .
Herein, arising is appearance here in this becoming with previous kamma as condition.
Occurrence is the occurrence of what has arisen in this way.
The sign is the sign of all formations.
Accumulation is the kamma that is the cause of future rebirth-linking.
Rebirth-linking is future appearance.
Destiny is the destiny in which the rebirth-linking takes place.
Generation is the generating of aggregates.
Re-arising is the occurrence of kamma-result stated thus, “In one who has attained to it or in one who has been reborn in it” .
Birth is birth with becoming as its condition, itself a condition for ageing and so on.
Ageing, sickness, death, etc., are obvious.
And here only the five beginning with arising are mentioned as actual objects of knowledge of danger;
For the pair, generation and birth, are synonyms both for arising and for rebirth-linking.
The pair, destiny and re-arising, are synonyms for occurrence.
Ageing, etc., are synonyms for the sign.
Hence it was said:
“He contemplates as suffering Arising, occurrence, and the sign,
Accumulation, rebirth-linking— And this his knowledge is of danger.”
And: “This knowledge about danger has Five sources for its origin” .
Knowledge of the state of peace is this: “Non-arising is safety,” etc.: this, however, should be understood as said for the purpose of showing the opposite kind of knowledge to knowledge of danger.
Or when it is stated in this way, that there is safety without terror and free from danger, it is for the purpose of comforting those who are upset in their hearts by seeing danger through appearance as terror.
Or else, when arising, etc., have clearly appeared to a man as terror, his mind inclines towards their opposites, and so this is said for the purpose of showing the advantages in the knowledge of danger established by the appearance as terror.
And here what is terror is certainly suffering,
and what is suffering is purely worldly since it is not free from the worldliness of the rounds of becoming, of the world, and of defilements,13
and what is worldly consists solely of formations.
Therefore it is said that understanding of appearance as terror thus, “Arising is suffering,” is knowledge of danger, and so on.
And while this is so, still there is a difference to be understood here in the way these things beginning with “arising” occur, since there is a difference in their mode with the mode of terror, the mode of suffering, and the mode of worldliness.
Ten knowledges he understands: one who understands knowledge of danger understands, penetrates, realizes, ten kinds of knowledge, that is, the five based on arising, etc., and the five on non-arising and so on.
When skilled in these two kinds of knowledge: with skill in the two, that is, knowledge of danger and knowledge of the state of peace.
The various views will shake him not: he does not vacillate about views that occur such as “The ultimate Nibbāna is here and now.”
Knowledge of contemplation of danger is ended.
Knowledge of the state of peace is this: ‘Non-occurrence is Nibbāna’ … … Knowledge of the state of peace is this Non-despair is Nibbāna.’
and understanding is in the sense of the act of understanding that.
the rest are synonyms for them.
The rest is clear.
Worldliness of the round is that of the threefold round of past, future and present becoming;
worldliness of the world is the five cords of sense desire because they are accessible to defilements;
worldliness of defilement is the defilements themselves.
When he sees all formations in this way as danger, he becomes dispassionate towards, is dissatisfied with, takes no delight in the manifold field of formations belonging to any kind of becoming, destiny, station of consciousness, or abode of beings.
Just as a golden swan that loves the foothills of Citta Peak finds delight, not in a filthy puddle at the gate of a village of outcastes, but only in the seven great lakes , so too this meditator swan finds delight, not in the manifold formations seen clearly as danger,
And just as the lion, king of beasts, finds delight, not when put into a gold cage, but only in Himalaya with its three thousand leagues’ extent, so too the meditator lion finds delight, not in the triple becoming of the happy destiny,14 but only in the three contemplations.
And just as Chaddanta, king of elephants, all white with sevenfold stance, possessed of supernormal power, who travels through the air,15 finds pleasure, not in the midst of a town, but only in the Chaddanta Lake and Wood in the Himalaya, so too this meditator elephant finds delight, not in any formation, but only in the state of peace seen in the way beginning “Non-arising is safety,” and his mind tends, inclines, and leans towards that.
Knowledge of contemplation of dispassion is ended.
Knowledge of contemplation of danger is the same as the last two kinds of knowledge in meaning.
Hence the Ancients said:
it aroused the appearance of danger in those same formations, thus the name ‘contemplation of danger’ arose;
but only in the seven contemplations, because he delights in development.
“Knowledge of appearance as terror while one only has three names: It saw all formations as terror, thus the name ‘appearance as terror’ arose;
it arose, becoming dispassionate towards those same formations, thus the name ‘contemplation of dispassion’ arose.”
Also it is said in the text: “Understanding of appearance as terror, knowledge of danger, and dispassion: these things are one in meaning, only the letter is different” .
When, owing to this knowledge of dispassion, this clansman becomes dispassionate towards, is dissatisfied with, takes no delight in any single one of all the manifold formations in any kind of becoming, generation, destiny, station of consciousness, or abode of beings, his mind no longer sticks fast, cleaves, fastens on to them, and he becomes desirous of being delivered from the whole field of formations and escaping from it.
Like what?
Just as a fish in a net, a frog in a snake’s jaws, a jungle fowl shut into a cage, a deer fallen into the clutches of a strong snare, a snake in the hands of a snake charmer, an elephant stuck fast in a great bog, a royal nāga in the mouth of a supaṇṇa, the moon inside Rāhu’s mouth,16 a man encircled by enemies, etc.— just as these are desirous of being delivered, of finding an escape from these things, so too this meditator’s mind is desirous of being delivered from the whole field of formations and escaping from it.
Then, when he thus no longer relies on any formations and is desirous of being delivered from the whole field of formations, knowledge of desire for deliverance arises in him.
Knowledge of desire for deliverance is ended.
Being thus desirous of deliverance from all the manifold formations in any kind of becoming, generation, destiny, station, or abode, in order to be delivered from the whole field of formations he again discerns those same formations, attributing to them the three characteristics by knowledge of contemplation of reflection.
He sees all formations as impermanent for the following reasons: because they are non-continuous, temporary, limited by rise and fall, disintegrating, fickle, perishable, unenduring, subject to change, coreless, due to be annihilated, formed, subject to death, and so on.
He sees them as painful for the following reasons: because they are continuously oppressed, hard to bear, the basis of pain, a disease, a tumour, a dart, a calamity, an affliction, a plague, a disaster, a terror, a menace, no protection, no shelter, no refuge, a danger, the root of calamity, murderous, subject to cankers, Māra’s bait, subject to birth, subject to ageing, subject to illness, subject to sorrow, subject to lamentation, subject to despair, subject to defilement, and so on.
He sees all formations as foul —the ancillary characteristic to that of pain—for the following reasons: because they are objectionable, stinking, disgusting, repulsive, unaffected by disguise, hideous, loathsome, and so on.
He sees all formations as not-self for the following reasons: because they are alien, empty, vain, void, ownerless, with no Overlord, with none to wield power over them, and so on.
It is when he sees formations in this way that he is said to discern them by attributing to them the three characteristics.
But why does he discern them in this way?
In order to contrive the means to deliverance.
Here is a simile: a man thought to catch a fish, it seems, so he took a fishing net and cast it in the water. He put his hand into the mouth of the net under the water and seized a snake by the neck. He was glad, thinking, “I have caught a fish.”
In the belief that he had caught a big fish, he lifted it up to see. When he saw three marks, he perceived that it was a snake and he was terrified. He saw danger, felt dispassion for what he had seized, and desired to be delivered from it. Contriving a means to deliverance, he unwrapped the coils from his hand, starting from the tip of its tail. Then he raised his arm, and when he had weakened the snake by swinging it two or three times round his head, he flung it away, crying “Go, foul snake.” Then quickly scrambling up on to dry land, he stood looking back whence he had come, thinking, “Goodness, I have been delivered from the jaws of a huge snake! ”
Herein, the time when the meditator was glad at the outset to have acquired a person is like the time when the man was glad to have seized the snake by the neck. This meditator’s seeing the three characteristics in formations after effecting resolution of the compact into elements is like the man’s seeing the three marks on pulling the snake’s head out of the mouth of the net. The meditator’s knowledge of appearance as terror is like the time when the man was frightened.
Knowledge of contemplation of danger is like the man’s thereupon seeing the danger. Knowledge of contemplation of dispassion is like the man’s dispassion for what he had seized.
Knowledge of desire for deliverance is like the man’s deliverance from the snake. The attribution of the three characteristics to formations by knowledge of contemplation of reflection is like the man’s contriving a means to deliverance.
For just as the man weakened the snake by swinging it, keeping it away and rendering it incapable of biting, and was thus quite delivered, so too this meditator weakens formations by swinging them with the attribution of the three characteristics, rendering them incapable of appearing again in the modes of permanence, pleasure, beauty, and self, and is thus quite delivered.
That is why it was said above that he discerns them in this way “in order to contrive the means to deliverance.”
At this point knowledge of reflection has arisen in him,
When he brings to mind as painful, …
When he brings to mind as impermanent, there arises in him knowledge after reflecting on the sign.
When he brings to mind as painful, there arises in him knowledge after reflecting on occurrence.
When he brings to mind as not-self, there arises in him knowledge after reflecting on the sign and occurrence” .
As here after reflecting on the sign means having known the sign of formations by means of the characteristic of impermanence as unlasting and temporary.
Of course, it is not17 that, first having known, subsequently knowledge arises; but it is expressed in this way according to common usage, as in the passage beginning, “Due to mind and mental object, mind-consciousness arises” , and so on.
Or alternatively, it can be understood as expressed thus according to the method of identity by identifying the preceding with the subsequent.
The meaning of the remaining two expressions that is, “occurrence” and “the sign and occurrence” should be understood in the same way.
Knowledge of contemplation of reflection is ended.
with reference to which it is said:
“When he brings to mind as impermanent, there arises in him knowledge after reflecting on what?
as not-self, there arises in him knowledge after reflecting on what?
Having thus discerned by knowledge of contemplation of reflection that “All formations are void” , he again discerns voidness in the double logical relation18 thus: “This is void of self or of what belongs to self” .
When he has thus seen that there is neither a self nor any other thing or being occupying the position of a self s property, he again discerns voidness in the quadruple logical relation as set forth in this passage: “I am not anywhere anyone’s owning, nor is there anywhere my owning in anyone ” .19
 This meditator, thinking I … not anywhere , does not see a self anywhere;
This is how he discerns voidness in the quadruple logical relation.
Having discerned voidness in the quadruple logical relation in this way, he discerns voidness again in six modes.
How?
Eye is void of self, or of the property of a self, or of permanence, or of lastingness, or of eternalness, or of non-subjectness to change; … mind …
visible data … mental data …
Having discerned voidness in the six modes in this way, he discerns it again in eight modes,
Feeling … perception … formations … consciousness … eye … … ageing-and-death has no core, is coreless, without a core, as far as concerns any core of permanence, or core of lastingness, or core of pleasure, or core of self, or as far as concerns what is permanent, or what is lasting, or what is eternal, or what is not subject to change.
Just as a reed has no core, is coreless, without core;
just as a castor-oil plant, an udumbara tree, a setavaccha tree, a pāḷibhaddaka tree, a lump of froth, a bubble on water, a mirage, a plantain trunk, a conjuring trick, has no core, is coreless, without core, so too materiality … … ageing-and-death has no core … or what is subject to change” ; Nidd II 278–89 ).
Having discerned voidness in eight modes in this way, he discerns it again in ten modes. How? “He sees materiality as empty,
as vain, as not-self, as having no Overlord, as incapable of being made into what one wants, as incapable of being had as one wishes, as insusceptible to the exercise of mastery, as alien, as secluded from past and future.
He sees feeling … … consciousness as empty, … as secluded”24 ).
Having discerned voidness in ten modes in this way, he discerns it again in twelve modes,
that is to say: “Materiality is no living being,25 no soul, no human being, no man, no female, no male, no self, no property of a self,
Feeling … … consciousness … not anyone’s ; Nidd II 280 ).
Having discerned voidness in twelve modes in this way, he discerns it again in forty-two modes through full-understanding as investigating. He sees materiality as impermanent, as painful, as a disease, a tumour, a dart, a calamity, an affliction, as alien, as disintegrating, a plague, a disaster, a terror, a menace, as fickle, perishable, unenduring, as no protection, no shelter, no refuge, as unfit to be a refuge, as empty, vain, void, not-self, as without satisfaction,26 as a danger, as subject to change, as having no core, as the root of calamity, as murderous, as due to be annihilated, as subject to cankers, as formed, as Māra’s bait, as subject to birth, subject to ageing, subject to illness, subject to death, subject to sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief and despair; as arising, as departing; as danger,27 as escape.
He sees feeling … … consciousness … as escape .
And this is said too:28 “When he sees materiality as impermanent … as escape, he looks upon the world as void.
When he sees feeling … … consciousness as impermanent … as escape, he looks upon the world as void.”
“Let him look on the world as void: Thus, Mogharāja, always mindful,
He may escape the clutch of death By giving up belief in self.
For King Death cannot see the man That looks in this way on the world”29
When he has discerned formations by attributing the three characteristics to them and seeing them as void in this way, he abandons both terror and delight, he becomes indifferent to them and neutral, he neither takes them as “I” nor as mine,” he is like a man who has divorced his wife.
Suppose a man were married to a lovely, desirable, charming wife and so deeply in love with her as to be unable to bear separation from her for a moment. He would be disturbed and displeased to see her standing or sitting or talking or laughing with another man, and would be very unhappy;
and thereafter, even though he saw her doing whatever it might be with whomsoever it might be, he would not be disturbed or displeased, but would on the contrary be indifferent and neutral.
So too this meditator, wanting to get free from all formations, discerns formations by the contemplation of reflection; then, seeing nothing to be taken as “I” or “mine,” he abandons both terror and delight and becomes indifferent and neutral towards all formations.
When he knows and sees thus, his heart retreats, retracts and recoils from the three kinds of becoming, the four kinds of generation, the five kinds of destiny, the seven stations of consciousness, and the nine abodes of beings; his heart no longer goes out to them. Either equanimity or repulsiveness is established.
Just as water drops retreat, retract and recoil on a lotus leaf that slopes a little and do not spread out, so too his heart … And just as a fowl’s feather or a shred of sinew thrown on a fire retreats, retracts and recoils, and does not spread out, so too his heart retreats, retracts and recoils from the three kinds of becoming … Either equanimity or repulsiveness is established.
In this way there arises in him what is called knowledge of equanimity about formations.
But if this knowledge sees Nibbāna, the state of peace, as peaceful, it rejects the occurrence of all formations and enters only into Nibbāna.
If it does not see Nibbāna as peaceful, it occurs again and again with formations as its object, like the sailors’ crow.
When traders board a ship, it seems, they take with them what is called a land-finding crow. When the ship gets blown off its course by gales and goes adrift with no land in sight, then they release the land-finding crow.
It takes off from the mast-head,30 and after exploring all the quarters, if it sees land, it flies straight in the direction of it;
if not, it returns and alights on the mast-head.
So too, if knowledge of equanimity about formations sees Nibbāna, the state of peace, as peaceful, it rejects the occurrence of all formations and enters only into Nibbāna.
If it does not see it, it occurs again and again with formations as its object.
as though sifting flour on the edge of a tray,
And in so doing, this insight knowledge enters upon the state of the triple gateway to liberation, and it becomes a condition for the classification of noble persons into seven kinds.
It enters upon the state of the triple gateway to liberation now with the predominance of one of three faculties according as the contemplation occurs in one of the three ways.32
For it is the three contemplations that are called the three gateways to liberation,
“But these three gateways to liberation lead to the outlet from the world, that is to say, to the seeing of all formations as limited and circumscribed and to the entering of consciousness into the signless element, to the stirring up of the mind with respect to all formations and to the entering of consciousness into the desireless element, to the seeing of all things as alien and to the entering of consciousness into the voidness element. These three gateways to liberation lead to the outlet from the world” .33
Herein, as limited and circumscribed means both as limited by rise and fall and as circumscribed by them;
To the seeing … as alien: to contemplating them as not- self thus: “Not I,” “Not mine.”
So these three clauses should be understood to express the contemplations of impermanence, and so on.
Hence in the answer to the next question asked in the Paṭisambhidā it is said: “When he brings them to mind as impermanent, formations appear as liable to destruction.
When he brings them to mind as painful, formations appear as a terror.
When he brings them to mind as not-self, formations appear as void” .
What are the liberations to which these contemplations are the gateways?
They are these three, namely, the signless, the desireless, and the void.
For this is said: “When one who has great resolution brings formations to mind as impermanent, he acquires the signless liberation.
When one who has great tranquillity brings them to mind as painful, he acquires the desireless liberation.
When one who has great wisdom brings them to mind as not-self, he acquires the void liberation” .
And here the signless liberation should be understood as the noble path that has occurred by making Nibbāna its object through the signless aspect.
In the same way the path that has occurred by making Nibbāna its object through the desireless aspect is desireless.
And the path that has occurred by making Nibbāna its object through the void aspect is void.
But it is said in the Abhidhamma: “On the occasion when he develops the supramundane jhāna that is an outlet and leads to dispersal, having abandoned the field of false views with the reaching of the first grade, secluded from sense desires he enters upon and dwells in the first jhāna, which is desireless … is void,” thus mentioning only two liberations. This refers to the way in which insight arrives at the path and is expressed literally.
However, in the Paṭisambhidā insight knowledge is expressed as follows:
 “Knowledge of contemplation of impermanence is the void liberation since it liberates from interpreting them as permanent;
knowledge of contemplation of pain is the void liberation since it liberates from interpreting them as pleasant;
 “Knowledge of contemplation of impermanence is the signless liberation since it liberates from the sign of formations as permanent;
 “Knowledge of contemplation of impermanence is the desireless liberation since it liberates from desire for formations as permanent;
But although stated in this way, insight knowledge is not literally signless because there is no abandoning of the sign of formations as formed, here, as distinct from their sign as impermanent and so on.
It is however literally void and desireless.
And it is at the moment of the noble path that the liberation is distinguished, and that is done according to insight knowledge’s way of arrival at the path.35
That, it should be understood, is why only two liberations are stated in the Abhidhamma, namely, the desireless and the void.
This, firstly, is the treatise on the liberations here.
It was said above, “It becomes a condition for the classification of noble persons into seven kinds.” Herein, there are firstly these seven kinds of noble person: the faith devotee, one liberated by faith, the body witness, the both-ways liberated, the Dhamma devotee, one attained to vision, and one liberated by understanding. This knowledge of equanimity about formations is a condition for their being placed as these seven classes.
When a man brings formations to mind as impermanent and, having great resolution, acquires the faith faculty, he becomes a faith devotee at the moment of the stream-entry path;
and in the other seven instances that is, in the three higher paths and the four fruitions he becomes one liberated by faith.
When a man brings them to mind as painful and, having great tranquillity, acquires the faculty of concentration, he is called a body witness in all eight instances.
He is called both-ways liberated when he has reached the highest fruition after also reaching the immaterial jhānas.
When a man brings them to mind as not-self and, having great wisdom, acquires the faculty of understanding, he becomes a Dhamma devotee at the moment of the stream-entry path;
This is said:
With the faith faculty in excess he acquires the stream-entry path. Hence he is called a ’faith devotee’” .
Likewise, “When he brings formations to mind as impermanent, the faith faculty is in excess in him. With the faith faculty in excess the fruition of stream- entry is realized. Hence he is called ‘one liberated by faith’” .
It is said further:
“At the moment of the first path: he has been liberated by having faith , thus he is one liberated by faith;
he first experiences the experience of jhāna and afterwards realizes cessation, Nibbāna, thus he is a body witness;
As to the remaining four, however, the word meaning should be understood thus: he follows faith, thus he is a faith devotee ; or he follows, he goes, by means of faith, thus he is a faith devotee.
Likewise, he follows the Dhamma called understanding, or he follows by means of the Dhamma, thus he is a Dhamma devotee.
He is liberated in both ways, by immaterial jhāna and the noble path, thus he is both-ways liberated.
Understanding, he is liberated, thus he is one liberated by understanding.
Hence the Ancients said: “This knowledge of equanimity about formations is one only and has three names. At the outset it has the name of knowledge of desire for deliverance. In the middle it has the name knowledge of reflection. At the end, when it has reached its culmination, it is called knowledge of equanimity about formations.”
“How is it that understanding of desire for deliverance, of reflection, and of composure is knowledge of the kinds of equanimity about formations?
Understanding of desire for deliverance, of reflection, and composure occupied with arising is knowledge of equanimity about formations.
So in the first stage it is desire to give up, the desire to be delivered from, arising, etc., in one who has become dispassionate by knowledge of dispassion that is desire for deliverance.
It is reflection in the middle stage for the purpose of finding a means to deliverance that is reflection.
It is equanimous onlooking in the end stage on being delivered that is composure.
It is said with reference to this: “Arising is formations; he looks with equanimity on those formations; thus it is equanimity about formations” , and so on.
So this is only one kind of knowledge.
Furthermore, it may be understood that this is so from the following text;
Now, when this clansman has reached equanimity about formations thus, his insight has reached its culmination and leads to emergence.
“Insight that has reached culmination” or “insight leading to emergence” are names for the three kinds of knowledge beginning with equanimity about formations, that is, equanimity about formations, conformity, and change-of-lineage.
It has “reached its culmination” because it has reached the culminating final stage.
It is called “leading to emergence” because it goes towards emergence.
The path is called “emergence” because it emerges externally from the objective basis interpreted as a sign and also internally from occurrence of defilement.36 It goes to that, thus it leads to emergence; the meaning is that it joins with the path.
Herein, for the purpose of clarification there is this list of the kinds of emergence classed according to the manner of interpreting: after interpreting the internal37 it emerges from the internal, after interpreting the internal it emerges from the external, after interpreting the external it emerges from the external, after interpreting the external it emerges from the internal; after interpreting the material it emerges from the material, after interpreting the material it emerges from the immaterial, after interpreting the immaterial it emerges from the immaterial, after interpreting the immaterial it emerges from the material; it emerges at one stroke from the five aggregates; after interpreting as impermanent it emerges from the impermanent, after interpreting as impermanent it emerges from the painful, after interpreting as impermanent it emerges from the not-self; after interpreting as painful it emerges from the painful, after interpreting as painful it emerges from the impermanent, after interpreting as painful it emerges from the not-self, after interpreting as not-self it emerges from the not-self, after interpreting as not-self it emerges from the impermanent, after interpreting as not-self it emerges from the painful.
How?
Here someone does his interpreting at the start with his own internal formations. After interpreting them he sees them.
But emergence of the path does not come about through seeing the bare internal only since the external must be seen too, so he sees that another’s aggregates, as well as unclung-to formations inanimate things, are impermanent, painful, not-self.
At one time he comprehends the internal and at another time the external.
As he does so, insight joins with the path while he is comprehending the internal.
It is said of him that “after interpreting the internal it emerges from the internal.”
Similarly in the case of “after interpreting the external it emerges from the external,” and “from the internal.”
Another does his interpreting at the start with materiality. When he has done that, he sees the materiality of the primaries and the materiality derived from them all together.
But emergence does not come about through the seeing of bare materiality only since the immaterial must be seen too,
At one time he comprehends the material and at another the immaterial.
As he does so, insight joins with the path while he is comprehending materiality. It is said of him that “after interpreting the material it emerges from the material.”
But if his insight joins with the path at the time when he is comprehending the immaterial, it is said of him that “after interpreting the material it emerges from the immaterial.”
When he has done his interpreting in this way, “All that is subject to arising is subject to cessation” , and so too at the time of emergence, it is said that “it emerges at one stroke from the five aggregates.”
One man comprehends formations as impermanent at the start.
But emergence does not come about through mere comprehending as impermanent since there must be comprehension of them as painful and not-self too, so he comprehends them as painful and not-self.
As he does so, emergence comes about while he is comprehending them as impermanent. It is said of him that “after interpreting as impermanent it emerges from the impermanent,”
– But if emergence comes about in him while he is comprehending them as painful … as not-self, then it is said that “after interpreting as impermanent it emerges from the painful … from the not-self.”
And whether they have interpreted at the start as impermanent or as painful or as not-self, when the time of emergence comes, if the emergence takes place while contemplating as impermanent,
If the emergence is from the painful, then the three persons acquire the faculty of concentration since they have great tranquillity; they are liberated by the desireless liberation, and in all eight states they are body witnesses.
Of them, the one who has an immaterial jhāna as the basis for his insight is, in the case of the highest fruition, both-ways liberated.
And then if the emergence takes place while contemplating as not-self, the three persons acquire the faculty of understanding since they have great wisdom; they are liberated by the void liberation. They become Dhamma devotees at the moment of the first path. In the next six instances they become attained to vision. In the case of the highest fruit they are liberated by understanding.
Now, twelve similes should be understood in order to explain this insight leading to emergence and the kinds of knowledge that precede and follow it.
Here is the list:
The fruit bat, the black snake, and the house, The oxen, and the ghoul, the child,
Hunger, and thirst, and cold, and heat, And darkness, and by poison, too.
A pause can be made to bring in these similes anywhere among the kinds of knowledge from appearance as terror onwards.
But if they are brought in here, then all becomes clear from appearance as terror up to fruition knowledge, which is why it was said that they should be brought in here.38
1. The Fruit Bat. There was a fruit bat, it seems. She had alighted on a honey tree with five branches, thinking, “I shall find flowers or fruits here.” She investigated one branch but saw no flowers or fruits there worth taking.
And as with the first so too she tried the second, the third, the fourth,
She thought, “This tree is barren; there is nothing worth taking here,” so she lost interest in the tree. She climbed up on a straight branch, and poking her head through a gap in the foliage, she looked upwards, flew up into the air and alighted on another tree.
Herein, the meditator should be regarded as like the fruit bat. The five aggregates as objects of clinging are like the honey tree with the five branches. The meditator’s interpreting of the five aggregates is like the fruit bat’s alighting on the tree. His comprehending the materiality aggregate and, seeing nothing there worth taking, comprehending the remaining aggregates is like her trying each branch and, seeing nothing there worth taking, trying the rest. His triple knowledge beginning with desire for deliverance, after he has become dispassionate towards the five aggregates through seeing their characteristic of impermanence, etc., is like her thinking “This tree is barren; there is nothing worth taking here” and losing interest. His conformity knowledge is like her climbing up the straight branch. His change-of- lineage knowledge is like her poking her head out and looking upwards. His path knowledge is like her flying up into the air. His fruition knowledge is like her alighting on a different tree.
The Black Snake. This simile has already been given .
But the application of the simile here is this. Change-of-lineage knowledge is like throwing the snake away. Path knowledge is like the man’s standing and looking back whence he had come after getting free from it. Fruition knowledge is like his standing in a place free from fear after he had got away. This is the difference.
The House. The owner of a house, it seems, ate his meal in the evening, climbed into his bed and fell asleep. The house caught fire. When he woke up and saw the fire, he was frightened. He thought, “It would be good if I could get out without getting burnt.” Looking round, he saw a way. Getting out, he quickly went away to a safe place and stayed there.
Herein, the foolish ordinary man’s taking the five aggregates as “I” and “mine” is like the house-owner’s falling asleep after he had eaten and climbed into bed.
Knowledge of appearance as terror after entering upon the right way and seeing the three characteristics is like the time when the man was frightened on waking up and seeing the fire. Knowledge of desire for deliverance is like the man’s looking for a way out. Conformity knowledge is like the man’s seeing the way. Change-of-lineage is like the man’s going away quickly. Fruition knowledge is like his staying in a safe place.
The Oxen. One night, it seems, while a farmer was sleeping his oxen broke out of their stable and escaped. When he went there at dawn and looked in, he found that they had escaped. Going to find them, he saw the king’s oxen.
He thought that they were his and drove them back. When it got light, he recognized that they were not his but the king’s oxen. He was frightened. Thinking, “I shall escape before the king’s men seize me for a thief and bring me to ruin and destruction,” he abandoned the oxen. Escaping quickly, he stopped in a place free from fear.
Herein, the foolish ordinary man’s taking the five aggregates as “I” and “mine” is like the man’s taking the king’s oxen. The meditator’s recognizing the five aggregates as impermanent, painful, and not-self by means of the three characteristics is like the man’s recognizing the oxen as the king’s when it got light. Knowledge of appearance as terror is like the time when the man was frightened. Desire for deliverance is like the man’s desire to leave them and go away. Change-of-lineage is like the man’s actual leaving. The path is like his escaping. Fruition is like the man’s staying in a place without fear after escaping.
The Ghoul. A man went to live with a ghoul, it seems. At night, thinking he was asleep, she went to the place where the dead were exposed and ate human flesh.
He wondered where she was going and followed her. When he saw her eating human flesh, he knew that she was a non-human being. He was frightened, and he thought, “I shall escape before she eats me.” Quickly escaping, he went to a safe place and stayed there.
Herein, taking the aggregates as “I” and “mine” is like the man’s living with the ghoul. Recognizing the aggregates as impermanent, etc., by seeing the three characteristics is like the man’s recognizing that she was a ghoul on seeing her eating human flesh in the place for the dead. Appearance as terror is like the time when the man was frightened. Desire for deliverance is like his desire to escape. Change-of-lineage is like his leaving the place for the dead. The path is like his escaping quickly. Fruition is like his standing in the place without fear.
The Child. A woman was very fond of her son, it seems. While sitting on an upper floor she heard the sound of a child in the street. Wondering, “Is someone hurting my child? ,” she hurried down. Mistaking the child for her own son, she picked up someone else’s son.
Then she recognized that it was someone else’s son, and she was ashamed and looked about her. She thought, “Let no one say I am a baby thief” and she put the child down there and then, and she quickly returned to the upper floor and sat down.
Herein, taking the five aggregates as “I” and “mine” is like the woman’s mistaking someone else’s child for her own. The recognition that “This is not I, not mine” by means of the three characteristics is like her recognizing it as someone else’s child. Knowledge of desire for deliverance is like her looking about her. Conformity knowledge is like her putting the child down there and then. Change-of-lineage is like the time when she stood in the street after putting the child down. The path is like her return to the upper floor. Fruition is like her sitting down after returning.
7–12. Hunger, Thirst, Cold, Heat, Darkness, and By Poison. These six similes, however, are given for the purpose of showing that one with insight that leads to emergence tends, inclines and leans in the direction of the supramundane states.
Just as a man faint with hunger and famished longs for delicious food, so too the meditator famished with the hunger of the round of rebirths longs for the food consisting of mindfulness occupied with the body, which tastes of the deathless.
Just as a thirsty man whose throat and mouth are parched longs for a drink with many ingredients, so too this meditator who is parched with the thirst of the round of rebirths longs for the noble drink of the Eightfold Path.
Just as a man frozen by cold longs for heat, so too this meditator frozen by the cold of craving and selfish affection in the round of rebirths longs for the fire of the path that burns up the defilements.
Just as a man faint with heat longs for cold, so too this meditator scorched by the burning of the eleven fires in the round of rebirths longs for Nibbāna.
Just as a man smothered in darkness longs for light, so too this meditator wrapped and enveloped in the darkness of ignorance longs for the light of knowledge consisting in path development.
Just as a man sick with poison longs for an antidote, so too this meditator sick with the poison of defilement longs for Nibbāna, the deathless medicine that destroys the poison of defilement.
That is why it was said above: “When he knows and sees thus, his heart retreats, retracts and recoils from the three kinds of becoming, the four kinds of generation, the five kinds of destiny, the seven stations of consciousness, and the nine abodes of beings; his heart no longer goes out to them.
Just as water drops retreat, retract and recoil on a lotus leaf that slopes a little …” , all of which should be given in the way already stated.
But at this point he is called “one who walks aloof,” with reference to whom it is said:
“When a bhikkhu keeps apart
And cultivates seclusion of the mind,
It will befit him, as they say,
To show himself no more in this becoming” .
This knowledge of equanimity about formations governs the fact that the meditator keeps apart. It furthermore governs the difference in the number of the noble path’s enlightenment factors, path factors, and jhāna factors, the mode of progress, and the kind of liberation.
For while some elders say that it is the jhāna used as the basis for insight leading to emergence that governs the difference in the number of enlightenment factors, path factors, and jhāna factors,
To deal with these three theories in order: According to governance by insight, the path arisen in a bare-insight worker, and the path arisen in one who possesses a jhāna attainment but who has not made the jhāna the basis for insight, and the path made to arise by comprehending unrelated formations after using the first jhāna as the basis for insight, are paths of the first jhāna only.
In each case there are seven enlightenment factors, eight path factors, and five jhāna factors.
For while their preliminary insight can be accompanied by joy and it can be accompanied by equanimity, when their insight reaches the state of equanimity about formations at the time of emergence it is accompanied by joy.
When paths are made to arise by using the second, third, and fourth jhānas in the fivefold reckoning as the basis for insight, then the jhāna in those paths has respectively four, three, and two factors.
In each case, however, the path factors number seven,
This difference is due both to governance by the basic jhāna and to governance by insight.
For again, while their preliminary insight can be accompanied by joy and it can be accompanied by equanimity,
their insight leading to emergence is accompanied by joy only.
However, when the path is produced by making the fifth jhāna the basis for insight, then the jhāna factors number two, that is, equanimity and unification of the mind, and there are six enlightenment factors and seven path factors.
This difference too is due to both kinds of governance.
For in this case the preliminary insight is either accompanied by joy or accompanied by equanimity,
The same method applies in the case of the path made to arise by making the immaterial jhānas the basis for insight.
Also when, after emerging from jhāna made the basis for insight, the path has been produced by comprehending no matter what formations unrelated to that jhāna, then it is the attainment emerged from at the point nearest to the path that makes it like itself, as the colour of the soil does an monitor lizard’s colour.
But in the case of the second elder’s theory the path is like the attainment, whatever it may be, which was instrumental in producing the path through the comprehension of any of its states after emergence from it.
And here governance by insight should be understood in the same way as before.
In the case of the third elder’s theory the path is like that jhāna, whichever it may be, that suits the personal bent, which jhāna was instrumental in producing the path through the comprehension of any of its states in using it as the basis for insight.
But this is not accomplished by mere bent alone unless the jhāna has been made the basis for insight or unless the jhāna has been comprehended;
And here too, governance by insight should be understood in the same way as before.
This, firstly, is how it should be understood that equanimity about formations governs the numbers of enlightenment factors, path factors, and jhāna factors.
Progress. But if insight has from the start only been able to suppress defilements with difficulty, with effort and with prompting, then it is called “of difficult progress.”
For one bhikkhu this progress is different in the four paths, while for another it is the same.
For Buddhas, however, the four paths are of easy progress and swift direct-knowledge.
Likewise in the case of the General of the Dhamma the Elder Sāriputta.
But in the Elder Mahā Moggallāna’s case the first path was of easy progress and swift direct-knowledge,
Predominance. And as with the kinds of progress, so also with the kinds of predominance,40 which are different in the four paths for one bhikkhu
and the same for another.
So it is equanimity about formations that governs the difference in the progress.
Liberation. But it has already been told how it governs the difference in the liberation §66f..
Furthermore, the path gets its names for five reasons, that is to say, owing to its own nature, or owing to what it opposes, or owing to its own special quality, or owing to its object, or owing to the way of arrival.
If equanimity about formations induces emergence by comprehending formations as impermanent, liberation takes place with the signless liberation.
If it induces emergence by comprehending them as painful, liberation takes place with the desireless liberation.
If it induces emergence by comprehending them as not-self, liberation takes place with the void liberation.
This is its name according to its own nature.
When this path is arrived at with the abandoning of the signs of permanence, lastingness, and eternalness, by effecting the resolution of the compact in formations by means of the contemplation of impermanence, it is then called signless.
When it is arrived at with the drying up of desire and longing, by abandoning perception of pleasure by means of the contemplation of pain, it is then called desireless.
When formations are seen as void by abandoning perception of self, of a living being, of a person, by means of the contemplation of not-self, it is then called void. This is its name according to what it opposes.
It is void because void of greed, and so on. It is signless owing either to absence of the sign of materiality, etc., or to absence only of the sign of greed, and so on. It is desireless because of absence of desire as greed, and so on. This is its name according to its own special quality.
It is called void, signless, and desireless, too, because it makes the void, signless, desireless Nibbāna its object.
This is its name according to its object.
The way of arrival is twofold,
Now, contemplation of not-self is called void and the path arrived at by void insight is called void. Again, contemplation of impermanence is called signless and the path arrived at by signless insight is called signless.
But while this name is inadmissible by the Abhidhamma method,41 it is admissible by the Suttanta method;
Hence the path is called signless.
And its fruition can be called signless too according to the path’s way of arrival.
Lastly, contemplation of pain is called desireless because it arrives at the path by drying up desire for formations. The path arrived at by desireless insight is called desireless. The fruition of the desireless path is called desireless.
In this way insight gives its own name to the path, and the path hands it on to its fruition. This is its name according to the way of arrival.
This is how equanimity about formations governs the difference in the liberations.
Equanimity about formations is ended.
How?
So he sees no self anywhere of his own; nor does he see it as deducible in the fact of another’s owning; nor does he see another’s self; nor does he see that as deducible in the fact of his own owning.23
the meaning is that he does not see in any instance another’s self deducible owing to this fact of his owning a brother in the case of a brother, a friend in the case of a friend, chattel in the case of a chattel.
 Now, bringing in the word my , we have is there … my owning in anyone : he does not see thus, “Another’s self exists owing to some state of my owning22 of it”;
 As regards the phrase nor … anywhere my , leaving aside the word my here for the moment, the words nor anywhere means that he does not21 see another’s self anywhere;
the meaning is that he does not see a self of his own deducible by conceiving a brother to own it in the case of a brother,20 a friend to own it in the case of a friend, or a chattel to own it in the case of a chattel;
 Thinking am … anyone’s owning , he does not see a self of his own to be inferred in another’s owning;
eye-consciousness … mind-consciousness …
mind-contact … ; Nidd II 279 ; cf.S IV 54) and this should be continued as far as ageing-and- death .
that is to say: “Materiality has no core, is coreless, without core, as far as concerns any core of permanence, or core of lastingness, or core of pleasure, or core of self, or as far as concerns what is permanent, or what is lasting, or what is eternal, or what is not subject to change.
not I, not mine, not another’s, not anyone’s.
but later, when he had found out the woman’s faults, and wanting to get free, had divorced her, he would no more take her as “mine”;
Now, after discerning formations in the various modes,6 as though carding cotton from which the seeds have been picked out,31 and after abandoning terror and delight, and after becoming neutral in the investigation of formations, he still persists in the triple contemplation.
according as it is said:
for contemplation of impermanence limits them thus, “Formations do not exist previous to their rise,” and in seeking their destiny, sees them as circumscribed thus, “They do not go beyond fall, they vanish there.”
To the stirring up of the mind: by giving consciousness a sense of urgency;
for with the contemplation of pain consciousness acquires a sense of urgency with respect to formations.
For that path is signless owing to the signless element having arisen,
and it is a liberation owing to deliverance from defilements.34
knowledge of contemplation of not-self is the void liberation since it liberates from interpreting them as self” . It is expressed firstly as the void liberation by its liberating from misinterpreting formations .
knowledge of contemplation of pain is the signless liberation since it liberates from the sign of formations as pleasant; knowledge of contemplation of not-self is the signless liberation since it liberates from the sign of formations as self” . Then it is expressed as the signless liberation by liberating from signs .
knowledge of contemplation of pain is the desireless liberation since it liberates from the desire for them as pleasant;
knowledge of contemplation of not-self is the desireless liberation since it liberates from the desire for them as self” . Lastly as the desireless liberation by its liberating from desire
it is expressed .
in the next six instances he becomes one attained to vision; and in the case of the highest fruition he becomes one liberated by understanding.
“When he brings formations to mind as impermanent, the faith faculty is in excess in him.
he has realized Nibbāna by experiencing, thus he is a body witness;
he has attained Nibbāna by vision, thus he is one attained to vision.
At the moments of the three remaining paths: he is liberated by faith , thus he is one liberated by faith;
it is known, seen, recognized, realized, and experienced with understanding, that formations are painful and cessation is bliss, thus he is one attained to vision” .
This knowledge of equanimity about formations is the same in meaning as the two kinds that precede it.
… with despair is knowledge of equanimity about formations” .
Understanding of desire for deliverance, of reflection, and of composure occupied with occurrence … the sign … 
for this is said: “Desire for deliverance, and contemplation of reflection, and equanimity about formations: these things are one in meaning and only the letter is different” .
If his insight joins with the path at the time when he is comprehending the external, it is said of him that “after interpreting the internal it emerges from the external.”
so he sees as the immaterial mentality the feeling, perception, formations and consciousness that have arisen by making that materiality their object.
Similarly in the case of “after interpreting the immaterial it emerges from the immaterial,” and “from the material.”
Similarly in the cases of emergence after interpreting – as painful and – as not-self.
then all three persons acquire the faculty of faith since they have great resolution; they are liberated by the signless liberation, and so they become faith devotees at the moment of the first path; and in the remaining seven stages they are liberated by faith.
and the fifth, but saw nothing.
and some say that it is the aggregates made the object of insight that govern it,
and some say that it is the personal bent that governs it,39
yet it is only this preliminary insight and insight leading to emergence that should be understood to govern it in their doctrine.
and in the fourth case there are six enlightenment factors.
but that leading to emergence is accompanied by equanimity only.
and this meaning should be illustrated by the Nandakovāda Sutta .
The opposite kind is called “of easy progress.”
And when the manifestation of the path, the goal of insight, is slowly effected after defilements have been suppressed, then it is called “of sluggish direct- knowledge.”
The opposite kind is called “of swift direct-knowledge.”
So this equanimity about formations stands at the arrival point and gives its own name to the path in each case,
and so the path has four names according to the kind of progress .
but the others were of difficult progress and sluggish direct-knowledge.
namely, insight’s way of arrival applies to the path, and the path’s way of arrival applies to fruition.
for, they say, by that method change-of- lineage takes the name “signless” by making the signless Nibbāna its object, and while itself remaining at the arrival point, it gives its name to the path.
‘Nāhaṃ kvacini’: he sees the non-existence of a self of his own.
So this mere conglomeration of formations is seen, by discerning it with the voidness of the quadruple logical relation, as voidness of self or property of a self in both internal and external aggregates’”
He sees of another that that other is not the property of his own self thus, ‘My owning of that other’s self does not exist.’
He sees the nonexistence of another’s self thus, ‘There is no other’s self anywhere.’
If it were there would be forty-three ways.
Although it has already been described as a danger in order to show it as such, the word is used again in order to show that it is opposed to enjoyment .
When insight reaches its culmination, it settles down in one of the three contemplations impermanence, pain, or not-self and at this stage of the development the “seven contemplations” and the “eighteen contemplations” are all included by the three.
Contemplation of impermanence sees formations as limited by rise in the beginning and by fall in the end,
‘Into the void’: into the unformed element, which is given the name ‘void’ because of voidness of self.
‘Into the desireless’: into the unformed element, which is given the name ‘desireless’ owing to the non-existence of desire due to greed and so on.
‘To the entering of consciousness’: to the higher consciousness’s completely going into by means of the state of conformity knowledge, after delimiting.
‘Into the signless element’: into the unformed element, which is given the name ‘signless’ because it is the opposite of the sign of formations.
and it sees that it is because they have a beginning and an end that they are impermanent.
One who is pursuing insight by discerning formations according to their sign by means of the contemplation of impermanence and resolves according to the signless aspect thus, ‘Where this sign of formations is entirely nonexistent, that is, the signless Nibbāna’ joins insight leading to emergence with the path.
One who resolves upon the desireless by keeping desire away by means of the contemplation of pain, and one who resolves upon the void by keeping the belief in self away by means of the contemplation of not-self, should both be construed in the same way.
The signless aspect of Nibbāna is not created by the path or by insight; on the contrary, it is the establishment of the individual essence of Nibbāna,
Then the path realizes Nibbāna for him as signless.
and the path is called signless because it has that as its object.
Of course, signless insight is mentioned in the suttas thus, ‘Develop the signless and get rid of the inherent tendency to conceit’ . Nevertheless, though it eliminates the signs of permanence, of lastingness, and of self, it still possesses a sign itself and is occupied with states that possess a sign.
Again, the Abhidhamma is the teaching in the ultimate sense, and in the ultimate sense the cause of a signless path is wanting.
For the signless liberation is stated in accordance with the contemplation of impermanence, and in that the faith faculty predominates.
But the faith faculty is not represented by any one of the factors of the path. And so it cannot give its name to the path since it forms no part of it.
Why is signless insight unable to give its own name to the path when it has come to the point of arrival at the path?
In the case of the other two, the desireless liberation is due to the contemplation of pain, and the void liberation is due to the contemplation of not-self.
Now the concentration faculty predominates in the desireless liberation and the understanding faculty in the void liberation. So since these are factors of the path as well, they can give their own names to the path; but there is no signless path because the factor is wanting. So some say.
But there are others who say that there is a signless path, and that although it does not get its name from the way insight arrives at it, still it gets its name from a special quality of its own and from its object. In their opinion the desireless and void paths should also get their names from special qualities of their own and from their objects too.
That is wrong.
Why?
Because the path gets its names for two reasons, that is, because of its own nature and because of what it opposes—the meaning is, because of its individual essence and because of what it is contrary to.
For the desireless path is free from desire due to greed, etc., and the void path is free from greed too, so they both get their names from their individual essence.
Similarly, the desireless path is the contrary of desire and the void path is the contrary of misinterpretation as self, so they get their names from what they oppose. On the other hand, the signless path gets its name only from its own nature owing to the non-existence in it of the signs of greed, etc., or of the signs of permanence, etc., but not owing to what it opposes.
For it does not oppose the contemplation of impermanence, which has as its object the sign of formations as formed, but remains in agreement with it. So a signless path is altogether inadmissible by the Abhidhamma method.
This is why it is said, ‘This refers to the way in which insight arrives at the path and is expressed in the literal sense’ .
“However, by the Suttanta method a signless path is admissible.
For according to that, in whatever way insight leading to emergence effects its comprehending it still leads on to emergence of the path, and when it is at the point of arrival it gives its own name to the path accordingly—when emerging owing to comprehension as impermanent the path is signless, when emerging owing to comprehension as painful it is desireless, and when emerging owing to comprehension as not-self it is void. Taking this as a sutta commentary, therefore, three liberations are differentiated here.
But in the Paṭisambhidā the deliverance from misinterpreting, from the sign and from desire, are taken respectively as the arrival of the three kinds of comprehension at that deliverance, and what is described is a corresponding state of void liberation, etc., respectively in the paths that follow upon that deliverance. There is no question of treating that literally, which is why he said, ‘However, in the Paṭisambhidā insight knowledge’ and so on.
‘From the object interpreted as the sign’: from the pentad of aggregates as the object of insight;
for that pentad of aggregates is called the ‘object interpreted’ on account of the interpreting, in other words, on account of being made the domain of insight.
And although it is included in one’s own continuity, it is nevertheless called ‘external’ because it is seen as alien to it;
it is that too which in other contexts is spoken of as ‘externally from all signs’ .
‘Internally from occurrence’: from the occurrence of wrong view, etc., in one’s own continuity, and from the defilements and from the aggregates that occur consequent upon them.
For it is stated in this way because there is occurrence of defilement in one’s own continuity and because there is occurrence of clung-to aggregates produced by that defilement when there is no path development.
And emergence consists both in making these the object and in producing their non-liability to future arising.
‘Emerges from the internal’ is said figuratively owing to the fact that in this case the insight leading to emergence has an internal state as its object. In the literal sense, however, the path emerges from both.
Said in the Discourse on Purification 
The first ‘some’ refers to the Elder Tipiṭaka Cūḷa-Nāga.
The second ‘some’ refers to the Elder Mahā Datta, dweller at Moravāpi.
The third ‘some’ refers to the Elder Tipiṭaka Cūḷa Abhaya
If this is so, then is the path that follows on the contemplation of impermanence not included in the Abhidhamma?
—That is not so; for it is included in the method of ‘simple progress’ 
As he repeats, develops and cultivates that equanimity about formations, his faith becomes more resolute, his energy better exerted, his mindfulness better established, his mind better concentrated, while his equanimity about formations grows more refined.
He thinks, “Now the path will arise.” Equanimity about formations, after comprehending formations as impermanent, or as painful, or as not-self, sinks into the life-continuum.
Next to the life-continuum, mind-door adverting arises making formations its object as impermanent or as painful or as not-self according to the way taken by equanimity about formations.
Then next to the functional adverting consciousness that arose displacing the life-continuum, the first impulsion consciousness arises making formations its object in the same way, maintaining the continuity of consciousness.42 This is called the “preliminary work.”
Next to that a third impulsion consciousness also arises making formations its object in the same way. This is called “conformity.”
These are their individual names.
But it is admissible to call all three impulsions “repetition” or “preliminary-work” or “access” or “conformity” indiscriminately.
Conformity to what?
To what precedes and to what follows.
For it conforms to the functions of truth both in the eight preceding kinds of insight knowledge and in the thirty-seven states partaking of enlightenment that follow.
Since its occurrence is contingent upon formations through compre- hending the characteristics of impermanence, etc., it, so to speak, says, “Knowledge of rise and fall indeed saw the rise and fall of precisely those states that possess rise and fall” and “Contemplation of dissolution indeed saw the dissolution of precisely those states that possess dissolution” and “It was indeed precisely what was terrible that appeared as terror to knowledge of appearance as terror” and “Contemplation of danger indeed saw danger in precisely what was dangerous” and “Knowledge of dispassion indeed became dispassionate towards precisely that which should be regarded with dispassion” and “Knowledge of desire for deliverance indeed produced desire for deliverance from precisely what there should be deliverance from” and “What was reflected upon by knowledge of reflection was indeed precisely what should be reflected upon” and “What was looked on at with equanimity by equanimity about formations was indeed precisely what should be looked on at with equanimity.” So it conforms to the functions of truth both in these eight kinds of knowledge and in the thirty-seven states partaking of enlightenment which follow, because they are to be reached by entering upon it.
Just as a righteous king, who sits in the place of judgement hearing the pronouncements of the judges while excluding bias and remaining impartial, conforms both to their pronouncements and to the ancient royal custom by saying, “So be it,” so it is here too.
Conformity is like the king. The eight kinds of knowledge are like eight judges. The thirty-seven states partaking of enlightenment are like the ancient royal custom.
Herein, just as the king conforms by saying “So be it” both to the judges’ pronouncements and to the royal custom, so this conformity, which arises contingent upon formations through comprehending impermanence, etc., conforms to the function of truth both in the eight kinds of knowledge and in the thirty-seven states partaking of enlightenment that follow.
Hence it is called “knowledge in conformity with truth.”
Knowledge of conformity is ended.
Next to that a second impulsion consciousness arises making formations its object in the same way. This is called the “access.”
For when the life-continuum which is mind-consciousness element is displaced by the functional mind element of five- door adverting , the occurrence of the functional consciousness makes an interruption, an interval, between the occurrence of the resultant consciousness i.e. the life-continuum and the consciousness that follows. But this is not so with mind- door adverting which is mind-consciousness element.
‘Maintaining the continuity of consciousness’ by absence of interruption, in other words, of occurrence of dissimilar consciousness.
still change-of-lineage knowledge is the last of all the kinds of insight leading to emergence.
For this insight leading to emergence is called “aloofness” 43 in the Saḷāyatana-vibhaṅga Sutta thus, “Bhikkhus, by depending and relying on aloofness abandon, surmount, equanimity that is unified, based on unity” .
In the Alagadda Sutta it is called “dispassion” thus, “Being dispassionate his greed fades away. With the fading away of greed he is liberated” .
In the Susīma Sutta it is called “knowledge of the relationship of states” thus, “Previously, Susīma, there is knowledge of relationship of states; subsequently there is knowledge of Nibbāna” .
In the Poṭṭhapāda Sutta it is called the “culmination of perception” thus, “First, Poṭṭhapāda, the culmination of perception arises, and afterwards knowledge” .
In the Dasuttara Sutta it is called the “principal factor of purity” thus, “Purification by knowledge and vision of the way is the principal factor of purity” .
In the Paṭisambhidāmagga it is called by the three names thus, “Desire for deliverance, and contemplation of reflection, and equanimity about formations: these things are one in meaning and only the letter is different” .
In the Paṭṭhāna it is called by two names thus, “conformity to change-of-lineage” and “conformity to cleansing”44 .
In the Rathavinīta Sutta it is called “purification by knowledge and vision of the way” thus, “But how, friend, is it for the purpose of the purification by knowledge and vision of the way that the life of purity is lived under the Blessed One? ” .
The Greatest Sage did thus proclaim With many a neatly chosen name.
This insight stilled and purified, That to emergence leads beside,
The round of rebirth’s slough of pain Is vast and terrible; If he would this emergence gain.
a man Wisely should strive as best he can,
in the Path of Purification composed for the purpose of gladdening good people.
in the Treatise on the Development of Understanding
Now, the following sutta references should be understood in order not to be confused about insight leading to emergence.
Though this conformity knowledge is the end of the insight leading to emergence that has formations as its object,
called “The Description of Purification by Knowledge and Vision of the Way”
The twenty-first chapter
considers thus: “I have gone forth from an aristocratic family; but these other bhikkhus have not gone forth from aristocratic families.’
considers thus: ‘I have gone forth from an influential family; but these other bhikkhus have not gone forth from influential families.’
considers thus: ‘I am well known and famous; but these other bhikkhus are unknown and of no account.’
considers thus: ‘I gain robes, almsfood, resting places, and requisites of medicine; but these other bhikkhus do not gain these things.’
Change-of-lineage knowledge comes next. Its position is to advert to the path, and so it belongs neither to purification by knowledge and vision of the way nor to purification by knowledge and vision, but being intermediate, it is unassignable.
Still it is reckoned as insight because it falls in line with insight.
Purification by knowledge and vision properly consists in knowledge of the four paths, that is to say, the path of stream-entry, the path of once-return, the path of non-return, and the path of Arahantship.
Herein, nothing further needs to be done by one who wants to achieve, firstly, the knowledge of the first path.
For what he needs to do has already been done by arousing the insight that ends in conformity knowledge.
As soon as conformity knowledge has arisen in him in this way, and the thick murk that hides the truths has been dispelled by the respective force peculiar to each of the three kinds of conformity , then his consciousness no longer enters into or settles down on or resolves upon any field of formations at all, or clings, cleaves or clutches on to it,
Then, while every sign and occurrence appears to him as an impediment, when conformity knowledge’s repetition has ended, change-of-lineage knowledge arises in him, which takes as its object the signless, non- occurrence, non-formation, cessation, Nibbāna,—which knowledge passes out of the lineage, the category, the plane, of the ordinary man and enters the lineage, the category, the plane, of the Noble Ones,—which, being the first adverting, the first concern, the first reaction, to Nibbāna as object, fulfils the state of a condition for the path in six ways, as proximity, contiguity, repetition, decisive-support, absence, and disappearance conditions,—which is the culminating peak of insight,—which is irrevocable,—
“How is it that understanding of emergence and turning away from the external1 is change-of-lineage knowledge?
“It overcomes arising, thus it is change-of-lineage.
It overcomes occurrence … the sign … accumulation … rebirth-linking … destiny … generation … re- arising … birth … ageing … sickness … death … sorrow … lamentation … . It overcomes despair, thus it is change-of-lineage.
It overcomes the sign of formations externally, thus it is change-of-lineage.
“It enters into2 non-arising, thus it is change-of-lineage.
It enters into non- occurrence, thus it is change-of-lineage … … It enters into non-despair, thus it is change-of-lineage. It enters into cessation, Nibbāna, thus it is change- of-lineage.
“Having overcome arising, it enters into non-arising, thus it is change-of- lineage …” and so on, all of which should be quoted.
Here is a simile that illustrates how conformity and change-of-lineage occur with different objects though occurring in a single cognitive series with a single adverting. Suppose a man wanted to leap across a broad stream and establish himself on the opposite bank, he would run fast, and seizing a rope fastened to the branch of a tree on the stream’s near bank and hanging down, or a pole, he would leap with his body tending, inclining and leaning towards the opposite bank, and when he had arrived above the opposite bank, he would let go, fall on to the opposite bank, staggering first and then steady himself there; so too this meditator, who wants to establish himself on Nibbāna, the bank opposite to the kinds of becoming, generation, destiny, station, and abode, runs fast by means of the contemplation of rise and fall, etc., and seizing with conformity’s adverting to impermanence, pain or not-self the rope of materiality fastened to the branch of his selfhood and hanging down, or one among the poles beginning with feeling, he leaps with the first conformity consciousness without letting go and with the second he tends, inclines and leans towards Nibbāna, like the body that was tending, inclining and leaning towards the opposite bank; then, being with the third next to Nibbāna, which is now attainable, like the other’s arriving above the opposite bank, he lets go that information as object with the ceasing of that consciousness, and with the change-of-lineage consciousness he falls on to the unformed Nibbāna, the bank opposite;
but staggering, as the man did, for lack of previous repetition, he is not yet properly steady on the single object. After that he is steadied by path knowledge.
Herein, conformity is able to dispel the murk of defilements that conceals the truths, but is unable to make Nibbāna its object.
Change-of-lineage is only able to make Nibbāna its object, but it is unable to dispel the murk that conceals the truths.
Here is a simile: A man with eyes went out at night, it seems, to find out the conjunction of the stars, and he looked up to see the moon. It was invisible because it was concealed by clouds.
Then a wind sprang up and blew away the thick clouds;
another blew away the medium clouds; and another blew away the fine clouds as well.
Then the man saw the moon in the sky free from clouds, and he found out the conjunction of the stars.
Herein, the thick, medium and fine kinds of darkness that conceal the truths are like the three kinds of cloud. The three kinds of conformity consciousness are like the three winds. Change-of-lineage knowledge is like the man with eyes. Nibbāna is like the moon. The dispelling of the murk that conceals the truths by each kind of conformity consciousness is like the successive blowing away of the clouds by each wind. Change-of-lineage knowledge’s seeing the clear Nibbāna when the murk that concealed the truths has disappeared is like the man’s seeing the clear moon in the sky free from cloud.
Just as the three winds are able only to blow away the clouds that conceal the moon but cannot see the moon, so the three kinds of conformity are able only to dispel the murk that conceals the truths but cannot see Nibbāna.
Just as the man can only see the moon but cannot blow away the clouds, so change-of- lineage knowledge can only see Nibbāna but cannot dispel the defilements.
Hence it is called “adverting to the path.”
For although it is not adverting, it occupies the position of adverting; and then, after, as it were, giving a sign to the path to come into being, it ceases.
And without pausing after the sign given by that the change-of-lineage knowledge, the path follows upon it in uninterrupted continuity, and as it comes into being it pierces and explodes the mass of greed, the mass of hate, and the mass of delusion never pierced and exploded before .
Here is a simile for this. An archer, it seems, had a target3 set up at a distance of eight usabhas , and wrapping his face in a cloth and arming himself with an arrow, he stood on a wheel contrivance .
Another man turned the wheel contrivance, and when the target was opposite the archer, he gave him a sign with a stick.
Without pausing after the sign the archer shot the arrow and hit the target.
Herein, change-of-lineage knowledge is like the sign with the stick. Path knowledge is like the archer.
Path knowledge’s making Nibbāna its object without pausing after the sign given by change-of-lineage, and its piercing and exploding the mass of greed, hate and delusion never pierced and exploded before, is like the archer’s hitting the target without pausing after the sign.
And not only does it cause the piercing of this mass of greed, etc., but it also dries up the ocean of suffering of the round in the beginningless round of rebirths. It closes all doors to the states of loss. It provides actual experience of the seven noble treasures.4 It abandons the eightfold wrong path. It allays all enmity and fear.5 It leads to the state of the Fully Enlightened One’s breast-born son . And it leads to the acquisition of many hundred other blessings. So it is the knowledge associated with the path of stream-entry, the provider of many hundred blessings, that is called knowledge of the path of stream-entry.
The first kind of knowledge is ended.
and every sign as object, every occurrence as object, appears as an impediment.
but retreats, retracts and recoils as water does from a lotus leaf,
of which it is said:
‘Of emerging and turning away from the external’: it is the understanding of turning away that is being effected, which turning away is emergence from the field of formations; it is termed external because the unformed element’s existence is external.
a “phalakasata” is one made of the heart of the asana tree.
The five kinds of enmity beginning with killing living things and the twenty-five great terrors are what constitute ‘all enmity and fear’.
Immediately next to that knowledge, however, there arise either two or three fruition consciousnesses, which are its result.
For it is owing to this very fact that supramundane profitable consciousness results immediately that it is said, “And which he called the concentration with immediate result” , and “Sluggishly he reaches what has immediate result for the destruction of the cankers” , and so on.
Some, however, say that there are one, two, three, four, or five fruition consciousnesses. That is inadmissible.
For change-of-lineage knowledge arises at the end of conformity’s repetition,
And a single series of impulsions has a maximum of seven impulsion consciousnesses.
Consequently, that series which has two conformities and change-of-lineage as a third and path consciousness as fourth has three fruition consciousnesses.
That which has three conformities and change-of-lineage as fourth and path consciousness as fifth has two fruition consciousnesses.
That is why it was said above, “There arise either two or three fruition consciousnesses.”
Then some say that which has four conformities and change-of-lineage as fifth and path consciousness as sixth has one fruition consciousness. But that is refuted because it is the fourth or fifth impulsion that reaches the path, not those after that, owing to their nearness to the life-continuum .
So that cannot be accepted as correct.
And at this point this stream-enterer is called the second noble person.
However negligent he may be, he is bound to make an end of suffering when he has travelled and traversed the round of rebirths among deities and human beings for the seventh time.
At the end of the fruition his consciousness enters the life-continuum. After that, it arises as mind-door adverting interrupting the life-continuum for the purpose of reviewing the path. When that has ceased, seven impulsions of path reviewing arise.
After re-entry into the life-continuum, adverting, etc., arise again in the same way for the purpose of reviewing fruition, and so on.
With the arising of these he reviews the path, he reviews the fruition, he reviews the defilements abandoned, he reviews the defilements still remaining, and he reviews Nibbāna.
He reviews the path in this way, “So this is the path I have come by.” Next he reviews the fruition after that in this way, “This is the blessing I have obtained.”
And as in the case of the stream-enterer, so also in the cases of the once- returner and non-returner.
But the Arahant has no reviewing of remaining defilements.
So all the kinds of reviewing total nineteen.
This is the maximum number.
Trainers may or may not have the reviewing of the defilements abandoned and those still remaining.
In fact it was owing to the absence of such reviewing that Mahānāma asked the Blessed One, “What state is there still unabandoned by me internally owing to which at times states of greed invade my mind and remain? ” all of which should be quoted.
so at the minimum there must be two conformity consciousnesses, since one alone does not act as repetition condition.
Next he reviews the defilements that have been abandoned, “These are the defilements abandoned in me.”
Next he reviews the defilements still to be eliminated by the three higher paths, “These are the defilements still remaining in me.”
And lastly he reviews the deathless Nibbāna in this way, “This is the state that has been penetrated by me as object.”
So the noble disciple who is a stream-enterer has five kinds of reviewing.
However, after reviewing in this way, either while sitting in the same session or on another occasion, the noble disciple who is a stream-enterer makes it his task to reach the second plane by attenuating both greed for sense desires and ill-will.
He brings to bear the faculties,6 the powers, and the enlightenment factors, and he works over and turns up that same field of formations, classed as materiality, feeling, perception, formations, and consciousness, with the knowledge that they are impermanent, painful, not-self, and he embarks upon the progressive series of insights.
When he has done so, and when, at the end of equanimity about formations, conformity and change-of-lineage7 knowledge have arisen in a single adverting in the way already described, then the path of once-return arises next to change-of-lineage.
The knowledge associated with that is knowledge of the path of once-return.
The second kind of knowledge is ended.
Here ‘change-of-lineage’ means ‘like change-of-lineage’;
for the knowledge that ushers in the first path is called that in the literal sense because it overcomes the ordinary man’s lineage and develops the Noble One’s lineage. But this is called ‘change-of-lineage’ figuratively because of its similarity to the other.
It is also called ‘cleansing’ because it purifies from certain defilements and because it makes absolute purification its object.
Hence it is said in the Paṭṭhāna, ‘Conformity is a condition, as proximity condition, for cleansing’ .
But ‘next to change-of-lineage’ is said here because it is said in the Paṭisambhidāmagga that for the purpose of ‘overcoming arising,’ etc., ‘eight states of change-of-lineage arise through concentration’ and ‘ten states of change-of-lineage arise through concentration’ and ‘ten states of change-of-lineage arise through insight’ , and it is given in the same way in this page.
Now, after reviewing in this way, either while sitting in the same session or on another occasion, this noble disciple who is a once-returner makes it his task to reach the third plane by abandoning, without remainder, both greed for the sense desires and ill-will. He brings to bear the faculties, the powers, and the enlightenment factors, and he works over and turns up that same field of formations with the knowledge that they are impermanent, painful, not-self, and he embarks upon the progressive series of insights.
When he has done so, and when, at the end of equanimity about formations, conformity and change-of-lineage have arisen in a single adverting in the way already described, then the path of non-return arises next to change-of-lineage. The knowledge associated with that is knowledge of the path of non-return.
The third kind of knowledge is ended.
The fruition consciousness should be understood to follow immediately upon this knowledge in the same way as before.
And at this point this once- returner is called the fourth noble person. He is bound to make an end of suffering after returning once to this world.
Next there comes reviewing in the way already described.
The fruition consciousnesses should be understood to follow immediately upon this knowledge in the same way as before.
And at this point this non- returner is called the sixth noble person. After death he reappears apparitionally elsewhere and attains complete extinction there without ever returning, without ever coming to this world again through rebirth-linking.
Next there comes reviewing in the way already described.
Now, after reviewing in this way, either while sitting in the same session or on another occasion, this noble disciple who is a non-returner makes it his task to reach the fourth plane by abandoning, without remainder, greed for the fine- material and immaterial, conceit , agitation, and ignorance. He brings to bear the faculties, the powers, and the enlightenment factors, and he works over and turns up that same field of formations with the knowledge that they are impermanent, painful, not-self, and he embarks upon the progressive series of insights.
When he has done so, and when, at the end of equanimity about formations, conformity and change-of-lineage have arisen in a single adverting, then the path of Arahantship arises next to change-of-lineage. The knowledge associated with that is knowledge of the path of Arahantship.
The fourth kind of knowledge is ended.
The fruition consciousness should be understood to follow immediately upon this knowledge in the same way as before.
And at this point this Arahant is called the eighth noble person. He is one of the Great Ones with cankers destroyed, he bears this last body, he has laid down the burden, reached his goal and destroyed the fetter of becoming, he is rightly liberated with final knowledge and worthy of the highest offering of the world with its deities.
So when it was said above, “However, purification by knowledge and vision properly consists in knowledge of the four paths, that is to say, the path of stream-entry, the path of once-return, the path of non-return, and the path of Arahantship” , that referred to these four kinds of knowledge to be reached in this order.
Now, in order to appreciate the value of this same purification by knowledge and vision with its four kinds of knowledge:
fulfilment of states sharing in enlightenment, Emergence, and the coupling of the powers,
The kinds of states that ought to be abandoned, Also the act of their abandoning,
Functions of full-understanding, and the rest As stated when truths are penetrated to,
Each one of which ought to be recognized According to its individual essence.
Herein, the fulfilment of states sharing in enlightenment is the fulfilledness of those states partaking in enlightenment.
For they are the following thirty- seven states: the four foundations of mindfulness , the four right endeavours , the four roads to power , the five faculties , the five powers , the seven enlightenment factors , and the Noble Eightfold Path . And they are called “partaking of enlightenment” because they take the part of the Noble Eightfold Path, which is called “enlightenment” in the sense of enlightening,
and they “take the part” of that because they are helpful.8
It is of four kinds because it occurs with respect to the body, feeling, consciousness, and mental objects , taking them as foul, painful, impermanent, and non-self, and because it accomplishes the function of abandoning perception of beauty, pleasure, permanence, and self.
That is why “four foundations of mindfulness” is said.
By it they endeavour , thus it is endeavour ;
Or alternatively: by its means people endeavour rightly , thus it is right endeavour .
Or alternatively: it is good because of abandoning the unseemliness of defilement, and it is endeavour because of bringing about improvement and giving precedence in the sense of producing well-being and bliss, thus it is right endeavour.
It is a name for energy.
It accomplishes the functions of abandoning arisen unprofitable things, preventing the arising of those not yet arisen, arousing unarisen profitable things, and maintaining those already arisen; thus it is fourfold. That is why “four right endeavours” is said.
Power is in the sense of success as already described .
It is the road to that power in the sense of being the precursor of that success which is associated with it and in the sense of being the prior cause of that success which is its fruit, thus it is a road to power .
It is fourfold as zeal , and so on. That is why “four roads to power” are spoken of,
according as it is said: “Four roads to power: the road to power consisting in zeal, the road to power consisting in energy, the road to power consisting in natural purity of consciousness, the road to power consisting in inquiry” .
These are supramundane only.
But they are also mundane “If a bhikkhu obtains concentration, obtains mental unification by making zeal predominant,
“Faculty” is in the sense of predominance, in other words, of overcoming, because these states, as faculties respectively overcome faithlessness, idleness, negligence, distraction, and confusion.
“Power” is in the sense of unwaveringness because these states, as powers are incapable of being overcome respectively by faithlessness, and so on.
Both are fivefold as consisting in faith, energy, mindfulness, concentration, and understanding. That is why “five faculties” and “five powers” is said.
Mindfulness, investigation-of-states, energy, happiness, tranquillity concentration, and equanimity, as factors in a being who is becoming enlightened, are the “seven enlightenment factors.”
Hence, “seven enlightenment factors” and “the Noble Eightfold Path” is said.
So there are these thirty-seven states partaking of enlightenment. Now, in the prior stage when mundane insight is occurring, they are found in a plurality of consciousnesses as follows: the foundation of mindfulness consisting in contemplation of the body is found in one discerning the body in the fourteen ways;10 the foundation of mindfulness consisting in contemplation of feeling, in one discerning feeling in the nine ways; the foundation of mindfulness consisting in the contemplation of mind, in one discerning the manner of consciousness in sixteen ways; the foundation of mindfulness consisting in contemplation of mental objects, in one discerning mental objects in the five ways.
And at the time when, on seeing an unprofitable state arisen in someone else, which has not yet arisen in his own person, he strives for its non-arising thus, “I shall not behave as he has done in whom this is now arisen, and so this will not arise in me,” then he has the first right endeavour;
And at the time of arousing a profitable state with zeal as the motive force, there is the road to power consisting in zeal, and so on with the remaining three roads to power.
And at the time of abstaining from wrong speech there is right speech, and so on with abstaining from wrong action and wrong livelihood.11
At the time of arising of any one of the four kinds of path knowledge, all these states are found in a single consciousness.
In the moment of fruition the thirty-three excepting the four right endeavours are found.
When these are found in a single consciousness in this way, it is the one kind of mindfulness whose object is Nibbāna that is called “the four foundations of mindfulness” because it accomplishes the function of abandoning the four perceptions of beauty, etc., in the four things beginning with the body.
And also the one kind of energy is called “four right endeavours” because it accomplishes the four functions beginning with preventing the arising of the unarisen unprofitable.
But there is no decrease or increase with the rest.
Furthermore it is said of them:
Nine in one way, one in two ways, Then in four ways, and in five ways,
In eight ways, and in nine ways, too— So in six ways they come to be.
 Nine in one way: these nine are zeal, consciousness, happiness, tranquillity, equanimity, thinking, speech, action, and livelihood, and they are found “in one way” as road to power consisting in zeal, etc., since they do not belong to any other group.
 One in two ways: faith is found “in two ways,” as a faculty and as a power.
 Then in four ways, and in five ways: the meaning is that another one is found in four ways and another in five.
Herein, concentration is the “one in four ways” since it is a faculty, a power, an enlightenment factor, and a path factor;
 In eight ways, and in nine ways, too: the meaning is that another one is found in eight ways and another in nine ways.
Mindfulness is one “in eight ways” since it is the four foundations of mindfulness, a faculty, a power, an enlightenment factor, and a path factor;
So:
States sharing in enlightenment Are fourteen, undistributed;
They total thirty-seven states Among the groups distributed.
While each performs the proper task That to its special lot falls due,
They all come into being when The Noble Eightfold Path comes true.
This is how, firstly, the “fulfilment of states partaking in enlightenment” should be understood here.
“Foundation” is because of establishment by going down into, by descending upon, such and such objects.9
Mindfulness itself as foundation is “foundation of mindfulness.”
a good endeavour is a right endeavour.
this is called concentration through zeal” , etc., because of the words as states acquired by predominance of zeal, etc., respectively.
And right view, right thinking, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, and right concentration, are the eight “path factors” in the sense of being an outlet.
when, seeing something unprofitable in his own behaviour, he strives to abandon it, then he has the second;
when he strives to arouse jhāna or insight so far unarisen in this person, he has the third;
and when he arouses again and again what has already arisen so that it shall not diminish, he has the fourth.
understanding is the “one in five ways” since it is these four and also a road to power.
energy is the one “in nine ways” since it is four right endeavours, a road to power, a faculty, a power, an enlightenment factor, and a path factor.
Only the road to power consisting in zeal, and right speech, are actually included here;
but when these are mentioned, the remaining roads to power and remaining two abstinences are implied in the meaning too. The meaning of this sentence should be understood according to the ‘category of characteristics’ .
When one thing has been stated, then those things That are in characteristic one with it
Are stated too–this is the formulation Of the category of characteristics
Emergence and 3. coupling of the powers: the resolution of the compound vuṭṭhānabalasamāyoga is vuṭṭhānañ c’eva bala-samāyogo ca.
2. Emergence: mundane insight induces no emergence either from occurrence of defilement internally, because it does not cut off originating, which is the act of causing occurrence,12 or from the sign of formations externally, because it has the sign as object.
“At the moment of the stream-entry path, right view in the sense of seeing emerges from wrong view, and it emerges from defilements and from the aggregates that occur consequent upon that wrong view,13 and externally it emerges from all signs;
Right thinking in the sense of directing emerges from wrong thinking … Right speech in the sense of embracing emerges from wrong speech …
“At the moment of the once-return path, right view in the sense of seeing … Right concentration in the sense of non-distraction emerges from the gross fetter of greed for sense desires, from the gross fetter of resentment, from the gross inherent tendency to greed for sense desires, and from the gross inherent tendency to resentment, and it emerges from defilements and from the aggregates consequent upon that, and externally it emerges from all signs; hence it was said: Understanding of emergence and turning away from both is knowledge of the path.
“At the moment of the non-return path, right view in the sense of seeing … Right concentration in the sense of non-distraction emerges from the residual fetter of greed for sense desires, from the residual fetter of resentment, from the residual inherent tendency to greed for sense desires, from the residual inherent tendency to resentment, and it emerges from defilements and from the aggregates that occur consequent upon that, and externally it emerges from all signs; hence it was said: Understanding of emergence and turning away from both is knowledge of the path.
“At the moment of the Arahant path, right view in the sense of seeing … Right concentration in the sense of non-distraction emerges from greed for the fine-material existence, from greed for immaterial existence, from conceit , from agitation, from ignorance, from the inherent tendency to conceit , from the inherent tendency to greed for becoming, from the inherent tendency to ignorance, and it emerges from defilements and from the aggregates that occur consequent upon that, and externally it emerges from all signs;
3. Coupling of the powers: At the time of developing the eight mundane attainments the serenity power is in excess,
But at the noble path moment they occur coupled together in the sense that neither one exceeds the other.
So there is coupling of the powers in the case of each one of these four kinds of knowledge,
“When he emerges from the defilements associated with agitation, and from the aggregates, his mental unification, non-distraction, concentration, has cessation as its domain. When he emerges from the defilements associated with ignorance and from the aggregates, his insight in the sense of contemplation has cessation as its domain.
So serenity and insight have a single nature in the sense of emergence, they are coupled together, and neither exceeds the other.
Hence it was said: He develops serenity and insight coupled together in the sense of emergence” .
“Emergence” and “coupling of the powers” should be understood here in this way.
“How is it that understanding of emergence and turning away from both is knowledge of the path?
Hence it is said:
These four kinds of path knowledge emerge from the sign because they have the signless as their object, and also from occurrence because they cut off origination. So they emerge from both.
Hence it is said, “Understanding of emergence and turning away from the external is knowledge of change-of-lineage” .
Likewise the whole passage, “Having turned away from arising, it enters into non-arising, thus it is change-of-lineage. Having turned away from occurrence … … Having turned away from the sign of formations externally, it enters into cessation, Nibbāna, thus it is change-of-lineage” , should be understood here.
Change-of-lineage knowledge does not induce emergence from occurrence internally because it does not cut off originating,
but it does induce emergence from the sign externally because it has Nibbāna as its object; so there is emergence from one.
hence it was said: Understanding of emergence and turning away from both is knowledge of the path.
Right action in the sense of originating emerges from wrong action …
Right livelihood in the sense of cleansing emerges from wrong livelihood …
Right effort in the sense of exerting emerges from wrong effort …
Right mindfulness in the sense of establishment emerges from wrong mindfulness …
Right concentration in the sense of non-distraction emerges from wrong concentration and it emerges from defilements and from the aggregates that occur consequent upon that wrong concentration, and externally it emerges from all signs;
hence it was said: Understanding of emergence and turning away from both is knowledge of the path.
hence it was said: Understanding of emergence and turning away from both is knowledge of the path” .
while at the time of developing the contemplations of impermanence, etc., the insight power is in excess.
according as it is said:
Emergence from the sign consists in relinquishing the sign of formations and making Nibbāna the object.
Emergence from occurrence consists in entering upon the state of non-liability to the occurrence of kamma-result in the future by causing the cessation of cause.
It emerges from the defilements of uncertainty, etc., that occur consequent upon that view, which is wrong since it leads to states of loss.
Functions of full-understanding and the rest As stated when truths are penetrated to,
Each one of which ought to be recognized According to its individual essence. 
Now, at the times of penetrating to the truths each one of the four path knowledges is said to exercise four functions in a single moment. These are full- understanding, abandoning, realizing, and developing; and each one of them ought to be recognized according to its individual essence.
For this is said by the Ancients:
“Just as a lamp performs the four functions simultaneously in a single moment—it burns the wick, dispels darkness, makes light appear, and uses up the oil—, so too, path knowledge penetrates to the four truths simultaneously in a single moment—it penetrates to suffering by penetrating to it with full-understanding, penetrates to origination by penetrating to it with abandoning, penetrates to the path by penetrating to it with developing, and penetrates cessation by penetrating to it with realizing” .
What is meant?
By making cessation its object it reaches, sees and pierces the four truths.”
For this is said: “Bhikkhus, he who sees suffering sees also the origin of suffering, sees also the cessation of suffering, sees also the way leading to the cessation of suffering” , etc., and so it should be understood for all the other three truths.
And further it is said: “The knowledge of one who possesses the path is knowledge of suffering and it is knowledge of the origin of suffering and it is knowledge of the cessation of suffering and it is knowledge of the way leading to the cessation of suffering” .
As the lamp burns the wick, so his path knowledge fully understands suffering;
and as the lamp uses up the oil, so the knowledge realizes cessation, which brings defilements to an end. This is how the application of the simile should be understood.
Another method: as the sun, when it rises, performs four functions simultaneously with its appearance—it illuminates visible objects, dispels darkness, causes light to be seen, and allays cold—, so too, path knowledge … penetrates to cessation by penetrating to it with realizing.
as the sun dispels darkness, so path knowledge abandons origin;
as the sun allays cold, so path knowledge realizes the cessation, which is the tranquilizing of defilements. This is how the application of the simile should be understood.
Another method: as a boat performs four functions simultaneously in a single moment—it leaves the hither shore, it cleaves the stream, it carries its cargo, and it approaches the further shore—, so too, path knowledge … penetrates to cessation by penetrating to it with realizing.
And here, as the boat leaves the hither shore, so path knowledge fully understands suffering;
as the boat approaches the further shore, so path knowledge realizes cessation, which is the further shore. This is how the application of the simile should be understood.
So when his knowledge occurs with the four functions in a single moment at the time of penetrating the four truths, then the four truths have a single penetration in the sense of trueness in sixteen ways,
There is single penetration of the four truths in the sense of trueness in sixteen aspects:
The four truths in these sixteen ways are included as one.
What is included as one is unity.
Unity is penetrated by a single knowledge. Thus the four truths have a single penetration” .
Here it may be asked: “Since there are other meanings of suffering, etc., too, such as ‘a disease, a tumour’ , etc., why then are only four mentioned for each?”
We answer that in this context it is better because of what is evident through seeing the other three truths in each case.
Firstly, in the passage beginning, “Herein, what is knowledge of suffering?
It is the understanding, the act of understanding … that arises contingent upon suffering” , knowledge of the truths is presented as having a single truth as its object individually.
But in the passage beginning, “Bhikkhus, he who sees suffering also sees its origin” , it is presented as accomplishing its function with respect to the other three truths simultaneously with its making one of them its object.
As regards these two contexts, when, firstly, knowledge makes each truth its object singly, then when suffering is made the object, suffering has the characteristic of oppressing as its individual essence, but its sense of being formed becomes evident through seeing origin because that suffering is accumulated, formed, agglomerated, by the origin, which has the characteristic of accumulating.
Then the cooling path removes the burning of the defilements, and so suffering’s sense of burning becomes evident through seeing the path, as the beauty’s ugliness did to the venerable Nanda through seeing the celestial nymphs .
But its sense of changing becomes evident through seeing cessation as not subject to change, which needs no explaining.
Likewise, when origin is made the object, origin has the characteristic of accumulating as its individual essence; but its sense of source becomes evident through seeing suffering, just as the fact that unsuitable food is the source of a sickness, becomes evident through seeing how a sickness arises owing to such food.
Its sense of bondage becomes evident through seeing cessation, which has no bonds.
And its sense of impediment becomes evident through seeing the path, which is the outlet.
Likewise, when cessation is made the object, cessation has the characteristic of an escape. But its sense of seclusion becomes evident through seeing origin as unsecluded.
Its sense of being not formed becomes evident through seeing the path; for the path has never been seen by him before in the beginningless round of rebirths, and yet even that is formed since it has conditions, and so the unformedness of the conditionless becomes quite clear.
But its sense of being deathless becomes evident through seeing suffering; for suffering is poison and Nibbāna is deathless.
Likewise, when the path is made the object, the path has the characteristic of the outlet. But its sense of cause becomes evident through seeing origin thus, “That is not the cause, but on the contrary this is the cause, for the attaining of Nibbāna.”
Its sense of seeing becomes evident through seeing cessation, as the eye’s clearness becomes evident to one who sees very subtle visible objects and thinks, “How clear my eye is!”
Its sense of dominance becomes evident through seeing suffering, just as the superiority of lordly people becomes evident through seeing wretched people afflicted with many diseases. 103. So in that first context four senses are stated for each truth because in the case of each truth individually one sense becomes evident as the specific characteristic, while the other three become evident through seeing the remaining three truths.
At the path moment, however, all these senses are penetrated simultaneously by a single knowledge that has four functions with respect to suffering and the rest.
But about those who would have it that the different truths are penetrated to separately, more is said in the Abhidhamma in the Kathāvatthu .
as the lamp dispels the darkness, so the knowledge abandons origin;
as the lamp makes the light appear, so the knowledge as right view develops the path, in other words, the states consisting in right thinking, etc., by acting as conascence, etc., for them;
And here also, as the sun illuminates visible objects, so path knowledge fully understands suffering;
as the sun causes light to be seen, so path knowledge as right view develops the other path factors by acting as their conascence condition, etc.;
as the boat cleaves the stream, so path knowledge abandons origin;
as the boat carries its cargo, so path knowledge develops the other path factors by acting as their conascence condition, etc.;
as it is said:
“How is there single penetration of the four truths in the sense of trueness?
the path has the meaning of outlet, meaning of cause, meaning of seeing, meaning of dominance, as its meaning of trueness.
cessation has the meaning of escape, meaning of seclusion, meaning of being not formed, meaning of deathlessness, as its meaning of trueness;
origin has the meaning of accumulation, meaning of source, meaning of bondage, meaning of impediment, as its meaning of trueness;
suffering has the meaning of oppressing, meaning of being formed, meaning of burning , meaning of change, as its meaning of trueness;
Now, as to those four functions beginning with full-understanding, which were mentioned above :
 Full-understanding is threefold; So too abandoning, and realizing,
And two developings are reckoned— Thus should be known the exposition.
 Full-understanding is threefold, that is, full understanding as the known, full-understanding as investigating , and full- understanding as abandoning .
 Herein, : “Understanding that is direct-knowledge is knowledge in the sense of the known” . It is briefly stated thus: “Whatever states are directly known are known” . It is given in detail in the way beginning: “Bhikkhus, all is to be directly known.
And what is all that is to be directly known?
Eye is to be directly known …” . full-understanding as the known is summarized thus .
Its particular plane is the direct knowing of mentality-materiality with its conditions.
 is summarized thus: “Understanding that is full-understanding is knowledge in the sense of investigation ” . It is briefly stated thus: “Whatever states are fully understood are investigated ” . “Bhikkhus, all is to be fully understood.
And what is all that is to be fully understood?
The eye is to be fully understood …” Full-understanding as investigating - It is given in detail in the way beginning .
Its particular plane starts with comprehension by groups, and occurring as investigation of impermanence, suffering, and not-self, it extends as far as conformity .
 Full-understanding as abandoning is summarized thus: “Understanding that is abandoning is knowledge in the sense of giving up” . It is stated in detail thus: Whatever states are abandoned are given up” . It occurs in the way beginning: “Through the contemplation of impermanence he abandons the perception of permanence …” .
Its plane extends from the contemplation of dissolution up to path knowledge. This is what is intended here.
Or alternatively, full-understanding as the known and full-understanding as investigating have that third kind as their aim, too, and whatever states a man abandons are certainly known and investigated, and so all three kinds of full-understanding can be understood in this way as the function of path knowledge.
 So too abandoning: abandoning is threefold too, like full-understanding, that is, abandoning by suppressing, abandoning by substitution of opposites, and abandoning by cutting off.
 Herein, when any of the mundane kinds of concentration suppresses opposing states such as the hindrances, that act of suppressing, which is like the pressing down of water-weed by placing a porous pot on weed-filled water, is called abandoning by suppressing.
But the suppression of only the hindrances is given in the text thus: “And there is abandoning of the hindrances by suppression in one who develops the first jhāna” . However, that should be understood as so stated because of the obviousness of the suppression then.
For even before and after the jhāna as well hindrances do not invade consciousness suddenly; but applied thought, etc., are suppressed only at the moment of actual absorption in the second jhāna, etc.,
 But what is called abandoning by substitution of opposites is the abandoning of any given state that ought to be abandoned through the means of a particular factor of knowledge, which as a constituent of insight is opposed to it, like the abandoning of darkness at night through the means of a light.
the abandoning of apprehension contrary to truth through the means of conformity.
the abandoning by substitution of opposites is .
Herein, – the way in which the abandoning of the perception of permanence, etc., takes place through the means of the seven contemplations beginning with that of impermanence has already been explained under the contemplation of dissolution .
Contemplation of destruction, however, is the knowledge in one who effects the resolution of the compact and so sees destruction as “impermanent in the sense of destruction.”
Through the means of that knowledge there comes to be the abandoning of the perception of compactness.
Contemplation of fall is stated thus:
“Defining both to be alike By inference from that same object.
Intentness on cessation—these Are insight in the mark of fall” .
It is intentness on cessation, in other words, on that same dissolution, after seeing dissolution of both seen and unseen formations by personal experience and by inference respectively. Through the means of that contemplation there comes to be the abandoning of accumulation.
When a man sees with insight that “The things for the sake of which I might accumulate kamma are thus subject to fall,” his consciousness no longer inclines to accumulation.
Contemplation of change is the act of seeing, according to the material septad, etc., how momentary occurrences in continuity take place differently by gradually diverging from any definition;
Contemplation of the signless is the same as the contemplation of impermanence. Through its means the sign of permanence is abandoned.
Contemplation of the desireless is the same as the contemplation of pain. Through its means desire for pleasure and hope for pleasure are abandoned.
Contemplation of voidness is the same as the contemplation of not-self. Through its means the misinterpreting that “a self exists” is abandoned.
Insight into states that is higher understanding is stated thus:
“Having reflected on the object, Dissolution he contemplates,
Appearance then as empty—this Is insight of higher understanding” .
Insight so described occurs after knowing materiality, etc., as object, by seeing the dissolution both of that object and of the consciousness whose object it was, and by apprehending voidness through the dissolution in this way: “Only formations break up. It is the death of formations. There is nothing else.”
Taking that insight as higher understanding and as insight with respect to states, it is called “insight into states that is higher understanding.” Through its means misinterpreting due to grasping at a core is abandoned, because it has been clearly seen that there is no core of permanence and no core of self.
Correct knowledge and vision is the discernment of mentality-materiality with its conditions. Through its means misinterpreting due to confusion that occurs in this way, “Was I in the past? ” , and in this way, “The world was created by an Overlord,” are abandoned.
Contemplation of danger is knowledge seeing danger in all kinds of becoming, etc., which as arisen owing to appearance as terror. Through its means misinterpreting due to reliance is abandoned, since he does not see any formation to be relied on for shelter.
Contemplation of reflection is the reflection that effects the means to liberation. Through its means non-reflection is abandoned.
Contemplation of turning away is equanimity about formations and conformity.
For at that point his mind is said to retreat, retract and recoil from the whole field of formations, as a water drop does on a lotus leaf that slopes a little.
That is why through its means misinterpreting due to bondage is abandoned. The meaning is: abandoning of the occurrence of defilement that consists in misinterpreting defiled by the bondage of sense desires, and so on.
Abandoning by substitution of the opposites should be understood in detail in this way.
But in the texts it is stated in brief thus: “Abandoning of views by substitution of opposites comes about in one who develops concentration partaking of penetration” .
 The abandoning of the states beginning with the fetters by the noble path knowledge in such a way that they never occur again, like a tree struck by a thunderbolt, is called abandoning by cutting off.
With reference to this it is said: “Abandoning by cutting off comes about in one who develops the supramundane path that leads to the destruction of defilements” .
So of these three kinds of abandoning, it is only abandoning by cutting off that is intended here.
But since that meditator’s previous abandoning by suppression and by substitution by opposites have that third kind as their aim, too, all three kinds of abandoning can therefore be understood in this way as the function of path knowledge.
For when a man has gained an empire by killing off the opposing kings, what was done by him previous to that is also called “done by the king.”
 Realizing is divided into two as mundane realizing, and supramundane realizing. And it is threefold too with the subdivision of the supramundane into two as seeing and developing.
 Herein, the touch of the first jhāna, etc., as given in the way beginning, “I am an obtainer, a master, of the first jhāna; the first jhāna has been realized by me” , is called mundane realizing.
“Touch” is the touching with the contact of knowledge by personal experience on arriving, thus, “This has been arrived at by me”.21
With reference to this meaning realization is summarized thus, “Understanding that is realization is knowledge in the sense of touch” , after which it is described thus, “Whatever states are realized are touched” .
Also, those states which are not aroused in one’s own continuity and are known through knowledge that depends on another are realized;
And what is all that should be realized?
The eye should be realized” , and so on.
And it is further said: “One who sees materiality realizes it.
One who sees feeling … perception … formations … consciousness realizes it.
One who sees the eye … … ageing and death realizes it. One who sees suffering … 22 … One who sees Nibbāna, which merges in the deathless in the sense of the end realizes it.
Whatever states are realized are touched” .
 The seeing of Nibbāna at the moment of the first path is realizing as seeing.
At the other path moments it is realizing as developing.
And it is intended as twofold here.
So realizing of Nibbāna as seeing and as developing should be understood as a function of this knowledge.
 And two developings are reckoned: but developing is also reckoned as twofold, namely as mundane developing, and as supramundane developing.
 Herein, the arousing of mundane virtue, concentration and understanding, and the influencing of the continuity by their means, is mundane developing.
And the arousing of supramundane virtue, concentration and understanding, and the influencing of the continuity by them, is supramundane developing.
Of these, it is the supramundane that is intended here.
For this fourfold knowledge arouses supramundane virtue, etc.,
since it is their conascence condition, and it influences the continuity by their means. So it is only supramundane developing that is a function of it.
Therefore these are the:
Functions of full-understanding, and the rest As stated when truths are penetrated to,
Each one of which ought to be recognized According to its individual essence.
Now, with reference to the stanza:
“When a wise man, established well in virtue, Develops consciousness and understanding” ,
it was said above “After he has perfected the two purifications that are the ‘roots,’ then he can develop the five purifications that are the ‘trunk’”. And at this point the detailed exposition of the system for developing understanding in the proper way as it has been handed down is completed.
So the question, “How should it be developed? ” is now answered.
in the Path of Purification composed for the purpose of gladdening good people.
in the Treatise on the Development of Understanding
and so the suppression of the hindrances then is obvious.
It is in fact the abandoning firstly of the false view of individuality through the means of delimitation of mentality-materiality;
the abandoning of not looking on equably through the means of equanimity;
the abandoning of non-reflection through the means of reflection;
the abandoning of lack of desire for deliverance through the means of desire for deliverance;
the abandoning of the perception of delight through the means of the contemplation of dispassion ;
the abandoning of the perception of enjoyment through the means of seeing danger;
the abandoning of the perception of non-terror in what is terror through the means of appearance as terror;
the abandoning of the eternity view through the means of seeing fall;
the abandoning of the annihilation view through the means of seeing rise;
the abandoning of perception of the path in what is not the path through the means of the definition of what is the path and what is not the path;
the abandoning of apprehension of a conglomeration as “I” and “mine” through the means of comprehension by groups;
the abandoning of both the no-cause view and the fictitious-cause view and also of the stain of doubt through the means of discerning conditions;
And also in the case of the eighteen principal insights: the abandoning of the perception of the perception of permanence, through the means of the contemplation of impermanence;
of the perception of pleasure, through the means of the contemplation of pain;
of the perception of self, through the means of the contemplation of not-self;
of delight, through the means of the contemplation of dispassion ;
of greed, through the means of the contemplation of fading away;
of originating, through the means of the contemplation of cessation;
of grasping, through the means of the contemplation of relinquishment;
of the perception of compactness, through the means of the contemplation of destruction;
of accumulation, through the means of the contemplation of fall;
of the perception of lastingness, through the means of the contemplation of change;
of the sign, through the means of the contemplation of the signless;
of desire, through the means of the contemplation of the desireless;
of misinterpreting , through the means of the contemplation of voidness;
of misinterpreting due to grasping at a core, through the means of insight into states that is higher understanding;
of misinterpreting due to confusion, through the means of correct knowledge and vision;
of misinterpreting due to reliance on formations, through the means of the contemplation of danger in them;
of non-reflection, through the means of the contemplation of reflection;
of misinterpreting due to bondage, through means of contemplation of turning away .
or it is the act of seeing change in the two aspects of the ageing and the death of what is arisen. Through the means of that contemplation the perception of lastingness is abandoned.
for it is said, referring to that, “Bhikkhus, all should be realized.
called “The Description of Purification by Knowledge and Vision”
The twenty-second chapter
The words, ‘By personal experience’ exclude taking it as an object by inference. For what is intended here as the ‘contact of knowledge’ is knowing by personal experience through reviewing thus, ‘This is like this’”
‘With the contact of knowledge by personal experience’ means by personal experience of it as object, which is what the ‘contact of knowledge’ is called.
WHAT ARE THE BENEFITS IN DEVELOPING UNDERSTANDING? To that question, which was asked above,
we reply that this development of understanding has many hundred benefits.
But it would be impossible to explain its benefits in detail, however long a time were taken over it.
Briefly, though, its benefits should be understood as these: removal of the various defilements, experience of the taste of the noble fruit, ability to attain the attainment of cessation, and achievement of worthiness to receive gifts and so on.
Herein, it should be understood that one of the benefits of the mundane development of understanding is the removal of the various defilements beginning with mistaken view of individuality. This starts with the delimitation of mentality-materiality.
Then one of the benefits of the supramundane development of understanding is the removal, at the path moment, of the various defilements beginning with the fetters.
With dreadful thump the thunderbolt Annihilates the rock.
The fire whipped by the driving wind Annihilates the wood.
The radiant orb of solar flame Annihilates the dark.
Developed understanding, too, Annihilates inveterate
Defilements’ netted overgrowth, The source of every woe.
This blessing in this very life A man himself may know.
Not only the removal of the various defilements but also the experience of the taste of the noble fruit is a benefit of the development of understanding.
For it is the fruitions of stream-entry, etc.—the fruits of asceticism—that are called the “noble fruit.”
Its taste is experienced in two ways,
Of these, only its occurrence in the cognitive series of the path has been shown .
Furthermore, when people say that the fruit is the mere abandoning of fetters1 and nothing more than that, the following sutta can be cited in order to convince them that they are wrong: “How is it that understanding of the tranquilizing of effort is knowledge of fruit?
At the moment of the stream-entry path right view in the sense of seeing emerges from wrong view, and it emerges from the defilements and from the aggregates that occur consequent upon that wrong view, and externally it emerges from all signs. Right view arises because of the tranquilizing of that effort.
This is the fruit of the path” , and this should be given in detail.
Also such passages as, “The four paths and the four fruits—these states have a measureless object” ,
However, in order to show how it occurs in the attainment of fruition there is the following set of questions: What is fruition attainment? Who attains it? Who do not attain it? Why do they attain it? How does its attainment come about? How is it made to last? How does the emergence from it come about? What is next to fruition? What is fruition next to?
Herein, What is fruition attainment? It is absorption in the cessation in which the noble fruition consists.
 Who attains it? Who do not attain it? No ordinary men attain it.
Why?
Because it is beyond their reach.
But all Noble Ones attain it.
Why?
Because it is within their reach.
But those who have reached a higher path do not attain a lower fruition because the state of each successive person is more tranquilized than the one below.
And those who have only reached a lower path do not attain a higher fruition because it is beyond their reach.
But each one attains his appropriate fruition. This is what has been agreed here.
But there are some who say that the stream-enterer and once-returner do not attain it,
The reason they give is that only these two show achievement in concentration.
But that is no reason, since even the ordinary man attains such mundane concentration as is within his reach.
But why argue here over what is and what is not a reason?
Is it not said in the texts as follows? “Which ten states of change-of-lineage arise through insight?
“For the purpose of obtaining the stream-entry path it overcomes arising, occurrence … … despair, and externally the sign of formations, thus it is change-of-lineage.
“For the purpose of attaining the stream-entry fruition … “For the purpose of attaining the once-return path … “For the purpose of attaining the once-return fruition … “For the purpose of attaining the non-return path … “For the purpose of attaining the non-return fruition … “For the purpose of attaining the Arahant path … “For the purpose of attaining the Arahant fruition … “For the purpose of attaining the void abiding … “For the purpose of attaining the signless abiding it overcomes arising, occurrence … … despair, and externally the sign of formations, thus it is change-of-lineage” .2
From that it must be concluded that all Noble Ones attain each their own fruit.
 Why do they attain it? For the purpose of abiding in bliss here and now.
For just as a king experiences royal bliss and a deity experiences divine bliss, so too the Noble Ones think, “We shall experience the noble supramundane bliss,” and after deciding on the duration, they attain the attainment of fruition whenever they choose.3
 How does its attainment come about? How is it made to last? How does the emergence from it come about? In the first place its attainment comes about for two reasons: with not bringing to mind any object other than Nibbāna, and with bringing Nibbāna to mind,
according as it is said: “Friend, there are two conditions for the attainment of the signless mind-deliverance; they are the non-bringing to mind of all signs, and the bringing to mind of the signless element” .
Now, the process of attaining it is as follows.
A noble disciple who seeks the attainment of fruition should go into solitary retreat. He should see formations with insight according to rise and fall and so on.
When that insight has progressed as far as conformity, then comes change-of-lineage knowledge with formations as its object.4 And immediately next to it consciousness becomes absorbed in cessation with the attainment of fruition.
And here it is only fruition, not path, that arises even in a trainer, because his tendency is to fruition attainment.
But there are those5 who say that when a stream-enterer embarks on insight, thinking, “I shall attain fruition attainment,” he becomes a once-returner,
and a once-returner, a non-returner. They should be told: “In that case a non-returner becomes an Arahant and an Arahant, a Paccekabuddha and a Paccekabuddha, a Buddha.
For that reason, and because it is contradicted as well by the text quoted above, none of that should be accepted.
Only this should be accepted: fruition itself, not path, arises also in the trainer.
And if the path he has arrived at had the first jhāna,
his fruition will have the first jhāna too when it arises.
If the path has the second, so will the fruition. And so with the other jhānas.”
This, firstly, is how attaining comes about.
 It is made to last in three ways, because of the words: “Friend, there are three conditions for the persistence of the signless mind-deliverance: they are the non-bringing to mind of all signs, the bringing to mind of the signless element, and the prior volition” .
Herein, the prior volition is the predetermining of the time before attaining;6
This is how it is made to last.
 Emergence from it comes about in two ways, because of the words: “Friend, there are two conditions for the emergence from the signless mind- deliverance: they are the bringing to mind of all signs, and the non-bringing to mind of the signless element” .
Herein, of all signs means the sign of materiality, sign of feeling, perception, formations, and consciousness.
Of course, a man does not bring all those to mind at once, but this is said in order to include all.
So the emergence from the attainment of fruition comes about in him when he brings to mind whatever is the object of the life-continuum.7
 What is next to fruition? What is fruition next to? In the first case either fruition itself is next to fruition or the life-continuum is next to it.
But there is fruition that is next to the path, there is that next to fruition, there is that next to change-of-lineage, and there is that next to the base consisting of neither perception nor non-perception.
Herein, it is next to the path in the cognitive series of the path. Each one that is subsequent to a previous one is next to fruition.
 Each first one in the attainments of fruition is next to change-of-lineage.
And conformity should be understood here as “change-of-lineage”;
In trainers, conformity is a condition, as proximity condition, for fruition attainment” .
 The fruition by means of which there is emergence from the attainment of cessation is next to the base consisting of neither perception non-perception.
Herein, all except the fruition that arises in the cognitive series of the path occur as fruition attainment.
So whether it arises in the cognitive series of the path or in fruition attainment:
Which tranquilizes all distress,Its beauty from the Deathless draws,
Asceticism’s fruit sublime, Its calm from lack of worldliness.
Of a sweet purifying bliss It is the fountainhead besides,
Whose honey-sweet ambrosia A deathless sustenance provides.
This peerless bliss, which is the taste The noble fruit provides; and so
Now, if a wise man cultivates His understanding, he shall know
Of flavour of the noble fruit A blessing of fulfilled insight.
This is the reason why they call Experience here and now aright
that is to say, in its occurrence in the cognitive series of the path, and in its occurrence in the attainment of fruition.
and, “An exalted state is a condition, as proximity condition, for a measureless state” ), establish the meaning here.
and that only the two above them attain it.
for it is by determining it thus, “I shall emerge at such a time,” that it lasts until that time comes.
for this is said in the Paṭṭhāna: “In the Arahant, conformity is a condition, as proximity condition, for fruition attainment.
who maintain this;
for they take the sutta wrongly which says, ‘“Arahantship” is said, friend Sāriputta; what is Arahantship?—The destruction of greed, the destruction of hate, the destruction of delusion: that is what is called Arahantship” , taking it literally and asserting that nothing exists called Arahantship and that it is only the abandoning of defilements that is so called by common usage. And they deny that there are any other fruitions.
It is the Andhakas, etc.,
Although they are resultant states, nevertheless the states of fruition attainment occur in the noble person only when he chooses since they do not arise without the preliminary work and do so only when they are given predominance.
Why does change-of-lineage not have Nibbāna as its object here as it does when it precedes the path?
Because states belonging to fruition are not associated with an outlet
as in the case of the path.
For this is said: ‘What states are an outlet?
The four unincluded paths’ 
Those of the Abhayagiri Monastery in Anurādhapura.
The ‘volition’ is attaining after deciding the time limit in this way, ‘When the moon, or the sun, has gone so far, I shall emerge,’ which is an act of volition.
It is because he is called ‘emerged from attainment’ as soon as the life-continuum consciousness has arisen that ‘he brings to mind that which is the object of the life-continuum’ is said.
Kamma, etc., are called the object of the life-continuum 
And not only the experience of the taste of the noble fruit but also the ability to attain the attainment of cessation should be understood as a benefit of the development of understanding.
Now, in order to explain the attainment of cessation there is this set of questions: What is the attainment of cessation? Who attains it? Who do not attain it? Where do they attain it? Why do they attain it? How does its attainment come about? How is it made to last? How does the emergence from it come about? Towards what does the mind of one who has emerged tend? What is the difference between one who has attained it and one who is dead? Is the attainment of cessation formed or unformed, mundane or supramundane, produced or unproduced?
Herein, What is the attainment of cessation? It is the non-occurrence of consciousness and its concomitants owing to their progressive cessation.
 Who attains it? Who do not attain it? No ordinary men, no stream- enterers or once-returners, and no non-returners and Arahants who are bare- insight workers attain it.
But both non-returners and those with cankers destroyed who are obtainers of the eight attainments attain it.
For it is said: “Understanding that is mastery, owing to possession of two powers, to the tranquilization of three formations, to sixteen kinds of exercise of knowledge, and to nine kinds of exercise of concentration, is knowledge of the attainment of cessation” .
And these qualifications are not to be found together in any persons other than non-returners and those whose cankers are destroyed, who are obtainers of the eight attainments.
That is why only they and no others attain it.
But which are the two powers? And the three formations … and mastery?
Here there is no need for us to say anything;
“Of the two powers: of the two powers, the serenity power and the insight power.
“What is serenity as a power?
The unification of the mind and non-distraction due to renunciation are serenity as a power.
The unification of the mind and non-distraction due to non-ill will are serenity as a power. The unification of the mind and non-distraction due to perception of light … to non-distraction … to defining of states … to knowledge … to gladness … to the eight attainments, the ten kasiṇas, the ten recollections, the nine charnel-ground contemplations, and the thirty-two modes of mindfulness of breathing8 … the unification of the mind and non-distraction due to breathing out in one who is contemplating relinquishment9 is serenity as a power.
“In what sense is serenity a power?
Owing to the first jhāna it does not waver on account of the hindrances, thus serenity is a power.
Owing to the second jhāna it does not waver on account of applied and sustained thought, thus serenity is a power … … Owing to the base consisting of neither perception nor non-perception it does not waver on account of the perception of the base consisting of nothingness, thus serenity is a power.
It does not waver and vacillate and hesitate on account of agitation and on account of the defilements and the aggregates that accompany agitation, thus serenity is a power.
This is the serenity power.
“What is insight as a power?
Contemplation of impermanence is insight as a power.
Contemplation of pain … Contemplation of not-self … Contemplation of dispassion … Contemplation of fading away … Contemplation of cessation … Contemplation of relinquishment is insight as a power.
Contemplation of impermanence in materiality … … Contemplation of relinquishment in materiality is insight as a power.
Contemplation of impermanence in feeling … in perception … in formations … in consciousness is insight as a power … Contemplation of relinquishment in consciousness is insight as a power. Contemplation of impermanence in the eye … … Contemplation of impermanence in ageing-and-death … …
Contemplation of relinquishment in ageing-and-death is insight as a power.
“In what sense is insight a power?
Owing to the contemplation of impermanence it does not waver on account of perception of permanence, thus insight is a power.
Owing to the contemplation of pain it does not waver on account of perception of pleasure … Owing to the contemplation of not-self it does not waver on account of the perception of self … Owing to the contemplation of dispassion it does not waver on account of delight … Owing to the contemplation of fading away it does not waver on account of greed … Owing to the contemplation of cessation it does not waver on account of arising … Owing to the contemplation of relinquishment it does not waver on account of grasping, thus insight is a power.
It does not waver and vacillate and hesitate on account of ignorance and on account of the defilements and the aggregates that accompany ignorance,
“Owing to the tranquilization of three formations: owing to the tranquilization of what three formations?
In one who has attained the second jhāna the verbal formations consisting in applied and sustained thought are quite tranquilized.
In one who has attained the fourth jhāna the bodily formations consisting in in-breaths and out- breaths are quite tranquilized.
In one who has attained cessation of perception and feeling the mental formations consisting in feeling and perception are quite tranquilized.
It is owing to the tranquilization of these three formations.
“Owing to sixteen kinds of exercise of knowledge: owing to what sixteen kinds of exercise of knowledge?
Contemplation of impermanence is a kind of exercise of knowledge.
Contemplation of pain … Contemplation of not-self … Contemplation of dispassion … Contemplation of fading away … Contemplation of cessation … Contemplation of relinquishment … Contemplation of turning away is a kind of exercise of knowledge.
The stream-entry path is a kind of exercise of knowledge.
The attainment of the fruition of stream-entry …
It is owing to these sixteen kinds of exercise of knowledge.
“Owing to nine kinds of exercise of concentration: owing to what nine kinds of exercise of concentration?
The first jhāna is a kind of exercise of concentration.
The second jhāna … The third jhāna … The fourth jhāna … Th e attainment of the base consisting of boundless space … The attainment of the base consisting of boundless consciousness … The attainment of the base consisting of nothingness … . The attainment of the base consisting of neither perception nor non-perception is a kind of exercise of concentration.
And the applied thought and sustained thought and happiness and bliss and unification of mind that have the purpose of attaining the first jhāna … … And the applied thought and sustained thought and happiness and bliss and unification of mind that have the purpose of attaining the attainment of the base consisting of neither perception nor non-perception.
It is owing to these nine kinds of exercise of concentration.10
“Mastery: there are five kinds of mastery. There is mastery in adverting, in attaining, in resolving, in emerging, in reviewing.
He adverts to the first jhāna where, when, and for as long as he wishes, he has no difficulty in adverting, thus it is mastery in adverting.
He attains the first jhāna where, when, and for as long as he wishes, he has no difficulty in attaining, thus it is mastery in attaining. He resolves upon the duration of the first jhāna where, … thus it is mastery in resolving. He emerges from the first jhāna, … thus it is mastery in emerging. He reviews the first jhāna where, when, and for as long as he wishes, he has no difficulty in reviewing, thus it is mastery in reviewing.
He adverts to the second jhāna … … He reviews the attainment of the base consisting of neither perception nor non-perception where, when, and for as long as he wishes,
These are the five kinds of mastery” .
And here the words: “Owing to sixteen kinds of exercise of knowledge” state the maximum.
But in a non-returner the mastery is owing to fourteen kinds of exercise of knowledge.
If that is so, then does it not come about also in the once-returner owing to twelve? And in the stream-enterer owing to ten?
—It does not. Because the greed based on the cords of sense desire, which is an obstacle to concentration, is unabandoned in them.
that the serenity power is not perfected. Since it is not perfected they are not, owing to want of power, able to attain the attainment of cessation, which has to be attained by the two powers.
But it is abandoned in the non-returner and so his power is perfected.
Since his power is perfected he is able to attain it.
Hence the Blessed One said: “Profitable consciousness of the base consisting of neither perception nor non-perception in one emerging from cessation is a condition, as proximity condition, for the attainment of fruition” .
For this is said in the Great Book of the Paṭṭhāna11 with reference only to non- returners’ emerging from cessation.
 Where do they attain it? In the five-constituent becoming.
Why?
Because of the necessity for the succession of all the attainments .
But in the four-constituent becoming there is no arising of the first jhāna, etc.,
But some say that is because of the lack of a physical basis for the mind there.12
 Why do they attain it? Being wearied by the occurrence and dissolution of formations, they attain it thinking, “Let us dwell in bliss by being without consciousness here and now and reaching the cessation that is Nibbāna.”13
 How does its attainment come about? It comes about in one who performs the preparatory tasks by striving with serenity and insight and causes the cessation of consciousness belonging to the base consisting of neither perception nor non-perception.
One who strives with serenity alone reaches the base consisting of neither perception nor non-perception and remains there,
But it is one who strives with both, and after performing the preparatory tasks, causes the cessation of consciousness belonging to the base consisting of neither perception nor non-perception, who attains it. This is in brief.
But the detail is this. When a bhikkhu who desires to attain cessation has finished all that has to do with his meal and has washed his hands and feet well, he sits down on a well-prepared seat in a secluded place. Having folded his legs crosswise, set his body erect, established mindfulness in front of him, he attains the first jhāna, and on emerging he sees the formations in it with insight as impermanent, painful, not-self.
This insight is threefold as insight that discerns formations, insight for the attainment of fruition, and insight for the attainment of cessation.
Herein, insight that discerns formations, whether sluggish or keen, is the proximate cause only for a path.
Insight for the attainment of fruition, which is only valid when keen, is similar to that for the development of a path.
Insight for the attainment of cessation is only valid when it is not over-sluggish and not over-keen.
Therefore he sees those formations with insight that is not over-sluggish and not over-keen.
After that, he attains the second jhāna, and on emerging he sees formations with insight in like manner.
After that, he attains the third jhāna … … After that, he attains the base consisting of boundless consciousness, and on emerging he sees the formations in it in like manner.
Likewise he attains the base consisting of nothingness. On emerging from that he does the fourfold preparatory task, that is to say, about non-damage to others’ property, the Community’s waiting, the Master’s summons, and the limit of the duration.
 Herein, non-damage to others’ property refers to what the bhikkhu has about him that is not his personal property: a robe and bowl, or a bed and chair, or a living room, or any other kind of requisite kept by him but the property of various others. It should be resolved14 that such property will not be damaged, will not be destroyed by fire, water, wind, thieves, rats, and so on.
Here is the form of the resolve: “During these seven days let this and this not be burnt by fire; let it not be swept off by water; let it not be spoilt by wind; let it not be stolen by thieves; let it not be devoured by rats, and so on.”
If he does not resolve in this way, they may be destroyed by fire, etc., as in the case of the Elder Mahā Nāga.
The elder, it seems, went for alms into the village where his mother, a lay follower, lived.
She gave him rice gruel and seated him in the sitting hall.
The elder sat down and attained cessation.
While he was sitting there the hall caught fire. The other bhikkhus each picked up their seats and fled.
The villagers gathered together, and seeing the elder, they said, “What a lazy monk! What a lazy monk!”
The fire burned the grass thatch, the bamboos, and timbers, and it encircled the elder.
People brought water and put it out. They removed the ashes, did repairs,15 scattered flowers, and then stood respectfully waiting.
The elder emerged at the time he had determined. Seeing them, he said, “I am discovered! ,” and he rose up into the air and went to Piyaṅgu Island.
This is “non-damage to others’ property.”
There is no special resolving to be done for what is his own personal property such as the inner and outer robes or the seat he is sitting on.
He protects all that by means of the attainment itself, like those of the venerable Sañjīva.
And this is said: “There was success by intervention of concentration in the venerable Sañjīva. There was success by intervention of concentration in the venerable Sāriputta” .
 The Community’s waiting is the Community’s expecting.
The meaning is: till this bhikkhu comes there is no carrying out of acts of the Community.
And here it is not the actual Community’s waiting that is the preparatory task, but the adverting to the waiting.
So it should be adverted to in this way: “While I am sitting for seven days in the attainment of cessation, if the Community wants to enact a resolution, etc., I shall emerge before any bhikkhu comes to summon me.”
But if he does not do so, then perhaps the Community assembles, and not seeing him, it is asked, “Where is the bhikkhu so and so?” They reply, “He has attained cessation.” The Community dispatches a bhikkhu, telling him, “Go and summon him in the name of the Community.”
Then as soon as the bhikkhu stands within his hearing and merely says, “The Community is waiting for you, friend,” he emerges.
Such is the importance of the Community’s order.
So he should attain in such-wise that, by adverting to it beforehand, he emerges by himself.
 The Master’s summons: here too it is the adverting to the Master’s summons that is the preparatory task.
So that also should be adverted to in this way: “While I am sitting for seven days in the attainment of cessation, if the Master, after examining a case, makes known a course of training, or teaches the Dhamma, the origin of which discourse is some need that has arisen,16 I shall emerge before anyone comes to summon me.”
But if he does not do so, when the Community assembles, the Master, not seeing him, asks, “Where is the bhikkhu so and so?” They reply, “He has attained cessation.” Then he dispatches a bhikkhu, telling him, “Go and summon him in my name.”
As soon as the bhikkhu stands within his hearing and merely says, “The Master calls the venerable one,” he emerges.
Such is the importance of the Master’s summons. So he should attain in such wise that, by adverting to it beforehand, he emerges himself.
 The limit of duration is the limit of life’s duration.
For this bhikkhu should be very careful to determine what the limit of his life’s duration is.
He should attain only after adverting in this way: “Will my own vital formations go on occurring for seven days or will they not?”
For if he attains it without adverting when the vital formations are due to cease within seven days, then since the attainment of cessation cannot ward off his death
So he should attain only after adverting to that.
For while it may be permissible to omit adverting to others,
Now, when he has thus attained the base consisting of nothingness and emerged and done this preparatory task, he then attains the base consisting of neither perception nor non-perception.
Then after one or two turns of consciousness have passed, he becomes without consciousness, he achieves cessation.
But why do consciousnesses not go on occurring in him after the two consciousnesses?
Because the effort is directed to cessation.
For this bhikkhu’s mounting through the eight attainments, coupling together the states of serenity and insight, is directed to successive cessation, not to attaining the base consisting of neither perception nor non-perception. So it is because the effort is directed to cessation that no more than the two consciousnesses occur.
But if a bhikkhu emerges from the base consisting of nothingness without having done this preparatory task and then attains the base consisting of neither perception nor non-perception, he is unable then to become without consciousness: he returns to the base consisting of nothingness and settles down there.
And here the simile of the man and the road not previously travelled may be told.
A man who had not previously travelled a certain road came to a ravine cut by water, or after crossing a deep morass he came to a rock heated by a fierce sun. Then without arranging his inner and outer garments, he descended into the ravine but came up again for fear of wetting his belongings and remained on the bank,
or he walked up on to the rock but on burning his feet he returned to the near side and waited there.
Herein, just as the man, as soon as he had descended into the ravine, or walked up on to the hot rock, turned back and remained on the near side because he had not seen to the arrangement of his inner and outer garments, so too as soon as the meditator has attained the base consisting of neither perception nor non-perception, he turns back and remains in the base consisting of nothingness because the preparatory task has not been done.
Just as when a man who has travelled that road before comes to that place, he puts his inner garment on securely, and taking the other in his hand, crosses over the ravine, or so acts as to tread only lightly on the hot rock and accordingly gets to the other side, so too, when the bhikkhu does the preparatory task and then attains the base consisting of neither perception nor non-perception, then he achieves cessation, which is the other side, by becoming without consciousness.
 How is it made to last? It lasts as long as the time predetermined for its duration, unless interrupted meanwhile by the exhaustion of the life span, by the waiting of the Community, or by the Master’s summons.
 How does the emergence from it come about? The emergence comes about in two ways thus: by means of the fruition of non-return in the case of the non- returner, or by means of the fruition of Arahantship in the case of the Arahant.
 Towards what does the mind of one who has emerged tend? It tends towards Nibbāna.
For this is said: “When a bhikkhu has emerged from the attainment of the cessation of perception and feeling, friend Visākha, his consciousness inclines to seclusion, leans to seclusion, tends to seclusion” .
 What is the difference between one who has attained and one who is dead?
This is also given in a sutta, according as it is said: “When a bhikkhu is dead, friend, has completed his term, his bodily formations have ceased and are quite still, his verbal formations have ceased and are quite still, his mental formations have ceased and are quite still, his life is exhausted, his heat has subsided, and his faculties are broken up.
When a bhikkhu has entered upon the cessation of perception and feeling, his bodily formations have ceased and are quite still, his verbal formations have ceased and are quite still, his mental formations have ceased and are quite still, his life is unexhausted, his heat has not subsided, his faculties are quite whole” .
 As to the question is the attainment of cessation formed or unformed, etc.? It is not classifiable as formed or unformed, mundane or supramundane.
Why?
Because it has no individual essence.
But since it comes to be attained by one who attains it, it is therefore permissible to say that it is produced, not unproduced.18
This too is an attainment which A Noble One may cultivate;
The peace it gives is reckoned as Nibbāna here and now.
A wise man by developing The noble understanding can
With it himself endow; So this ability is called
A boon of understanding, too, The noble paths allow.
for it has all been said in the description of the summary quoted above,
according as it is said:
thus insight is a power.
The once-return path … The attainment of the fruition of once-return … The non- return path … The attainment of the fruition of non-return … The Arahant path … The attainment of the fruition of Arahantship is a kind of exercise of knowledge.
he has no difficulty in reviewing, thus it is mastery in reviewing.
It is because that is not abandoned in them
and so it is not possible to attain it there.
while one who strives with insight alone reaches the attainment of fruition and remains there.
When he has resolved in this way, they are not in danger during the seven days.
One who attains it after doing this emerges at exactly that time.
For when he has seated himself after doing so, he emerges at exactly that time.
because there is no dying during cessation,17 he consequently emerges from the attainment meanwhile.
it is said that this must be adverted to.
The word ‘profitable’ used in this Paṭṭhāna passage shows that it app1ies only to non-returners, otherwise ‘functional’ would have been said”
They say so because of absence of heart-basis; but the meaning is because of absence of basis called physical body.
For if anyone were to attain cessation in the immaterial worlds he would become indefinable owing to the non- existence of any consciousness or consciousness concomitant at all, and he would be as though attained to final Nibbāna without remainder of results of past clinging;
for what remainder of results of past clinging could be predicated of him when he had entered into cessation?
So it is because of the lack of the necessary factors that there is no attaining of the attainment of cessation in the immaterial worlds.
‘Reaching the cessation that is Nibbāna’: as though reaching Nibbāna without remainder of result of past clinging.
‘In bliss’ means without suffering.
‘It should be resolved’: the thought should be aroused.
For here the resolve consists in arousing the thought.
In the non-arising of consciousness-originated materiality, etc., and in the absence of support by a postnascence condition, etc., the physical body continues the same only for seven days; after that it suffers wastage. So he limits the duration to seven days when he attains cessation, they say.
He should attain only after adverting thus, ‘Let sudden death not occur.’
There is no death during cessation because dying takes place by means of the final life-continuum consciousness.
For in the case of sudden death he would not be able to declare final knowledge, advise the bhikkhus, and testify to the Dispensation’s power. And there would be no reaching the highest path in the case of a non-returner.
though some say that they are the life span, heat and consciousness. These are the object only of his normal consciousness.
‘Vital formations’ are the same as life span;
The five aggregates are positively-produced always, not un-positively-produced ; they are always formed, not unformed. Besides, they are produced as well.
For among the dhammas that are individual essences it is only Nibbāna that is un-positively-produced and un-produced .
What is the difference between the positively-produced and the produced?
A dhamma that is an individual essence with a beginning and an end in time, produced by conditions, and marked by the three characteristics, is positively produced. But besides this, what is produced but not positively produced is a dhamma with no individual essence when it is produced by the taking of a name or by attaining the attainment of cessation.
And not only the ability to attain the attainment of cessation but also achievement of worthiness to receive gifts should be understood as a benefit of this supramundane development of understanding.
For, generally speaking, it is because understanding has been developed in these four ways that a person who has developed it, is fit for the gifts of the world with its deities, fit for its hospitality, fit for its offerings, and fit for its reverential salutation, and an incomparable field of merit for the world.
But in particular, firstly, one who arrives at development of under-standing of the first path with sluggish insight and limp faculties is called, “one who will be reborn seven times at most”; he traverses the round of rebirths seven times in the happy destinies.
One who arrives with medium insight and medium faculties is called, “one who goes from noble family to noble family”; with two or three rebirths in noble families he makes an end of suffering.
One who arrives with keen insight and keen faculties is called, “one who germinates only once”; with one rebirth in the human world he makes an end of suffering .
By developing understanding of the second path, he is called a once-returner. He returns once to this world and makes an end of suffering.
By developing understanding of the third path he is called a non-returner.
According to the difference in his faculties he in one of five ways : he becomes “one who attains Nibbāna early in his next existence” or “one who attains Nibbāna more than half way through his next existence” or “one who attains Nibbāna without prompting” or “one who attains Nibbāna with prompting” or “one who is going upstream bound for the Highest Gods” .
Herein, one who attains Nibbāna early in his next existence attains Nibbāna after reappearing anywhere in the Pure Abodes, without reaching the middle of his life span there.
One who attains Nibbāna more than half way through his next existence attains Nibbāna after the middle of his life span there.
One who attains Nibbāna without prompting generates the highest path without prompting, with little effort.
One who attains Nibbāna with prompting generates the highest path with prompting, with effort.
One who is going upstream bound for the Highest Gods passes on upwards from wherever he is reborn in the Pure Abodes to the Highest Gods’ becoming and attains Nibbāna there.
By developing understanding of the fourth path one becomes “liberated by faith,” another “liberated by understanding,” another “both-ways liberated,” another “one with the triple clear vision,” another “one with the six kinds of direct-knowledge,” another “one of the great ones whose cankers are destroyed who has reached the categories of discrimination.”
The noble understanding, when Developed, will these blessings win;
Accordingly discerning men Rejoice exceedingly therein.
And at this point
the development of understanding with its benefits, which is shown in the Path of Purification with its headings of virtue, concentration, and understanding, in the stanza has been fully illustrated.
completes his course after he has left this world.
It was about one who has developed the fourth path that it was said: “But it is at the moment of the path that he is said to be disentangling that tangle:
at the moment of fruition he has disentangled the tangle and is worthy of the highest offerings in the world with its deities” .
“When a wise man, established well in virtue, Develops consciousness and understanding,
Then as a bhikkhu ardent and sagacious, He succeeds in disentangling this tangle” ,
in the Path of Purification composed for the purpose of gladdening good people.
called “The Description of the Benefits of Understanding”
The twenty-third chapter
“When a wise man, established well in virtue, Develops consciousness and understanding,
Then as a bhikkhu ardent and sagacious He succeeds in disentangling this tangle” ,
After we quoted this stanza we then said:
Of this same verse composed by the Great Sage.
My task is now to set out the true sense, Divided into virtue and the rest.
Right hard to find, — There are here in the Victor’s Dispensation Seekers gone forth from home to homelessness,
Now, at this point that has all been expounded.
And herein:
Of all these meanings classed as virtue and so on Now, that the exposition as set forth
Of the five Nikāyas—for this reason Stated in the commentarial system
After collating all the expositions
Is almost free from errors and from flaws
Let meditators pure in understanding Desiring purification
duly show Reverence for this Path of Purification.
In doing this, accepting the suggestion
Desiring establishment in this Good Dhamma What store of merit has been gained by me
And now just as the Path of Purification, Without impediment,
With eight and fifty recitation sections In the text, has herewith been completed
so may all those Who in the world depend on what is good
Glad-hearted soon succeed without delay.
POSTSCRIPT This Path of Purification was made by the elder who is adorned with supreme and pure faith, wisdom and energy, in whom are gathered a concourse of upright, gentle, etc., qualities due to the practice of virtue, who is capable of delving into and fathoming the views of his own and others’ creeds, who is possessed of keenness of understanding, who is strong in unerring knowledge of the Master’s Dispensation as divided into three Piṭakas with their commentaries, a great expounder, gifted with sweet and noble speech that springs from the ease born of perfection of the vocal instrument, a speaker of what is appropriately said, a superlative speaker, a great poet, an ornament in the lineage of the elders who dwell in the Great Monastery, and who are shining lights in the lineage of elders with unblemished enlightenment in the superhuman states that are embellished with the special qualities of the six kinds of direct-knowledge and the categories of discrimination, who has abundant purified wit, who bears the name Buddhaghosa conferred by the venerable ones, and who should be called “of Moraṇḍaceṭaka.”
May it continue here to show To ferry them across the worlds
The way to purity of virtue, etc., For clansmen seeking out the means
Shall last that name “Enlightened One,” By which, thus purified in mind,
For just as long as in this world Is known the Greatest Sage, World Chief.
The exposition of the Path of Purification Has thus been made for gladdening good people;
But this, by reckoning the Pali text, Has eight and fifty recitation sections.
of the sure straight way Comprising virtue and the other two, that leads to purity
Have no right knowledge And who although desiring purity
Who, though they strive, here gain no purity.
To them, pure in expositions,
Relying on the teaching of the dwellers In the Great Monastery;2 let all those
I shall expound the comforting Path Of Purification
Good men who do desire purity Listen intently to my exposition.
A true Vibhajjavādin, who is wise, of famous elders
into the line One born, Dwelling within the Great Monastery,
Of the venerable Saṅghapāla, And lives in pure simplicity, devoted
Whose mind the virtuous qualities of patience, Mildness, loving kindness, and so on, grace—
By the power of that store of merit May every being prosper happily.
To discipline’s observance, and to practice,
END
who is expert in the Discipline
who is a preacher of the Dhamma
who is a forest dweller
who is a refuse-rag wearer
an alms-food eater
a tree-root dweller
a charnel-ground dweller… an open-air dweller … a continual sitter … an any-bed user … a one-session eater
considers thus: ‘I am a one-session eater; but these other bhikkhus are not one-session eaters.’1065
for in whatever way they conceive, the fact is ever other than that.’1066
for in whatever way they conceive, the fact is ever other than that.’
A dog, it seems, was attacked in the forest by a boar and fled. When it was dusk he saw in the distance a cauldron for boiling rice, and perceiving it as a boar, he fled in fear and terror. Again, a man who was afraid of pisāca goblins saw a decapitated palm stump at night in a place that was unfamiliar to him, and perceiving it as a pisāca goblin, he fell down in his fear, horror and confusion.
A formed dhamma with an individual essence is delimited by rise and fall because it is produced after having not been, and because after having been it vanishes.
But space is called boundless since it has neither rise nor fall because it is a dhamma without individual essence.
He should not give attention to it only as ‘Boundless, boundless;’ instead of developing it thus, he should give attention to it as ‘Boundless consciousness, boundless consciousness’ or as ‘Consciousness, consciousness’.
‘Some’ is said with reference to the Elder Upatissa.
For it is put in this way by him in the Vimuttimagga.
The word ‘apparently’ indicates dissent from what follows.
in the Treatise on the Development of Concentration
called “The Description of Taking a Meditation Subject”
The third chapter
“Sineru is not only 84,000 leagues in height
but measures the same in width and breadth
For this is said:
‘Bhikkhus, Sineru, king of mountains, is eighty-four thousand leagues in width and it is eighty-four thousand leagues in breadth’ .
Each of the seven surrounding mountains is half as high as that last mentioned, that is, Yugandhara is half as high as Sineru, and so on.
Their widths correspond respectively to the heights of Sineru and the rest.
Between Sineru and Yugandhara and so on, the oceans are called ‘bottomless’ .
The great ocean gradually slopes from the foot of the world-sphere mountains down as far as the foot of Sineru, where it measures in depth as much as Sineru’s height. And Yugandhara, which is half that height, rests on the earth as Ìsadhara and the rest do;
for it is said: ‘Bhikkhus, the great ocean gradually slopes, gradually tends, gradually inclines’ .
The mountains stand all round Sineru, enclosing it, as it were.
Yugandhara surrounds Sineru, then Ìsadhara surrounds Yugandhara,
and likewise with the others”
‘The word Blessed is a term of respect.
Moreover, he has abolished greed, thus he is blessed ; he has abolished hate, … delusion, … views, … craving, … defilement, thus he is blessed. “‘He divided , analyzed , and classified the Dhamma treasure, thus he is blessed . He makes an end of the kinds of becoming , thus he is blessed . He has developed the body and virtue and the mind and understanding, thus he is blessed . “‘Or the Blessed One is a frequenter of remote jungle-thicket resting places with little noise, with few voices, with a lonely atmosphere, where one can lie hidden from people, favourable to retreat, thus he is blessed . “‘Or the Blessed One is a partaker of robes, alms food, resting place, and the requisite of medicine as cure for the sick, thus he is blessed . Or he is a partaker of the taste of meaning, the taste of the Law, the taste of deliverance, the higher virtue, the higher consciousness, the higher understanding, thus he is blessed . Or he is a partaker of the four jhānas, the four measureless states, the four immaterial states, thus he is blessed. Or he is a partaker of the eight liberations, the eight bases of mastery, the nine successive attainments, thus he is blessed. Or he is a partaker of the ten developments of perception, the ten kasiṇa attainments, concentration due to mindfulness of breathing, the attainment due to foulness, thus he is blessed. Or he is a partaker of the ten powers of Perfect Ones , of the four kinds of perfect confidence , of the four discriminations, of the six kinds of direct knowledge, of the six Enlightened Ones’ states not shared by disciples , thus he is blessed. Blessed One : this is not a name made by a mother … This name, Blessed One, is a designation based on realization”’
“Moreover, with the complete surmounting of perceptions of form, with the disappearance of perceptions of sensory impact, with non-attention to perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite,’ an untrue man enters upon and abides in the base of infinite space
“Moreover, by completely surmounting the base of infinite space, aware that ‘consciousness is infinite,’ an untrue man enters upon and abides in the base of infinite consciousness
“Moreover, by completely surmounting the base of nothingness, an untrue man enters upon and abides in the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception.
He considers thus: ‘I have gained the attainment of the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception; but these other bhikkhus have not gamed the attainment of the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception.’
And his taints are destroyed by his seeing with wisdom.
It counter-strikes , thus it is a counter-stroke . What strikes out , removes, what is counter to it is therefore called counter-striking ,
since what is counter-striking strikes out anything counter to itself. Paṭihāriya is the same as pāṭihāriya 
Death is the basis of such pain. And this suffices to explain Why death the name of pain should gain.
All those whose vitals death attacks With grip that shall no more relax.
Then bodily pain severs sinews. Joints and so on, and continues
Also when good men cannot bear To part from all that they hold dear.
Without distinction as they die Pain grips their minds impartially
Torture unbearable, which racks
various ordures such as bile, phlegm, pus, blood, excrement, gorge and so on.
Whether the mother is twenty, thirty, or forty years old, it is ‘as exceptionally loathsome’ as an excrement bucket that has not been washed for a like number of years.
for its scope precisely because of the existence of its use as a mere metaphor—like the word ‘lion’ .
It is clung-to by the kinds of clinging , thus it is ‘result-of- past-clinging’ : this is the pentad of aggregates as objects of clinging.
Taking Nibbāna, which is the escape from that, as its stilling, its quieting, since there is remainder of it up till the last consciousness of the Arahant, after which there is no remainder of it, the Nibbāna element is thus conventionally spoken of in two ways as ‘with result of past clinging left’ and ‘without result of past clinging left’ .
First it has to be seen by inference according to the texts.
Afterwards it gradually comes to be seen by personal experience when the knowledge of development gets stronger.
When the contemplation of impermanence is established, then the contemplations of cessation, destruction, fall, and change are partly established. When the contemplation of pain is established, then the contemplations of dispassion and danger are partly established. And when the contemplation of not-self is established, then the rest are partly established.
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Savatthi in Jeta’s Grove, Anathapindika’s Park.
There he addressed the bhikkhus thus: “Bhikkhus.”
- “Venerable sir,” they replied.
The Blessed One said this:
“That bhikkhu’s words should neither be approved nor disapproved.
Without approving or disapproving, a question should be put thus: ‘Friend, there are four kinds of expression rightly proclaimed by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened.
What four?
Telling the seen as it is seen; telling the heard as it is heard; telling the sensed as it is sensed; telling the cognized as it is cognized.1056 These, friend, are the four kinds of expression rightly proclaimed by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened.
How does the venerable one know, how does he see, regarding these four kinds of expression, so that through not clinging his mind is liberated from the taints?
“Bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu is one with taints destroyed’, who has lived the holy life, done what had to be done, laid down the burden, reached the true goal, destroyed the fetters of being, and is completely liberated through final knowledge, this is the nature of his answer: ‘“Friends, regarding the seen I abide unattracted, unrepelled, independent, detached, free, dissociated, with a mind rid of barriers.1057
It is by knowing thus, seeing thus, regarding these four kinds of expression, that through not clinging my mind is liberated from the taints.’
“Saying ‘good,’ one may delight and rejoice in that bhikkhu’s words.
Having done so, a further question may be put thus:
What five?
They are the material form aggregate affected by clinging, the feeling aggregate affected by clinging, the perception aggregate affected by clinging, the formations aggregate affected by clinging, and the consciousness aggregate affected by clinging. These, friend, are the five aggregates affected by clinging, rightly proclaimed by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened.
How does the venerable one know, how does he see, regarding these five aggregates affected by clinging, so that through not clinging his mind is liberated from the taints?
“Bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu is one with taints destroyed… and is completely liberated through final knowledge, this is the nature of his answer: ‘“Friends, having known material form to be feeble, fading away, and comfortless, with the destruction, fading away, cessation, giving up, and relinquishing of attraction and clinging regarding material form, of mental standpoints, adherences, and underlying tendencies regarding material form,1058 I have understood that my mind is liberated.
“‘Friends, having known feeling…Having known perception… Having known formations…Having known consciousness to be feeble, fading away, and comfortless, with the destruction, fading away, cessation, giving up, and relinquishing of attraction and clinging regarding consciousness, of mental standpoints, adherences, and underlying tendencies regarding consciousness, I have understood that my mind is liberated.
‘“It is by knowing thus, seeing thus, regarding these five aggregates affected by clinging, that through not clinging my mind is liberated from the taints.’
“ Saying ‘good,’ one may delight and rejoice in that bhikkhu’s words.
Having done so, a further question may be put thus:
What six?
They are the earth element, the water element, the fire element, the air element, the space element, and the consciousness element. These, friend, are the six elements rightly proclaimed by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened.
How does the venerable one know, how does he see, regarding these six elements, so that through not clinging his mind is liberated from the taints?
“Bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu is one with taints destroyed… and is completely liberated through final knowledge, this is the nature of his answer: ‘“Friends, I have treated the earth element as not self, with no self based on the earth element.1059
‘“Friends, I have treated the water element…the fire element…the air element…the space element…the consciousness element as not self, with no self based on the consciousness element.
And with the destruction, fading away, cessation, giving up, and relinquishing of attraction and clinging based on the consciousness element, of mental standpoints, adherences, and underlying tendencies based on the consciousness element, I have understood that my mind is liberated.
“‘It is by knowing thus, seeing thus, regarding these six elements, that through not clinging my mind is liberated from the taints.’
“Saying ‘good,’ one may delight and rejoice in that bhikkhu’s words.
Having done so, a further question may be put thus:
What six?
They are the eye and forms, the ear and sounds, the nose and odours, the tongue and flavours, the body and tangibles, the mind and mind-objects. These, friend, are the six internal and external bases rightly proclaimed by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened.
“Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu makes a declaration of final knowledge thus: ‘I understand: Birth is destroyed, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more coming to any state of being.’
Regarding the heard…Regarding the sensed…Regarding the cognized I abide unattracted, unrepelled, independent, detached, free, dissociated, with a mind rid of barriers.
‘“Friend, there are these five aggregates affected by clinging, rightly proclaimed by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened.
“‘Friend, there are these six elements rightly proclaimed by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened.
And with the destruction, fading away, cessation, giving up, and relinquishing of attraction and clinging based on the earth element, of mental standpoints, adherences, and underlying tendencies based on the earth element, I have understood that my mind is liberated.
‘“But, friend, there are these six internal and external bases rightly proclaimed by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened.
How does the venerable one know, how does he see, regarding these six internal and external bases, so that through not clinging his mind is liberated from the taints?’
“Saying ‘good,’ one may delight and rejoice in that bhikkhu’s words.
“Bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu is one with taints destroyed… and is completely liberated through final knowledge, this is the nature of his answer: ‘“Friends, formerly when I lived the home life I was ignorant.
‘“Having thus gone forth and possessing the bhikkhus’ training and way of life…,
‘“Having thus abandoned these five hindrances, imperfections of the mind that weaken wisdom, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, I entered upon and abided in the first jhana, which is accompanied by applied and sustained thought, with rapture and pleasure born of seclusion.
‘“When my concentrated mind was thus purified, bright, unblemished, rid of imperfections, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, I directed it to knowledge of the destruction of the taints.1062
‘“When I knew and saw thus, my mind was liberated from the taint of sensual desire, from the taint of being, and from the taint of ignorance. When it was liberated there came the knowledge: “It is liberated.”
“Saying ‘good,’ bhikkhus, one may delight and rejoice in that bhikkhu’s words.
“Bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu is one with taints destroyed… and is completely liberated through final knowledge, this is the nature of his answer: ‘“Friends, with the destruction, fading away, cessation, giving up, and relinquishing of desire, lust, delight, craving, attraction, and clinging, and of mental standpoints, adherences, and underlying tendencies regarding the eye, forms, eye-consciousness, and things cognizable by the mind through eye-consciousness, I have understood that my mind is liberated.1060
husband and wife addressing each other with pleasant words,
Their enemies are saddened when both are the same in virtue.
delighting after death in a deva world, they rejoice, enjoying sensual pleasures
“Bhikkhus, when kings are unrighteous,the royal vassals become unrighteous.
When the royal vassals are unrighteous, brahmins and householders become unrighteous.
When the people of the towns and countryside are unrighteous, the sun and moon proceed off course.
When the sun and moon proceed off course, the constellations and the stars proceed off course.
When the constellations and the stars proceed off course, day and night proceed off course…
When the seasons and years proceed off course, the winds blow off course and at random.
When the winds blow off course and at random, the deities become upset.
When the deities are upset, sufficient rain does not fall.
When sufficient rain does not fall, the crops ripen irregularly.
When people eat crops that ripen irregularly, they become short-lived, ugly, weak, and sickly.”
Bhikkhus, when kings, are righteous, the royal vassals become righteous.
When the royal vassals are righteous, brahmins and householders become righteous.
When brahmins and householders are righteous, the people of the towns and countryside become righteous.
When the people of the towns and countryside are righteous, the sun and moon proceed on course.
When the sun and moon proceed on course, the constellations and the stars proceed on course.
When the constellations and the stars proceed on course, day and night proceed on course…
When the seasons and years proceed on course, the .winds blow on course and dependably.
When the winds blow on course and dependably, the deities do not become upset.
When the deities are not upset, sufficient rain falls.
When sufficient rain falls, the crops ripen in season.
When people eat crops that ripen in season, they become long-lived, beautiful, strong, and healthy.’
When brahmins and householders are unrighteous, the people of the towns and countryside become unrighteous.
the months and fortnights proceed off course …
the seasons and years proceed off course.
the months and fortnights proceed on course …
the seasons and years proceed on course.
When cattle are crossing a ford, if the chief bull goes crookedly,
all the others go crookedly because their leader has gone crookedly
So too, among human beings, when the one considered the chief
behaves unrighteously, other people do so as well.
The entire kingdom is dejected if the king is unrighteous.
When cattle are crossing a ford if the chief bull goes straight across,
all the others go straight across because their leader has gone straight.
The entire kingdom rejoices if the king is righteous.
So too, among human beings, when the one considered the chief
conducts himself righteously, other people do so as well.
‘“With the destruction, fading away, cessation, giving up, and relinquishing of desire, lust, delight, craving, attraction, and clinging, and of mental standpoints, adherences, and underlying tendencies regarding the ear, sounds, ear-consciousness, and things cognizable by the mind through ear-consciousness… regarding the nose, odours, nose-consciousness, and things cognizable by the mind through nose-consciousness…regarding the tongue, flavours, tongue-consciousness, and things cognizable by the mind through tongue consciousness…regarding the body, tangibles, body-consciousness, and things cognizable by the mind through body-consciousness…regarding the mind, mind-objects, mind-consciousness, and things cognizable by the mind through mind-consciousness, I have understood that my mind is liberated.
‘“It is by knowing thus, seeing thus, regarding these six internal and external bases, that through not clinging my mind is liberated from the taints.’
“Bhikkhus, a bhikkhu who has dispelled personal truths, totally renounced seeking, and tranquilized bodily activity is said to have drawn back.
“And how, bhikkhus, has a bhikkhu dispelled personal truths?
It is in this way that a bhikkhu has dispelled personal truths.
Here, whatever ordinary personal truths may be held by ordinary ascetics and brahmins—that is, ‘The world is eternal’ or ‘The world is not eternal’; ‘The world is finite’ or ‘The .world is infinite’; ‘The soul and the body are the same’ or ‘The soul is one thing, the body another’; ‘The Tathagata exists after death,’ or ‘The Tathagata does not exist after death/ or ‘The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death/ or ‘The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death’—a bhikkhu has discarded and dispelled them all, given them up, rejected them, let go of them, abandoned and relinquished them.
“And how has a bhikkhu totally renounced seeking?
Here, a bhikkhu has abandoned the search for sensual pleasures and the search for existence and has allayed the search for a spiritual life.
It is in this way that a bhikkhu has totally renounced seeking,
“And how has a bhikkhu tranquilized bodily activity?
Here, with the abandoning of pleasure and pain, and with the previous passing away of joy an,d dejection, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the fourth jhana, neither painful nor pleasant, which has purification of mindfulness by equanimity.
It is in this way that a bhikkhu has tranquilized bodily activity.
“And how has a bhikkhu drawn back?
Here, a bhikkhu has abandoned the conceit ‘I am,’ cut it off at the root, made it like a palm stump, obliterated it so that if is no longer subject to future arising.
It is in this way that a bhikkhu has drawn back.
“Bhikkhus, a bhikkhu who has dispelled personal truths,totally renounced seeking, and tranquilized bodily activity is said to have drawn back.”
Seeking for sense pleasures, seeking for existence, seeking for a spiritual life;
the tight grasp “Such is the truth,” viewpoints that are swellings:
for one entirely detached from lust, liberated by the. destruction of craving,
such seeking has been relinquished, and viewpoints are uprooted.
That peaceful, mindful bhikkhu, tranquil, undefeated,
enlightened by breaking through conceit, is called “one who has drawn back.”
Having done so, a further question may be put thus:
‘“But, friend, how does the venerable one know, how does he see, so that in regard to this body with its consciousness and all external signs, I-making, mine-making, and the underlying tendency to conceit have been eradicated in him? ‘1061
Then the Tathagata or his disciple taught me the Dhamma.
On hearing the Dhamma I acquired faith in the Tathagata.
Possessing that faith, I considered thus: “Household life is crowded and dusty; life gone forth is wide open.
It is not easy while living in a home to lead the holy life utterly perfect and pure as a polished shell.
Suppose I shave off my hair and beard, put on the yellow robe, and go forth from the home life into homelessness.”
On a later occasion, abandoning a small or a large fortune, abandoning a small or a large circle of relations, I shaved off my hair and beard, put on the yellow robe, and went forth from the home life into homelessness.
I go for refuge to tlie Enlightened One.
I go for refuge to the True Idea.
I go for refuge to the Community.
For the second time I go for refuge to the Enlightened One.
For the second time I go for refuge to the True Idea.
For the second time I go for refuge to the Community.
For the third time I go for refuge to the Enlightened One.
For the third time I go for refuge to the True Idea.
For the third time I go for refuge to the Community.
I undertake the training precept of abstention from killing breathing things.
I undertake the training precept of abstention from taking what is not given.
I undertake the training precept of abstention from unchastity.
I undertake the training precept of abstention from speaking falsehood.
I undertake the training precept of abstention from any opportunity for negligence due to liquor, wine, and besotting drink.
I undertake the training precept of abstention from untimely eating.
I undertake the training precept of abstention from dancing, singing, music, and contortionist shows.
I undertake the training precept of abstention from any opportunity for wearing garlands, smartening with scents, and embellishment with unguents.
I undertake the training precept of abstention from the use of high couches and large couches.
I undertake the training precept of abstention from accepting gold and silver.
There are in this body
flesh, sinews, bones, bone-marrow, kidney,
bowels, entrails, gorge, dung,
bile, phlegm, pus, blood, sweat, fat,
tears, grease, spittle, snot, oil-of-the-joints, urine, and brain in the head.
head-hairs, body-hairs, nails, teeth, skin,
heart, liver, midriff, spleen, lights,
One is what?
—All creatures subsist by nutriment.
Two is what?
—Name and form.
Three is what?
—Three kinds of feeling.
Four is what?
—Four Noble Truths.
Five is what?
—Five categories of what is affected by clinging.
Six is what?
—Six bases in oneself.
Seven is what?
—Seven enlightenment factors.
Eight is what?
—The Noble Eightfold Path.
Nine is what?
—Nine abodes of creatures.
Ten is what?
—He that is endowed with ten factors is declared an Arahant.
A man a treasure store lays by Deep in a water-level pit;
He thinks If need arise for aid, It will be there to aid me then
For my discharge, from kings were I Denounced, or from a brigand else
If held to ransom, or of debts, In famines, or in accidents:
With suchlike aims, what in the world Is called a store will be laid by.
Though be it ne’er so well laid by Deep in a water-level pit,
Not all of it will yet suffice To serve him all the time; and then
The store gets shifted from its place, Or he perhaps forgets the marks,
Or Naga-Serpents hale it off, Or spirits fritter it away,
Or else the heirs he cannot bear Abstract it while he does not see;
And when his merit is consumed, The whole will vanish utterly.
Shall have with gifts or virtuousness Or with refraining or constraint
But when a woman or a man A store of merit well laid by
In shrines or the Community, Or in a person or in guests
Or in a mother or a father, Even in an elder brother,
This treasure store is well laid by, A follower unlosable:
Among what by abandoning Have to be gone to he goes with this.
No others have a share in it, And robbers cannot steal this store;
So let the steadfast merit make, The store that is their follower.
This is a store can satisfy Every desire of god or man;
No matter what they aspire to have: All that is got by merit’s grace.
Beauty of looks, beauty of voice, Beauty of figure, beauty of form,
And lordliness and retinue: All that is got by merit’s grace.
A local kingship, empire, too, Bliss of Wheel-turning Monarchy,
And godly rule in paradise: All that is got by merit’s grace.
And every human excellence, Any delight in a godly world,
Even extinction’s excellence: All that is got by merit’s grace.
A man has excellence in friends; Devoting reason right, he wins
True knowledge and deliverance: All that is got by merit’s grace.
Discriminations, liberations, Perfection of disciples, too,
And both kinds of enlightenment: All that is got by merit’s grace.
So great are the rewards it gives, Simply, this merit’s excellence:
For that the steadfast and the wise Commend a store of merit made.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five kinds of warriors found in the world.
What five?
“Here, some warrior, when he sees the cloud of dust sinks, founders, does hot brace himself, and cannot enter the battle.
There is, bhikkhus, such a warrior here.
This is the first kind of warrior found in the world.
“Again, some warrior can endure the cloud of dust, but when he sees the crests of the standards, he sinks, founders, does not brace himself, and cannot enter the battle.
There is, bhikkhus, such a warrior here.
This is the second kind of warrior found in the world.
“Again, some warrior can endure the cloud of dust and the crests of the standards, but when he hears the uproar, he sinks, founders, does not brace himself, and cannot enter the battle.
There is, bhikkhus, such a warrior here.
This is the third kind of warrior found in the world.
“Again, some warrior can endure the cloud of dust, the crests of the standards, and the uproar, but he is struck down and wounded by blows.
There is, bhikkhus, such a warrior here.
This is the fourth kind of warrior found in the world.
“Again, some warrior can endure the cloud of dust, the crests of the standards, the uproar, and the blows.
Having triumphed in that battle, he emerges victorious and settles at the head of the battlefield.
There is, bhikkhus, such a warrior here.
This is the fifth kind of warrior found in the world.
“These are the five kinds of warriors found in the world.
“So too, there are these five kinds of persons similar to warriors found among the bhikkhus.
What five?
“Here, some bhikkhu, when he sees the cloud of dust, sinks, founders, does not. brace himself, and cannot maintain the spiritual life.
He discloses his weakness in the training, gives up the training, and reverts to the lower life.
What is the cloud of dust in his case?
The bhikkhu hears: In such and such a village or town the women or girls are beautiful, attractive, graceful, possessing supreme beauty of complexion.’
Having heard this, he sinks, founders, does not brace himself, and cannot maintain the spiritual life.
He discloses his weakness in the training, gives up the training, and reverts to the lower life.
This is the cloud of dust in his case.
I say that this person is just like the warrior who, when he sees the cloud of dust, sinks, founders, does not brace himself, and cannot enter the battle.
There is, bhikkhus, such a person here.
This is the first kind of person similar to a warrior found among the bhikkhus.
“Again, some bhikkhu can endure the cloud of dust, but when he sees the crests of the standards, he sinks, founders, does not brace himself, and cannot maintain the spiritual life.
He discloses his weakness in the training, gives up the training, and reverts to the lower life.
What are the crests of the standards in his case?
The bhikkhu does not hear: ‘In such and such a village or town the women or girls are beautiful, attractive, graceful, possessing supreme beauty of complexion.’ but he himself sees a woman or a girl who is beautiful, attractive, graceful, possessing supreme beauty of complexion.
Having seen her, he sinks, founders, does not brace himself, and cannot maintain the spiritual life.
He discloses his weakness in the training, gives up the training, and reverts to the lower life.
These are the crests of the standards in his case.
I say that this person is just like the warrior who can endure the cloud of dust, but when he sees the crests of the standards, he sinks, founders, does not brace himself, and cannot enter the battle.
There is, bhikkhus, such a person here.
This is the second kind of person similar to a warrior found among the bhikkhus.
“Again, some bhikkhu can endure the cloud of dust and the-crests of the standards, but when he hears the uproar, he sinks, founders, does not brace himself, and cannot maintain the spiritual life.
He discloses his weakness in the training, gives up the training, and reverts to the lower life.
What is the uproar in his case?
When the bhikkhu has gone to the forest, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty hut, a woman approaches him, smiles at him, chats with him, laughs at him, and teases him.
As the woman is smiling at him, chatting with him, laughing at him, and teasing him, he sinks, founders, does not brace himself, and cannot maintain the spiritual life.
He discloses his weakness in the training, gives up the training, and reverts to the lower life.
This is the uproar in his case.
I say that this person is just like the warrior who can endure the cloud of dust and the crests of the standards, but when he hears the uproar, he sinks, founders, does not brace himself, and cannot enter the battle.
There is, bhikkhus, such a person here.
This is the third kind of person similar to a warrior found among the bhikkhus.
“Again, some.bhikkhu can endure the cloud of dust, the crests of the standards, and the uproar, but he is struck down and wounded by a blow.
What is the blow in his case?
When the bhikkhu has gone to the forest, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty hut, a woman approaches him, sits down or lies down next to him, and embraces him.
When she does so, he has sexual intercourse with her without having given up the training and disclosed his weakness.
This is the blow in his case.
I say that this person is just like the warrior who can endure the cloud of dust, the crests of the standards, and the uproar, but who is struck down and wounded by a blow.
There is, bhikkhus, such a person here.
This is the fourth kind of person similar to a warrior found among the bhikkhus.
“Again, some bhikkhu can endure the clouds of dust, the crests of the standards, the uproar, and a blow. Having triumphed in that battle, he emerges victorious and settles at the head of the battlefield.
What is the victory in his case?
When the bhikkhu has gone to the forest, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty hut, a woman approaches him, sits down or lies down next to him, and embraces him.
Gone to the forest, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty hut, he sits down, folding his legs crosswise, straightening his body, and establishing mindfulness in front of him.
Having abandoned longing for the world, he dwells with a mind free from longing; he purifies his mind from longing. Having abandoned ill will and hatred, he dwells with a mind free from ill.will, compassionate toward all living beings; he purifies his mind from ill will and hatred. Having abandoned dullness and drowsiness, he dwells free from dullness and drowsiness, percipient of light, mindful and clearly comprehending; he purifies his mind from dullness and drowsiness. Having abandoned restlessness and remorse, he dwells without agitation, with a mind inwardly peaceful; he purifies his mind from restlessness and remorse. Having abandoned doubt, he dwells having gone beyond doubt, unperplexed about wholesome qualities; he purifies his mind from doubt.
“Having abandoned these five hindrances, defilements’ of the mind that weaken wisdom, secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, he enters and dwells in the first jhana …
the fourth jhana, neither painful nor pleasant, which has purification of mindfulness by equanimity.
“When his mind is thus concentrated, purified, cleansed, unblemished, rid of defilement, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, he directs it to the knowledge of the destruction of the taints.
He understands as it really is: This is suffering.’ He understands as it really is: ‘This is the origin of suffering.’ He understands as it really is: This is the cessation of suffering.’ He understands as it really is: This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’ He undarstands as it really is: ‘These are the taints.’ He understands as it really is: ‘This is the origin of the taints.’ He understands as it really is: ‘This is the cessation of the taints.’ He understands as it really is: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of the taints.’
When he knows and sees thus, his mind is liberated from the taint of sensual desire, from the taint of existence, and from the taint of ignorance. When it is liberated, there comes the knowledge: ‘It’s liberated.’
He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the spiritual life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more coming back to any state of being.’
This is his victory in battle.
“Bhikkhus, I say that this person is like the warrior who can endure the cloud of dust, the crests of the standards, the uproar, and the blow, and who, having triumphed in that battle, emerges victorious and settles at the head of the battlefield.
There is, bhikkhus, such a person here.
This is the fifth kind of person similar to a warrior found among the bhikkhus.
“These are the five kinds of persons similar to warriors found among the bhikkhus.”
But he disentangles himself, frees himself, and goes off wherever he wants.
Now it was said: ‘ Then next there should Be told the proper way of knowing “ Buddha “ Goer ”, and “ Refuge-going ”. Herein, the word Buddha is a term for distinguishing creatures either involving a description derived upon a five- category-continuity fortified by attainment of the supreme liberation that is the sign for unobstructed knowledge of all ideas, or else involving a description derived upon the attainment to the four Truths that is the footing for omniscient knowledge, 9
according as it is said:
‘ “ Buddha ”: he is that Blessed One who, self-become, without teacher in ideas not heard before, himself discovered the Truths and reached omniscience therein and mastery of the powers ’ .
This, firstly, is the explanation of the word ‘ Buddha ’ as to meaning.
Now as to the phrasing, it should be understood in the way beginning ‘ He is the discoverer , thus he is enlightened ; he is the enlightener , thus he is enlightened’,
He is the discoverer of the Truths, thus he is enlightened . He is the enlightener of the generation, thus he is enlightened. He is enlightened by omniscience, enlightened by seeing all, enlightened without being led by others, enlightened because of burgeoning; 10 having exhausted the taints, he is termed enlightened; having immunity from defilement, 11 he is termed enlightened; he is quite without lust, thus he is enlightened; he is quite without hate, thus he is enlightened; he is quite without delusion, thus he is enlightened; he is quite without defilement, thus he is enlightened; he has travelled by the path that goes in only one way, 12 thus he is enlightened; he alone discovered the peerless complete enlightenment, thus he is enlightened; he is enlightened because he has abolished non-discovery and obtained discovery .
Buddha: this is not a name made by a mother, made by a father, made by a brother, made by a sister, made by friends and companions, made by relatives and kin, made by monks and divines, 13 made by deities; this name “ Buddha ”, which signifies final liberation, is a realistic 14 description of enlightened Ones, Blessed Ones, together with their obtainment of omniscient knowledge at the root of an enlightenment tree 5 .
And as to this quotation, the active and middle-voice usage ‘ he is the discoverer of the Truths, thus he is enlightened ’ is stated in the same way as in the world outside the Dispensation a ‘ descender into 5 is called a ‘ descended one ’ ,
‘He is enlightened by omniscience’: what is meant is that he is enlightened by discovery capable of discovering all ideas.
‘ Enlightened by seeing all ’: what is meant is that he is enlightened by discovery capable of causing discovery of all ideas.
‘ Enlightened without being led by others ’: what is meant is that he is enlightened because of his being enlightened by himself alone without having been caused to be enlightened by another.
‘ Enlightened because of burgeoning ’ : what is meant is that he is enlightened because of displaying 16 diverse special qualities in the sense of opening like a lotus flower.
‘ Enlightened since he is reckoned to have exhausted the taints ’, etc.: what is meant is that he is enlightened owing to his being awakened by the exhaustion of all the sleep consisting in defilements like a man awakened by the exhaustion of sleep because of his abandoning the reasons for the cramping of cognizance.
He has travelled by the path that goes in only one way ’: this is said in order to show that he is called ‘ enlightened ’ because he has travelled { gata) by the path that goes in only one way that is, to the goal, since verbal roots with meanings of ‘ travelling ’ have by metaphorical use also meanings of ‘ discovering 5 , just as a man is called i travelled ’ when he has travelled a path.
‘ He alone discovered the peerless complete enlightenment ‘: what is meant is that he is enlightened not because of his being enlightened by others but is on the contrary enlightened because he himself alone discovered the peerless complete enlightenment.
‘ He is enlightened because he has abolished non-discovery and obtained discovery ’: the middle-voice term ‘ discovery ’ and the causative-voice term ‘ causing-discovery ’ are metaphorical expressions ;
for this is said in order to have it known that ‘ enlightened ’ is said of him because of his association with the quality of discovery , just as ‘ blue cloth ’ or ‘ red cloth ’ is said because of the cloth’s association with the respective quality of blue or red.
After that, the passage beginning ‘ Buddha: this is not a name…’ is stated in order to cause discovery of the fact that this foregoing description conforms with the meaning; and it can be understood that the meaning of the word ‘ Buddha ’ is capable of being established in this manner in all the remaining clauses.
This is the explanation of the word ‘ Buddha ’ as to the phrasing.
and this is said
‘ Buddha: in what sense buddha?
and in the causative-voice usage ‘ he is the enlightener of the generation, thus he is enlightened ’ is stated in the same way as in the world outside the Dispensation a ‘ leaf-drying wind ‘ is called ‘ leaf-dried ’ 20.
And its beginning I go for refuge to the Enlightened One. I go for refuge to the True Idea. I go for refuge to the Community. For the second time…For the third time…
Here is a schedule of the method of commenting on it:
Wherefore Here stated thus initially Though other words were said before?
Now, having in this way made good Their Source herein, then next there should
The breach or none, the fruit they spell, ‘ What must be gone’ besides we tell.
And for the other two as well The way prescribed is parallel.
The reason must be shown why these Display the order that they do.
Lastly the Triple Refuge too Must be explained by similes.
Herein, as to the first stanza to begin with: there are these five questions, namely, By whom were these three Refuges pronounced? Where were they pronounced? When were they pronounced? Why were they pronounced? And why, although they were not the words pronounced by the Blessed One in the beginning , are they stated at the beginning here?
The answers are as follows. 12. By whom pronounced? They were pronounced by the Blessed One, not by disciples, nor by the Seers, nor by deities.
Where? At Benares in the Deer Park at Isipatana.
When? When the sixty - one Arahants were engaged in teaching the True Idea in the world for the benefit of the many, after the venerable Yasa, together with his companions, had attained Arahantship .
Why? For the purpose of giving the Going Forth into Homelessness and for the purpose of giving the Full Admission,
according as it is said:
‘ And, bhikkhus, he is to be given the Going Forth and given the Full Admission thus:
first, having had his hair and beard shaved off, he should be clothed in the yellow clothes, and then, after having him arrange his upper robe on one shoulder, he should be made to pay homage at the bhikkhus’ feet, and then, after seating him on his heels with hands extended palms together, he should be told “ Say thus: I go for refuge to the Enlightened One, I go for refuge to the True Idea, I go for refuge to the Community ” ’ .
Wherefore here stated thus initially? It can be understood as follows: since this is the pathway by which gods and men enter the Dispensation, whether they become lay-followers or those gone forth, consequently, it being the pathway of entry into the Dispensation, it was stated here initially in the Minor Readings by the Former Teachers when, during their inclusion of the Master’s nine-factored Dispensation 8 in three Pitakas, they were composing a pathway for the serial order of the recitation.
The source has now been ‘made good ’.
By whom pronounced, where, when, and why, Were these three Refuges?
Be told the proper way of knowing ‘ Buddha ‘ ‘ Goer and ‘ Refuge-going ’.
Now as to the ‘ going etc.: it combats, thus it is a refuge ; the meaning is that when people have gone for refuge, then by that very going for refuge it combats, dispels, carries off, and stops, their fear, anguish, suffering, risk of unhappy destination on rebirth, and defilement.
Or alternatively: he combats creatures’ fear by promoting their good and preventing their harm, thus he is the Enlightened One ; the True Idea does so by providing the crossing of the Desert of Being and by giving consolation; the Community does so by causing the obtainment of great fruitfulness from small actions;
The going for refuge is the arising of cognizance with confidence therein and giving preponderance thereto, 18 from which defilement is eliminated and eradicated, and which, occurs in the mode of taking that as the highest value, whether or not someone else is a condition for so doing.
A creature possessing that kind of cognizance goes for refuge to that object; the meaning is that by means of the kind of cognizance-arising just mentioned he approaches that thus. This is my refuge, this is my highest value ’.
And when approaching it, he does so either by an undertaking, as in the case of Tapassu and Bhalluka, etc., thus ‘ Venerable sir, we go for refuge to the Blessed One and to the True Idea; let the Blessed One remember us as followers ’ , or by assuming the status of a pupil, as in the case of Maha Kassapa, etc., thus ‘ Venerable sir, the Blessed One is my teacher, I am his disciple ’ , or by inclination thereto, as in the case of Brahmayu, etc., thus ‘ When this was said, Brahmayu the divine rose from his seat, and arranging his upper robe on one shoulder, he raised his hands palms together towards where the Blessed One was, and he uttered this exclamation three times: “Honour to that Blessed One, accomplished and fully enlightened! Honour to that Blessed One, accomplished and fully enlightened!
Honour to that Blessed One, accomplished and fully enlightened! ” 5 , or by self-dedication to the teacher like a meditator devoting himself to a meditation subject , or by severing his imperfections by going as a Noble Person for refuge . Thus he approaches variously both as to objective field and as to function.
This is the explanation of the ‘ Refuge-going ’ and of the ‘ Goer ‘.
so in this way the refuge is also that threefold Jewel.
Now there is the explanation of the breach, etc., stated thus: ‘ The breach or none, the fruit they spell, “ What must be gone ” besides we tell ’. 23. When a person has gone for refuge thus, his breach of the refuge-going is of two kinds: reprehensible and blameless.
The blameless kind of breach consists in dying; the reprehensible kind of breach consists in adopting procedure of the kind just described with respect to another teacher and in adopting the opposite kind of procedure with respect to that refuge.
Both kinds occur only in ordinary men.
In them the refuge is defiled both by the occurrence of unknowing, doubt, and wrong knowledge about the Buddha’s special qualities and by occurrence of irreverence, etc.;
but in Noble Persons the refuge always remains unbroken and undefiled,
Ordinary men remain with their refuge unbroken as long as they do not arrive at a breach of the refuges.
When the breach of their refuge is reprehensible and defiled it gives unwanted fruit;
according as it is said:
‘ Those who take refuge in the Buddha ‘ Go to no state of deprivation, ‘
And when they leave the human frame ‘ A godly body they fulfil ’ .
Herein, those who by becoming Noble Persons have gone for refuge by severing imperfections in their refuge-going will nevermore go to any state of deprivation;
This, firstly, is the explanation of the breach, non-breach and fruit.
according as it is said ‘ Bhikkhus, it is impossible, it cannot happen, that a person perfected in his view should seek another teacher .
when it is blameless it gives no fruit because it then has no ripening. 24. Non-breach, however, as to fruit, always gives wanted fruit,
but the others who are still ordinary men may still go there in spite of their having gone to them; this is how the purport of the stanza should be understood.
..I purified my mind from doubt.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five kinds of warriors found in the world.
What five?
“Here, some warrior takes up a sword and shield, arms himself with a bow and quiver, and enters the fray of battle.
He strives and exerts himself in the battle,
There is, bhikkhus, such a warrior here.
This is the first kind of warrior found in the world.
“Again, some warrior takes up a sword and shield, arms himself with a bow and quiver, and enters the fray of battle.
He strives and exerts himself in the battle,
While he is being brought to his relatives, he dies along the way even before he arrives.
There is bhikkhus, such a warrior here.
This is the second kind of warrior found in the world.
“Again, some warrior takes up a sword and shield, arms himself with a bow and quiver, and enters the fray of battle.
He strives and exerts himself in the battle,
but his foes wound him. His comrades carry him off and bring him to his relatives.
His relatives nurse him and look after him,
There is, bhikkhus, such a warrior here.
This is the third kind of warrior found in the world.
Again, some warrior takes up a sword and shield, arms himself with a bow and quiver, and enters the fray of battle.
He strives and exerts himself in the battle,
but his foes wound him. His comrades carry him off and bring him to his relatives.
His relatives nurse him and look after him,
There is, bhikkhus, such a warrior here.
This is the fourth kind of warrior found in the world.
“Again, some warrior takes up a sword arid shield, arms himself with a bow and quiver, and enters the fray of battle.
Having triumphed in that battle, he emerges victorious and settles at the head of the battlefield.
There is, bhikkhus, such a warrior here.
This is the fifth kind of warrior found in the world.
“These are the five kinds of warriors found in the world… “
What five?
“Here, some bhikkhu dwells in dependence upon a certain village or town.
In the morning, he dresses, takes his robe and bowl, and enters that village or town for alms, with body, speech , and mind unguarded , without having established mindfulness, his sense faculties unrestrained.
There he sees women with their dress in disarray and loosely attired.
When he sees them, lust invades his mind.
With his mind invaded by lust, he has sexual intercourse without having disclosed his weakness and given up the training.
This person, I say , is just like the warrior who takes up a sword and shield, arms himself with a bow and quiver, and enters the fray of battle, and whose foes slay him and finish him off while he is striving and exerting himself in battle.
There is, bhikkhus, such a person here.
This is the first kind of person similar to a warrior found among the bhikkhus.
“Again, some bhikkhu dwells in dependence upon a certain village or town.
In the morning, he dresses, takes his robe and bowl, and enters that village or town for alms …
With his mind invaded by lust, he burns bodily and mentally with the fever of lust.
He thinks: “Let me return to the monastery and inform the bhikkhus: “Friends, I am obsessed by lust, oppressed by lust. I cannot maintain the spiritual life. Having disclosed my weakness in the training, will give up the training and revert to the lower life.”
While he is returning to the monastery, even before he arrives, he discloses his weakness in the training, gives up the training, and reverts to the lower life along the way.
just like the warrior who takes up a sword and shield, arms himself with a bow and quiver, enters the fray of battle, is wounded by his foes while he strives and exerts himself in the battle, and is then carried off and brought to his relatives
There is, bhikkhus, such a person here.
This is the second kind of person similar to a warrior found among the bhikkhus.
“Again, some bhikkhu dwells in dependence upon a certain village or town.
In the morning, he dresses, takes his robe and bowl, and enters that village or town for alms …
With his mind invaded by lust, he burns bodily and mentally with the fever of lust.
He thinks: ‘Let me return to the monastery and inform the bhikkhus: “Friends, I am obsessed by lust, oppressed by lust. I cannot maintain the spiritual life. Having disclosed my weakness in the training, I will give up the training and revert to the lower life.’“
He returns to the monastery and informs the bhikkhus: ‘Friends, I am obsessed by lust, oppressed by lust. I cannot maintain the spiritual life. Having disclosed my weakness in the training, I will give up the training and revert to the lower life.’
His fellow monks then exhort, and instruct him : ‘Friend, the Blessed One has stated that sensual pleasures provide little gratification, much suffering and anguish, and that the danger in them is more.
With the simile of the skeleton the Blessed One has stated that sensual pleasures provide little gratification, much suffering and anguish, and that the danger in them is more.
With the simile of the piece of meat.
With the simile of the grass torch …
Enjoy the spiritual life. Do not think you are unable to follow the training, give it up, and revert to the lower life.’
While he is being exhorted and instructed by his fellow monks in this way, he protests: “Friends, although the Blessed One has stated that sensual pleasures provide little gratification, much suffering and anguish, and that the danger in them is more, still, I am unable to maintain the spiritual life. Having disclosed my weakness in the training, I will give up the training and revert to the lower life.’
Having disclosed his weakness in the training, he gives up the training and reverts to the lower life.
Just like the warrior who takes up a sword and shield, arms himself with a bow and quiver, enters the fray of battle, is wounded by his foes while he strives and exerts himself in the battle, and is then carried off and brought to his relatives, who nurse him and look after him,
There is, bhikkhus, such a person here.
This is the third kind of person similar to a warrior found among the bhikkhus.
“Again, some bhikkhu dwells in dependence upon a certain village or town.
In the morning, he dresses, takes his robe and bowl, and enters that village or town for alms …
With his mind invaded by lust, he burns bodily and mentally with the fever of lust.
He thinks: ‘Let me return to the monastery and inform the bhikkhus: “Friends, I am obsessed by lust, oppressed by lust. I cannot maintain the spiritual life. Having disclosed my weakness in the training, I will give up the training and revert to the lower life.”
He returns to the monastery and informs the bhikkhus: Friends, I am obsessed by lust, oppressed by lust. I cannot maintain the spiritual life. Having disclosed my weakness in the training, I will give up the training and revert to the lower life.’
His fellow monks then exhort and instruct him : ‘Friend, the Blessed One has stated that sensual pleasures provide little gratification, much suffering and anguish, and that the danger in them is more.
…with the simile of the snake’s head, the Blessed One has stated that sensual pleasures provide little gratification, much suffering and anguish, and that the danger in them is more.
Enjoy the spiritual life. Do not think you are unable to follow the training, give it up, and revert to the lower life.’
While he is being exhorted and instructed by his fellow monks in this way, he says: ‘I will try, friends, I will carry on, I will enjoy it.
I won’t think I am unable to follow the training, give it up, and revert to the lower life.’
just like the warrior who takes up a sword and shield, arms himself with a bow and quiver, and enters the fray of battle, who is wounded by his foes while he strives and exerts himself in the battle, and is then carried off and brought to his relatives, who nurse him and look after him,
This is the fourth kind of person similar to a warrior found among the bhikkhus.
“Again, some bhikkhu dwells in dependence upon a certain village or town.
In the morning he dresses, takes his robe and bowl, and enters that village or town for alms with body, speech, and mind guarded, mindfulness established, and sense faculties restrained.
Having seen a form with the eye, he does not grasp its marks and features.
Since, if he left the eye faculty unrestrained, bad unwholesome states of longing and dejection might invade him, he practices restraint over it; he guards the eye faculty, he undertakes the restraint of the eye faculty.
Having heard a sound with the ear… Having smelled an odor with the nose … Having tasted a taste with the tongue … … Having felt a tactile object with the body … Having cognized a mental phenomenon with the mind, he does not grasp its m arks and features.
Since, if he left the mind faculty unrestrained, bad unwholesome states of longing and dejection might invade him, he practices restraint over it; he guards the mind faculty, he undertakes the restraint of the mind faculty.
After his meal, on returning from his alms round, he resorts to a secluded lodging: the forest, the foot of a tree, a mountain, a ravine, a hillside cave, a charnel ground, a jungle highland, the open air, a heap of straw.
Gone to the forest, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty hut, he sits down, folding his legs crosswise, straightening his body, and establishing mindfulness in front of him.
Having abandoned longing for the world … as in 5 :75  … he purifies his mind from doubt. “Having abandoned these five hindrances, defilements of the mind that weaken wisdom, secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, he enters and dwells in the first jhana … the second jhana … the third jhana … the fourth jhana, neither painful nor pleasant, which has purification of mindfulness by equanimity.
“When his mind is thus concentrated, purified, cleansed, unblemished, rid of defilement, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, he directs it to the knowledge of the destruction of the taints.
He understands as it really is: `This is suffering ‘ … ‘Destroyed is birth, the spiritual life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more coming back to any state of being.’
This person, I say, is just like the warrior who takes up a sword and shield, arms himself with a bow and quiver, enters the fray of battle, and having triumphed in that battle, emerges victorious and settles at the head of the battlefield.
There is, bhikkhus, such a person here.
This is the fifth kind of person similar to a warrior found among the bhikkhus.
“These are the five kinds of persons similar to warriors found among the bhikkhus.’
but his foes slay him and finish him off.
but his foes wound him. His comrades carry him off and bring him to his relatives.
but while they are doing so he dies from that injury.
and as a result he recovers from that injury.
So too, there are these five kinds of persons similar to warriors found among the bhikkhus.
and lust invades his mind.
but dies along the way even before he arrives. This person, I say, is just like .
and lust invades his mind.
with the simile of the snake’s head, the Blessed One has stated that sensual pleasures provide little gratification, much suffering and anguish, and that the danger in them is more.
with the simile of the sword stake …
with the simile of the butcher’s knife and block …
with the simile of fruits on a tree …
with the simile of the borrowed goods …
with the simile of the dream …
with the simile of the charcoal pit …
lust invades his mind.
With the simile of the skeleton …
There is, bhikkhus, such a person here.
With the stilling of applied and sustained thought, I entered upon and abided in the second jhana.. .With the fading away as well of rapture.. .I entered upon and abided in the third jhana…With the abandoning of pleasure and pain…I entered upon and abided in the fourth jhana, which has neither-pain- nor-pleasure and purity of mindfulness due to equanimity.
I directly knew as it actually is: “This is suffering”…“This is the origin of suffering”…“This is the cessation of suffering”…“This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.” I directly knew as it actually is: “These are the taints “…“This is the origin of the taints”… “This is the cessation of the taints”…“This is the way leading to the cessation of the taints.”
As regards the explanation of ‘ what must be gone to ’, an objector said: Now, as to the phrase Buddham saranam gacchami the Buddha refuge ’), should one who goes to the Buddha refuge go to the Buddha or to the refuge ? And in either case the mention of one of the two is meaningless.
—Why so?
—Because the verb ‘ to go ’ does not have two objects ;
for the grammarians do not require two passive objects here as they do in such phrases as ajam gamam neti the village ’), 19
and it has meaning only in such phrases as gacchat’eva puhbam disam gacchati pacchimam disam the east direction, he goes the west direction S.i.122).
—That is not so, because identical causativity is not intended of the words ‘ Buddha ’ and ‘sarana’.
For if identical causativity were intended of them, then even one who had lost his wits would, on approaching the Buddha, be gone to the Buddha refuge 
since he would have literally gone to the refuge, itself merely nominally distinguished as ‘ the Buddha
—But is there not identical causativity nevertheless, because of the words ‘ This is the refuge that is safe, This is the ultimate refuge ’ ?
No. That state of identical causativity applies only in that instance.
That state of identical causativity is intended only there in those lines and is intended there in this way: ‘ The refuge is safe and ultimate because of absence of any exception 20 in the refuge-state, in other words, in the abolition of fear in those who have gone for refuge to the three Jewels beginning with the Buddha but it is not intended anywhere else, because even when there is connexion with something gone to,21 that is inadequate to establish the the going was for refuge. So that argument is unestablished.
- But there is not identical causativity nevertheless since there is establishment that the going is for refuge when there is its connexion with something gone to in the passage ‘ On coming to this refuge, he from every suffering is freed ’ ?
—No, because of that argument’s falling still within the scope of the flaw mentioned earlier.
For there it was shown that if there were identical causativity, then even one who had lost his wits would, on coming to this refuge consisting of the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Sangha, be automatically freed from all suffering; thus there would be here too the flaw already mentioned; and owing to the flaw, that does not help us. So that argument too remains unestablished.
Just as, in the passage ‘ On coming to me as the good friend, Ananda, creatures normally inseparable from the idea of birth are freed from birth ’ it is of creatures being freed by the might of the Blessed One as the Good Friend that it is said that On coming to… the good friend ’ they ‘ are freed’,
so too there in the passage ‘ on coming to this refuge.’it is of one being freed by the might of the refuge consisting of the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Sangha, that it is said ‘ On coming to this refuge, he from every suffering is freed ’. That is how the intention should be understood there.
—So then in any case it is illogical to predicate either of the Buddha that he ‘ must be gone ’ or of the refuge or of both tamth at: and accordingly the sense of the phrase must be gone ’ requires on the contrary that it is predicated of the goer demonstrated by the word gacchdmi , the logic of which still remains to be stated.
What ‘ must be gone ’ here is always the Buddha. But the mention of him as the refuge is for the purpose of showing the mode of going: ‘ I go the Buddha as refuge ,
for me he is the highest value, the eliminator of the abyss, the provider of welfare, and it is with this intention that I go to him, frequent, wait upon and reverence him’, or ‘that is how I know, how I have discovered ’;
—In that case is not the non-addition 24 of the word ‘ as ’ contrary to the requirements of logic ?
That is not so.
Now at this point it may be objected: If the meaning there were thus, then the word iti ought to be added as is done in such passages as ‘ He understands impermanent form, in accordance with how it actually is, as “ impermanent form ” ’ ; but it is not added, therefore that argument is stated illogically.
—No. It is logical.
—Why so?
—Because the meaning of that too is essentially implied;
for the meaning of that is actually implied there also, on which account it has to be understood, in the same way as it was earlier, as if it were added although it is not.
This is the explanation of what 4 must be gone to ’.
—As to that it may be stated as follows:
for these linguistic roots 23 which have the meaning of ‘ travelling ’ have also the meaning of ‘ discovering ’ .
Otherwise 26 the argument would fall under the scope of the flaw already mentioned.
Now as to the lines in the Schedule ‘And for the other two as well The way prescribed is parallel ’ , it may be said as follows: The way of commenting on the clause ‘ I go for refuge to the Enlightened One’ should be understood to be the same as in the case of the two clauses ‘I go for refuge to the True Idea ’ and ‘ I go for refuge to the Community ’.
For here it is only the explanations of the words ‘ True Idea ’ and ‘ Community ‘ that are dissimilar in the meaning and the phrasing.
Consequently there is only need to mention what is dissimilar here. 34. Some say that ‘ “ Dhamma ” is the Path, its Fruit, and Extinction ’.
Our preference is that only the fading of lust, which is the Path, is the ‘True Idea’ in this sense, since it causes the upholding of those who have maintained the Path in being and have realized extinction by its not allowing their falling into states of deprivation, and since it makes provision for their supreme consolation. And this is established by Aggapasada Sutta;
for this is said: ‘Bhikkhus, in so far as there are ideas that are determined, the Noble Eightfold Path is accounted the foremost of them’ and so on.
The mass composed of the persons that possess the fourfold Noble Path and consist of category-continuities fully imbued with 27 the fruit of the monks’ life is the Community because of its combining the concurrence of right view and virtue.
‘How do you conceive this, Ananda? Those ideas that have been taught by me after directly knowing them, that is to say, the four foundations of mindfulness, the four right endeavours, the four bases for success , the five faculties, the five powers, the seven enlightenment factors, and the Noble Eightfold Path: do you see, Ananda, even two bhikkhus who have differing theories about these ideas? ‘ .
For it is this Community taken thus in the ultimate sense that ‘must be gone to’ as refuge,
and which in the Suttas is called ‘fit for gifts, fit for hospitality, fit for offerings, and fit for reverential salutation, as the incomparable field of merit for the world ’ .
Now when someone has gone for refuge to this Community regarded thus in the ultimate sense, his refuge-going is neither broken nor defiled by the act of paying homage to some other subordinate kind, for instance to a community of bhikkhus or to a community of bhikkhunis or to a community headed by the Enlightened One or to the conventional community classed as consisting of a chapter of four, etc., or even when consisting of a single person gone forth under the Blessed One. 36. This is what is different here.
What remains to be said about this and about the second refuge-going should be understood in the way already stated under directions for the breach and non-breach, and the rest.
This, then, is the commentary on the lines ‘ And for the other two as well The way prescribed is parallel’.
And this is said by the Blessed One:
but who dies from that injury. This person, I say, is just like .
and who then recovers from that injury. This person, I say, is just like .
“He resorts to a secluded lodging: the forest, the foot of a tree, a mountain, a ravine, a hillside cave, a charnel ground, a jungle highland, the open air, a heap of straw.
I directly knew: “Birth is destroyed, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more coming to any state of being.”
“‘It is by knowing thus, seeing thus, friends, that in regard to this body with’its consciousness and all external signs, I-making, mine-making, and the underlying tendency to conceit have been eradicated in me.’
Having done so, one should say to him: ‘It is a gain for us, friend, it is a great gain for us, friend, that we see such a companion in the holy life as the venerable one.’“1063
That is what the Blessed One said.
The bhikkhus were satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five qualities that make for selfconfidence in a trainee.
Here, a bhikkhu is endowed with faith and is virtuous, learned, energetic, and wise.
Whatever timidity there is in one without faith does not exist in one endowed with faith;
Whatever timidity there is in one who is immoral does not exist in one who is virtuous;
Whatever timidity there is in one who is unlearned does not exist in one who is learned;
Whatever timidity there is in one who is lazy does not exist in one who is energetic;
Whatever timidity there is in one who is unwise does not exist in one who is wise;
These are the five qualities that make for self-confidence in a trainee.”
What five?
therefore this quality makes for selfconfidence in a trainee.
therefore this quality makes for selfсonfidence in a trainee.
therefore this quality makes for self-confidence in a trainee.
therefore this quality makes for self-confidence in a trainee.
therefore this quality makes for self-confidence in a trainee.
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Savatthl in the Eastern Park, in the Palace of Migara’s Mother.
On that occasion - the Uposatha day of the fifteenth, on the full-moon night - the Blessed One was seated in the open surrounded by the Sangha of bhikkhus.
Then, surveying the silent Sangha of bhikkhus, he addressed them thus: 3. “Bhikkhus, would an untrue man1045 know of an untrue man: ‘This person is an untrue man’?”
- “No, venerable sir.”
- “Good, bhikkhus. It is impossible, it cannot be, that an untrue man should know of an untrue man: ‘This person is an untrue man.’
But would an untrue man know of a true man: ‘This person is a true man’?”
- “No, venerable sir.”
- “Good, bhikkhus. It is impossible, it cannot be, that an untrue man should know of a true man: ‘This person is a true man.’
Bhikkhus, an untrue man is possessed of bad qualities; he associates as an untrue man, he wills as an untrue man, he counsels as an untrue man, he speaks as an untrue man, he acts as an untrue man, he holds views as an untrue man, and he gives gifts as an untrue man.
“And how is an untrue man possessed of bad qualities?
Here an untrue man has no faith, no shame, no fear of wrong- doing; he is unlearned, lazy, forgetful, and unwise.
That is how an untrue man is possessed of bad qualities.
“And how does an untrue man associate as an untrue man?
Here an untrue man has for friends and companions those recluses and brahmins who have no faith, no shame, no fear of wrongdoing; who are unlearned, lazy, forgetful, and unwise.
That is how an untrue man associates as an untrue man.
“And how does an untrue man will as an untrue man?
Here an untrue man wills for his own affliction, for the affliction of others, and for the affliction of both.
That is how an untrue man wills as an untrue man.
“And how does an untrue man counsel as an untrue man?
Here an untrue man counsels for his own affliction, for the affliction of others, and for the affliction of both.
That is how an untrue man counsels as an untrue man.
“And how does an untrue man speak as an untrue man?
Here an untrue man speaks false speech, malicious speech, harsh speech, and gossip.
That is how an untrue man speaks as an untrue man.
“And how does an untrue man act as an untrue man?
Here an untrue man kills living beings, takes what is not given, and misconducts himself in sensual pleasures.
That is how an untrue man acts as an untrue man.
“And how does an untrue man hold views as an untrue man?
Here an untrue man holds such a view as this: ‘There is nothing given, nothing offered, nothing sacrificed; no fruit or result of good and bad actions; no this world, no other world; no mother, no father; no beings who are reborn spontaneously; no good and virtuous recluses and brahmins in the world who have realised for themselves by direct knowledge and declare this world and the other world.’
That is how an untrue man holds views as an untrue man.
“And how does an untrue man give gifts as an untrue man?
Here an untrue man gives a gift carelessly, gives it not with his own hand, gives it without showing respect, gives what is to be discarded, gives it with the view that nothing will come of it.
That is how an untrue man gives gifts as an untrue man.
“That untrue man - thus possessed of bad qualities, who thus associates as an untrue man, wills as an untrue man, counsels as an untrue man, speaks as an untrue man, acts as an untrue man, holds views as an untrue man, and gives gifts as an untrue man - on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappears in the destination of untrue men.
And what is the destination of untrue men?
It is hell or the animal world.
“Bhikkhus, would a true man know of a true man: ‘This person is a true man’?”
- “Yes, venerable sir.”
- “Good, bhikkhus.
It is possible that a true man would know of a true man: ‘This person is a true man.’ But would a true man know of an untrue man: ‘This person is an untrue man’?”
- “Yes, venerable sir.”
- “Good, bhikkhus. It is possible that a true man would know of an untrue man: ‘This person is an untrue man.’
“Bhikkhus, a true man is possessed of good qualities; he associates as a true man, he wills as a true man, he counsels as a true man, he speaks as a true man, he acts as a true man, he holds views as a true man, and he gives gifts as a true man.
“And how is a true man possessed of good qualities?
Here a true man has faith, shame, and fear of wrongdoing; he is learned, energetic, mindful, and wise.
That is how a true man is possessed of good qualities.
“And how does a true man associate as a true man?
Here a true man has for his friends and companions those recluses and brahmins who have faith, shame, and fear of wrongdoing; who are learned, energetic, mindful, and wise.
That is how a true man associates as a true man.
“And how does a true man will as a true man?
Here a true man does not will for his own affliction, for the affliction of others, or for the affliction of both.
That is how a true man wills as a true man.
“And how does a true man counsel as a true man?
Here a true man does not counsel for his own affliction, for the affliction of others, or for the affliction of both.
That is how a true man counsels as a true man.
“And how does a true man speak as a true man?
Here a true man abstains from false speech, from malicious speech, from harsh speech, and from gossip.
That is how a true man speaks as a true man.
“And how does a true man act as a true man?
Here a true man abstains from killing living beings, from taking what is not given, and from misconduct in sensual pleasures.
That is how a true man acts as a true man.
“And how does a true man hold views as a true man?
Here a true man holds such a view as this: ‘There is what is given and what is offered and what is sacrificed; there is fruit and result of good and bad actions; there is this world and the other world; there is mother and father; there are beings who are reborn spontaneously; there are good and virtuous recluses and brahmins in the world who have realised for themselves by direct knowledge and declare this world and the other world.’
That is how a true man holds views as a true man.
“And how does a true man give gifts as a true man?
Here a true man gives a gift carefully, gives it with his own hand, gives it showing respect, gives a valuable gift, gives it with the view that something will come of it.
That is how a true man gives gifts as a true man.
“That true man - thus possessed of good qualities, who thus associates as a true man, wills as a true man, counsels as a true man, speaks as a true man, acts as a true man, holds views as a true man, and gives gifts as a true man - on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappears in the destination of true men.
And what is the destination of true men?
It is greatness among the gods or greatness among human beings.”
That is what the Blessed One said.
The bhikkhus were satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five kinds of persons found in the world.
What five?
“Here, one person violates and then becomes remorseful, and does not understand as it really is the liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, where these arisen bad unwholesome states of his cease without remainder.
“Here, one person violates and does not become remorseful, and does not understand as it really is the liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, where these arisen bad unwholesome states of his cease without remainder.
“Here, one person does not violate and yet becomes remorseful, and does not understand as it really is the liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, where these arisen bad unwholesome states of his cease without remainder.
“Here, one person does not violate and does not become remorseful, and does not understand as it really is the liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, where these arisen bad unwholesome states of his cease without remainder.
“Here, one person does not violate and does not become remorseful, and understands as it really is the liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, where these arisen bad unwholesome states of his cease without remainder.
“Bhikkhus, the person among these who violates and then becomes remorseful, and does not understand as it really is the liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, where these arisen bad unwholesome states of his cease without remainder, should be told: ‘Taints born of violation are found in you, and taints born of remorse increase. Please abandon the taints born of violation and dispel the taints born of remorse; then develop your mind and wisdom. In this way you will be exactly the same as the fifth type of person.’
“The person among these who violates and does not become remorseful, and does not understand as it really is the liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, where these arisen bad unwholesome states of his cease without remainder, should be told:- ‘Taints born of violation are found in you, but taints born of remorse do not increase. Please abandon the taints born of violation, and then develop your mind and wisdom. In this way you will be exactly the same as the fifth type of person.’
3) “The person among these who does not violate and yet becomes remorseful, and does not understand as it really is the liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, where these arisen bad unwholesome states of his cease without remainder, should be told: ‘Taints born of violation are not found in you, yet taints born of remorse increase. Please dispel the taints born of remorse, and then develop your mind and wisdom. In this way you will be exactly the same as the fifth type of person.’
“The person among these who does not violate and does not become remorseful, and does not understand as it really is the liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, where these arisen bad unwholesome states of his cease without remainder, should be told: ‘Taints born of violation are not found in you, and taints born of remorse do not increase. Please develop your mind and wisdom. In this way you will be exactly the same as the fifth type of person.’
“Thus, bhikkhus, when persons of these four types are exhorted and instructed by the example of the fifth type of person, they gradually attain the destruction of the taints.”
On one occasion the Blessed One was dwelling at Saketa in the Tikandakl Grove.
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus!
“‘Venerable sir,” those bhikkhus replied.
The Blessed One said this:”
Bhikkhus, it is good for a bhikkhu from time to time to dwell perceiving the repulsive in the unrepulsive.
 It is good for a bhikkhu from time to time to dwell perceiving the unrepulsive in the repulsive,
It is good for a bhikkhu from time to time to dwell perceiving the repulsive in both the unrepulsive and the repulsive.
It is good for a bhikkhu from time to time to dwell perceiving the unrepulsive in both the repulsive and the unrepulsive.
It is good for a bhikkhu from time to time to dwell equanimous, mindful and clearly comprehending, having turned away from both the repulsive and the unrepulsive.
“And for the sake of what benefit should a bhikkhu dwell perceiving the repulsive in the unrepulsive?
‘Let no lust arise in me toward things provocative of lust! ‘: for the sake of this benefit a bhikkhu should dwell perceiving the repulsive in the unrepulsive.
“And for the sake of what benefit should a bhikkhu dwell perceiving the unrepulsive in the repulsive?
‘Let no hatred arise in me toward things provocative of hatred! ‘: for the sake of this benefit a bhikkhu should dwell perceiving the unrepulsive in the repulsive.
“And for the sake of what benefit should a bhikkhu dwell perceiving the repulsive in both the unrepulsive and the repulsive?
‘Let no lust arise in me toward things provocative of lust, and no hatred toward things provocative of hatred! ‘: for the sake of this benefit a bhikkhu should dwell perceiving the repulsive in both the unrepulsive and the repulsive.
“And for the sake of what benefit should a bhikkhu dwell perceiving the unrepulsive in both the repulsive and the unrepulsive?
‘Let no hatred arise in me toward things provocative of hatred, and no lust toward things provocative of lust! ‘: for the sake of this benefit a bhikkhu should dwell perceiving the unrepulsive in both the repulsive and the unrepulsive.
“And for the sake of what benefit should a bhikkhu dwell equanimous, mindful and clearly comprehending, having turned away from both the repulsive and the unrepulsive?
‘Let no lust at all arise in me anywhere in any way regarding things provocative of lust! Let no hatred at all arise in me anywhere in any way regarding things provocative of hatred! May no delusion at all arise in me anywhere in any way regarding things that breed delusion! ‘ for the sake of this benefit a bhikkhu should dwell equanimous, mindful and clearly comprehending, having turned away from both the repulsive and the unrepulsive.’
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Savatthl in the Eastern Park, in the Palace of Migara’s Mother.
On that occasion - on the Uposatha day of the fifteenth,1036 on the full-moon night - the Blessed One was seated in the open surrounded by the Sangha of bhikkhus.
Then a certain bhikkhu rose from his seat,1037 arranged his upper robe on one shoulder, and extending his hands in reverential salutation towards the Blessed One, said to him:
- “Sit on your own seat, bhikkhu, and ask what you like.”
So the bhikkhu sat on his own seat and said to the Blessed One: 4. “Are these not, venerable sir, the five aggregates affected by clinging; that is, the material form aggregate affected by clinging, the feeling aggregate affected by clinging, the perception aggregate affected by clinging, the formations aggregate affected by clinging, and the consciousness aggregate affected by clinging?”
“These, bhikkhus, are the five aggregates affected by clinging; that is, the material form aggregate affected by clinging…and the consciousness aggregate affected by clinging.”
Saying, “Good, venerable sir,” the bhikkhu delighted and rejoiced in the Blessed One’s words. Then he asked him a further question: 5. “But, venerable sir, in what are these five aggregates affected by clinging rooted?”
“These five aggregates affected by clinging are rooted in desire,1038 bhikkhu.”
“Venerable sir, is that clinging the same as these five aggregates affected by clinging, or is the clinging something apart from the five aggregates affected by clinging?”
“Bhikkhu, that clinging is neither the same as these five aggregates affected by clinging, nor is the clinging something apart from the five aggregates affected by clinging.
It is the desire and lust in regard to the five aggregates affected by clinging that is the clinging there.”
“But, venerable sir, can there be diversity in the desire and lust regarding these five aggregates affected by clinging?”
“There can be, bhikkhu , “ the Blessed One said. “Here, bhikkhu, someone thinks thus: ‘May my material form be thus in the future; may my feeling be thus in the future; may my perception be thus in the future; may my formations be thus in the future; may my consciousness be thus in the future.’
Thus there is diversity in the desire and lust regarding these five aggregates affected by clinging.”
“But, venerable sir, in what way does the term ‘aggregates’ apply to the aggregates?”
“Bhikkhu, any kind of material form whatever, whether past, future, or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near - this is the material form aggregate.
Any kind of feeling whatever…far or near - this is the feeling aggregate.
Any kind of perception whatever…far or near - this is the perception aggregate.
Any kind of formations whatever… far or near - this is the formations aggregate.
Any kind of consciousness whatever…far or near - this is the consciousness aggregate.
It is in this Way, bhikkhu, that the term ‘aggregate’ applies to the aggregates.”
“What is the cause and condition, venerable sir, for the manifestation of the material form aggregate?
What is the cause and condition for the manifestation of the feeling aggregate…
“The four great elements, bhikkhu, are the cause and condition for the manifestation of the material form aggregate.
Contact is the cause and condition for the manifestation of the feeling aggregate.
Contact is the cause and the condition for the manifestation of the perception aggregate.
Contact is the cause and condition for the manifestation of the formations aggregate.
Mentality-materiality is the cause and condition for the manifestation of the consciousness aggregate.”1040
“Venerable sir, how does personality view come to be?”1041
“Here, bhikkhu, an untaught ordinary person, who has no regard for noble ones and is unskilled and undisciplined in their Dhamma, who has no regard for true men and is unskilled and undisciplined in their Dhamma, regards material form as self, or self as possessed of material form, or material form as in self, or self as in material form. He regards feeling as self…perception as self…formations as self…consciousness as self, or self as possessed of consciousness, or consciousness as in self, or self as in consciousness.
That is how personality view comes to be.”
“But, venerable sir, how does personality view not come to be?”
“Here, bhikkhu, a well-taught noble disciple, who has regard for noble ones and is skilled and disciplined in their Dhamma, who has regard for true men and is skilled and disciplined in their Dhamma, does not regard material form as self, or self as possessed of material form, or material form as in self, or self as in material form. He does not regard feeling as self…perception as self…formations as self…consciousness as self, or self as possessed of consciousness, or consciousness as in self, or self as in consciousness.
That is how personality view does not come to be.”
“What, venerable sir, is the gratification, what is the danger, and what is the escape in the case of material form?
What is the gratification, what is the danger, and what is the escape in the case of feeling…
“The pleasure and joy, bhikkhu, that arise in dependence on material form - this is the gratification in the case of material form.
Material form is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change - this is the danger in the case of material form.
The removal of desire and lust, the abandonment of desire and lust for material form - this is the escape in the case of material form.
“The pleasure and joy that arise in dependence on feeling…in dependence on perception…in dependence on formations…in dependence on consciousness - this is the gratification in the case of consciousness.
Consciousness is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change - this is the danger in the case of consciousness.
The removal of desire and lust, the abandonment of desire and lust for consciousness - this is the escape in the case of consciousness.”
“Venerable sir, how does one know, how does one see, so that in regard to this body with its consciousness and all external signs, there is no I-making, mine-making, and underlying tendency to conceit?”
“Bhikkhu, any kind of material form whatever, whether past or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near - one sees all material form as it actually is with proper wisdom thus: “This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
Any kind of feeling whatever…Any kind of perception whateverAny kind of formations whateverAny kind of consciousness whatever…one sees all consciousness as it actually is with proper wisdom thus: “This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
It is when one knows and sees thus that in regard to this body with its consciousness and all external signs there is no I-making, mine-making, or underlying tendency to conceit.”
Then, in the mind of a certain bhikkhu this thought arose: “So, it seems, material form is not self, feeling is not self, perception is not self, formations are not self, consciousness is not self. What self, then, will actions done by the not-self affect?””1042
Then the Blessed One, knowing in his mind the thought in the mind of that bhikkhu, addressed the bhikkhus thus: “It is possible, bhikkhus, that some misguided man here, obtuse and ignorant, with his mind dominated by craving,’ might think that he can outstrip the Teacher’s Dispensation thus: ‘So, it seems, material form is not self…consciousness is not self. What self, then, will actions done by the not-self affect?”
Now, bhikkhus, you have been trained by me through interrogation on various occasions in regard to various things.1043
“Bhikkhus, what do you think? Is material form permanent or impermanent?”
- “Impermanent, venerable sir.”
- “Is what is impermanent suffering or happiness?”
- “Suffering, venerable sir.”
- “Is what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change fit to be regarded thus: “This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?”
- “No, venerable sir.”
“Bhikkhus, what do you think: Is feeling…perception…formations… consciousness permanent or impermanent?”
- “Impermanent, venerable sir.”
- “Is what is impermanent suffering or happiness?”
- “Suffering, venerable sir.”
- “Is what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change fit to be regarded thus: “This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?”
- “No, venerable sir.”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, any kind of material form whatever, whether past, future, or present…all material form should be seen as it actually is with proper wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
Any kind of feeling whatever… Any kind of perception whatever…Any kind of formations whatever…Any kind of consciousness whatever…all consciousness should be seen as it actually is with proper wisdom thus: “This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
“Seeing thus, a well-taught noble disciple becomes disenchanted with material form, disenchanted with feeling, disenchanted with perception, disenchanted with formations, disenchanted with consciousness. 18. “Being disenchanted, he becomes dispassionate. Through dispassion his mind is liberated.
He understands: ‘Birth is destroyed, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more coming to any state of being.’“
That is what the Blessed One said.
The bhikkhus were satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
Now while this discourse was being spoken, through not clinging the minds of sixty bhikkhus were liberated from the taints.1044
There the Venerable Sariputta … said this:“Here, friends, a bhikkhu accomplished in virtuous behavior, concentration, and wisdom might enter and emerge from the cessation of perception and feeling. There is this possibility.
But if he does not reach final knowledge in this very life, having been reborn among a certain group of mind-made deities that transcend the company of devas that subsist on edible food, he might again enter and emerge from the cessation of perception and feeling.” There is this possibility.”
When this was said, the Venerable Udayi said to the Venerable Sariputta: “This is impossible, friend Sariputta, it cannot happen that a bhikkhu, having been reborn among a certain group of mind-made deities that transcend the company of devas that subsist on edible food, might again enter and emerge from the cessation of perception and feeling. There is no such possibility.”
A second time… A third time, the Venerable Sariputta said: “Here, friends, it is possible that a bhikkhu accomplished in virtuous behavior having been reborn among a certain group of mind-made deities …
A third time, the Venerable Udayi said to the Venerable Sariputta: “This is impossible, friend Sariputta, it cannot happen that a bhikkhu, having been reborn among a certain group of mind-made deities… might again enter and emerge from the cessation of perception and feeling. There is no such possibility.”
Then it occurred to the Venerable Sariputta: “The Venerable Udayi has rejected me up to the third time, and not a single bhikkhu expresses agreement with me.
Let me approach the Blessed One.”
Then the Venerable Sariputta approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side,
and addressed the bhikkhus: “Here, friends, a bhikkhu accomplished in virtuous behavior, concentration, and wisdom might again enter and emerge from the cessation of perception and feeling. There is this possibility.
If he does not reach final knowledge in this very life, having been reborn among a certain group of mind- made deities that transcend the company of devas that subsist on edible food, he might again enter and emerge from the cessation of perception and feeling. There is this possibility.”
When this was said, the Venerable Udayi said to the Venerable Sariputta: “This is impossible, friend Sariputta, it cannot happen that a bhikkhu, having been reborn among a certain group of mind-made deities transcending the company of devas that subsist on edible food, might again enter and emerge from the cessation of perception and feeling. There is no such possibility.
A second time… A third time, the Venerable Sariputta addressed the bhikkhus: “Here, friends, a bhikkhu accomplished in virtuous behavior … having been reborn among a certain group of mind-made deities… might again enter and emerge from the cessation of perception and feeling.
There is this possibility.”
A third time, the Venerable Udayl said to the Venerable Sariputta: “This is impossible, friend Sariputta, it cannot happen that a bhikkhu …reborn among a certain group of mind-made deities … might again enter and emerge from the cessation of perception and feeling. There is no such possibility.’
Then it occurred to the Venerable Sariputta: “Even when I am in the presence of the Blessed One, the Venerable Udayi rejects me up to the third time, and not a single bhikkhu expresses agreement with me.
Let me just keep silent.”
Then the Blessed One addressed the Venerable Udayi: “Udayi, just what do you understand by a mind-made group?”
“Bhante, it is those devas that are formless, perception- made”
“What are you saying, Udayi, you foolish and incompetent fellow?
“ Then the Blessed One addressed the Venerable Ananda: “Ananda, do you just look on passively as an elder bhikkhu is being harassed?
Don’t you have any compassion toward an elder bhikkhu when he’s being harassed?”
Then tine Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus: “Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu accomplished in virtuous behavior, concentration, and wisdom might enter and emerge from the cessation of perception and feeling.
If he does not reach final knowledge in this very life, then, having been reborn among a certain group of mind-made deities that transcend the company of devas that subsist on edible food, he might again enter and emerge from the cessation of perception and feeling. There is this possibility.”
This is what the Blessed One said.
Having said this, the Fortunate One got up from his seat and entered his dwelling.
Then, not long after the Blessed One had left, the Venerable Ananda approached the Venerable Upavana and said to him: “Here, friend Upavana, they were harassing other elder bhikkhus,
It would not be surprising if this evening, when he emerges from seclusion, the Blessed One makes a pronouncement about this matter, and he might call upon the Venerable Upavana himself to give an account,
Then, in the evening, the Blessed One emerged from seclusion and went to the meeting hall.
He sat down in the appointed seat and said to the Venerable Upavana:
“Possessing five qualities, Bhante, an elder bhikkhu is pleasing and agreeable to his fellow monks and is respected and esteemed by them.
What five?
He is virtuous; he dwells restrained by the Patimokkha … as in 5:134… he trains in them. He has learned much… as in 5:134… he has penetrated well by view. He is a good speaker with a good delivery; he is gifted With speech that is polished, clear, articulate expressive of the meaning. He gains at will, without trouble or difficulty, the four jhanas that constitute the higher mind and are pleasant dwellings in this very life. With the destruction of the taints, he has realized for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, he dwells in it.
Possessing these five qualities, an elder is pleasing and agreeable to his fellow monks and is respected and esteemed by them.”
“Good, good, Upavana!
Possessing those five qualities, an elder is pleasing and agreeable to1 his fellow monks and is respected and esteemed by them.
But if these five qualities are not found in an elder bhikkhu, why should bis fellow monks honor, respect, esteem, and venerate him? On account of his broken teeth, grey hair, and wrinkled skin?
But because these five qualities are found in an elder bhikkhu, his fellow monks honor, respect, esteem, and venerate him.”
might again enter and emerge from the cessation of perception and feeling. There is this possibility.”
Then the Venerable Sariputta fell silent.
Yet you think you have to speak up!”
but we didn’t question them.
Just now I feel timid.”
“Upavana, how many qualities should an elder bhikkhu possess to be pleasing and agreeable to his fellow monks and to be respected and esteemed by them?”
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Jetavana with reference to Elder Sāriputta.
For one day thirty forest-dwellers approached the Teacher, paid obeisance to him, and sat down.
The Teacher, seeing that they possessed the requisite faculties for attaining Arahatship, addressed Elder Sāriputta as follows, “Sāriputta, do you believe that the quality of faith, when it has been developed and enlarged, is connected with the Deathless and terminates in the Deathless?” In this manner the Teacher questioned the Elder with reference to the Five Moral Qualities
Said the Elder, “Reverend Sir, I do not go by the faith of the Exalted One in this matter, that the quality of faith, when it has been developed and enlarged, is connected with the Deathless and terminates in the Deathless.
But of course, Reverend Sir, those who have not known the Deathless or seen or perceived or realized or grasped the Deathless by the power of reason, such persons must of necessity go by the faith of others in this matter;
namely, that the faculty of faith, when it has been developed and enlarged, is connected with the Deathless and terminates in the Deathless.” Thus did the Elder answer his question.
When the monks heard this, they began a discussion: “Elder Sāriputta has never really given up false views. Even to-day he refused to believe even the Supremely Enlightened One.”
When the Teacher heard this, he said, “Monks, why do you say this?
For I asked Sāriputta the following question, ‘Sāriputta, do you believe that without developing the Five Moral Qualities, without developing Tranquillity and Spiritual Insight, it is possible for a man to realize the Paths and the Fruits?’
And he answered me as follows, ‘There is no one who can thus realize the Paths and the Fruits.’
Then I asked him, ‘Do you not believe that there is such a thing as the ripening of the fruit of almsgiving and good works? Do you not believe in the virtues of the Buddhas and the rest?’
But as a matter of fact, Sāriputta walks not by the faith of others, for the reason that he has, in and by himself, attained states of mind to which the Paths and the Fruits lead, by the power of Spiritual Insight induced by Ecstatic Meditation.
Therefore he is not open to censure.” So saying, he joined the connection, and preaching the Law, pronounced the following Stanza,
That man who is free from credulity, who knows the Uncreate, who has brought rebirth to an end,
Who has put an end to every occasion of good and evil, who has renounced all desires, that man is the greatest of men.
On one occasion the Blessed One was dwelling among the Bhaggas at Sumsumaragira, in the deer park at Bhesakala Grove.
Now on that occasion the householder Nakulapita was; sick, afflicted, gravely ill.
Then the housewife Nakulamata said this to him:
To die full of concern is painful. To die full of concern has been criticized by the Blessed One.
“It may be, householder, that you think thus: After I’m gone, Nakulamata won’t be able to support our children and maintain the household.’
But you should not look at the matter in this way.
I am skilled at weaving cotton and knitting wool.
After you are gone,I`ll be able to support the children and maintain the household.
Therefore, householder, do not die full of concern.
To die full of concern is painful. To die full, of concern has been criticized by the Blessed One.
“It may be, householder, that you think thus: After I’m gone, Nakulamata will take another husband.’
You know, householder, and so do I, that for the last sixteen years we have led the layperson’s celibate life.
To die full of concern is painful. To die full of concern has been criticized by the Blessed One.
“It may be, householder, that you think thus: ‘After I’m gone, Nakulamata won’t want to see the Blessed One and the Sangha of bhikkhus.’
But you should not look at the matter in this way.
After you are gone, householder, I will be even keener to see the Blessed One and the Sangha of bhikkhus.
Therefore, householder, do not die full of concern.
To die full of concern is painful. To die full of concern has been criticized by the Blessed One.
“It may be, householder, that you think thus: ‘Nakulamata does not fulfill virtuous behavior.’
But you should not look at the matter in this way.
I am one of the Blessed One’s white- robed female lay disciples who fulfill virtuous behavior.
If anyone has any doubt or uncertainty about this, the Blessed One, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One is dwelling among the Bhaggas at Sumsumaragira, in the deer park at Bhesakala Grove. They can go and ask him.
Therefore, householder, do not die full of concern.
To die full of concern is painful. To die full of concern has been criticized by the Blessed One.
“It may be, householder, that you think thus: ‘Nakulamata does not obtain internal serenity of mind.’
But you should not look at the matter in this way.
I am one of the Blessed One’s white-robed female lay disciples who obtain internal serenity of mind.
If anyone has any doubt or uncertainty about this, the Blessed One, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One is dwelling among the Bhaggas at Sumsumaragira, in the deer park at Bhesakala Grove. They can go and ask him.
Therefore, householder, do not die full of concern.
To die full of concern is painful. To die full of concern has been criticized by the Blessed One.
“It may be, householder, that you think thus: ‘Nakulamata has not attained a foothold, a firm stand, assurance in this Dhamma and discipline.’ she has not crossed over doubt, gotten rid of bewilderment, attained self-confidence, and become independent of others in the Teacher’s teaching.’
But you should not look at the matter in this way.
I am one of the Blessed One’s white-robed female lay disciples who have attained a foothold, a firm stand assurance in this Dhamma and discipline; I am one of those who have crossed ,over doubt, gotten rid of bewilderment, attained self-confidence, and become independent of others in the Teacher’s teaching.
If anyone has any doubt or uncertainty about this, the Blessed One, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One is dwelling among the Bhaggas at Sumsumaragira, in the deer park at Bhesakala Grove. They can go and ask him.
Therefore, householder, do not die full of concern.
To die full of concern is painful. To die full of concern has been criticized by the Blessed One.”
Then, while the householder Nakulapita was being exhorted in this way by the housewife Nakulamata, his ailment subsided on the spot.
Nakulapita recovered from that illness, and that is how his illness was abandoned.
Then, not long after he had recovered, the householder Nakulapita, leaning on a staff, approached the Blessed One. He paid homage to the Blessed One and sat down to one side.
The Blessed One then said to him:
Nakulamata is one of my white-robed female lay disciples who fulfill virtuous behavior.
She is one of my white-robed female lay disciples who obtain internal serenity of mind.
She is one of my white-robed female lay disciples who have attained a foothold, a firm stand, assurance in this Dhamma and discipline, who have crossed over doubt, gotten rid of bewilderment, attained self-confidence, and become independent of others in the Teacher’s teaching.
It is truly your good fortune and gain, householder,
“Do not die full of concern,householder.
But you should not look at the matter in this way.
Therefore, householder, do not die full of concern.
“It is truly your good fortune and gain, householder,
that the housewife Nakulamata has compassion for you, desires your good, and exhorts and instructs you.
that the housewife Nakulamata has compassion for you, desires your good, and exhorts and instructs you.”
Thus have I heard. On one occasion the Blessed One was dwelling at Savatthi in the Eastern Gatehouse.
There the Blessed One addressed the Venerable Sariputta thus: “Sariputta, do you have faith that the faculty of faith, when developed and cultivated, has the Deathless as its ground, the Deathless as its destination, the Deathless as its final goal? … That the faculty of wisdom, when developed and cultivated, has the Deathless as its ground, the Deathless as its destination, the Deathless as its final goal.”
“Venerable sir, I do not go by faith in the Blessed One about this: that the faculty of faith … the faculty of wisdom, when developed and cultivated, has the Deathless as its ground, the Deathless as its destination, the Deathless as its final goal. Those by whom this has not been known, seen, understood, rea1ked, and contacted with wisdom-they would have to go by faith in others about this: that the faculty of faith … the faculty of wisdom, when developed and cultivated, has the Deathless as its ground, the Deathless as its destination, the Deathless as its final goal.
But those by whom this has been known, seen, understood, realized, and contacted with wisdom-they would be without perplexity or doubt about this: that the faculty of faith . . . the faculty of wisdom, when developed and cultivated, has the Deathless as its ground, the Deathless as its destination, the Deathless as its final goal.
But those by whom this has been known, seen, understood, realized, and contacted with wisdom-they would be without perplexity or doubt about this: that the faculty of faith . . . the faculty of wisdom, when developed and cultivated, has the Deathless as its ground, the Deathless as its destination, the Deathless as its final goal.
“I am one, venerable sir, by whom this has been known, seen, understood, realized, and contacted with wisdom.
wisdom. I am without perplexity or doubt about this: that the faculty of faith … the faculty of wisdom, when developed and cultivated, has the Deathless as its ground, the Deathless as its destination, the Deathless as its final goal.”
“Good, good Sariputta!
Those by whom this has not been known . .. they would have to go by faith in others about this …. But those by whom this has been known … they would be without perplexity or doubt about this: that the faculty of faith -
… the faculty of wisdom, when developed and cultivated, has the Deathless as its ground, the Deathless as its destination, the Deathless as its final goal.”
There the Venerable Sariputta addressed the bhikkhus thus : … “Friends, a bhikkhu who wishes to reprove another should first establish five things in himself.
What five?
He should consider: I will speak at a proper time, not at an improper time; I will speak truthfully, not falsely; I will speak gently, not harshly; I will speak in a beneficial way, not in a harmful way; I will speak with a mind of loving-kindness, not while harboring hatred.’
A bhikkhu who wishes to reprove another should first establish these five things in himself.
“Here, friends, I see some p e rson being reproved at an improper time, not disturbed at a proper time; being reproved about what is false, not disturbed about what is true; being reproved harshly, not disturbed gently; being reproved in a harmful way, not disturbed in a beneficial w ay; being reproved by one who harbors hatred, not disturbed by one with a mind of loving-kindness.
“Friends, when a bhikkhu is reproved in a way contrary to the Dhamma, non-remorse should be induced in him in five ways: ‘Friend, you were reproved at an improper time, not at a proper time; that is sufficient for you to be without remorse. You were reproved falsely, riot truthfully; that is sufficient for you to be without remorse. You were reproved harshly, not gently; that is sufficient for you to be without remorse. You were reproved, in a harmful way, not in a beneficial way; that is sufficient for you to be without remorse. You were reproved by one harboring hatred, not by one with a mind of loving-kindness; that is sufficient for you to be without remorse.’
When a bhikkhu is reproved in a way contrary to the Dhamma, non-remorse should be induced in him in these five ways.
“Friends, when a bhikkhu reproves in a way contrary to the Dhamma, remorse should be induced in him in five ways: ‘Friend, you reproved him at an improper time, not at a proper time; that is sufficient for you to feel remorse. You reproved him falsely, not truthfully; that is sufficient for you to feel remorse. You reproved him harshly, not gently; that is sufficient for you to feel remorse. You reproved him in a harmful way, not in a beneficial way ; that is sufficient for you to feel remorse. You reproved him while harboring hatred, not w ith a mind of loving-kindness; that is sufficient for you to feel remorse.’
When a bhikkhu reproves in a way contrary to the Dhamma, remorse should be induced in him in these five ways.
For what reason?
So that another bhikkhu would not think of reproving falsely.
“Here, friends, I see some person being reproved at a proper time, not disturbed at an improper time; being reproved truthfully, not disturbed falsely; being reproved gently, not disturbed harshly; being reproved in a beneficial way, not disturbed in a harmful w ay; being reproved by one with a mind of loving-kindness, not disturbed by one who harbors hatred.
“Friends, when a bhikkhu is reproved in accordance with the Dhamma, remorse should be induced in him in five ways: ‘Friend, you were reproved at a proper time, not at an improper time; that is sufficient for you to feel remorse. You were reproved truthfully, not falsely; that is sufficient for you to feel remorse. You were reproved gently, not harshly; that is sufficient for you to feel remorse. You were reproved in a beneficial Way, not in a harmful way; that is sufficient for you to feel remorse. You were reproved by one with a mind of loving-kindness,, not by one harboring hatred; that is sufficient for you to feel remorse.’
When a bhikkhu is reproved in accordance with the Dhamma, remorse should be induced in him in these five ways.
“Friends , when a bhikkhu reproves in a cco rdan ce with the Dhamma, non-remorse should be induced in him in five ways: ‘Friend, you reproved him at a proper time, not at an improper time; that is sufficient for you to be without remorse. You reproved him truthfully, not falsely; that is sufficient for you to be w ithout remorse You reproved him gently, not harshly; that is sufficient for you to be without remorse. You reproved him in a beneficial way, not in a harmful way; that is sufficient for you to be without remorse. You reproved him with a mind of loving-kindness, not while harboring hatred; that is sufficient for you to be without remorse.’
When a bhikkhu reproves in accordance with the Dhamma, non-remorse should be induced in him in these five ways.
For what reason?
So that another bhikkhu would think of reproving about what is true.
“Friends, a person who is reproved should be established in two things: in truth and non-anger.
If others should reprove me— whether at a proper time or at an improper time; whether about what is true or about what is false; whether gently or harshly; whether in a beneficial way or in a harmful way; whether with a mind of loving-kindness or while harboring hatred— I should still be established in two things: in truth and non-anger.
“If I know: ‘There is such a quality in me.’ I tell him: It exists. This quality is found in me.’
If I know: ‘There is no such quality in me.’ I tell him: It doesn’t exist. This quality isn’t found in me.’
The Blessed One said: “Sariputta, even when you are speaking to them in such a way, some foolish men here do not respectfully accept what you say.”
“There are, Bhante, persons devoid of faith who have gone forth from the household life into homelessness, not out of faith but intent on earning a living; they are crafty, hypocritical, deceptive, restless, puffed up, vain, talkative, rambling in their talk, unguarded over the doors of the senses, immoderate in eating, not intent on wakefulness, indifferent to the ascetic life, not keenly respectful of the training, luxurious and lax, leaders in backsliding, discarding the duty of solitude, lazy, devoid of energy, muddle-minded, lacking in clear comprehension, unconcentrated, with wandering minds, unwise, stupid. When I speak to them in such a way, they do not respectfully accept what I say.
“But, Bhante, there are clansmen who have gone forth from the household life into homelessness out of faith, who are not crafty, hypocritical, deceptive, restless, puffed up, vain, talkative, and rambling in their talk; who keep guard over the doors of the senses; who are moderate in eating, intent on wakefulness, intent upon the ascetic life, keenly respectful of the training; who are riot luxurious and lax; who discard backsliding and take the lead in solitude; who are energetic, resolute, mindful, clearly comprehending, concentrated, with one-pointed minds, wise, intelligent. When I speak to them in such a way, they respectfully accept what I say.”
“Sariputta, leave alone those people who are devoid of faith and have gone forth from the household life into homelessness, not out of faith but intent on earning a living; who are crafty … unwise, stupid.
But, Sariputta, you should speak to those clansmen who have gone forth from the household life into homelessness out of faith, who are not crafty … who are wise, intelligent. Exhort your fellow monks, Sariputta!
Instruct your fellow monks, Sariputta, thinking: ‘I will cause my fellow monks to emerge from what is contrary to the good Dhamma and will establish them in the good Dhamma.’
Thus, Sariputta, should you train yourself.”
“Venerable sir, I would ask the Blessed One about a certain point, if the Blessed One would grant me an answer to my question.”
On one occasion the Venerable Ananda was dwelling at Kosambi in Ghosita’s Park.
Then the Venerable Bhaddaji approached the Venerable Ananda and exchanged greetings with him.
When they had concluded their greetings and cordial talk, he sat down to one side.
The Venerable Ananda then said to him: “Friend Bhaddaji, what is the foremost of sights? What is the foremost kind of hearing? What is the foremost happiness? What is the foremost perception? What is the foremost among states of existence? “
“ There is, friend, Brahma, the vanquisher, the unvanquished, the universal seer, the wielder of power. Getting to see Brahma is the foremost sight.
There are the devas of streaming radiance who are suffused and inundated with happiness.
They sometimes utter the inspired utterance: ‘Oh, what happiness! Oh, what happiness!’
Getting to hear that sound is the foremost kind of hearing.
There are the devas of refulgent glory.
Being happy, they experience very peaceful happiness: this is the foremost happiness.
There are the devas of the base of nothingness: this is the foremost perception.
There are the devas of the base of neither-perception-nor-nonperception: this is the foremost state of existence.”
“Then does the Venerable Bhaddaji agree with the multitude about this? “
“The Venerable Ananda is learned,
“Then listen, friend Bhaddaji, and attend closely. I will speak.”
“Yes, friend,” the Venerable Bhaddaji replied.
The Venerable Ananda said this:
“ In whatever way, friend, one sees such that immediately afterward the destruction of the taints occurs : this is the foremost sight.
In whatever way one hears such that immediately afterward the destruction of the taints occurs: this is the foremost kind of hearing.
In whatever way one is happy such that immediately afterward the destruction of the taints occurs: this is the foremost happiness.
In whatever way one perceives such that immediately afterward the destruction of the taints occurs: this is the foremost perception.
In whatever way one exists such that immediately afterward the destruction of the taints occurs: this is the foremost state of existence.”
so let him clear this up himself.”
On one occasion the Blessed One was wandering on tour among the Kosalans together with a large Sahgha of bhikkhus.
Then, while traveling along the highway, the Blessed One saw a large sal-tree grove in a certain place. He left the highway, entered the sal-tree grove, and smiled when he reached a certain place.
Then it occurred to che Venerable Ananda: “Why did the Blessed One smile?
Tathagatas do not smile without a reason.”
Then the Venerable Ananda said to the Blessed One: “Wiry, Bhante, did the Blessed One smile?
Tathagatas do not smile without a reason.”
“In the past, Ananda, in this place there was an affluent, prosperous, well-populated city, one teeming with people.
Now the Blessed One, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One Kassapa lived in dependence on that city.
The Blessed One Kassapa had a lay follower named Gavesi who had not fulfilled virtuous behavior.
And Gavesi taught and guided five hundred lay followers who had not fulfilled virtuous behavior.
‘Then, Ananda, it occurred to Gavesi: I am the benefactor, the leader, and the guide of these five hundred lay followers, yet neither I myself nor these five hundred lay followers have fulfilled virtuous behavior.
Thus we are on the same level, and I am not the least bit better. Let me surpass them.’
Then Gavesi approached the five hundred lay followers and said to them: ‘From today on, you should consider me to be one fulfilling virtuous behavior.’
Then it occurred to those five hundred lay followers: ‘Master Gavesi is our benefactor, leader, and guide.
Now Master Gavesi will fulfill virtuous behavior.
Why shouldn’t we do so too?’
“Then those five hundred lay followers approached Gavesi and said to him: ‘From today onward let. Master Gavesi consider us to be fulfilling virtuous behavior.’
“Then, Ananda, it occurred to the lay follower Gavesi: I am the benefactor, leader, and guide of these five hundred lay followers. Now I am fulfilling virtuoUs behavior, and so too are these five hundred lay followers.
Thus we are on the same level, and I am not the least bit better. Let me surpass them.’
“Then Gavesi approached the five hundred lay followers and said to them: ‘From today on, you should consider me to be celibate, living apart, abstaining from sexual intercourse, the common person’s practice.’
Then it occurred to those five hundred lay followers: ‘Master Gavesi is our benefactor, leader, and guide.
Now Master Gavesi will be celibate, living apart, abstaining from sexual intercourse, the common person’s practice.
Why shouldn’t we do so too?’
“Then those five hundred lay followers approached Gavesi. and said to him: ‘From today onward let Master Gavesi consider us to be celibate, living apart, abstaining from sexual intercourse, the common persons practice.’
“Then, Ananda, it occurred to the lay follower Gavesi: ‘I am the benefactor, leader, and guide of these five hundred lay followers.
Now I am fulfilling virtuous behavior,
I am celibate, living apart, abstaining from sexual intercourse, the common person’s practice,
Thus we are on the same level, and I am not the least bit better. Let me surpass them.’
“Then Gavesi approached the five hundred lay followers and said to them: ‘From today on, you should consider me to be once a day, refraining from a night meal, abstaining from eating outside the proper time.’
Then it occurred to those five hundred lay followers: ‘Master Gavesi is our benefactor, leader, and guide.
Now Master Gavesi eats once a day, refraining from a night meal, abstaining from eating outside the proper time.
Why shouldn’t we do so too?’
“Then those five hundred lay followers approached Gavesi and said to him: ‘From today onward let Master Gavesi consider us to be eating once a day, refraining from a night meal, abstaining from eating outside the proper time.’
“Then, Ananda, it o ccurred to the lay follower Gavesi: ‘I am the benefactor, leader, and guide of these five hundred lay followers.
Now I am fulfilling virtuous behavior, and so too are these, five hundred lay followers.
I am celibate, living apart, abstaining from sexual intercourse, the common person’s practice and so too are these five hundred lay followers.
I eat once a day, refraining from a night meal, abstaining from eating Outside the proper time, and so too do these five hundred lay followers.
Thus we are on the same level, and I am not the least bit better. Let me surpass them.’
“Then Gavesi approached the Blessed One, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One Kassapa, and said to him: ‘Bhante, may I obtain the going forth and full ordination under the Blessed One?’
The lay follower Gavesi obtained the going forth and full ordination under the Blessed One, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One Kassapa.
Soon after his full ordination, dwelling alone, withdrawn, heedful, ardent, and resolute, the bhikkhu Gavesi realized for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, that unsurpassed consummation of the spiritual life for the sake of which clansmen rightly go forth from the household life into homelessness, and having entered upon it, he dwelled in it.
He directly knew: ‘Destroyed is birth, the spiritual life has been lived, wha t had to be done has been done, there is no more coming back to any state of being.’
And the bhikkhu Gavesi became one of the arahants.
“Then, Ananda, it o ccurred to those five hundred lay followers: ‘Master Gavesi is our benefactor, leader, and guide.
Now Master Gavesi, having shaved off his hair and beard and put on ochre robes, has gone forth from the household life into homelessness.
Why shouldn’t we do so too?’
“Then those five hundred lay followers approached the Blessed One, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One Kassapa, and said to him: ‘Bhante, may we obtain the going forth and full ordination under the Blessed One?’
Then those five hundred lay followers obtained the going forth and full ordination under the Blessed One, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One Kassapa.
“Then, Ananda, it occurred to the bhikkhu Gavesi: I obtain at will, without trouble or difficulty, the unsurpassed bliss of liberation.
Oh, that these five hundred bhikkhus could obtain at will, without trouble or difficulty, the unsurpassed bliss of liberation!
’ Then, Ananda, dwelling each alone, withdrawn, heedful, ardent, and resolute, in no long time those five hundred bhikkhus realized for themselves with direct knowledge, in this very life, that unsurpassed consummation of the spiritual life for the sake Of which clansmen rightly go forth from the household life into homelessness, and having entered upon it, they dwelled in it.
They directly knew: ‘Destroyed is birth, the spiritual life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more coming back to any state of being.’
“Thus, Ananda, those five hundred bhikkhus headed by Gavesi, striving in successively higher and more sublime ways, realized the unsurpassed bliss of liberation.’
Therefore, Ananda, you should train yourselves thus: ‘Striving in successively higher and more sublime ways, we will realize the unsurpassed bliss of liberation.’
Thus, Ananda, should you train yourselves.”
and so too are these five hundred lay followers.
and so too are these five hundred lay followers.
Then a certain bhikkhu approached the Blessed One… and said to him: “Bhante, by what is the world led? By what is the world dragged around? When what has arisen does the world go under its control?”
Now as to the lines ‘ The reason must be shown why these Display the order that they do ’ : The term ‘ Enlightened One ’ is defined and explained first among these three refuge terms by taking the Enlightened One as ‘ the foremost of all creatures ’ ; ‘ The True Idea ’ next because that was given its being by him and taught by him; and The Community ’ last because that is the bearer and the server of the True Idea.
Or alternatively, ‘ Enlightened One ’ is defined and explained first by taking him as ‘ The promoter of all creatures’ welfare ’; ‘ The True Idea ’ next because that was given its being by him for the sake of all creatures’ welfare; and ‘ The Community ’ last by taking that as ‘practising for the attainment of welfare, by reaching the Path and attained to welfare by reaching its Fruit ’. That is how ‘ The reason must be shown why these Display the order that they do ’.
Now it was said : ‘Lastly the Triple Refuge too Must be explained by similes ’ , of which it may be said as follows. The Enlightened One is like the full moon; the True Idea taught by him is like the shedding of the moon’s effulgence; and the Community is like the world inspired with happiness by the effulgence of the full moon.
The Enlightened One is like the rising sun; the True Idea as already stated is like the web of his rays; and the Community is like the world rid by him of darkness.
The Enlightened One is like a man who burns a jungle; the True Idea, which burns up the j ungle of defilements, is like the fire which burns the jungle; and the Community, which has become a field for merit since its defilements have been burnt up, is like the piece of ground which has become a field for sowing since its jungle has been burnt up.
The Enlightened One is like a great rain-cloud; the True Idea is like a downpour of rain; and the Community, in which the dust of defilement has been laid, is like the countryside in which the dust has been laid by the fall of rain.
The Enlightened One is like a good trainer of thoroughbreds; the True Object for faith is like the means for the disciplining of thoroughbred horses; and the Community is like a mass of well-disciplined thoroughbreds.
The Enlightened One is like a dart-extractor because he removes all darts of wrong views; the True Idea is like the means for removing the darts; and the Community, from whom the darts of wrong views have been removed, is like people from whom darts have been removed.
Or else the Enlightened One is like a lancet-user because he dissects away 28 the cataract of delusion; the True Idea is like the means for dissecting cataract away; and the Community, whose eye of knowledge 29 is cleared by the dissecting away of the cataract of delusion, is like people whose eyes are cleared with the dissecting away of cataract.
Or else the Enlightened One is like a clever physician because he is able to cure the sickness consisting in defilement by underlying tendencies; the True Idea is like a rightly applied medicine; and the Community, whose underlying tendencies to the sickness of defilement are quite cured, is like people whose sickness is quite cured by the application of the medicine.
Or else the Enlightened One is like a good guide; the True Idea is like a good path to a land of safety; and the Community is like people who enter upon the path and reach the land of safety.
The Enlightened One is like a good pilot; the True Idea is like a ship; and the Community is like people who have succeeded in reaching the further shore.
The Enlightened One is like the Himalaya Mountain; the True Idea is like the healing herbs that are given their being by that mountain; and the Community is like people free from ailment owing to the use of the healing herbs.
The Enlightened One is like a bestower of riches; the True Idea is like the riches and the Community, which has rightly obtained the Noble One’s riches , is like people who have obtained riches in the way hoped for.
The Enlightened One is like one who shows a hidden treasure-store; the True Idea is like the hidden treasure- store; and the Community is like people who have found the hidden treasure-store.
Furthermore, the Enlightened One is like a steadfast man who gives protection from fear; the True Idea is the protection from fear; and the Community, which has found complete protection from fear, is like people who have found protection from fear.
The Enlightened One is like a consoler; the True Idea is like a consolation; and the Community is like people consoled.
The Enlightened One is like a good friend; the True Idea is like helpful advice; the Community is like people who have reached all their aims through following the helpful advice.
The Enlightened One is like a mine of riches; the True Idea is like the vein of riches; and the Community is like people who exploit the vein of riches.
The Enlightened One is like one who bathes a prince; the True Idea is like the water for washing the head; and the Community, which has been well bathed in the water of the True Object for faith, is like a company of well-bathed princes.
The Enlightened One is like the maker of an ornament; the True Idea is like the ornament; and the Community, which is adorned with the True Object for faith, is like a party of kings’ sons wearing ornaments.
The Enlightened One is like a sandalwood tree; the True Idea is like the scent given its being by that tree; and the Community, whose fever has been quelled by the use of the True Object for faith, is like people whose fever has been quelled by the use of sandalwood.
The Enlightened One is like the bestower of an inheritance; the True Object of Faith is like the inheritance; and the Community, which is heir to the heritage consisting of the True Object for faith, is like a company of children who are heirs to the inheritance.
The Enlightened One is like an opened lotus flower; the True Idea is like the honey given its being by that flower; and the Community is like a swarm of bees making use of that honey.
That is how ‘ Lastly the Triple Refuge too Must be explained by similes
And at this point the Schedule of the method of commenting, which was set out in the four stages beginning thus ‘ By whom pronounced, where, when, and why, Were these three Refuges?’ , has been explained as to its meaning.
in the Illustrator of Ultimate Meaning, the Commentary on the Minor Books,
The explanation of the Refuges is ended.
“Good, good, bhikkhu!
Your acumen is excellent. Your discernment is excellent. Your inquiry is a good one.
For you have asked thus: “Bhante, by what is the world led? By what is the world dragged around? When what has arisen does the world go under its control?”
“Yes, Bhante.”
“The world, bhikkhu, is led by the mind; it is dragged around by the mind; when the mind has arisen, the world goes under its control.”
Saying, “Good, Bhante,” that bhikkhu delighted and rejoiced in the Blessed One’s statement.
Then he asked the Blessed One a further question: “It is said, Bhante, ‘a learned expert on the Dhamma, a learned expert on the Dhamma.’ In what way is one a learned expert on the Dhamma?”
“Good, good, bhikkhu!
Your acumen is excellent. Your discernment is excellent. Your inquiry is a good one.
For you have asked thus: It is said, Bhante, “a learned expert on the Dhamma, a learned expert on the Dhamma.”
In what way is one a learned expert on the Dhamma?”
“Yes, Bhante.”
“I have taught many teachings, bhikkhu: discourses, mixed prose and verse, expositions, verses, inspired utterances, quotations, birth stories, amazing accounts, and questions-and-answers.
If, after learning the meaning and Dhamma of even a four-line verse, one practices in accordance with the Dhamma, that is enough for one to be called ‘a learned expert on the Dhamma.’”
Saying, “Good, Bhante,” that bhikkhu delighted and rejoiced in the Blessed One’s statement. Then he asked the Blessed One a further question: “It is said, Bhante, ‘learned, of penetrative wisdom; learned, of penetrative wisdom.’
In what way is one learned, of penetrative wisdom?”
“Good, good, bhikkhu!
Your acumen is excellent. Your discernment is excellent. Your inquiry is a good one.
For you have asked thus: It is said, Bhante, “learned, of penetrative wisdom; learned, of penetrative wisdom.”
In what way is one learned, of penetrative wisdom?”
“Yes, Bhante.”
“Here, bhikkhu, a bhikkhu has heard:‘This is suffering.’ and he sees the meaning of this, having pierced through it with wisdom. He has heard: “This is the origin of suffering.’ and he sees the meaning of this, having pierced through it with wisdom. He has heard: ‘This is the cessation of suffering.’ and he sees the meaning of this, having pierced through it with wisdom. He has heard: “This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’ and he sees the meaning of this having pierced through it with wisdom.
It is in this way that one is learned, of penetrative wisdom.”
Saying, “Good, Bhante,” that bhikkhu delighted and rejoiced in the Blessed One’s statement. Then he asked the Blessed One a further question: “It is said, Bhante, “a wise person of great wisdom, a wise person of great wisdom.’
In what way is one a wise person of great wisdom?”
“Good, good, bhikkhu!
Your acumen is excellent. Your discernment is excellent. Your inquiry is a good one.
For you have asked thus: it is said, Bhante, “a wise person of great wisdom, a wise person of great wisdom.”
In what way is one a wise person of great wisdom?”
“Yes, Bhante.”
“Here, bhikkhu, a wise person of great wisdom does not intend for his own affliction, or for the affliction of others, or for the affliction of both. Rather, when he thinks, he thinks only of his own welfare, the welfare of others, the welfare of both, and the welfare of the whole world.
It is in this way that one is a wise person of great wisdom.”
The entry into the Dispensation having been shown by means of the refuge-going, there follows here the Reading consisting of the Training Precepts, which was placed here in order to show what training precepts should first be trained in by someone who has already entered the Dispensation thus. Now here is a Schedule for the commentary thereto:
Of these it should be known by whom They were pronounced, where, when, and why;
Defining those shared equally Next, and then that reserved to some,
Stating what is looked on askance By nature, what by ordinance.
For phrasing and for meaning too We make one common treatment do
For terms that all the precepts share. We must duly become aware
Next, in the first five precepts there Of diverse meanings that they bear.
Only the five that start 1 with killing, Then to explain we must be willing By singleness and so on, taking
By object, and by undertaking, By breach, by blamability,
By means, factor, origination, By feeling, root, and action, too,
By abstinence, and by the fruit.
What thence in the last five must be Construed, and special application,
Then why inferior we review, And why superior to boot.
Herein, these ten training precepts were pronounced by the Blessed One himself, not by disciples, and so on.
And they were pronounced by him at Savatthi in Jeta’s Wood, Anathapindika’s Park, when he arrived at Savatthi from Kapilavatthu after giving the venerable Rahula the Going Forth, the purpose being to give novices a definition of the training precepts.
For this is said:
There he lived in Jeta’s Wood, Anathapindika’s Park.
Now on that occasion … it occurred to the novices “ How many training precepts have we?”,
and they told this matter to the Blessed One, who said “ Bhikkhus, I allow ten novices’ training precepts, and training in them by novices. They are: abstinence from killing breathing things,… Abstinence from accepting gold and silver ” ’ .
These as stated thus, firstly, in the Vinaya should be understood to have been again a second time incorporated in the ‘pathway ’ for the serial order of the Tipitaka’ s recitation according to the manner of the Suttas as follows: ‘ He undertakes the training precepts and trains in them ’ , and again a third time, according to the manner of the Readings in the way shown under the Going-for-Refuge , thus: ‘ I undertake the training precept of abstinence from killing breathing things…’
So much for the lines ‘ Of these it should be known by whom They were pronounced, where, when, and why ’.
‘Then when the Blessed One had stayed at Kapilavatthu as long as he chose, he set out to wander by stages to Savatthi,
and so doing, he eventually arrived at Savatthi.
Now the first two and the fourth and fifth are shared equally between lay followers and novices as invariable virtuous practices.
But by combining the seventh and eighth into one and omitting the last one of all, all save the last are only for lay followers as the virtuous practice on the occasion of the Uposatha observance, and so all these are shared with novices. That is ‘Defining those shared equally Next, and then that reserved to some ’ should be done.
Then the first five are abstentions 4 from what is looked on askance by nature ’ since killing breathing things, etc., are always originated by unprofitable cognizance, ‘ but the rest are abstentions ‘from what is looked on askance by ordinance ’. That is how it should be stated ‘What is looked on askance By nature, what by ordinance ’.
Now it was said ‘ Next in the first five precepts there We duly must become aware Of diverse meanings that they bear. Then to explain we must be willing By singleness and so on, taking Only the five that start with killing, By object and by undertaking, By breach, by blamability, By means, factor, origination, By feeling, root, and action too, By abstinence, and by the fruit herein, it can be stated as follows.
As to killing breathing things, firstly: a ‘ breathing thing ’ is a category-continuity involving the fife faculty, or it is a creature described derivatively upon that. When in the case of such a breathing thing someone perceives it as a breathing thing, then ‘ killing breathing things ‘ is his choice to kill occurring in either the body door or the speech door, and originating the active process of severing the life faculty.
Taking what is not given : ‘ what is not given ’ is what has been taken possession of as a chattel by another, when that other incurs no punishment by proceeding to do as he likes with it and remains blameless. Now when someone, in the case of some such thing already taken possession of by another, perceives it as something already taken possession of by another, then ‘ taking what is not given ’ is his choice to steal, occurring in either the body door or the speech door, and originating the active process of taking that.
Unchastity is what is not the highest kind of conduct; it is the choice to transgress when there is opportunity for practice not in accordance with the True Ideal, the choice occurring in the body door as the practice of sexual intercourse consisting in copulation.
Speaking falsehood: the ‘ falsehood ‘ is the verbal means or bodily means employed in concealing a meaning on the part of one who gives precedence to deception; but the speaking of the falsehood is the wrong choice as intention to deceive, occurring in either the body door or the speech door, which originates the form of the body or speech that is the means to the deceiving of another.
Any opportunity for negligence due to liquor , wine and besotting drink: here as to ‘ liquor ’, there are five kinds of liquor: flour liquor, cake liquor, rice liquor, that containing yeast, and that mixed with condiments.
Both these are ‘ besotting ’ in the sense of causing intoxication ; or alternatively, whatever else there is that causes intoxication, by drinking which one becomes mad and negligent is called ‘ besotting’.
The ‘ opportunity for negligence ’ is the choice by which one drinks, swallows. That is so called since it is the cause for the subsequent vanity and negligence ; consequently, what should be understood as the c opportunity for negligence ’ is the choice in swallowing the liquor, wine or besotting drink, as intent to swallow, which occurs in the body door .
This firstly is the explanation of the five that start with killing.
Also ‘ wine ‘ is of five kinds: flower wine, fruit wine, sugar wine, honey wine, and that mixed with condiments .
“Bhikkhus, four facts about people can be known from four other facts.
What four?
“By dwelling together their virtuous behavior can be known, and this only after a long time, not casually; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inatteintive; and by one who is wise, not by one who is unwise.
“By dealing with them their integrity can be known, and this only after a long time, not casually; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; and by one who is wise, not by one who is unwise.
“In misfortune their fortitude can be known, and this only after a long time, not casually; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; and by one who is wise, not by one who is unwise.
“By conversation their wisdom can be known, and this only after a long time, not casually; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; and by one who is wise, not by one who is unwise.
“It was said: ‘By dwelling together their virtuous behavior can be known, and this only after a long time, not casually; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; and by. one who is wise, not by one who is unwise.’
On account of what was this said?
“Here, bhikkhus, by dwelling together with another person, one comes to know him thus: For a long time this venerable one’s conduct has been broken, flawed, blemished, and blotched, and he does not consistently observe and follow virtuous behavior. This venerable one is immoral, not virtuous.’
“But in another case, by dwelling together with another person, one comes to know him thus: ‘For a long time this venerable one’s conduct has been unbroken, flawless, unblemished, and unblotched, and he consistently observes and follows virtuous behavior. This venerable one is virtuous, not immoral.’
“It was on account of this that it was said: ‘By dwelling together their virtuous behavior can be known, and this only after a long time, not casually; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; and by one who is wise, not by one who is unwise.’
“Further it was said: ‘By dealing with them their integrity can be known, and this only after a long time, not casually; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; and by one who is wise, not by one who is unwise.’
On account of what was this said?
“Here, bhikkhus, when dealing with a person, one comes to know him thus: ‘This venerable one deals with one person in one way, in another way if he deals with two, in still another way if he deals with three, and in still another way if he deals with many. His dealings in one case deviate from his dealings in another. This venerable one is impure in his dealings with others, not pure in such dealings.’
“But in another case, when dealing with a person, one comes to know him thus: ‘In the same way as he deals with one, he deals with two, three, or many.
His dealings in one case do not deviate from his dealings in another. This venerable one is pure in his dealings with others, not impure in such dealings.’
“It was on account of this that it was said: ‘By dealing with them their integrity can be known, and this only after a long time, not casually; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; and by one who is wise, not by one who is unwise.’
“Further it was said: In misfortune their fortitude can be known, and this only after a long time, not casually; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; and by one who is wise, not by one who is unwise.’
On account of what was this said?
“Here, bhikkhus, someone is afflicted with the loss of relatives, wealth, or health, but he does not reflect thus: ‘Human life in the world is of such a nature that the eight worldly conditions revolve around the world, and the world revolves around these eight worldly conditions, namely, gain and loss, disrepute and fame, blame and praise, and pleasure and pain.’
Thus when afflicted with loss of relatives, wealth, or health, he sorrows, languishes, and laments; he weeps beating his breast and becomes confused.
“But in another case, someone is afflicted with the loss of relatives, wealth, Or health, but he does reflect thus: ‘Human life in the world is such that the eight worldly conditions revolve around the world, and the world revolves around these eight worldly conditions, namely, gain and loss, disrepute and fame, blame and praise, and pleasure and pain.’
Thus when afflicted with the loss of relatives, wealth, or health, he does not sorrow, languish, and lament; he does not weep beating his breast and become confused.
“It was on account of this that it was said: ‘In misfortune their fortitude can be known, and this Only after a long time, not casually; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; and by one who is wise, not by one who is unwise.’
“Further it was said: ‘By conversation their wisdom can be known, and this only after a long time, not casually; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; and by one who is wise, not by one who is unwise.’
On account of what was this said?
“Here, bhikkhus, when conversing with someone, one comes to know: ‘Judging from the way this venerable one initiates, formulates, and poses a question, he is unwise, not wise.
For what reason?
This venerable one does not speak about matters that are deep, peaceful, sublime, beyond the sphere of reasoning, subtle, comprehensible to the wise.
When this venerable one speaks on the Dhamma, he is not able to explain, teach, describe, establish, reveal, analyze, and explicate its meaning either briefly or in detail.
This venerable one is unwise, not wise.’
Just as if a man with good sight, standing on the bank of a pond, were to see a small fish emerging,
so too, when conversing with a person, one comes to know: ‘Judging from the way this venerable one initiates, formulates, and poses a question, he is unwise, not wise.’
“But in another case, when conversing with someone, one comes to know: ‘Judging from the way this venerable one initiates, formulates, and poses a question, he is wise, not unwise.
For what reason?
This venerable one speaks about matters that are deep, peaceful, sublime, beyond the sphere of reasoning, subtle, comprehensible to the wise.
When this venerable one speaks on the Dhamma, he is able to explain, teach, describe, establish, reveal, analyze, and explicate its meaning both briefly and in detail.
This venerable one is wise, not unwise.’
Just as if a man with good sight, standing on the bank of a pond, were to see a big fish emerging,
so too, when conversing with someone, one comes to, know: ‘Judging from the way this venerable one initiates, formulates, and poses a question, he is wise, not unwise.’
“It was on account of this that it was said: ‘By conversation their wisdom can be known, and this only after a long time, not casually; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; and by one who is wise, not by one who is unwise.’
“These, bhikkhus, are the four facts about people that can be known from four other facts.”
he would think: ‘Judging from the way this fish emerges, from the ripples it makes; and from its force, this is a small fish, not a big one.’
‘By singleness, and so on ’: here it may be asked: But how then? Is singularity in the case of killing-breathing-things decided by the singleness of the victim or the killer or the means or the choice, etc.? And is its multiplicity decided by their multipleness, and likewise in the cases of any of the rest beginning with taking what is not given? Or is this not so?
By which ought this to be decided?
For firstly, if its singularity is decided by the singleness of any one of them, then when many killers kill a single victim, or when a single killer kills many victims, or when many victims are killed by a single means among those beginning with one’s own hand, or when a single choice originates the means that severs the life faculty of many victims, then there would have to be only a single killing-of-breathing-things.
then when a single killer employs a single means for the purpose of killing a single victim and actually kills many victims, or when many killers employing many means for the purpose of killing many victims called, say, Devadatta, Yannadatta, Somadatta, etc., actually kill only a single victim, say, Devadatta or Yannadatta or Somadatta,
—It can be stated as follows. Herein, firstly in the case of killing breathing things, its singleness or multipleness is decided individually by the singleness or multipleness of the victim on the one hand and of the killer, etc., on the other. But taking the victim in conjunction with the killer, etc., while its singleness is decided by singleness in both of these factors, its multipleness is decided by multipleness in both or either of these two factors;
This method applies also in the cases of taking what is not given and the rest.
This is how the explanation should be understood here ‘ as to singleness, and so on ’.
‘By object among ideas of material- form breathing-things has for its object the life faculty,
Speaking-falsehood has for its object a creature since it occurs contingent upon the creature to whom it is spoken.
According to some, what-is-not-the-Divine-Life has creatures for its object,
That is how the explanation should be known by object here.
‘ By undertaking these training precepts of abstention from killing breathing things, and the rest, are undertaken by a novice only when undertaken in the presence of a bhikkhu. But they are undertaken by a lay follower either when he undertakes them by himself or when he does so in another’s presence;
and they are undertaken by him when undertaken together or undertaken separately.
Now when someone undertakes them together, his abstinence is single and his choice is single, though they are still described individually 9 according to their several functions.
But when someone undertakes them singly, the abstinence is fivefold and so is the choice, it should be understood.
That is how the explanation should be known by undertaking.
‘ By breach ’: in the case of novices, when one is broken, all are broken;
In the case of householders, when one is broken then only that one is broken, and consequently the fivefoldness of their virtue becomes effective again as soon as that one alone is reundertaken.
Some others, however, have said that ‘ When they have been undertaken separately, then, on one being broken, only that one is broken. However, when they have been undertaken thus “ I undertake the virtue possessed of the five factors ”, then when one is broken the rest are all broken too
—Why?
Because of the unity of the undertaking—; but then responsibility for action 10 resides only in the one actually transgressed ’.
That is how the explanation should be known by breach.
‘ By blamability ‘: in the case of breathing things beginning with animals that are devoid of special qualities, killing of breathing things is relatively less blamable in the case of a small one and more blamable in the case of one with a large physical frame.
Why?
Because of the greater magnitude of the means needed;
So too with the rest.
But unlike killing-breathing-things, etc., whose blamability varies, the opportunity-for- negligence-due-to-liquor-wine-and-besotting-drink is always greatly blamable.
Why?
Because it obstructs the Noble Ones’ True Idea by inducing even madness in a human being.
That is how the explanation should be known by blamability.
‘By means ’: in the case of killing-breathing-things there are six kinds of means: with one’s own hand, by command, by missile, by fixed contrivance, by magical science, and by supernormal power.
Herein, a blow given by the body or by what is connected to the body is ‘with one’s own hand ’ as means. That is of two kinds as directed to an individual and not so directed.
Herein, in the case of that directed to an individual, one becomes responsible for the action of killing 10 only through the death of the one to whom the blow was directed.
In the case of that not so directed and given thus ‘ Let anyone at all die ’ one becomes responsible through anyone’s death that is conditioned by that blow.
And in both cases, whether the breathing thing dies with the very blow or afterwards of a sickness due to it, one becomes responsible for the action as from the moment of the blow,
in which case there is no killing-of-breathing-things by the second blow;
This method applies also when a blow is given by many to one;
A command given after making a decision is a ‘ command ’ as means.
Herein, too, responsibility for the action should be followed out by the same method as that stated under ‘ with one’s own hand’ as means.
And the definitive rule to be understood is sixfold as follows:
Herein, the ‘ object ’ is the breathing thing to be killed.
The ‘ time ’ is the time consisting in morning, afternoon, etc., and the time consisting in youth, full strength, and so on.11
The ‘ locality ’ is the village or town or wood or forest or crossroads, and so on.
The ‘ weapon ’ is the sword, arrow or spear, and so on.
The ‘ posture ’ is the standing or sitting posture, etc., of the breathing thing to be killed and of the killer.
The ‘ kind of act ’ is the stabbing or the cutting or the breaking or the ‘ polished-shell shave ’ , and so on.
If the object is mistaken and someone is killed other than the one whom it was commanded to kill, then the giver of the command has no responsibility for the action.
But if the object is not mistaken and the death is caused, then responsibility for the action lies with both the one giving the command and the one commanded: with the former from the moment of his giving the command, and with the latter from the moment of the death.
Likewise in the case of ‘time’ and the rest.
‘A missile as means’ is when a blow is given for the purpose of killing by throwing something by the body or by what is connected to the body.
That too is twofold, being classed as directed to an individual and not so directed. And responsibility for the action should be understood here in the way already stated.
A fixed contrivance as means 5 is as follows: digging a pitfall, fixing, say, a poisoned fchorn on what is leant on, putting something lethal in someone’s vicinity, administering unsuitable medicine, poison, a mechanical device, etc., the purpose of which is to kill.
That too is twofold, being classed as directed to an individual or not so directed. Consequently, responsibility for the action should be understood in the way already stated herein.
But there is this difference. When the pitfall or whatever it may be is given out to others by a lessor 12 for money or gratis, then if the breathing thing dies with that as condition, the responsibility for the action lies only with the lessor.
Also even if the pitfall is obliterated either by him or by another and the ground made level there, and then earth-washers 12 take away earth or root-diggers digging up roots make a pit or mud appears after a fall of rain, and anyone slipping in or getting bogged there dies, then the responsibility for the action lies only with the lessor.
But if either he who has thus obtained it from the lessor, or someone else, widens it and anyone dies with that as condition, the responsibility for the action lies with both.
It is only according as roots interlock with roots in that place and it thus once more becomes firm ground that he is freed from potential responsibility.
Similarly with fixing, say, a poisoned thorn on what is leant on, etc.: as long as they last, so long should the responsibility for the action be understood to last according as applicable.
‘ Magical science as means’ is the pronouncement of the incantations of magical science for the purpose of causing death.
‘ Supernormal power as means ’ is the causing of alterations by the supernormal power that is the ripening of action, such as the sharpening of the tusks, etc., of those that have tusks as weapons, and so on.13
In the case of taking what is not given,  31  the means are those beginning with ‘ one’s own hand ’ and ‘ by command ’ occurring under the five heads of robbery by theft, force, hiding, stratagem, and tea-grass ; and the classification of these should also be understood in the way already stated.
In the case of those beginning with what-is-not-the-Divine-Life , only ‘ one’s own hand as means ’ is possible, and not ‘ by command ’ and the rest.
‘ By factor ’: in the case of killing-breathing-things there are five factors, that is to say: there is a breathing thing, the transgressor is percipient of that as a breathing thing, the cognizance of killing is established, he makes an effort, the breathing thing dies by that effort.
In the case of taking-what-is-not-given the factors are also five, that is to say: there is what has been taken possession of by another, the transgressor is percipient of that as having been taken possess- sion of by another, the cognizance of stealing is established, he makes an effort, what is takable is taken by him.
In the case of what-is-not-the-Divine-Life the factors are four, that is to say: there is an object for the infringe- ment, the cognizance of indulging is established, the transgressor has the physical means ready as condition for indulgence, and there is consent to the act.
Similarly with the remaining two; for in the case of speaking falsehood, firstly, the factors are four, that is to say: there is a falsehood, there is established cognizance of deception regarding that object, the appropriate effort is made, the intimation occurs intimating what deceives another.
In the case of the opportunity-for-negligence-due-to-liquor- wine-and-besotting-drink the factors are these four: there is one or other of the tilings beginning with liquor, cognizance of desire to drink an intoxicant is established, one undertakes the appropriate effort, when has been drunk it is absorbed.
That is how the explanation should be known by factor.
‘ By origination ’: killing-breathing-things, taking-what-is-not- given, and speaking-falsehood, have threefold origination, namely, by body-cum-cognizance, by speech-cum-cognizance, and by body- cum-speech-cum-cognizance.
What-is-not-the-Divine-Life has only single origination, namely, by body-cum-cognizance.
The opportunity-for-negligence-due-to-liquor-wine-and-be- sotting-drink has twofold origination, namely, by body and by body- cum-cognizance.14
This is how the explanation should be known by origination.
‘By feeling’: killing-breathing-things is associated with only painful feeling.
Taking-what-is-not-given is associated with any one of the three kinds of feeling. Likewise speaking-falsehood.
The other two are associated only with pleasant or with neither- painful-nor-pleasant feeling.
This is how the explanation should be known by feeling.
‘ By root ’: killing-breathing-things has delusion and hate for its roots.
Taking-what-is-not-given and speaking-falsehood have greed and delusion for their roots or they have hate and delusion for their roots.
The other two have greed and delusion for their roots.
This is how the explanation should be known by root.
‘ By action ’: killing-breathing-things, taking-what-is-not- given, and what-is-not-the-Divine-Life are always bodily action and to be such have always reached a completed course of action. Speaking-falsehood is always verbal action;
but that which actually conceals a meaning is a completed course of action, 15
The opportunity-for- negligence-due-to-fiquor-wine-and-besotting-drink is always bodily action.
This is how the explanation should be known by action.
‘ By abstinence ’ : here it may be asked: When someone is abstaining from killing breathing things, what does he abstain from?
—It may be stated as follows. Firstly when someone abstains by undertaking, he abstains either from his own or others’ unprofitable action consisting in killing breathing things, and the rest.
—Contingent upon what?
—Upon only that from which he abstains.
And secondly when someone abstains by custom, he abstains from unprofitable action of the kind just stated, too.
—Upon only the objects, as already stated , of killing-breathing-things, and the rest .
Some say, however, that ‘ His abstaining from the opportunity-for-negligence- due-to-fiquor-wine-and-besotting-drink is contingent upon only determinations consisting of liquor, wine and intoxicants; that his abstaining from taking-what-is-not-given and from speaking- falsehood are contingent upon both determinations and creatures respectively to be stolen and to be deceived; and that his abstaining from killing-breathing-things and from what-is-not-the-Divine-Life are contingent only upon creatures’.16
But others, holding the view that ‘ If that is so, then while cognizing one thing he would be doing another, and so he would not know what it was that he was abandoning ’, did not agree, and they said that ‘ He abstains contingent only upon his own unprofitable action consisting in killing-breathing-things, and the rest, which is what he abandons.’
Why?
Because it takes no account either of presence or externality;
for in the Vibhanga reading of the training precepts, after asking the question ‘How many of the five training precepts are profitable?… How many are without conflict? when the answer is given in the way beginning ‘ They are profitable only. They may be associated with pleasant feeling … ‘ they are then stated to ‘ have a present object ’ and to ‘ have an external object ‘ , thus their object is stated to be present and external . Consequently that does not apply to one 4 abstaining contingent upon his own unprofitable action consisting in killing-breathing- things, and so on.
Now as to the objection that ‘ Cognizing one tiling he would be doing another, and so he would not know what it was he was abandoning ’
This is how the explanation should be known by abstinence.
‘ By the fruit ’: all these actions beginning with killing- breathing-things generate an unhappy destination as their fruit in rebirth-linking, and in the course of existence in a happy destination they generate the un-wished-for, the undesired, and the disagreeable as their ripening: this is in future existence. In present existence they generate want of intrepidity, etc., as their fruit.
Also this may be understood in the way beginning ‘ Of killing breathing things the lightest ripening of all leads to short life in a human being ’ . This is how the explanation should be known by the fruit.
In addition, the explanation of abstentions from killing- breathing-things, and the rest, can be known by origination, feeling, root, action, and fruit, also as follows.
Here is the lay-out. All these abstentions originate from four originations, namely, from body, from body-cum-cognizance, from speech-cum-cognizance, and from body-cum-speech-cum-cognizance.
All as to feeling are either associated with pleasant feeling or associated with neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling. All as to root have non-greed and non-hate for their roots, or non-greed, non-hate, and non-delusion, for their roots.
As to action four are bodily action, while abstention from speaking falsehood is verbal action; and at the moment of the path, and when they are originated from cognizance, they are all mental action as well.
As to fruit the fruits of abstention from killing-breathing- things are such things as excellence of limbs, excellence of height and girth, excellence of speed, sure-footedness, elegance, malleability, pureness, courage, great strength, clarity of speech, popularity in the world, an assembly without schisms, untimorousness, unpersecutedness, immunity from death by others’ violence, constant support, beauty of form, beauty of shape, unafflictedness, sorrowlessness, non-separation from those dear and beloved, longevity, and so on.
The fruits of abstention from taking-what-is-not-given are such things as great riches, abundance of riches and corn, limitless property, arising of unarisen property, consolidation of arisen property, rapid acquisition of wished-for property, invulnerability of property to the claims of kings, bandits, water, fire, and unwelcome heirs,  34  obtaining riches not shared by others , primacy in the world, unknowing of the non-existence of giving, etc. , and a pleasant abiding.
The fruits of abstention from what-is-not-the-Divine-Life are such things as freedom from enemies, dearness to all people, obtainment of food, drink, clothing, lodging, etc., pleasant sleeping, pleasant waking, freedom from fear of states of deprivation, non-liability to assume the female sex or the neuter sex, freedom from anger, frankness, non-dismay, non-discountenancedness, mutual dearness of women and men, completeness of faculties, completeness of characteristics, unanxiousness, freedom from over-activity, a state of pleasant abiding, fearlessness, non-separation from loved ones, and so on.
The fruits of abstention from speaking-falsehood are such things as clearness of the faculties, distinct and sweet speech, evenly placed and pure white teeth, no over-stoutness, no over-leanness, no over-shortness, no over-tallness, pleasantness to the touch, a lotus-scented mouth, desire of those in one’s company to listen to one, amiable speech, a slender red tongue like a red lotus petal, undistractedness , no personal vanity, 17 and so on.
The fruits of abstention from the opportunity-for-negligence- due-to-liquor-wine-and-besotting-drink are such things as swift recognition of past, future and present tasks to be done, constant establishment of mindfulness, freedom from madness, possession of knowledge, non-procrastination, non-stupidity, non-drivellingness, non-intoxication, non-negligence, non-confusion, non-timorousness, non-presumption, unenviousness, truthfulness, freedom from malicious and harsh speech and from gossip, freedom from dullness both night and liberality, virtuousness, rectitude, unangriness, possession of conscience, possession of shame, rectitude of view, great understanding, wisdom, learnedness, skill in distinguishing good from harm, and so on.
This is how the explanation of the abstentions from killing-breathing-things, etc., can also be known by origination, feeling, root, action, and fruit.
he would think: ‘Judging from the way this fish emerges, from the ripples it makes, and from its force, this is a big fish, not a small one.’
But if its multiplicity is decided by the multiplicity of one of them,
—Then if neither the singularity nor the multiplicity of these namely, killing and the rest is decided by the singleness or multipleness of the victim, etc., but their singularity and multiplicity are decided otherwise 5 in fact, then it should be stated how that is, and as in the case of killing breathing things so also with the rest.6
—Both arguments are inappropriate.
or when a single victim is killed by many means beginning with one’s own hand, or when many choices originate the means for severing the fife faculty in only a single victim, then there would have to be many killings of breathing things.
for accordingly, when there are many killers killing many victims by a single or by many means from among the arrow, knife, etc., or from among those beginning with digging a pitfall, then there are many killings of breathing things;
and when there is a single killer killing many victims either by a single means or by many means and by a single choice or by many choices originating the means to that, then there are also many killings of breathing things; and when there are many killers killing a single victim either by a single or by many means of the kind already stated, then there are also many killings of breathing things.
while taking- what-is-not-given, what-is-not-the-Divine-Life , and opportunity-for-negligence-due-to-liquor-wine-and-besotting-drink, have for their objects other determinations that consist of one or other among the six external bases for contact beginning with visible form base.7
and also taking-what-is-not-given has creatures for its object when a creature is to be stolen;
however, these two latter are here contingent upon creatures only in virtue of the determinations upon which they are derivatively described, not in virtue of the actual derivative description itself as is the case with speaking falsehood.8
for they are to novices as the Defeats are to bhikkhus; but responsibility for action 10 resides only in the one actually transgressed.
and when the means are equal, it depends on the greater magnitude of the object, namely, the breathing thing.
But in the case of human beings, etc., endowed with special qualities, killing-breathing- things is relatively less blamable in the case of one with small special qualities;
and when there is equality of special qualities and of the physical frame, then the lesser blamableness should be understood to reside in the relative mildness of the defilements and of the active process adopted, and the greater blamableness in their greater violence.
and when after giving the blow with the intention to kill, the breathing thing is not killed and then again a blow accompanied by another cognizance is given by him to that breathing thing not yet dead, and later on if it dies of the first blow, it is from then that he becomes responsible for the action,
but if it dies through both, then he is responsible for the action as from the first blow. If it does not die through either, then there is no killing-of-breathing-things.
for then the responsibility for the action lies with him by whose blow the breathing thing died.
The object, time, locality, The weapon, posture,
and the kind Of act; these are the six that we Shall need to make ‘ command ’ defined.
That is how the explanation should be known by means.
while any other is only action.
— Contingent upon what?
That is incorrect.
it may be stated as follows: when someone is causing an occurrence by accomplishing a function, it is not said of him that ‘ cognizing one thing he would be doing another ’ or that ‘ he does not know what he is abandoning’;
on the contrary,Contingently upon the Deathless State He is all evil things abandoning.
,
Now it was said
Here is a commentary on its meaning 48. Firstly what was construed in the commentary on the first five training precepts must be taken thence and construed in that on the last five training precepts too.
Here is the construction. 49. ‘ By object ’: just as in the first five training precepts, as to object, the opportunity-for-negligence-due-to-liquor-wine-and-besotting-drink had for its obiect determinations consisting of one or other among the bases beginning with the visible- form base , so to untimely eating.
And the classification by object should be understood in this way for all the rest.
And ‘by undertaking ’: these also are undertaken by whomsoever undertakes them, whether novice or lay follower, in the same way as the first five .
Also ‘by factor’: again, just as it was stated there in the classification of kilhng-breathing-things and so on , so here too there are four factors in the case of untimely-eating. They are: the untimeliness, the permissibility only till noon of the particular object eaten, the swallowing, and the non-madness of the eater .
The exposition of the factors should be understood in like manner for the rest.
‘ By origination ’: and just as there, by origination, the opportunity -for- negligence - due - to - liquor-wine - and - besotting- drink had twofold origination, namely, by body and by body-cum-cognizance , so too has untimely-eating here.
The origination of the rest can be understood in the same way.
‘By feeling’: and just as there, by feeling, taking-what-is- not-given was associated with any one of the three kinds of feeling , so too is untimely-eating here.
And association with feeling can be understood in same way for all the rest.
‘By root’: and just as there what-is-not-the-Divine-Life had greed and delusion for its roots , so too here has untimely-eating, and it has also the alternative couple of roots.
The classification by root can be understood in this way for all the rest.
‘By action’: and just as there killing-breathing-things was bodily action , so too here are untimely-eating and the rest,
‘ By abstinence ’: and just as there someone abstains either from his own or others’ unprofitable action consisting in killing- breathing-things, and the rest , so too here he abstains from any unprofitable action consisting in eating after noon and also from any such that is profitable as well.
And just as the first five abstinences had fourfold origination, namely, by body, by body-cum-cognizance, by speech-cum-cogni- zance, and by body-cum-speech-cum-cognizance, and just as all were either associated with pleasant feeling or associated with neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling, and had non-greed and nonhate for their roots or non-greed, non-hate and non-delusion for their roots , and generated various kinds of wished-for fruit , so too this is
‘ What thence in the last five must be Construed ’ here.58.‘ And special application,
Then why inferior, we review, And why superior to boot ’ .
Untimely eating is eating when noon has gone by;
for this eating takes place when the permitted time has gone by , that is why it is called ‘untimely-eating ’ . From that untimely eating.
Dancing , singing , music , and contortionist show : here dancing is any kind of dancing; singing is any kind of singing; music is any kind of music;
contortionist show is a showing of contortions, or a showing that is a contortion, by its corrupting what partakes of the profitable because of its being a condition for the arising of defilement.
‘ And while some worthy monks and divines, after eating food given by the faithful, abide devoted to such contortionist shows—that is to say, dancing, singing, music, stage-shows, 19 ballad-reciting, manual playing, cymbal playing, drumming, miming, the game of outcastes, the the game of bamboos, bone-washing, elephant-fights, horse-fights, buffalo-fights, bull-fights, goat- fights, ram-fights, cock-fights, quail-fights, dog-fights, stick-fights, fist-fights, wrestling, military exercises, army parades, martial reviews, troop inspections, or anything of the kind, the monk Gotama abstains altogether from such contortionist show ’ .
Or an alternative interpretation: dancing, singing, and music, in the sense already stated, are themselves contortions , thus it is ‘ contortions consisting in dancing, singing, and music ’ , and the seeing of them is ‘ seeing of contortions consisting in dancing, singing, and music ’ .
Consequently in this latter interpretation, while ‘from seeing and from hearing ’ should actually be said, nevertheless, just as in such passages as ‘ And he has wrong view and mistaken seeing ’ ‘ seeing ’ is said including also an objective field that does not occur in the eye-door, so too, ‘ hearing ’ is also implicitly stated here by the word ‘ seeing.
Transgression takes place in one who sees after approaching out of desire to see.
But if it comes to the place where he is standing or sitting or lying down, or comes within his horizon while walking, and he sees it, then, while there may be defilement, there is no transgression of the precept.
And it should be understood that the adapting of the True Idea to song is not allowed, but the adapting of song to the True Idea is allowed.
In the case of opportunity for wearing of garlands , smartening with scents , and embellishment with unguents the three words beginning with ‘ garlands ’ should be construed appropriately with the three beginning with ‘ wearing ’ .
Herein, garlands are any kind of flower.
Unguents are any preparation made by pounding materials for the purpose of anointing;
None of these is allowed for the purpose of smartening or embellishing , though they are allowed for medicinal purposes. And when brought for the purpose of an offering they are in no way allowed for gratification.
High couches : This is what all those that exceed the permitted height-measurements are called.
Large couches are couches and spreads disallowed in size.
Neither of these is allowed to be accepted 21 in any way.
Gold is the noble metal .
Silver is a kahapana , or it can also be a metal masaka or a wooden masaka or a clay masaka, and so on, of any kind as employed in commerce anywhere. Both together are jataruparajata .
Accepting is the acceptance of that in any manner; and that is not allowed in any sense. This is how what is special to the last five should be stated.
Also these ten training precepts are inferior when undertaken with inferior zeal or with inferior energy, cognizance or inquiry;22 they are medium with medium zeal, etc.; and they are superior with superior zeal and so on.
Or alternatively they are inferior when defiled by craving, wrong views, and conceit; they are medium when not so defiled; they are superior when aided by understanding in any instance.
They are inferior when undertaken by profitable cognizance dissociated from knowledge; they are medium when undertaken by profitable cognizance associated with knowledge and unprompted by determination.23 That is how ‘the inferior we review, And why superior to boot.’
At this point the Schedule of the Commentary on the meaning, which was set out in the six stanzas beginning ‘ Of these it should be known by whom They were pronounced, where, when, and why ’ has been explained as to meaning.
in the Illustrator of Ultimate Meaning, the commentary on the Minor Books, is ended.
’ What thence in the last five must be Construed, and special application,
Then why inferior we review, And why superior to boot ’.
except that accepting-gold-and-silver may be bodily action or verbal action or mental action, but its occurrence in the body-door and speech-door is simply as the manner of its presence, 18 not as a completed course of action.
And here in this interpretation ‘ contortionist show ’ must be taken in the way stated in the Brahmajala Sutta;
for it is said there
and all the remaining kinds of scents such as talcum powder, incense smoke, etc., are scents .
The explanation of the Training Precepts
Now the turn has come for the commentary on the Boy’s Questions that begin with the words One is what?
We shall give a commentary after telling the Need Arisen 1 for their utterance and the purpose for which they were placed here as the fourth item in the Minor Readings.
The Need Arisen was this. The Blessed One had a great disciple called Sopaka.
That venerable one developed final knowledge 2 at the age of only seven years from his birth. The Blessed One wanted to allow his Full Admission to the Community by the method of getting him to answer questions, and, seeing 3 his ability to answer questions in the sense that he, the questioner himself, intended, he put the questions beginning with ‘ One is what?’
The Boy answered
and satisfied the Blessed One with his answers.
And that was the venerable one’s Full Admission.
This was the need arisen for their utterance.
Now maintenance of purified cognizance in other words, Concentration in being by means of the Recollections of the Enlightened One, the True Idea, and the Community, has been explained under the Going for Refuge , and maintenance of Virtue in being has been explained under the Training Precepts , and maintenance of Mindfulness-of-the-Body in being has been explained under the Thirty-two-fold Aspect ; and so now these answers to questions are placed here in the position they occupy in the Minor Readings in order to show the headings under which Understanding in its various aspects is maintained in being.
Or alternatively, Concentration has Virtue for its footing and Understanding has Concentration for its footing, according as it is said ‘ When a wise man, established well in Virtue, ‘ Develops Cognizance and Understanding ’ , and so it can be understood that, after employing the Training Precepts to show Virtue, and the Thirty-two-fold Aspect to show the Concentration which has that as its resort, these questions are placed here in order to show the classes of that Understanding “which belongs among the several ideas that constitute the equipment of concentrated cognizance.4
This is the purpose for which they were placed here.
Now comes the commentary on them. The Blessed One asked One is what? He asked the question with reference to that one idea, by becoming completely dispassionate towards which a bhikkhu might eventually make an end of suffering, or that one idea, by becoming dispassionate towards which this venerable one 5 had eventually made an end of suffering.
The Elder replied: All creatures subsist by nutriment. He did so employing the mode of teaching in terms of a person.6
‘And what is right mindfulness?
Hence what should be here understood to be stated by the Elder when asked ‘ One is what?’ is either the nutriment in virtue of which all creatures are said to ‘ subsist by nutriment ’ or else it is their subsistence by the nutriment;
for this is said by the Blessed One:
What one idea?
All creatures subsist by nutriment:
When a bhikkhu becomes completely dispassionate towards this one idea, … he is one who… makes an end of suffering here and now.
So it was with reference to this that it was said earlier: one question, one indication, one answer’ .
And here, as regards the expression ‘ subsist by nutriment ‘ Bhikkhus, there is the sign of beauty.
The cultivation of unreasoned attention to that is the nutriment for the arising of unarisen zeal for sensual desires ’ , since a condition is called a ‘ nutriment ’ in such passages as by taking the word ‘ nutriment ’ accordingly to mean ‘ condition ’ it is creatures maintained by conditions that are said to ‘ subsist by nutriment ’.
However, if ‘ subsist by nutriment’ is taken as said with reference to the ‘ four nutriments ‘ 9 then the word ‘ all ‘ would be out of place because of the passage ‘ The gods that are non-percipient creatures are root-cause-less, 10 without nutriment, without contact, and without feeling ’ .
Here it might be said: Even if it is stated thus, nevertheless because of the passage ‘ What ideas are accompanied by conditions?
The five categories, namely, the form category, the feeling category, the perception category, the determinations category, and the consciousness category ’ subsistence by conditions is appropriate only to the categories, and this passage would be inappropriate to creatures.
—It should not be regarded in that way.
— Why not?
— Because of the establishment, in the case of creatures, that they are only a metaphor 11 for the categories;
—Because they must be described derivatively upon the categories.12
—How?
—In the same way as ‘ village’ is a metaphor for houses.
Just as, 13 when one or two or three of a village’s houses have been burnt, it is said that ‘ the village has been burnt ’ because ‘ village ’ is describable as such derivatively upon the houses, and thus the metaphor of ‘ village ’ is established with respect to a house, so too, this metaphor, namely ‘ creatures subsist by nutriment ’ is established with respect to the categories, which subsist by nutriment in the sense of the conditions without which they cannot arise.
And in the ultimate sense too it can be understood that the usage ‘ creatures ’ is metaphorical with respect to categories, which is shown to be established by the Blessed One’s saying ‘ While the categories are born and age from moment to moment, you, bhikkhu, are being born and ageing and dying ’ .
Consequently it can be understood that ‘ one ‘ means the condition, styled ‘ nutriment ’, by means of which all creatures subsist, or that it means their subsistence by nutriment.
Now whether it is nutriment or subsistence by nutriment, it is a reason for dispassion because of the aspect of its impermanence.
And then one who comes to dispassion by seeing impermanence in these determinations termed ‘ all creatures ’ is one who eventually makes an end of suffering and reaches purity in the ultimate sense,
’ Impermanent are all determinations: ‘ And so when he sees thus with understanding,
for they say ‘ ki ha ’ when ‘ kim ’ should be said.
Some assert that ‘ ha ’ is a particle, and also that this too is the reading of those of the Elders’ Tradition.14 However, the meaning is the same in either case,
and it can be read according to preference.
And again, just as in such passages as ‘ Sukhena phuttha atha va dukhena ’ and ‘ dukkham domanassam patisamvedeti ’ , in some instances ‘ dukkham ’ is said and in others ‘ dukham so too, in some instances ‘ eka ’ is said and in others ‘ ekam ’;
and in fact here too there is the reading ekam nama.
Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu abides contemplating the body as a body ’ And here, in working out the construing of the answer, it is such Suttas as that establish it. 7
for it is that which is intended here by the Blessed One with the word ‘ one though it is not intended to signify that ‘ neither in the Dispensation nor in the world of secular and sectarian teaching outside it does there exist any other one ’;
’ Bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu becomes completely dispassionate towards one idea, when his lust for it completely fades away, when he is completely liberated from it, when he sees completely the ending of it, then he is one who, after attaining rightness, 8 makes an end of suffering here and now.
for it is established in the case of creatures that this term ‘ creatures ’ is a metaphor for the categories.
—Why?
according as it is said:
‘He then dispassion finds in suffering; ‘ This path it is that leads to purification ’ .
And here in the phrase ‘ One is what? ’ the reading is twofold as Kim and Ki ha. Herein, the Sinhalese reading is ki ha;
So the Teacher, being satisfied with the answer to his question, asked the further question Two is what? in the same manner as before.
Responding to the number ‘ two ’, the Elder replied Name and form , employing the mode of teaching in terms of ideas.6
Herein, because of the act of bending 15 towards an object and because of being the root-cause of the bent of cognizance, all of what is formless is called ‘ name ’ ;
And in accordance with what is meant here, when it is said that ‘ There is the two, that is to say, name and form that is not because of the absence of other twos,
‘ Bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu becomes completely dispassionate towards two ideas, … he is one who makes an end of suffering here and now.
What two?
Name and form:
So it was with reference to this that it was said earlier: two questions, two indications, two answers’ .
And here he comes to dispassion only through the Gateway to Liberation consisting in Contemplation of Not-self , abandoning the self-view through seeing merely name-and-form. And so he eventually makes an end of suffering and reaches purity in the ultimate sense,
according as it is said:
‘ And then, besides, not-self are all ideas: ‘ And so when he sees thus with understanding,
but here only what is inseparable from the idea of being affected by taints and not what is supra- mundane, that is, taintless is meant here since that is the root-cause of the dispassion. 13. The four great entities and all kinds of form that occur derived upon them are collectively called ‘ form ’ in the sense of their becoming deformed . 16 And all that is meant here.
according as it is said
when a bhikkhu becomes completely dispassionate towards these two ideas, … he is one who makes an end of suffering here and now.
’ He then dispassion finds in suffering; ‘ This path it is that leads to purification ’ .
the perception aggregate…
the formations aggregate…
the consciousness aggregate?”
in the case of perception…
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Jīvaka’s Mango-grove with reference to a question asked by Jīvaka.
The Story of Jīvaka is related in detail in the Khandhaka.
Now on a certain occasion Devadatta joined forces with Ajātasattu, climbed Vulture Peak, and out of the wickedness of his heart, saying to himself, “I will kill the Teacher,” hurled down a rock.
Two mountain crags caught the rock and splintered it;
The Teacher suffered intense pains and was removed by the monks to Maddakucchi.
Desiring to go on to Jīvaka’s Mango-grove, the Teacher said to the monks, “Carry me thither.”
When Jīvaka heard the news, he immediately went to the Teacher and to heal the wound applied an astringent. Then he bound up the wound and said to the Teacher, “Reverend Sir, I have a patient in the city. As soon as I have visited him, I will return. Let this dressing remain exactly as it is until I return.” So saying, Jīvaka went and treated his patient.
But the gate was closed when he returned, and he was therefore unable to enter.
Thereupon the following thought occurred to him, “I have committed a grievous fault. I applied an astringent to the foot of the Tathāgata and bound up his wound, just as I should have bound up the wound of any other man. It is now time to remove the bandage. For if the bandage remains unbound all night long, the Exalted One will suffer intense pain.”
At that moment the Teacher addressed the Elder Ānanda, “Ānanda, Jīvaka returned late in the evening and was unable to enter the gate. This was the thought in his mind, ‘Now it is time to remove the bandage.’Therefore remove the bandage.”
The Elder removed the bandage, whereupon the scar disappeared like bark from a tree.
At early dawn Jīvaka hastened to the Teacher’s side and asked, “Reverend Sir, did you suffer intense pain?”
Said the Teacher, “Jīvaka, all suffering is extinguished for the Tathāgata, even as when he sat on the Throne of Enlightenment.” And joining the connection and preaching the Law, he pronounced the following Stanza,
but one of the flying pieces struck the foot of the Exalted One and caused blood to flow.
So the monks took the Teacher and carried him to Jīvaka’s Mango-grove.
For him who has completed his journey, for him who is free from sorrow, For him who has freed himself from the bonds which beset him on all sides,
For him who has shaken off all the fetters, for such a one, no suffering is possible.
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Veḷuvana with reference to the Elder Kassapa the Great.
For on a certain occasion, after keeping residence during the season of the rains at Rājagaha, the Teacher caused the following announcement to be made to the monks, “At the expiration of a fortnight the Teacher will go forth on a pilgrimage for alms.” We are told that this is a practice of the Buddhas when they desire to go forth on an alms-pilgrimage with the monks.
The following consideration presents itself to their minds, “Under these circumstances the monks will scald their bowls and dye their robes and will make the pilgrimage pleasantly.” This, then, was the reason why the Teacher caused the announcement to be made to the monks, “At the expiration of a fortnight I will go forth on a pilgrimage for alms.”
But while the monks were scalding their bowls and dyeing their robes, the Elder Kassapa the Great washed his robes.
The monks were offended at this and said, “Why does the Elder wash his robes? Within and without this city dwell a hundred and eighty million people.
So many of these as are not the Elder’s kinsfolk are his supporters; and so many as are not his supporters are his kinsfolk.
All these people show honor and reverence to the Elder by providing him with the Four Requisites.
If he rejects all their good offices, where will he go?
Even were he to go, he would not go farther than Māpamāda Cave.” 
Likewise the Teacher thought as he set out on his pilgrimage, “Within and without this city dwell a hundred and eighty million people, and on occasions of public festivals or disasters, there the monks must go.
It is therefore out of the question to leave the monastery empty. But shall I direct all of them to return?”
Then the following thought occurred to him, “These people are either kinsfolk or retainers of Kassapa; therefore it is Kassapa whom I should direct to return.”
The monks were offended at this and said, “Did you observe, brethren? Did we not just say, ‘Why is Kassapa the Great washing his robes? He will not accompany the Teacher.’
Everything has happened just as we said it would.” When the Teacher heard the talk of the monks, he turned around, stood still, and said, “Monks, what is this you are saying?”
“We are talking about Elder Kassapa the Great, Reverend Sir,” replied the monks, and then repeated their conversation word for word.
The Teacher listened to what they had to say and then replied, “Monks, you say, ‘Kassapa is attached to his households and his requisites.’ As a matter of fact, he turned back because it was his desire to obey my command.
For in a previous state of existence he made an Earnest Wish and became, like the moon, free from attachment. He made the Earnest Wish, ‘May I be able to approach the households of supporters.’
Kassapa has no attachment for a household or a requisite. Beginning with Kassapa, I preached to all a Path like that of the moon, the Path of the Stock of the Elect.”
The monks asked the Teacher, “Reverend Sir, when did the Elder make his Earnest Wish?”
“Monks, do you wish to hear?”
“Yes, Reverend Sir.”
When the Teacher had related in detail this deed of the Elder in a previous state of existence, he said, “Thus, monks, beginning with my son Kassapa, I preached to all a Path like that of the moon, the Path of the Stock of the Elect. My son has no attachment for requisites or households or monasteries or cells. My son has no attachment anywhere, but is like a royal goose which goes down into a lake and swims therein and abides therein.” And joining the connection and preaching the Law, he pronounced the following Stanza,
(Māpamāda Cave, by the way, acquired its name in the following way: Whenever the Teacher reached this cave, he would say to the monks who were to return,
“Now you may return; be not heedless, mā pamajjittha.” Thus this cave came to be called Māpamāda Cave.)
Accordingly he said to the Elder, “Kassapa, it is out of the question to leave the monastery empty, for there is need of monks on occasions of public festivals or disasters; therefore take your own retinue with you and return.”
“Very well, Reverend Sir,” replied the Elder and taking his own retinue with him, he returned.
Said the Teacher to them, “Monks, a hundred thousand cycles of time in the past, the Buddha Padumuttara appeared in the world.” Beginning with these words, the Teacher related the whole story of the Elder’s deed in a previous state of existence, beginning with his Earnest Wish in the dispensation of the Buddha Padumuttara.
They that are mindful, exert themselves, they take not pleasure in an abode;
As geese leave a lake, so also do they leave house and home
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Jetavana with reference to Venerable Belaṭṭhisīsa.
The story goes that this Venerable Elder, finding it annoying to seek alms regularly, made a round for alms through one street in a village, and after eating his breakfast, made another round through a second street, taking boiled rice without sauce or curry, carrying it to the monastery and storing it away. After spending a few days in the bliss of Ecstatic Meditation, he had need of the food and therefore ate it.
When the monks found out what he had done, they were offended and reported the matter to the Exalted One.
On this occasion the Teacher promulgated the rule forbidding monks to store away food for future use. But since the Elder committed the fault before the rule had been promulgated, and because he was satisfied with but little, the Teacher declared him to be free from guilt. And joining the connection and preaching the Law, he pronounced the following Stanza,
They whose resort is the Void, the Uncaused, Deliverance,
Their going is hard to follow, like the flight of birds through the air.
They that possess not stores of food, they that know their food aright,
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Veḷuvana with reference to the Elder Anuruddha.
For one day, the Elder, whose robes were worn out, was seeking fresh robes on refuse-heaps and in other similar places.
Now in the Elder’s third previous existence he had a wife who had been reborn in the World of the Thirty-three as the goddess Jālinī.
When the goddess Jālinī saw the Elder seeking cloths for robes, she resolved to aid him. So taking three celestial cloths thirteen cubits long and four cubits wide, and thinking to herself, “If I display these cloths in this manner, the Elder will not take them,” she went to a certain refuse-heap in front of the heap where the Elder was seeking cloths and laid them down in such a way that only the hems were visible.
As the Elder proceeded on his way seeking cloths, he saw the hems of the celestial garments, whereupon he took hold of them and pulled them out. When he saw that they possessed the dimensions above described, he said to himself, “This indeed is a most remarkable refuse-heap! ” And taking them with him, he went his way.
On the day he was to make his robes, the Teacher, accompanied by his retinue of five hundred monks, went to the monastery and sat down; likewise did the eighty Chief Elders sit down there also. For the purpose of sewing the robes. Elder Kassapa the Great sat at the foot. Elder Sāriputta in the midst, and Elder Ānanda at the head. The company of monks spun out the thread, the Teacher threaded the needle, and Elder Moggallāna the Great went hither and thither supplying whatever else might be needed.
The goddess entered the village and incited the inhabitants to give alms, saying, “They are making robes for my noble Elder Anuruddha. The Teacher, surrounded by the eighty Chief Disciples, and accompanied by his retinue of five hundred monks, has gone to the monastery and sat down therein.
Take rice-porridge and other provisions and go to the monastery.” During the meal Elder Moggallāna the Great brought large pieces of rose-apple, but the five hundred monks were unable to eat it.
Sakka drew a circle about the place where they were making the robes; the earth was as if dyed with lac; there was a great heap of food both soft and hard remaining over and above to the monks who had eaten.
The monks were offended, and said, “Why should such a quantity of food be provided for so few monks?
Judging by the quantity, Anuruddha’s kinsfolk and retainers must have been told, ‘Bring this quantity.’ Elder Anuruddha doubtless wishes to show how many relatives and supporters he has.” The Teacher asked the monks what they were talking about. When they told him, he said, “But, monks, you do not think that this was brought by any orders of Anuruddha, do you?”
“Yes, Reverend Sir; we do.”
They that have rid themselves of the Depravities do not spend their time talking about Requisites; nay, these provisions were produced by the supernatural power of a goddess.” And joining the connection and preaching the Law, he pronounced the following Stanza,
“Monks, my son Anuruddha does not talk thus.
He who has rid himself of the Contaminations, he who relies not upon food,
He whose resort is the Void, the Uncaused, Deliverance,
His going is hard to follow, like the flight of birds through the air.
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Pubbārāma with reference to Elder Kaccāyana the Great.
For once upon a time, on the occasion of the terminal festival , the Exalted One sat on the ground floor of the mansion of the Mother of Migāra, surrounded by a company of eminent lay disciples.
At this time Elder Kaccāyana the Great resided in the Avanti country.
Now this Venerable Elder, although obliged to come from a great distance, regularly attended the preaching of the Law.
Therefore, when the Chief Elders sat down, they always left a seat for Elder Kaccāyana the Great.
Sakka king of gods drew near with his celestial retinue from the two Worlds of Gods, and honored the Teacher with celestial perfumes and garlands. Not seeing Elder Kaccāyana the Great, he thought to himself, “Why is my noble Elder nowhere seen?It would be well if he were to draw near.”
At that very moment the Elder drew near, and showed himself sitting in his proper seat.
When Sakka saw the Elder, he grasped him firmly by the ankles and said, “It is indeed well that my noble Elder has come; that my noble Elder should come, was the very thing I wished for.” So saying, he rubbed the Elder’s feet with both hands, honored him with perfumes and garlands, and having paid obeisance to him, stood respectfully on one side.
The monks were offended and said,
“Sakka shows respect of persons in rendering honor. Such honor as this, he has not rendered to the rest of the Chief Disciples. The moment he saw Kaccāyana the Great, he grasped him by the ankles and said, ‘It is indeed well that my noble Elder has come; that my noble Elder should come, was the very thing I wished for.’So saying, he rubbed the Elder’s feet with both hands, honored him with perfumes and garlands, and having paid obeisance to him, stood respectfully on one side.”
The Teacher, hearing their talk, said, “Monks, those monks who, like my son Kaccāyana the Great, keep the doors of their senses guarded, are beloved both of gods and men.” So saying, he joined the connection, and preaching the Law, pronounced the following Stanza,
For such a man the gods cherish deep affection.
If he has put away pride, if he is free from the Contaminations,
Like horses well broken in by a charioteer,
If a man’s senses have been brought to a state of tranquillity,
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Jetavana with reference to Elder Sāriputta.
For once upon a time, at the conclusion of the rains. Elder Sāriputta, desiring to go forth on an alms-pilgrimage, took leave of the Teacher, paid obeisance to him, and departed with his own retinue.
Many other monks took leave of the Elder.
In dismissing the monks the Elder mentioned the personal and family name of all of the monks who were known by personal and family names.
A certain monk who was not known by a personal and family name said, “Oh, that the Elder would greet me by a personal and family name in dismissing me.” But in the great throng of monks the Elder did not notice him.
Thereupon the monk said to himself, “He does not greet me as he does the other monks,” and straightway conceived a grudge against the Elder.
Besides that, the hem of the Elder’s garment brushed against the monk, and this also served to intensify the hatred the monk felt towards the Elder.
So soon as he knew that the Elder had passed beyond the entrance to the monastery, he approached the Teacher and said to him, “Reverend Sir, Venerable Sāriputta, doubtless thinking to himself, ‘I am your Chief Disciple,’ struck me a blow that almost broke the chain of my ear.Having so done, without so much as begging my pardon, he set out on his alms-pilgrimage.”
The Teacher caused the Elder to be summoned.
Thereupon Elder Moggallāna the Great and Elder Ānanda thought to themselves, “The Teacher does not know that our oldest brother did not really strike this monk; the Elder will of course roar a lion’s roar.” Accordingly they decided to convoke an assembly.
With key in hand, they opened the doors of the cells, saying, “Approach, Venerable Sirs! Approach, Venerable Sirs! So soon as Venerable Sāriputta is face to face with the Exalted One, he will roar the roar of a lion.” So saying, they convoked a full assembly of the monks.
Elder Sāriputta came with the rest, saluted the Teacher, and sat down respectfully on one side.
When the Teacher questioned him about the incident, the Elder, instead of saying, “I did not strike that monk,” recited his own virtues.
Said he, “Reverend Sir, in case any monk has not meditated on the body, he should here find a companion-monk and forsaking him not, go forth on pilgrimage.” Then he said, “Reverend Sir, it is as when they cast on the earth what is clean and then cast on the earth what is unclean.” He compared his own tranquillity of mind to that of the earth, to that of the severed horns of a bull, to that of a Caṇḍāla youth, to water, fire, wind, removal of impurity; he compared the oppression he suffered through his own body to the oppression of snakes and corpses; he compared the maintenance of his own body to that of protuberances of fat.
As the Elder described his own virtues in terms of these nine similes, the great earth shook, nine times in succession, to its ocean boundary.
As he employed the similes of the removal of impurity, the Caṇḍāla youth, and the protuberances of fat, those monks who had not yet attained the Fruit of Conversion were unable to restrain their tears; while those who had attained Arahatship were filled with religious emotion.
As the Elder recited his own virtues, remorse pervaded the whole body of the monk who had unjustly slandered him. And straightway he fell at the feet of the Exalted One, admitted that he was guilty of slander, and confessed his fault.
The Teacher addressing the Elder, said, “Sāriputta, pardon this deluded man, lest his head split into seven pieces.”
Thereupon the monks said, “Behold, brethren, the surpassing goodness of the Elder! He cherishes neither anger nor hatred against this lying, slanderous monk.Instead, he crouches before him, extends his hands in an attitude of reverence, and asks his pardon.”
When the Teacher heard the talk of the monks, he said, “Monks, what are you talking about? ” When they told him, he said, “Monks, it is impossible for Sāriputta and his like to cherish anger or hatred. Sāriputta’s mind is like the great earth, like a threshold, like a pool of still water.” So saying, he joined the connection, and preaching the Law, pronounced the following Stanza,
Thereupon the Elder crouched before the monk, and extending his clasped hands in an attitude of reverence, said to him, “Reverend Sir, I freely pardon this Venerable monk.Let this Venerable monk also pardon me if I have in any way offended against him.”
The rounds of existence do not exist for such a man.
He is like a pool of water free from mud.
like a threshold, such is the virtuous;
Like the earth, he is not troubled;
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Jetavana with reference to a novice of the Elder Tissa.
The story goes that a certain youth of station, residing at Kosambi, retired from the world and became a monk in the Religion of the Teacher. After making his full profession, he was known as Elder Kosambivāsī Tissa.
After he had kept residence during the season of the rains at Kosambi, his supporter brought a set of three robes and offerings of ghee and jagghery and laid them at his feet.
Said the Elder to him, “What are these, lay disciple?”
“Reverend Sir, have you not kept residence with me during the season of the rains?Those who keep residence in our monastery always receive these offerings; pray accept them, Reverend Sir.”
“Never mind, lay disciple, I have no need of them.”
“I have no novice to perform the usual offices for me, brother.”
The lay disciple brought his own son, but seven years old, to the Elder, and committed him into the Elder’s hands, saying, “Pray receive him into the Order, Reverend Sir.”
The instant the razor touched his hair, he attained Arahatship, together with the Supernatural Faculties.
The Elder, having received the youth into the Order, remained there for a fortnight. Then, deciding to visit the Teacher, he directed the novice to take the requisites, and set out on his journey. On the way he entered a certain monastery.
The novice obtained lodging for the Elder and looked after it for him.
While he was thus engaged, it grew dark and he was therefore unable to provide a lodging for himself.
When the time came for the novice to wait upon the Elder, the novice approached the Elder and sat down. The Elder asked the novice, “Novice, have you not neglected to provide yourself with lodging?”
“Reverend Sir, I have had no opportunity to look after a lodging for myself.”
“Well then, remain with me. It will inconvenience you to lodge outside in the place reserved for visitors.” So saying, the Elder taking him with him, entered his own lodging.
Now the Elder had not yet attained the Fruit of Conversion, and as soon as he lay down, fell asleep.
Thereupon the novice thought to himself, “To-day is the third day during which I have occupied the same lodging with my preceptor. If I lie down to sleep the Elder will commit the offense of sleeping in common. Therefore I will spend the night sitting up.” So assuming a cross-legged posture near the bed of his preceptor, he spent the night sitting up.
The Elder rose at dawn and said to himself, “I must cause the novice to go out.” So he took a fan which was placed at the side of the bed, struck the mat of the novice with the tip of the palm-leaf, and then, tossing the fan into the air, said, “Novice, go out.” The handle of the fan struck the novice in the eye and straightway put out his eye.
“What did you say, Reverend Sir? ” said the novice. “Rise and go out,” was the reply.The novice, instead of saying, “Reverend Sir, my eye has been put out,” covered his eye with one hand and went out.
Moreover, when it was time for him to perform his duties as novice, he did not say, “My eye has been put out,” nor did he remain seated, but covering his eye with one hand and taking a hand-broom in the other hand, he swept out the privy and the wash-room, after which, setting out water for washing the face, he swept out the Elder’s cell.
When he advanced to present the toothstick to the Elder, he presented it to him with only one hand.
His preceptor said to him, “This novice is not properly trained. Is it proper for a novice to present a toothstick to teachers and preceptors with one hand?”
“Reverend Sir, I know perfectly well what is the proper form, but one of my hands is not disengaged.”
Then the novice told him the whole story, beginning at the beginning.
When the Elder heard his story, he was deeply moved and said to himself, “Oh, what a grievous thing I have done! ” Then he said to the novice, “Pardon me, most excellent youth; I did not know this. Be my refuge.” And extending his clasped hands in an attitude of reverent salutation, he crouched on the ground before the feet of a seven-year-old novice.
Then said the novice to him, “It was not for this purpose, Reverend Sir, that I spoke. I said this for the purpose of sparing your feelings. You are not to blame in this matter and neither am I.
The round of existences alone is to blame for this. It was because I wished to spare you remorse that I did not tell you the real facts.”
The novice tried to comfort the Elder, but he would not be comforted. Overcome with remorse, he took the novice’s requisites and proceeded to the Teacher.
As the Teacher sat, he observed him approaching.
The Elder went to the Teacher, saluted him, and exchanged friendly greetings with him. The Teacher asked him, “Monk, is everything well with you? I trust that you have suffered no excessive discomfort.” The Elder replied, “All is well with me, Reverend Sir. I have suffered no excessive discomfort.But here is a young novice whose good qualities surpass anything I have ever seen.”
“Why, what has he done, monk?”
Thereupon the Elder told him the whole story, beginning at the beginning and concluding as follows, “Reverend Sir, when I asked him to pardon me, he said this to me, ‘You are not to blame in this matter and neither am I.
The round of existences alone is to blame for this. Be not disturbed.’ Thus he tried to comfort me, appearing to cherish neither anger nor hatred towards me.His good qualities surpass anything I have ever seen.”
Said the Teacher to the Elder, “Monk, those who have rid themselves of the Depravities cherish neither anger nor hatred towards anyone. On the contrary, their senses are in a state of calm and their thoughts are in a state of calm.” So saying, he joined the connection and preaching the Law, pronounced the following Stanza,
“Why is that, Reverend Sir?”
“Reverend Sir, if it be true that you have no novice to minister to your needs, my son will become your novice.”
The Elder graciously accepted the offer.
The Elder moistened the boy’s hair, taught him the Formula of Meditation on the first five of the Constituent Parts of the Body, and received him into the Order.
“What is the matter, novice?”
His thoughts are calm, his speech is calm, his deeds are calm;
Such is the calm of one who has obtained Deliverance by Right Knowledge.
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Jetavana with reference to the Elder Khadiravaniya Revata.
When the Venerable Sāriputta renounced eighty-seven crores of treasure and became a monk, three sisters of his, Cālā, Upacālā, and Sīsūpacālā, and two brothers, Canda and Upasena, entered the Religious Life and the youth Revata alone remained at home.
His mother thought to herself, “My son Upatissa has renounced all this wealth and become a monk; three sisters of his and two brothers of his have entered the Religious Life; Revata alone remains at home.
Should he make a monk of Revata also, all this wealth will be lost and the family stock will be uprooted. I will get him married while he is yet a mere boy.”
On his return the Elder Sāriputta addressed the monks as follows, “Brethren, should Revata come here desiring to become a monk, you are to make a monk of him the moment he arrives; my mother and father hold false views; why should their permission be asked? I myself am Revata’s mother and father.”
When the boy Revata was only seven years old, his mother made preparations for his marriage. She selected a girl of good family, appointed a day for the wedding, adorned the boy with handsome garments and costly ornaments, and accompanied by a large retinue, accompanied him to the house of the girl’s parents.
The kinsfolk of both parties were present at the festivities, and placing their hands in a bowl of water, pronounced blessings and wished them prosperity, saying to the bride, “May you behold the Truth your grandmother beheld; may you live long, even as your grandmother.”
The youth Revata thought to himself, “What do they mean by ‘the Truth her grandmother beheld’? ” And he asked them, “Which woman is her grandmother?”
They said to him, “Sir, do you not see that woman a hundred and twenty years old with broken teeth and gray hair, full of wrinkles, her body marked with moles, crooked as a shaped rafter?That is her grandmother.”
“But will my wife look like that some day?”
“Sir, she will if she lives.”
Kinsmen assisted the youth and his bride to enter a carriage, and they started out all together.
When they had gone a little way, Revata informed them that he wished to relieve himself and said, “Just stop the carriage and I will step out and return immediately.” He stepped out of the carriage, went into a certain thicket, remained there a little while, and then returned.
A second and a third time he made the same excuse, stepped down from the carriage, and climbed back again.
His kinsmen made up their minds, “Doubtless these calls of nature are habitual with him,” and therefore did not keep close watch of him.
When they had gone a little way farther, he made the same excuse, stepped down out of the carriage, and saying, “You drive on ahead; I will follow after you slowly,” disappeared in the direction of a thicket.
When his kinsmen heard him say, “I will follow after you,” they drove on ahead.
Now in this region lived thirty monks; and when Revata had made good his escape, he went to them, paid obeisance to them, and said, “Reverend Sirs, receive me into the Order.”
“Don’t you recognize me, Reverend Sirs?”
“We do not, brother.”
“It is just as I say, Reverend Sirs; the reverend monks call my brother ‘Sāriputta,’ and therefore do not know who is meant when the name ‘Upatissa’ is mentioned.”
“Yes, Reverend Sir.”
When the Elder received the message, he said to the Exalted One, “Reverend Sir, since the forest-monks have sent me word, ‘Revata has been received into the Order,’ I should like to go and see him and then return.”
The novice said to himself, “If I continue to reside here, my kinsmen will follow me and summon me to return home.” Therefore he obtained from the monks a Formula of Meditation as far as Arahatship, took bowl and robe, and set out on his alms-pilgrimage. After journeying a distance of thirty leagues he came to an acacia forest, and there he took up his residence for the season of the rains. Before the three months of the rainy season had passed, he attained Arahatship together with the Supernatural Faculties.
After the terminal festival the Elder Sāriputta again requested the Teacher to permit him to go to his brother.
The Teacher said, 29.212 “We too will go, Sāriputta,” and set out with five hundred monks.
When they had gone a little way, the Elder Ānanda, standing at a fork in the road, said to the Teacher, “Reverend Sir, there are two roads to the place where Revata resides: one is protected and is sixty leagues long and men live thereon; the other is a direct route, thirty leagues long, infested by evil spirits; which one shall we take?”
“Well, Ānanda, did Sīvali accompany us?”
“Yes, Reverend Sir.”
As soon as the Teacher set foot on that road, the forest-deities, thinking to themselves, “We will do honor to the noble Elder Sīvali,” erected rest-houses a league apart, all along the route; and permitting the monks to go no farther than a league, they rose early in the morning, and taking heavenly broth, rice, and other provisions, they went about asking, “Where is the noble Elder Sīvali seated?”
The Elder presented to the Congregation of Monks presided over by the Buddha the alms they brought him.
Thus the Teacher, together with his retinue, went a long and difficult journey of thirty leagues, enjoying the fruit of the merit acquired by one Elder, Sīvali.
As soon as the Elder Revata learned that the Teacher was approaching, he created by magic a Perfumed Chamber for the Exalted One, and likewise for the monks five hundred pinnacled residences, five hundred covered walks, and five hundred night-quarters and day-quarters.
The Teacher spent an entire month there as his guest,
But there were two old monks living there who, when the Teacher entered the acacia forest, said to themselves, “How will this monk be able to perform his meditations while engaged in all this new work? The Teacher shows favoritism to one who is the youngest brother of Sāriputta in coming to live with the builder of all this new work.”
As the Teacher surveyed the world on the morning of that day, he saw those two monks and became aware of their disposition of mind.
So when he had resided there for a month and the day came for him to depart, he resolved that those monks should forget to take with them their measure of oil and their water-vessel and their sandals. Accordingly when he came to depart, withdrawing just beyond the entrance to the monastery, he sent forth his magical power.
Straightway those monks exclaimed, “I have forgotten this and that;” “I have forgotten it too;” and both turned to retrace their steps. But they were unable to find the place where they had left their belongings, and as they wandered about, the thorns of the acacia-trees pierced their feet. Finally they saw their belongings hanging on the branch of an acacia-tree and taking them with them, departed.
The Teacher with the Congregation of Monks remained for yet another month, enjoying the fruit of the merit of the Elder Sīvali, and then went into residence at Pubbārāma.
Those two old monks bathed their faces early in the morning and said, “Let us go to the house of Visākhā the giver of alms to pilgrims and drink broth.” So they went there and sat down, drinking broth and eating hard food.
Visākhā asked them, “Reverend Sirs, did you accompany the Teacher to the place where the Elder Sīvali resides?”
“Yes, lay disciple.” “A charming place, Reverend Sirs, where the Elder resides.”
“Where does its charm come in? It’s a jungle of acacia-trees full of white thorns, lay disciple, fit only for ascetics to live in.”
Shortly afterwards two young monks came to the door.
The lay disciple provided them with broth and hard food and asked them the same question.
They replied, “Lay disciple, it is impossible to describe in words the Elder’s place of residence; it is like the heavenly palace Sudhammā, formed by magical power.”
The lay disciple thought to herself, “The visiting monks who came first said one thing and these monks say quite another. It must be that when the Teacher sent forth his magical power, the visiting monks who came first forgot something and had to go back again; on the other hand these monks must have gone there at the time when it was fashioned and perfected by magical power. Knowing the true explanation by her own wisdom, she waited, saying, “I will ask the Teacher when he comes.”
At that very moment the Teacher, surrounded by the Congregation of Monks, came to the house of Visākhā and sat down in the seats prepared for them.
Visākhā reverently ministered to the Congregation of Monks presided over by the Buddha and at the end of the meal paid obeisance to the Teacher and asked him the following question, “Reverend Sir, some of the monks who accompanied you say, ‘The place where the Elder Revata resides is a forest, a jungle of acacias;’ others say that it is a charming place; what is the explanation of this?”
The Teacher replied, “Lay disciple, whether it be in a village or in a forest, or in what place soever Arahats reside, that place is full of delight.” And joining the connection, he preached the Law by pronouncing the following Stanza,
In a village it may be, or in a forest, on the sea, or on dry land;
No matter where the Arahats reside, that spot is full of delight.
At another time the monks began a discussion. “Brethren, why was it that the Elder Sīvali remained for seven days and seven months and seven years in his mother’s womb? Why was it that he was tormented in Hell? How did he come to reach the pinnacle of gain and honor?”
The Teacher heard the discussion, asked them what it was about, and when they told him, related the story of the Venerable Elder’s deed in a former existence.
Monks, ninety-one cycles of time ago the Exalted Vipassī appeared in the world, and on a certain occasion making an alms-pilgrimage in the country, returned to the city of his father.
The king prepared hospitable offerings for the Congregation of Monks presided over by the Buddha and sent word to the citizens, “Come and share in my offerings.”
The king came and seeing their offerings, invited the Teacher for the following day, saying to himself, “I will give offerings yet more abundant than these.” But the king could not outdo the citizens, nor the citizens the king;
Therefore they sent men out of the four gates of the city to seek fresh honey, providing each man with a thousand pieces of money.
Now it happened that a certain countryman, going to see the village headman, caught sight of a honeycomb on the branch of a tree by the side of the road. Driving the flies away, he cut off the branch and taking honeycomb, branch and stick, he entered the city, intending to give it to the village headman.
One of the men who had been sent out to seek fresh honey saw him and asked him, “Sir, is that honey for sale?”
“No, master, it is not for sale.”
The countryman thought to himself, “This honeycomb is not worth even a farthing, but this man offers me a penny for it.
Then he said to the man, “Are you crazy, or have you no way of spending your money? This honey isn’t worth a farthing, but you offer me a thousand pieces of money for it; what is the explanation of this?”
“That is perfectly true, sir; but I have some use for this honey and I will tell you what it is.”
“We have prepared bounteous offerings for the Buddha Vipassī and his retinue of sixty-eight thousand monks, but we have no fresh honey; that is why I want it.”
“If that is the case, I will not sell it for a price; if I may receive the merit of the offering, I will give it to you.”
The same man also brought a pot of curds as a present, poured the curds also into the vessel, mixed them with the honey, and offered the food to the Buddha and to the Congregation of Monks over which he presided.
All took as much as they required and there was more than enough for all.
(We must not ask ourselves the question, “How was it that so little food sufficed for so many?”
For this was brought about by the supernatural power of the Buddha;
“He who ponders the Four Inconceivables will go mad.”)
Having wrought a good work so slight, the countryman was reborn, when the term of life allotted to him had come to an end, in the World of the Gods. After passing through the round of existence for a very long period of time, he passed at length from the World of the Gods and was reborn as the Prince Royal of Benāres. On the death of the king his father, he succeeded to the throne.
Straightway resolving, “I will take a certain city,” he invested the city and sent word to the citizens, “Give me battle or the kingdom.”
The king guarded the four principal gates and besieged the city for seven months and seven years.
Now his mother asked what her son was doing, and on learning the facts, said, “My son is a simpleton.Go tell him to close the lesser gates and blockade the city completely.”
When the king received his mother’s message, he did as she told him to.
The citizens were unable any longer to leave the city, and on the seventh day killed their own king and gave the kingdom to the hostile king.
Because he committed this act, he was reborn at the end of his life in the Hell of Avīci. After suffering torment in this Hell until this great earth was elevated a league, because he closed the four lesser gates, he passed from that existence, was conceived in the womb of his mother, and remained in her womb for seven months and seven years, lying across the mouth of the womb for seven days.
Thus, monks, through the demerit acquired by Sīvali in besieging the city at that time, he was tormented in Hell for so long a period; and because he closed the lesser gates, when he was conceived in the womb of his mother, he remained in her womb for so long a time;
Again another day the monks began a discussion. “How great was the novice’s gain! How great was the merit through which one man was able to erect for five hundred monks five hundred pinnacled residences!”
The Teacher came in and asked them, “Monks, what is it that you are sitting here now talking about?” When they told him, he said to them, “Monks, my son is attached neither to good nor to evil; he has renounced both.” So saying, he pronounced the following Stanza in the Brāhmaṇa Vagga,
Revata thought to himself, “Can it be that even so beautiful a body as that of my wife will so change for the worse through old age? This must be what my brother Upatissa saw. This very day it behooves me to run away and become a monk.”
“Brother, you are adorned with all the adornments; we know not whether you are a king’s son or a courtier’s son; how can we receive you into the Order?”
“I am the youngest brother of Upatissa.”
“Who is this ‘Upatissa’?
“Why, are you the youngest brother of Sāriputta?”
“Well then, come!” This is the very thing your brother enjoined upon us.” So they removed his jewels, received him into the Order, and sent word to the Elder.
The Teacher withheld his permission, saying to him, “Remain here for the present, Sāriputta.”
But after a few days the Elder made the same request, and the Teacher withheld his permission as before,
saying, “Remain here for the present, Sāriputta; we will go there together later.”
“If Sīvali is with us, take the direct route by all means.”
We are told that the Teacher did not say, “I will see to it that you are provided with broth and rice; take the short route,” because he knew within himself, “This is the place where each of these monks will receive gifts that are the fruit of a work of merit;” therefore he said, “If Sīvali is with us, take the direct route.”
enjoying during his stay the fruit of the merit of a single Elder, Sīvali.
Having done so, they made up their minds, “We will give offerings yet more abundant than those given by the king.” So they invited the Teacher, prepared offerings on the following day, and sent an invitation to the king.
the sixth time the citizens resolved, “To-morrow we will give such offerings that it will be impossible for the king to say that this or that is lacking in our offerings.” So on the following day they prepared offerings, and looking to see what might be lacking,
“Never mind, take this penny and give me the honey.”
they observed that there was plenty of honey in cooked form, but no fresh honey.
I suppose he has a great many pennies; I had best raise the price.”
So he replied, “I will not give it to you for that.” “Well then, take twopence.”
“I will not give it to you for so little as twopence.”
The countryman continued to raise the price until finally the man offered him a thousand pieces of money, whereupon he let him have the honey.
“What is it, master?”
When the man returned and related the incident to the citizens, the citizens, impressed with the firm faith of the giver, assented, saying, “Good! good!let him receive the merit of the offering.” So the citizens provided seats for the Congregation of Monks presided over by the Buddha, gave them broth and hard food, and then had a great silver vessel brought and strained the honeycomb.
and the power of a Buddha is inconceivable.
They replied, “We will give neither battle nor the kingdom.” So saying, they went forth from the lesser gates, procured firewood, water, and so forth, and did all that was necessary to maintain a defense.
because he gave the fresh honey in alms, he reached the pinnacle of gain.
Whosoever in this world has escaped from the bonds of good and of evil,
Whosoever is free from sorrow, free from defilement, free from impurity, him I call a Brahman.
This religious instruction was given by the Teacher while he was in residence at Jetavana with reference to a certain woman.
We are told that a certain monk who lived by his alms-bowl, got a Subject of Meditation from the Teacher and retired to a dilapidated pleasure garden for the purpose of meditation.
Now a certain courtezan made an assignation with a man, saying, “I will go to such and such a place and you meet me there.” The woman kept the assignation, but the man did not.
For some time she watched in vain the path by which she expected him to come. Finally, disappointed at his failure to keep his assignation, she strolled hither and thither and went into the pleasure garden. There she saw the monk sitting cross-legged. Looking this way and that, and seeing no one else about, she said to herself, “Here is a man; I will throw his thoughts into confusion.” So standing in front of the monk, she took down her undergarment several times and put it on again, unloosened her hair and bound it up again, and clapped her hands and laughed.
The Elder became excited; his whole body, in fact, was suffused with excitement.
“What does this mean? ” thought he.
The Teacher considered within himself, “A monk obtained a Subject of Meditation from me and went forth to perform his meditations. How is he getting on? ” Seeing that woman, and observing her evil conduct, and perceiving that her evil conduct was upsetting the Elder, still remaining seated in his Perfumed Chamber, he spoke as follows, “Monks, there is no delight where those abide who seek after their lusts.But where those abide who are free from passion, that place is full of delight.”
So saying, he sent forth a radiant image of himself, and instructing the Elder in the Law, pronounced the following Stanza,
Delightful are the woods; where the man of the world finds no delight,
There they that are free from passion find delight, not they that seek after their lusts.
At the conclusion of the Stanza that Elder, seated as he was, attained Arahatship, together with the Supernatural Faculties.
in the case of formations…
in the case of consciousness?”
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Savatthi in the Eastern Park, in the Palace of Migara’s Mother.
Then Sakka, ruler of gods, went to the Blessed One, and after paying homage to him,
“Here, ruler of gods, a bhikkhu has heard that nothing is worth adhering to.
When a bhikkhu has heard that nothing is worth adhering to,
he directly knows everything; having directly known everything, he fully understands everything; having fully understood everything, whatever feeling he feels, whether pleasant or painful or neither-painfui-nor-pleasant, he abides contemplating impermanence in those feelings, contemplating fading away, contemplating cessation, contemplating relinquishment.
Contemplating thus, he does not cling to anything in the world. When he does not cling, he is not agitated.
When he is not agitated, he personally attains Nibbana. He understands: ‘Birth is destroyed, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more coming to any state of being.’
Briefly, it is in this way, ruler of gods, that a bhikkhu is liberated by the destruction of craving, one who has reached the ultimate end, the ultimate security from bondage, the ultimate holy life, the ultimate goal, one who is foremost among gods and humans.”
Then Sakka, ruler of gods, delighting and rejoicing in the Blessed One’s words, paid homage to the Blessed One, and keeping him on his right, he vanished at once.
Now on that occasion the venerable Maha Moggallana was sitting not far from the Blessed One.
Then he considered: “Did that spirit penetrate to the meaning of the Blessed One’s words when he rejoiced, or did he not? Suppose I found out whether he did or not.”
Then, just as quickly as a strong man might extend his flexed arm or flex his extended arm, the venerable Maha Moggallana vanished from the Palace of Migara’s Mother in the Eastern Park and appeared among the gods of the Thirty-three.
Now on that occasion Sakka, ruler of gods, was furnished and endowed a hundredfold with the five kinds of heavenly music, and he was enjoying it in the Pleasure Park of the Single Lotus.
he dismissed the music, went to the venerable Maha Moggallana, and said to him: “Come, good sir Moggallana! Welcome, good sir Moggallana!
It is long, good sir Moggallana, since you found an opportunity to come here.
Sit down, good sir Moggallana; this seat is ready.”
The venerable Maha Moggallana sat down on the seat made ready,
The venerable Maha Moggallana then asked him: 8. “Kosiya, how did the Blessed One state to you in brief deliverance through the destruction of craving?
It would be good if we might also get to hear that statement.”
“Good sir Moggallana, we are so busy, we have so much to do, not only with our own business, but also with the business of the gods of the Thirty-three.
Besides, good sir Moggallana, what is well heard, well learned, well attended to, well remembered, does not vanish all of a sudden.
Good sir Moggallana, it once happened that war broke out between the gods and the titans.
In that war the gods won and the titans were defeated.
When I had won that war and returned from it as a conqueror, I had the Vejayanta Palace built.
Good sir Moggallana, the Vejayanta Palace has a hundred towers,
Would you like to see the loveliness of the Vejayanta Palace, good sir Moggallana?”
The venerable Maha Moggallana consented in silence.
Then Sakka, ruler of gods, and the divine King Vessavana went to the Vejayanta Palace, giving precedence to the venerable Maha Moggallana.
When the maids of Sakka saw the venerable Maha Moggallana coming in the distance, they were embarrassed and ashamed and they went each into their own rooms.
Then Sakka, ruler of gods, and the divine King Vessavana had the venerable Maha Moggallana walk all over and explore the Vejayanta Palace: “See, good sir Moggallana, this loveliness of the Vejayanta Palace! See, good sir Moggallana, this loveliness of the Vejayanta Palace!”
“It does the venerable Kosiya credit as one who has formerly made merit;
It does the venerable Kosiya credit as one who has formerly made merit.”
Then the venerable Maha Moggallana considered thus: “This spirit is living much too negligently.
What if I stirred up a sense of urgency in him?”
Then the venerable Maha Moggallana performed such a feat of supernormal power that with the point of his toe he made the Vejayanta Palace shake and quake and tremble.
Sakka and the divine King Vessavana and the gods of the Thirty-three were filled with wonder and amazement, and they said: “Sirs, it is wonderful, it is marvellous, what power and might the recluse has, that with the point of his toe he makes the heavenly region shake and quake and tremble!”
When the venerable Maha Moggallana knew that Sakka, ruler of the gods, was stirred to a sense of urgency with his hair standing on end, he asked him: “Kosiya, how did the Blessed One state to you in brief deliverance through the destruction of craving?
It would be good if we might also get to hear that statement.”
“Good sir Moggallana, I went to the Blessed One, and after paying homage to him, I stood at one side and said: ‘Venerable sir,…as in §2…
…of gods and humans.’
That is how the Blessed One stated to me in brief deliverance through the destruction of craving, good sir Moggallana.”
Then the venerable Maha Moggallana delighted and rejoiced in the words of Sakka, ruler of gods. Then, just as quickly as a strong man might extend his flexed arm or flex his extended arm, he vanished from among the gods of the Thirtythree and appeared in the Eastern Park in the Palace of Migara’s Mother.
Then, soon after the venerable Maha Moggallana had gone, the attendants of Sakka, ruler of gods, asked him: “Good sir, was that your teacher, the Blessed One?”
- “No, good sirs, that was not my teacher, the Blessed One.
That was one of my companions in the holy life, the venerable Maha Moggallana.”
“Good sir, it is a gain for you that your companion in the holy life has such power and might.
Oh, how much more so that the Blessed One is your teacher!”
and asked him: “Venerable sir, does the Blessed One recall stating in brief - to a certain one of the renowned spirits with a great following - deliverance through the destruction of craving?”
“I do recall doing so, Moggallana. Here Sakka, ruler of gods, came to me, and after paying homage to me, he stood at one side
and asked: ‘Venerable sir, how in brief is a bhikkhu liberated by the destruction of craving, one who has reached the ultimate end, the ultimate security from bondage, the ultimate holy life, the ultimate goal, one who is foremost among gods and humans?’
When this was said, I told him: ‘Here, ruler of gods, a bhikkhu has heard that nothing is worth adhering to.
When a bhikkhu has heard that nothing is worth adhering to, he directly knows everything;
having directly known everything, he fully understands everything; having fully understood everything, whatever feeling he feels, whether pleasant or painful or neitherpainful- nor-pleasant,
Briefly, it is in this way, ruler of gods, that a bhikkhu is liberated by the destruction of craving…one who is foremost among gods and humans.’
That is how I recall stating in brief to Sakka, ruler of gods, deliverance through the destruction of craving.”
That is what the Blessed One said.
The venerable Maha Moggallana was satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
he stood at one side and asked: “Venerable sir, how in brief is a bhikkhu liberated by the destruction of craving, one who has reached fee ultimate end, the ultimate security from bondage, the ultimate holy life, the ultimate goal, one who is foremost among gods and humans?”
Now the teacher, being satisfied with the answer to his question, asked the further question Three is what? in the same manner as before.
Responding to the number ‘ three ’ stated as the neuter ‘ tini ’, the Elder replied Three kinds of feeling, showing the numeral 17 in the feminine gender appropriate to the meaning to be given in the answer.
Or alternatively, it can be understood here in the sense that he spoke thus showing that ‘ I apply to the word ” three ” the meaning expressed by the Blessed One with the words ” Three kinds of feeling ” ’;
for the way of teaching has numerous facets in the case of those who have reached expertness in teaching by means of the classes of discriminations.18
Some, however, have said that tini is a supernumerary word.
And the phrase 4 three kinds of feeling ’ is stated here in the way already explained , not .because of the absence of other threes,
according as it is said:
‘ Bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu becomes completely dispassionate towards three ideas,… he is one who makes an end of suffering here and now.
So it was with reference to this that it was said earlier: three questions, three indications, three answers ’ .
And here… And he does so through following the way indicated in the passage ‘ Whatever is felt all comes under suffering ‘ ,
‘ Whoever pleasure saw as pain, ‘ Saw pain as though it were a dart,
or by following the way of the three- fold classification of intrinsic suffering, suffering suffering in determinations , as stated in the following passage . he comes to dispassion only through the Gateway to Liberation consisting in Contemplation of Suffering , abandoning perception of pleasure through seeing all these kinds of feelings as a state of suffering. And so he eventually makes an end of suffering and reaches purity in the ultimate sense,
What three?
The three kinds of feeling:
when a bhikkhu becomes completely dispassionate towards these three ideas,… he is one who makes an end of suffering here and now.
and Sakka took a low seat and sat down at one side.
When he saw the venerable Maha Moggallana coming in the distance,
and each tower has seven hundred upper chambers,
and each upper chamber has seven nymphs,
and each nymph has seven maids.
Just as a daughter-in-law is embarrassed and ashamed on seeing her father-in-law, so too, when the maids of Sakka saw the venerable Maha Moggallana coming, they were embarrassed and ashamed and they went each into their own rooms.
He then dispassion finds in suffering; ‘ This path it is that leads to purification ’ .
‘ And painful too are all determinations: ‘ And so when he sees thus with understanding, ‘
according as it is said:
‘ Saw peaceful neither-pain-nor-pleasure ‘ Ever to be impermanent,… ’ .
So the teacher, being satisfied with the answer to his question, asked the further question Four is what? in the same manner as before.
Now in the matter of answering this question, in some instances the four nutriments are meant in the way already stated ,
‘ Bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu becomes completely dispassionate towards four ideas…. he is one who makes an end of suffering here and now.
What four?
The four nutriments:
So it was with reference to this that it was said earlier: four questions, four indications, four answers ’ ;
but in other instances the four foundations of mindfulness are meant, which when a man maintains them in being in his cognizance, he makes an end of suffering,
‘ Friends, when a bhikkhu completely maintains four ideas in being in his cognizance,… sees completely the ending of them, then he is one who, after attaining rightness, makes an end of suffering here and now.
What four?
The four foundations of mindfulness :
So it was with reference to this that it was said by the Blessed One: Four questions, four indications, four answers’ .
However, in responding to the number ‘ four ’ the Elder replied Noble Truths , either because what was meant here was these four Noble Truths,
Herein, four is the delimitation by number.
Noble Truths: ariyasaccani—ariyani saccani ; the meaning is that they are not unreal, not deceptive,
according as it is said
‘ Bhikkhus, these four Noble Truths are real, not unreal, not otherwise than they seem, that is why they are called Noble Truths ’ .
Or alternatively, since Buddhas, Pacceka Buddhas and Buddhas’ disciples are reckoned as the Noble Ones , and it is they that penetrate them, for that they should be honoured 20 by the world with its gods—treated as reliable 21 is what is meant—, or since they cause posturing in the way regarded as the field for effort, or since they cause non-posturing in what is not the way , or since they cause devotion to the thirty- seven noble ideas that are on the side of enlightenment, they are thus called ‘ Noble Truths ’ ,
according as it is said
‘ Bhikkhus, there are these four Noble Truths: the Noble Truth of suffering, the Noble Truth of the origin of suffering, the Noble Truth of the cessation of suffering, and the Noble Truth of the way leading to the cessation of suffering. There are these four Noble Truths. Noble Ones penetrate them, that is why they are called “ Noble Truths ” ’ .
And furthermore they are Noble Truths since they are the Blessed One’s truths,
‘ Bhikkhus, in the world with its gods…the Perfect One is the Noble One. That is why they are called “ Noble Truths ” ’ .
Or alternatively, they are Noble Truths also owing to the establishment of nobleness by the discovery of them,
This is their word-meaning.
Now it is with the discovery and penetration of these Noble Truths that the severance of craving for being comes about,
‘ Bhikkhus, when this Noble Truth of suffering is discovered and penetrated, when this Noble Truth of the arising… when this Noble Truth of the cessation of suffering… When this Noble Truth of the way leading to the cessation of suffering is discovered and penetrated, then craving for being is severed, what leads to being is exhausted, now there is no more renewal of being ’ .
according as it is said
when a bhikkhu becomes completely dispassionate towards these four ideas, … he is one who makes an end of suffering here and now.
according as the bhikkhuni Kajangala said
when a bhikkhu completely maintains these four ideas in being in his cognizance, … he is one who makes an end of suffering here and now.
with whose discovery and penetration there comes to be severance of craving for being , or else because it is only completely answered 19 when answered in this way.
and whenever human beings see anything lovely, they say: ‘Sirs, it does credit to the gods of the Thirty-three!’
according as it is said
according as it is said
’ Bhikkhus, it is owing to the discovery of four Noble Truths as they actually are that a Perfect One is called Accomplished and fully enlightened ’ .
according as it is said
’ When this was said, good sir Moggallana, the Blessed One told me: ‘Here, ruler of gods … as in §3
So the teacher, being satisfied with the answer to his question, asked the further question Five is what? in the same manner as before.
Responding to the number ‘ five ’ the Elder replied Five categories of what is affected by clinging.
Herein, five is the delimitation by number.
Categories of what is affected by clinging are categories begotten by clinging or categories that are begetters of clinging.22
This is a term for what is described as follows: ‘ Any kind of form … feeling… perception… determinations… consciousness what- ever… that is affected by taints and productive of clinging ‘ .
And ‘five categories of what is affected by clinging ’ is stated here in the way already given , not because of the absence of other fives,
according as it is said
’ Bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu becomes completely dispassionate towards five ideas, … he is one who makes an end of suffering here and now.
So it was with reference to this that it was said earlier: Five questions, five indications, five answers ’ .
And here one who comprehends 23 the five categories by way of their rise and subsidence eventually realizes the Deathless by extinction owing to his obtainment of the Deathless by insight,
when a bhikkhu becomes completely dispassionate towards these five ideas, … he is one who makes an end of suffering here and now.
The five categories of what is affected by clinging:
What five?
according as it is said
‘ He comprehends the categories’ ‘ Rise and then their subsidence,
‘ There finding happiness and gladness ‘ Because he knows that to be deathless.’ 
So the teacher, being satisfied with the answer to his question, asked the further question Six is what? in the same manner as before.
Responding to the number ‘ six ’ the Elder replied Six bases in oneself.
Herein, six is the delimitation by number. They are connected in what has to do with oneself and occur in subordination to self , thus they are in-oneself .
They are bases because of actuating , because of being the range of the origin , and because of leading on the actuated suffering of the round of rebirths.24 This is a designation for eye, ear, nose, tongue, body, and mind.
And ‘ six bases in oneself ’ is stated here in the way already given , not because of the absence of other sixes,
according as it is said
What six?
The six bases in oneself:
So it was with reference to this that it w as said earlier: six questions, six indications, six answers ’ .
And one who comes to. dispassion by seeing them as void because of the words ‘ “ Void village ”, bhikkhus, is a designation for the six bases in oneself’ , and by seeing them as empty and deceptive because of their being as unlasting as bubbles, mirages, etc., eventually makes an end of suffering and passes beyond the vision of King Mortality,
‘ Bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu becomes completely dispassionate towards six ideas, … he is one who makes an end of suffering here and now.
when a bhikkhu becomes completely dispassionate towards these six ideas, … he is one who makes an end of suffering here and now.
according as it is said:
‘ And he that looks upon the world ‘ Regarding it as but a bubble,
‘ Regarding it as but a mirage, ‘ Is out of sight of Death the King ’ .
Then the venerable Maha Moggallana went to the Blessed One, and after paying homage to him, he sat down at one side
So the teacher, being satisfied with the answer to his question, asked the further question Seven is what?
Now although the seven Standpoints of Consciousness 25 are stated in the Principal Discourse on the Questions and Answers , nevertheless the Elder replied Seven Enlightenment factors, showing those ideas in virtue of which a bhikkhu makes an and of suffering by maintaining them in being in his cognizance.
And this meaning was confirmed by the Blessed One too,
‘ The bhikkhuni Kajangala is wise, householders, the bhikkhuni Kajangala has great understanding. Had you asked me the meaning of this, I should have given you the same answer as thr bhikkhuni Kajangala has done’ ,
it having been answered here by her as follows
What seven?
The seven enlightenment factors:
So it was with reference to this what it was said by the Blessed One: Seven questions, seven indications, seven answers’ .
That is how this meaning should be understood to have been confirmed by the Blessed One.
Herein, seven is the delimitation by number, denying either less or more.
Enlightenment factors is a designation for the ideas beginning with mindfulness.
Here is the word-meaning. Either it can be taken thus: By means of the harmony of the seven ideas known as mindfulness, investigation-of-ideas, energy, happiness, tranquillity, concentration, and onlooking-equammity, which are opposed to the several pitfalls consisting in indolence, agitation, stagnation and struggle , devotion to sensual pleasures and to self-mortification, insistence on annihilationism and etemalism, and arise at the moment of the mundane and supramundane path , a Noble Disciple is enlightened , thus it is enlightenment —what is meant is that he emerges from the sleep of the continuity of defilement, or that he penetrates the four Noble Truths, or that he realizes extinction—,
according as it is said ‘ He has discovered the supreme complete enlightenment by maintaining the seven enlightenment factors in being ’ .
Or else it can be taken thus: By means of the harmony of ideas of the kind already stated he is enlightened , thus the Noble Disciple is enlightenment also.
So they are enlightenment factors because they are factors of that harmony of ideas known as ‘ enlightenment ’ , being in that way analogous to the jhana factors and path factors; or else they are enlightenment factors also because they are factors of a Noble Disciple who is given the term of common usage ‘ enlightenment being in that way analogous to army factors, chariot factors, and so on.
Furthermore ‘Enlightenment factors: in what sense enlightenment factors?
They conduce to enlightenment, thus they are enlightenment factors; they are kept enlightened; they are left enlightened, thus they are enlightenment factors’ . the enlightenment-factor meaning of ‘ enlightenment factor ’ can be understood in the way stated in the Patisambhidamagga .
So by maintaining these seven enlightenment factors in being and developing them he soon obtains the special quality of entire dispassion, in virtue of which he is called ‘ one who makes an end of suffering here and now ’.
And this is said by the Blessed One:
according as it is said
‘Friends, when a bhikkhu completely maintains seven ideas in being in his cognizance… he is one who makes an end of suffering here and now.
when a bhikkhu completely maintains these seven ideas in being in his cognizance, he is one who makes an end of suffering here and how.
‘ Bhikkhus, these seven enlightenment factors, maintained in being and developed, conduce to entire dispassion, to fading of lust, to peace, to direct-knowledge, to full enlightenment, to extinction ’
So the teacher, being satisfied with the answer to his question, asked the further question Eight is what?
Now although the eight worldly ideas namely, gain, fame, censure, pleasure, and their opposites are stated in the Principal Discourse on the Questions and Answers , nevertheless the Elder replied The Noble Eightfold Path , showing those ideas in virtue of which a bhikkhu makes an end of suffering by maintaining them in being in his cognizance. But since there is no path apart from the eight factors, the mere eight factors being themselves the path, consequently with expertness in teaching he established that meaning when he answered as he did instead of saying ‘ the eight noble path-factors ’.
And this meaning and this method of teaching has been confirmed by the Blessed One,
‘ The bhikkhuni Kajangala is wise, householders,… Had you asked me the meaning of this, I should have given you the same answer as the bhikkhuni Kajangala has done ’ ,
it having been answered by her as follows:
So it was with reference to this that it was said by the Blessed One: Eight questions, eight indications, eight answers ’ .
That is how this meaning should be understood to have been confirmed by the Blessed One.
Herein, ‘noble ’ means ‘ to be relied on 26 by those seeking extinction ’ . Furthermore, ‘ noble ’ can be understood as c occurrence remote from defilements ’ , as ‘ reason for nobleness ’, and as ‘ obtainment of the noble fruitions’.
It has eight factors, thus it is ‘ eightfold ’ ;
Extinction is traced by it, or it itself is traced, or it goes killing defilements, thus it is the path .
A bhikkhu who maintains in being this eight-factored path classed thus as eightfold lances ignorance, produces true knowledge, and realizes extinction, and hence he is one who makes an end of suffering here and now.
And this is said:
Because the awn was rightly disposed—, so too, bhikkhus, with rightly disposed view, with rightly disposed maintenance of the path in being, it is possible that a bhikkhu will lance ignorance, produce true knowledge, and realize extinction ’ .
according as it is said
’ Friends, when a bhikkhu completely maintains eight ideas in being in his cognizance, … he is one who makes an end of suffering here and now. What eight? The Noble Eightfold Path: when a bhikkhu completely maintains these eight ideas in being in his cognizance.. he is one who makes an end of suffering here and now.
he abides contemplating impermanence in those feelings, contemplating fading away, contemplating cessation, contemplating relinquishment.
Contemplating thus, he does not cling to anything in the world.When he does not cling, he is not agitated.When he is not agitated, he personally attains Nibbana. He understands: “Birth is destroyed, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more coming to any state of being.”
and it must be understood as simply the factors themselves because it has no individual essence 27 apprehend- able by any attempt at analysing it out apart from its factors, as is likewise the case with the £ four-factored army ’ or the £ five- factored music’.
’ Bhikkhus, just as, if a rightly disposed rice-awn or wheat-awn is pressed upon by the hand or the foot, it is possible that the hand or foot will be lanced and blood will be produced
—Why is that?
So the teacher, being satisfied with the answer to his question, asked the further question Nine is what?
Responding to the number ‘ nine ’ the Eider replied Nine abodes of creatures.
Herein, nine is the delimitation by number.
Creatures : this means either the breathing things described derivatively upon categories bound up with the life-faculty, or else the description.
Creatures abide in these, thus they are abodes. Abodes of creatures: sattdvdsd—sattanam avasa .
That is the usual line of the teaching. But in meaning this is also a designation of the nine sorts of creatures,
according as it is said:
There are creatures with difference in body and unity in perception, namely, the gods of The High Divinity Body who are first to be reborn as such: 28 this is the second abode of creatures.
There are creatures with unity in body and difference in perception, namely, the Abhassara Gods: this is the third abode of creatures.
There are creatures without perception, experiencing no feeling, namely, the Gods who are Nonpercipient Creatures: this is the fifth abode of creatures.
There are creatures who, with the complete surmounting of perceptions of form, with the disappearance of perceptions of resistence, with not giving attention to perceptions of difference, aware that “ Space is infinite ”, have passed on to rebirth in the base consisting of infiniteness of space: this is the sixth abode of creatures.
There are creatures who, by completely surmounting the base consisting of infiniteness of space, aware that “ consciousness is infinite ”, have passed on to rebirth in the base consisting of infiniteness of consciousness: this is the seventh abode of creatures.
There are creatures who, by completely surmounting the base consisting of infiniteness of consciousness, aware that “ There is nothing at all ”, have passed on to rebirth in the base consisting of nothingness: this is the eighth abode of creatures.
There are creatures who, by completely surmounting the base consisting of nothingness, have passed on to rebirth in the base consisting of neither-perception-nor-non-perception: this is the ninth abode of creatures ‘ .
And the phrase ‘ nine abodes of creatures ‘ is stated here in the way already given , not because of the absence of other nines,
What nine?
The nine abodes of creatures:
So it was with reference to this that it was said earlier: nine questions, nine indications, nine answers ’ .
Now because of the words ‘ Nine ideas are to be fully known.
What nine?
The nine abodes of creatures ’ , he comes to dispassion towards the nine abodes of creatures by seeing them only as a bare compound of determinations, abandoning seeing 29 in them any everlasting, pleasant, beautiful, or self-state through the means firstly of Full-Knowledge as What is Known. 30 Then he causes his lust to fade out by contemplating impermanence in them, becomes liberated by contemplating suffering in them, and sees completely to the end of them by contemplating not-self in them, doing all three, secondly, through the means of Full- Knowledge as Judgment. Then he makes an end of suffering here and now by attaining rightness, 31 doing so, lastly, through the means of Full-Knowledge as Abandoning of wrongness.
That is why it was said
What nine?
The nine abodes of creatures ’ .
’ Friends, there are creatures with difference in body and difference in perception, namely, human beings, some gods, and some denizens of the states of deprivation: this is the first abode of creatures.
There are creatures with unity of body and unity of perception, namely, the Subhakinna Gods: this is the fourth abode of creatures.
according as it is said
‘ Bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu becomes completely dispassionate towards nine ideas,… he is one who makes an end of suffering here and now.
when a bhikkhu becomes completely dispassionate towards these nine ideas, he is one who makes an end of suffering here and now.
’ Bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu becomes completely dispassionate towards nine ideas, … he is one who makes an end of suffering here and now.
So the teacher, being satisfied with the answer to his question, asked the further question Ten is what?
In the Answers to Questions other than this the Ten Unprofitable Courses of Action 32 are given,
according as it is said
What ten?
The ten unprofitable courses of action:
So it was with reference to this that it was said earlier: ten questions, ten indications, ten answers ’ .
But although that is so, nevertheless here the venerable one, using the teaching in terms of a person, replied ‘He who is endowed with ten factors is declared an Arahant’, showing the attainment of those ten factors, in virtue of possessing which an Arahant is so called. He did so either because he wanted to declare final knowledge without citing himself, or else because the question is well answered when answered in this way, too.33
“ Adept, adept ” is said, venerable sir. How does a bhikkhu come to be called an adept?
— Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu is endowed with the adept’s right view, the adept’s right intention, the adept’s right speech, the adept’s right action, the adept’s right livelihood, the adept’s right effort, the adept’s right mindfulness, the adept’s right concentration, the adept’s right knowledge, and the adept’s right deliverance:
that is how a bhikkhu comes to be called an adept ’ .
should be understood according as they are stated in such discourses as that which follows .
in the Illustrator of Ultimate Meaning, the Commentary on the Minor Books
‘ Bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu becomes completely dispassionate towards ten ideas,…he is one who makes an end of suffering here and now.
when a bhikkhu becomes completely dispassionate towards these ten ideas,… he makes an end of suffering here and now.
Now these ten :
The explanation of the Boy’s Questions is ended.
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at SavatthI in Jeta’s Grove, Anathapindika’s Park.
Now on that occasion a pernicious view had arisen in a bhikkhu named Sati, son of a fisherman, thus: “As I understand the Dhamma taught by the Blessed One, it is this same consciousness that runs and wanders through the round of rebirths, not another.”
Then those bhikkhus, desiring to detach him from that pernicious view, pressed and questioned and cross-questioned him thus: “Friend Sati, do not say so. Do not misrepresent the Blessed One; it is not good to misrepresent the Blessed One. The Blessed One would not speak thus.
For in many discourses the Blessed One has stated consciousness to be dependency arisen, since without a condition there is no origination of consciousness.”
Yet although pressed and questioned and cross-questioned by those bhikkhus in this way, the bhikkhu Sati, son of a fisherman, still obstinately adhered to that pernicious view and continued to insist upon it.
Since the bhikkhus were unable to detach him from that pernicious view, they went to the Blessed One, and after paying homage to him, they sat down at one side
Then the Blessed One addressed a certain bhikkhu thus: “Come, bhikkhu, tell the bhikkhu Sati, son of a fisherman, in my name that the Teacher calls him.”
- “Yes, venerable sir,” he replied, and he went to the bhikkhu Sati and told him: “The Teacher calls you, friend Sati.”
“Yes, friend,” he replied, and he went to the Blessed One, and after paying homage to him, sat down at one side.
The Blessed One then asked him: “Sati, is it true that the following pernicious view has arisen in you: ‘As I understand the Dhamma taught by the Blessed One, it is this same consciousness that runs and wanders through the round of rebirths, not another’?”
“Exactly so, venerable sir. As I understand the Dhamma taught by the Blessed One, it is this same consciousness that runs and wanders through the round of rebirths, not another.”
“What is that consciousness, Sati?”
“Venerable sir, it is that which speaks and feels and experiences here and there the result of good and bad actions.”
“Misguided man, to whom have you ever known me to teach the Dhamma in that way?
Misguided man, in many discourses have I not stated consciousness to be dependency arisen, since without a condition there is no origination of consciousness?
But you, misguided man, have misrepresented us by your wrong grasp and injured yourself’and stored up much demerit;
Then the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus thus: “Bhikkhus, what do you think? Has this bhikkhu Sati, son of a fisherman, kindled even a spark of wisdom in this Dhamma and Discipline?”
“How could he, venerable sir?
No, venerable sir.”
When this was said, the bhikkhu Sati, son of a fisherman, sat silent, dismayed, with shoulders drooping and head down, glum, and without response.
Then, knowing this, the Blessed One told him: “Misguided man, you will be recognised by your own pernicious view.
I shall question the bhikkhus on this matter.”
Then the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus thus: “Bhikkhus, do you understand the Dhamma taught by me as this bhikkhu Sati, son of a fisherman, does when he misrepresents us by his wrong grasp and injures himself and stores up much demerit?”
“No, venerable sir.
For in many discourses the Blessed One has stated consciousness to be dependently arisen, since without a condition there is no origination of consciousness.”
“Good, bhikkhus.
It is good that you understand the Dhamma taught by me thus.
For in many discourses I have stated consciousness to be dependently arisen, since without a condition there is no origination of consciousness.
But this bhikkhu Sati, son of a fisherman, misrepresents us by his wrong grasp and injures himself and stores up much demerit;
 8. “Bhikkhus, consciousness is reckoned by the particular condition dependent upon which it arises.
When consciousness arises dependent on the eye and forms, it is reckoned as eyeconsciousness; when consciousness arises dependent on the ear and sounds, it is reckoned as ear-consciousness; when consciousness arises dependent on the nose and odours, it is reckoned as nose-consciousness; when consciousness arises dependent on the tongue and flavours, it is reckoned as tongueconsciousness; when consciousness arises dependent on the body and tangibles, it is reckoned as body-consciousness; when consciousness arises dependent on the mind and mind-objects, it is reckoned as mind-consciousness.
Just as fire is reckoned by the particular condition dependent on which it burns -
“Bhikkhus, do you see: ‘This has come to be’?
- “Yes, venerable sir.”
- “Bhikkhus, do you see: ‘Its origination occurs with that as nutriment’?”
- “Yes, venerable sir.”
- “Bhikkhus, do you see: ‘With the cessation of that nutriment, what has come to be is subject to cessation’?”
- “Yes, venerable sir.”
“Bhikkhus, does doubt arise when one is uncertain thus: ‘Has this come to be or not’?”
- “Yes, venerable sir.”
- “Bhikkhus, does doubt arise when one is uncertain thus: ‘Does its origination occur with that as nutriment or not’?”
- “Yes, venerable sir.”
- “Bhikkhus, does doubt arise when one is uncertain thus: ‘With the cessation of that nutriment, is what has come to be subject to cessation or not’?”
- “Yes, venerable sir.”
“Bhikkhus, is doubt abandoned in one who sees as it actually is with proper wisdom thus: ‘This has come to be’?”
- “Yes, venerable sir.”
- “Bhikkhus, is doubt abandoned in one who sees as it actually is with proper wisdom thus: ‘Its origination occurs with that as nutriment’?”
- “Yes, venerable sir.”
- “Bhikkhus, is doubt abandoned in one who sees as it actually is with proper wisdom thus: ‘With the cessation of that nutriment, what has come to be is subject to cessation’?”
- “Yes, venerable sir.”
“Bhikkhus, are you free from doubt here: “This has come to be’?”
- “Yes, venerable sir.”
- “Bhikkhus, are you free from doubt here: ‘Its origination occurs with that as nutriment’?”
- “Yes, venerable sir.”
- “Bhikkhus, are you free from doubt here: ‘With the cessation of that nutriment, what has come to be is subject to cessation’?”
- “Yes, venerable sir.”
“Bhikkhus, has it been seen well by you as it actually is with proper wisdom thus: ‘This has come to be’?”
- “Yes, venerable sir.”
- “Bhikkhus, has it been seen well by you as it actually is with proper wisdom thus: ‘Its origination occurs with that as nutriment’?”
- “Yes, venerable sir.”
- “Bhikkhus, has it been seen well by you as it actually is with proper wisdom thus: ‘With the cessation of that nutriment, what has come to be is subject to cessation’?”
- “Yes, venerable sir.”
“Bhikkhus, purified and bright as this view is, if you adhere to it, cherish it, treasure it, and treat it as a possession, would you then understand the Dhamma that has been taught as similar to a raft, being for the purpose of crossing over, not for the purpose of grasping?”
- “No, venerable sir.”
- “Bhikkhus, purified and bright as this view is, if you do not adhere to it, cherish it, treasure it, and treat it as a possession, would you then understand the Dhamma that has been taught as similar to a raft, being for the purpose of crossing over, not for the purpose of grasping?”
- “Yes, venerable sir.”
 15. “Bhikkhus, there are these four kinds of nutriment for the maintenance of beings that already have come to be and for the support of those seeking a new existence.
What four?
They are: physical food as nutriment, gross or subtle; contact as the second; mental volition as the third; and consciousness as the fourth.
These four kinds of nutriment have craving as their source, craving as their origin; they are born and produced from craving.
And this craving has what as its source…?
Craving has feeling as its source…
Feeling has contact as its source…
Contact has the sixfold base as its source…
The sixfold base has mentality-materiality as its source…
Mentalitymateriality has consciousness as its source…
Consciousness has formations as its source…
Formations have ignorance as their source, ignorance as their origin; they are born and produced from ignorance.
 17. “So, bhikkhus, with ignorance as condition, formations come to be; with formations as condition, consciousness; with consciousness as condition, mentality-materiality; with mentalitymateriality as condition, the sixfold base; with the sixfold base as condition, contact; with contact as condition, feeling; with feeling as condition, craving; with craving as condition, clinging; with clinging as condition, being; with being as condition, birth; with birth as condition, ageing and death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair come to be.
 18. “‘With birth as condition, ageing and death’: so it was said. Now, bhikkhus, do ageing and death have birth as condition or not, or how do you take it in this case?”
“Ageing and death have birth as condition, venerable sir. Thus we take it in this case: ‘With birth as condition, ageing and death.’“
“‘With being as condition, birth’: so it was said. Now, bhikkhus, does birth have being as condition or not, or how do you take it in this case?
“Birth has being as condition, venerable sir. Thus we take it in this case: ‘With being as condition, birth.’“
‘“With clinging as condition, being’: so it was said. Now, bhikkhus, does being have clinging as condition or not, or how do you take it in this case?”
“Being has clinging as condition, venerable sir. Thus we take it in this case: ‘With clinging as condition, being.’“
‘“With craving as condition, clinging’: so it was said. Now, bhikkhus, does clinging have craving as condition or not, or how do you take it in this case?”
“Clinging has craving as condition, venerable sir. Thus we take it in this case: ‘With craving as condition, clinging.’“
‘“With feeling as condition, craving’: so it was said. Now, bhikkhus, does craving have feeling as condition or not, or how do you take it in this case?”
“Craving has feeling as condition, venerable sir. Thus we take it in this case: ‘With feeling as condition, craving.’“
“‘With contact as condition, feeling’: so it was said. Now, bhikkhus, does feeling have contact as condition or not, or how do you take it in this case?”
“Feeling has contact as condition, venerable sir. Thus we take it in this case: ‘With contact as condition, feeling.’“
‘“With the sixfold base as condition, contact’: so it was said. Now, bhikkhus, does contact have the sixfold base as condition or not, or how do you take it in this case?”
“Contact has the sixfold base as condition, venerable sir. Thus we take it in this case: ‘With the sixfold base as condition, contact,’”
“‘With mentality-materiality as condition, the sixfold base’: so it was said. Now, bhikkhus, does the sixfold base have mentality- materiality as condition or not, or how do you take it in this case?”
“The sixfold base has mentality-materiality as condition, venerable sir. Thus we take it in this case: ‘With mentality-materiality as condition, the sixfold base.’“
‘“With consciousness as condition, mentality-materiality’: so it was said. Now, bhikkhus, does mentality-materiality have consciousness as condition or not, or how do you take it in this case?”
“Mentality-materiality has consciousness as condition, venerable sir. Thus we take it in this case: ‘With consciousness as condition, mentality-materiality.’“
‘“With formations as condition, consciousness’: so it was said. Now, bhikkhus, does consciousness have formations as condition or not, or how do you take it in this case?”
“Consciousness has formations as condition, venerable sir. Thus we take it in this case: ‘With formations as condition, consciousness.’“
‘“With ignorance as condition, formations’: so it was said. Now, bhikkhus, do formations have ignorance as condition or not, or how do you take it in this case?”
“Formations have ignorance as condition, venerable sir. Thus we take it in this case: ‘With formations as condition, ignorance.’“
 19. “Good, bhikkhus.
So you say thus, and I also say thus: ‘When this exists, that comes to be; with the arising of this, that arises.’ That is, with ignorance as condition, formations come to be; with formations as condition, consciousness; with consciousness as condition, mentality-materiality; with mentalitymateriality as condition, the sixfold base; with the sixfold base as condition, contact; with contact as condition, feeling; with feeling as condition, craving; with craving as condition, clinging;with clinging as condition, being; with being as condition, birth; with birth as condition, ageing and death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair come to be.
Such is the origin of this whole mass of suffering.
 20. “But with the remainderless fading away and cessation of ignorance comes cessation of formations; with the cessation of formations, cessation of consciousness; with the cessation of consciousness, cessation of mentality-materiality; with the cessation of mentality-materiality, cessation of the sixfold base; with the cessation of the sixfold base, cessation of contact; with the cessation of contact, cessation of feeling; with the cessation of feeling, cessation of craving; with the cessation of craving, cessation of clinging; with the cessation of clinging, cessation of being; with the cessation of being, cessation of birth; with the cessation of birth, ageing and death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair cease.
Such is the cessation of this whole mass of suffering.
 21. “‘With the cessation of birth, cessation of ageing and death’: so it was said. Now, bhikkhus, do ageing and death cease with the cessation of birth or not, or how do you take it in this case?”
“Ageing and death cease with the cessation of birth, venerable sir. Thus we take it in this case: ‘With the cessation of birth, cessation of ageing and death.’“
“‘With the cessation of being, cessation of birth’…
“Formations cease with the cessation of ignorance, venerable sir. Thus we take it in this case: ‘With the cessation of ignorance, cessation of formations.’“
 22. “Good, bhikkhus.
So you say thus, and I also say thus: ‘When this does not exist, that does not come to be; with the cessation of this, that ceases.’ That is, with the cessation of ignorance comes cessation of formations; with the cessation of formations, cessation of consciousness; with the cessation of consciousness, cessation of mentality-materiality; with the cessation of mentality-materiality, cessation of the sixfold base; with the cessation of the sixfold base, cessation of contact; with the cessation of contact, cessation of feeling; with the cessation of feeling, cessation of craving; with the cessation of craving, cessation of clinging; with the cessation of clinging, cessation of being; with the cessation of being, cessation of birth; with the cessation of birth, ageing and death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair cease.
Such is the cessation of this whole mass of suffering.
 23. “Bhikkhus, knowing and seeing in this way, would you run back to the past thus: ‘Were we in the past? Were we not in the past? What were we in the past? How were we in the past? Having been what, what did we become in the past?”
- “No, venerable sir.”
- “Knowing and seeing in this way, would you run forward to the future thus: ‘Shall we be in the future? Shall we not be in the future? What shall we be in the future? How shall we be in the future? Having been what, what shall we become in the future?”
- “No, venerable sir.”
- “Knowing and seeing in this way, would you now be inwardly perplexed about the present thus: ‘Am I? Am I not? What am I? How am I? Where has this being come from? Where will it go?”
“No, venerable sir.”
“Bhikkhus, knowing and seeing in this way, would you speak thus: ‘The Teacher is respected by us. We speak as we do out of respect for the Teacher’?”
- “No, venerable sir.”
“Knowing and seeing in this way, would you speak thus: ‘The Recluse says this, and so do other recluses, but we do not speak thus’?”
- “No, venerable sir.”
- “Knowing and seeing in this way, would you acknowledge another teacher?”
- “No, venerable sir.”
- “Knowing and seeing in this way, would you return to the observances, tumultuous debates, and auspicious signs of ordinary recluses and brahmins, taking them as the core of the holy life?
- “No, venerable sir.”
- “Do you speak only of what you have known, seen, and understood for yourselves?”
- “Yes, venerable sir.”
“Good, bhikkhus. So you have been guided by me with this Dhamma, which is visible here and now, immediately effective, inviting inspection, onward leading, to be experienced by the wise for themselves.
For it was with reference to this that it has been said: ‘Bhikkhus, this Dhamma is visible here and now, immediately effective, inviting inspection, onward leading, to be experienced by the wise for themselves.’
 26. “Bhikkhus, the conception of an embryo in a womb takes place through the union of three things.
Here, there is the union of the mother and father, and it is the mother’s season, but the being to be reborn is not present - in this case too there is no conception of an embryo in a womb.
But when there is the union of the mother and father, and it is the mother’s season, and the being to be reborn is present, through the union of these three things the conception of an embryo in a womb takes place.
“The mother then carries the embryo in her womb for nine or ten months with much anxiety, as a heavy burden.
Then, at the end of nine or ten months, the mother gives birth with much anxiety, as a heavy burden.
Then, when the child is born, she nourishes it with her own blood;
“When he grows up and his faculties mature, the child plays at such games as toy ploughs, tipcat, somersaults, toy windmills, toy measures, toy cars, and a toy bow and arrow.
“When he grows up and his faculties mature still further, the youth enjoys himself provided and endowed with the five cords of sensual pleasure, with forms cognizable by the eye… sounds cognizable by the ear…odours cognizable by the nose… flavours cognizable by the tongue…tangibles cognizable by the body that are wished for, desired, agreeable and likeable, connected with sensual desire, and provocative of lust.
 30. “On seeing a form with the eye, he lusts after it if it is pleasing; he dislikes it if it is unpleasing.
He abides with mindfulness of the body unestablished, with a limited mind, and he does not understand as it actually is the deliverance of mind and deliverance by wisdom wherein those evil unwholesome states cease without remainder.
Engaged as he is in favouring and opposing, whatever feeling he feels - whether pleasant or painful or neither-painfulnor- pleasant - he delights in that feeling, welcomes it, and remains holding to it.
As he does so, delight arises in him. Now delight in feelings is clinging.
With his clinging as condition, being comes to be; with being as condition, birth; with birth as condition, ageing and death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair come to be.
Such is the origin of this whole mass of suffering.
“On hearing a sound with the ear…On smelling an odour with the nose…On tasting a flavour with the tongue…On touching a tangible with the body…On cognizing a mind-object with the mind, he lusts after it if it is pleasing; he dislikes it if it is unpleasing.
Now delight in feelings is clinging. With his clinging as condition, being comes to be; with being as condition, birth; with birth as condition, ageing and death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair come to be.
Such is the origin of this whole mass of suffering.
went to the bhikkhu Sati and asked him: “Friend Sati, is it true that such a pernicious view has arisen in you?”
“Exactly so, friends. As I understand the Dhamma taught by the Blessed One, it is this same consciousness that runs and wanders through the round of rebirths, not another.”
When it is liberated there comes the knowledge: ‘It is liberated.’
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the venerable Ananda was living at Rajagaha in the Bamboo Grove, the Squirrels’ Sanctuary, not long after the Blessed One had attained to final Nibbana.1031
Suppose I went to the brahmin Gopaka Moggallana at his workplace.”
So the venerable Ananda went to the brahmin Gopaka Moggallana at his workplace.
The brahmin Gopaka Moggallana saw the venerable Ananda coming in the distance
and said to him: “Let Master Ananda come!
It is long since Master Ananda found an opportunity to come here.
Let Master Ananda be seated; this seat is ready.”
The venerable Ananda sat down on the seat made ready.
The brahmin Gopaka Moggallana took a low seat, sat down at one side,
“There is no single bhikkhu, brahmin, who possesses in each and every way all those qualities that were possessed by the Blessed One, accomplished and fully enlightened.
For the Blessed One was the arouser of the unarisen path, the producer of the unproduced path, the declarer of the undeclared path; he was the knower of the path, the finder of the path, the one skilled in the path. But his disciples now abide following that path and become possessed of it afterwards.”
But this discussion between the venerable Ananda and the brahmin Gopaka Moggallana was interrupted;
for then the brahmin Vassakara, the minister of Magadha,1033 while supervising the work at Rajagaha, went to the venerable Ananda at the workplace of the brahmin Gopaka Moggallana. He exchanged greetings with the venerable Ananda,
and asked the venerable Ananda: “For what discussion are you sitting together here now, Master Ananda? And what was your discussion that was interrupted?”
“Brahmin, the brahmin Gopaka Moggallana asked me: ‘Master Ananda, is there any single bhikkhu who possesses in each and every way all those qualities that were possessed by Master Gotama, accomplished and fully enlightened?”
I replied to the brahmin Gopaka Moggallana: ‘There is no single bhikkhu, brahmin, who possesses in each and every way all those qualities that were possessed by the Blessed One, accomplished and fully enlightened.
For the Blessed One was the arouser of the unarisen path …But his disciples now abide following that path and become possessed of it afterwards.’
This was our discussion that was interrupted
“Is there, Master Ananda, any single bhikkhu who was appointed by Master Gotama thus: ‘He will be your refuge when I am gone,’ and whom you now have recourse to?”
“There is no single bhikkhu, brahmin, who was appointed by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, thus: ‘He will be your refuge when I am gone,’ and whom we now have recourse to.”
“But is there, Master Ananda, any single bhikkhu who has been chosen by the Sangha and appointed by a number of elder bhikkhus thus: ‘He will be our refuge after the Blessed One has gone,’ and whom you now have recourse to?”
“There is no single bhikkhu, brahmin, who has been chosen by the Sangha and appointed by a number of elder bhikkhus thus: ‘He will be our refuge after the Blessed One has gone,’ and whom we now have recourse to.”
“But if you have no refuge, Master Ananda, what is the cause for your concord?”
“We are not without a refuge, brahmin. We have a refuge; we have the Dhamma as our refuge.”
“But when you were asked: ‘Is there, Master Ananda, any single bhikkhu who was appointed by Master Gotama thus: “He will be your refuge when I am gone,” and whom you now have recourse to? ‘ you answered: ‘There is no such single bhikkhu… whom we now have recourse to.’ When you were asked: ‘Is there, Master Ananda, any single bhikkhu who has been chosen by the Sangha and appointed by a number of elder bhikkhus thus: “He will be our refuge after the Blessed One has gone,” and whom you now have recourse to? ‘ you answered: “There is no such single bhikkhu… …whom we now have recourse to.’ When you were asked: ‘But if you have no refuge, Master Ananda, what is the cause for your concord? ‘ you answered: ‘We are not without a refuge, brahmin. We have a refuge; we have the Dhamma as our refuge.’
Now how should the meaning of these statements be regarded, Master Ananda?”
“Brahmin, the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, has prescribed the course of training for bhikkhus and he has laid down the Patimokkha.
On the Uposatha day as many of us as live in dependence upon a single village district meet together in unison, and when we meet we ask one who knows the Patimokkha to recite it.
If a bhikkhu remembers an offence or a transgression while the Patimokkha is being recited, we deal with him according to the Dhamma in the way we have been instructed.
It is not the worthy ones who deal with us; it is the Dhamma that deals with us.”1034
“Is there, Master Ananda, any single bhikkhu whom you now honour, respect, revere, and venerate, and on whom you live in dependence honouring and respecting him?”
“There is a single bhikkhu, brahmin, whom we now honour, respect, revere, and venerate, and on whom we live in dependence honouring and respecting him.”
“But when you were asked: ‘Is there, Master Ananda, any single bhikkhu who was appointed by Master Gotama…? ‘ you answered ‘There is no such single bhikkhu…’ When you were asked: ‘Is there, Master Ananda, any single bhikkhu who has been chosen by the Sangha…? ‘ you answered: ‘There is no such single bhikkhu…’ When you were asked: ‘Is there, Master Ananda, any single bhikkhu whom you honour, respect, revere, and venerate, and on whom you live in dependence honouring and respecting him? ‘ you answered: ‘There is such a single bhikkhu whom we now honour…and on whom we live in dependence honouring and respecting him.’
Now how should the meaning of these statements be regarded, Master Ananda?”
“There are, brahmin, ten qualities inspiring confidence that have been declared by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened.
When these qualities are found in anyone among us, we honour, respect, revere, and venerate him, and live in dependence on him honouring and respecting him.
What are the ten?
“Here, brahmin, a bhikkhu is virtuous, he dwells restrained with the restraint of the Patimokkha, he is perfect in conduct and resort, and seeing fear in the slightest faults, he trains himself by undertaking the framing precepts.
“He has learned much, remembers what he has learned, and consolidates what he has learned.
Such teachings as are good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing, and which affirm a holy life that is utterly perfect and pure - such teachings as these he has learned much of, remembered, mastered verbally, investigated with the mind, and penetrated well by view.
“He is content with his robes, almsfood, resting place, and medicinal requisites.
“He obtains at will, without trouble or difficulty, the four jhanas that constitute the higher mind and provide a pleasant abiding here and now.
“He wields the various kinds of supernormal power: having been one, he becomes many; having been many, he becomes one; he appears and vanishes; he goes unhindered through a wall, through an enclosure, through a mountain as though through space; he dives in and out of the earth as though it were water; he walks on water without sinking as though it were earth; seated cross-legged, he travels in space like a bird; with his hand he touches and strokes the moon and sun so powerful and mighty; he wields bodily mastery even as far as the Brahma-world.
“With the divine ear element, which is purified and surpasses the human, he hears both kinds of sounds, the divine and the human, those that are far as well as near.
“He understands the minds of other beings, of other persons, having encompassed them with his own mind.
He understands a mind affected by lust as affected by lust and a mind unaffected by lust as unaffected by lust; he understands a mind affected by hate as affected by hate and a mind unaffected by hate as unaffected by hate; he understands a mind affected by delusion as affected by delusion and a mind unaffected by delusion as unaffected by delusion; he understands a contracted mind as contracted and a distracted mind as distracted; he understands an exalted mind as exalted and an unexalted mind as unexalted; he understands a surpassed mind as surpassed and an unsurpassed mind as unsurpassed; he understands a concentrated mind as concentrated and an unconcentrated mind as unconcentrated; he understands a liberated mind as liberated and an unliberated mind as unliberated.
“He recollects his manifold past lives, that is, one birth, two births…
“With the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, he sees beings passing away and reappearing, ‘inferior and superior, fair and ugly, fortunate and unfortunate, and he understands how beings pass on according to their actions.
“By realising for himself with direct knowledge, he here and now enters upon and abides in the deliverance of mind and deliverance by wisdom that are taintless with the destruction of the taints.
“These, brahmin, are the ten qualities inspiring confidence that have been declared by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened.
When these qualities are found in anyone among us, we honour, respect, revere, and venerate him, and live in dependence on him honouring and respecting him.”
When this was said, the brahmin Vassakara, the minister of Magadha, said to General Upananda: “What do you think, general? When these worthy ones honour one who should be honoured, respect one who should be respected, revere one who should be revered, and venerate one who should be venerated,
For if these worthy ones did not honour, respect, revere, and venerate such a person, then whom could they honour, respect, revere, and venerate, and on whom could they live in dependence honouring and respecting?”
Then the brahmin Vassakara, the minister of Magadha, said to the venerable Ananda: “Where is Master Ananda living now?”
“Now I am living in the Bamboo Grove, brahmin.”
“I hope, Master Ananda, that the Bamboo Grove is pleasant, quiet and undisturbed by voices, with an atmosphere of seclusion, remote from people, favourable for retreat.”
“Indeed, brahmin, that the Bamboo Grove is pleasant… favourable for retreat is because of such guardian protectors as yourself.”
“Indeed, Master Ananda, that the Bamboo Grove is pleasant… favour able for retreat is because of the worthy ones who are meditators and cultivate meditation.
The worthy ones are meditators and cultivate meditation.
On one occasion, Master Ananda, Master Gotama was living at Vesali in the Hall with the Peaked Roof in the Great Wood.
Then I went there and approached Master Gotama,
Master Gotama was a meditator and cultivated meditation,
“The Blessed One, brahmin, did not praise every type of meditation, nor did he condemn every type of meditation.
What kind of meditation did the Blessed One not praise?
Here, brahmin, someone abides with his mind obsessed by sensual lust, a prey to sensual lust, and he does not understand as it actually is the escape from arisen sensual lust.
While he harbours sensual lust within, he meditates, premeditates, out-meditates, and mismeditates.1035 He abides with his mind obsessed by ill will, a prey to ill will…
While he harbours doubt within, he meditates, premeditates, out-meditates, and mismeditates.
The Blessed One did not praise that kind of meditation.
“And what kind of meditation did the Blessed One praise?
Here, brahmin, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the first jhana…
“It seems, Master Ananda, that Master Gotama censured that kind of meditation that should be censured and praised that kind of meditation that should be praised.
And now, Master Ananda, we depart. We are busy and have much to do.”
“Now is the time, brahmin, to do as you think fit.”
Then the brahmin Vassakara, the minister of Magadha, having delighted and rejoiced in the venerable Ananda’s words, rose from his seat and departed.
Then, soon after he had left, the brahmin Gopaka Moggallana said to the venerable Ananda: “Master Ananda has not yet answered what we asked him.”
“Did we not tell you, brahmin: ‘There is no single bhikkhu, brahmin, who possesses in each and every way all those qualities that were possessed by the Blessed One, accomplished and fully enlightened.
For the Blessed One was the arouser of the unarisen path, the producer of the unproduced path, the declarer of the undeclared path; he was the knower of the path, the finder of the path, the one skilled in the path.
But his disciples now abide following that path and become possessed of it afterwards’?”
Now on that occasion King Ajatasattu Vedehiputta of Magadha, being suspicious of King Pajjota, was having Rajagaha fortified.1032
Then, when it was morning, the venerable Ananda dressed, and taking his bowl and outer robe, went into Rajagaha for alms.
Then the venerable Ananda thought: “It is still too early to wander for alms in Rajagaha.
adding: “Venerable sir, since we could not detach the bhikkhu Sati, son of a fisherman, from this pernicious view, we have reported this matter to the Blessed One.”
and told him all that had occurred,
for this will lead to your harm and suffering for a long time.”
for this will lead to the harm and suffering of this misguided man for a long time.
when fire burns dependent on logs, it is reckoned as a log fire; when fire burns dependent on faggots, it is reckoned as a faggot fire; when fire bums dependent on grass, it is reckoned as a grass fire; when fire burns dependent on cowdung, it is reckoned as a cowdung fire; when fire burns dependent on chaff, it is reckoned as a chaff fire; when fire burns dependent on rubbish, it is reckoned as a rubbish fire -
so too, consciousness is reckoned by the particular condition dependent on which it arises.
When consciousness arises dependent on the eye and forms, it is reckoned as eye-consciousness
…when consciousness arises dependent on the mind and mind-objects, it is reckoned as mind-consciousness.
“Now, bhikkhus, these four kinds of nutriment have what as their source, what as their origin, from what are they born and produced?
And this feeling has what as its source…?
And this contact has what as its source…?
And this sixfold base has what as its source…?
And this mentality-materiality has what as its source…?
And this consciousness has what as its source…?
And these formations have what as their source, what as their origin, from what are they born and produced?
Such is the origin of this whole mass of suffering.
‘With the cessation of clinging, cessation of being’…
‘With the cessation of craving, cessation of cimging’…’
With the cessation of feeling, cessation of craving’…
‘With the cessation of contact, cessation of feeling’ …’
With the cessation of the sixfold base, cessation of contact’…
‘With the cessation of mentality-materiality, cessation of the sixfold base’…
‘With the cessation of consciousness, cessation of mentality-materiality’…
‘With the cessation of formations, cessation of consciousness’…
‘With the cessation of ignorance, cessation of formations’: so it was said. Now, bhikkhus, do formations cease with the cessation of ignorance or not, or how do you take it in this case?”
Here, there is the union of the mother and father, but it is not the mother’s season, and the being to be reborn is not present - in this case there is no conception of an embryo in a womb.
for the mother’s breast-milk is called blood in the Noble One’s Discipline.
 31-38. “Here, bhikkhus, a Tathagata appears in the world, accomplished, fully enlightened… 268-69
“Having thus abandoned these five hindrances, imperfections of the mind that weaken wisdom, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, he enters upon and abides in the first jhana…
With the stilling of applied and sustained thought, he enters upon and abides in the second jhana…With the fading away as well of rapture…he enters upon and abides in the third jhana…With the abandoning of pleasure and pain…he enters upon and abides in the fourth jhana…which has neither-pain-nor-pleasure and purity of mindfulness due to equanimity.
 40. “On seeing a form with the eye, he does not lust after it if it is pleasing; he does not dislike it if it is unpleasing. He abides with mindfulness of the body established, with an immeasurable mind,
and he understands as it actually is the deliverance of mind and deliverance by wisdom wherein those evil unwholesome states cease without remainder.
Having thus abandoned favouring and opposing, whatever feeling he feels, whether pleasant or painful or neither-painful-nor-pleasant, he does not delight in that feeling, welcome it, or remain holding to it.
With the cessation of his delight comes cessation of clinging; with the cessation of clinging, cessation of being; with the cessation of being, cessation of birth; with the cessation of birth, ageing and death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair cease.
Such is the cessation of this whole mass of suffering.
“Bhikkhus, remember this deliverance through the destruction of craving as taught in brief by me. But the bhikkhu Sati, son of a fisherman, is caught up in a vast net of craving, in the trammel of craving.”
That is what the Blessed One said.
The bhikkhus were satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
As he does not do so, delight in feelings ceases in him.
“On hearing a sound with the ear… On smelling an odour with the nose… On tasting a flavour with the tongue… On touching a tangible with the body. On cognizing a mind-object with the mind,
Such is the cessation of this whole mass of suffering.
With the cessation of his delight comes cessation of clinging; with the cessation of clinging, cessation of being; with the cessation of being, cessation of birth; with the cessation of birth, ageing and death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair cease.
he does not lust after it if it is pleasing; he does not dislike it if it is unpleasing.
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at SavatthI in Jeta’s Grove, Anathapindika’s Park.
Now a good report of Master Gotama has been spread to this effect: ‘That Blessed One is accomplished, fully enlightened, perfect in true knowledge and conduct, sublime, knower of worlds, incomparable leader of persons to be tamed, teacher of gods and humans, enlightened, blessed.
He declares this world with its gods, its Maras, and its Brahmas, this generation with its recluses and brahmins, its princes and its people, which he has himself realised with direct knowledge.
He teaches the Dhamma good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing, and he reveals a holy life that is utterly perfect and pure.’
Now it is good to see such arahants.”
Then the brahmin householders of Veranja went to the Blessed One. Some paid homage to the Blessed One and sat down at one side; some exchanged greetings with him, and when this courteous and amiable talk was finished, sat down at one side; some extended their hands in reverential salutation towards the Blessed One and sat down at one side; some pronounced their name and clan in the Blessed One’s presence and sat down at one side; some kept silent and sat down at one side.
When they were seated, they said to the Blessed One: “Master Gotama, what is the cause and condition why some beings here, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappear in states of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, even in hell?
And what is the cause and condition why some beings here, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappear in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world? “
“Householders, it is by reason of conduct not in accordance with the Dhamma, by reason of unrighteous conduct that some beings here, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappear in states of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, even in hell.
It is by reason of conduct in accordance with the Dhamma, by reason of righteous conduct that some beings here, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappear in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world.”
“We do not understand the detailed meaning of Master Gotama’s utterance, which he has spoken in brief without expounding the detailed meaning.
It would be good if Master Gotama would teach us the Dhamma so that we might understand the detailed meaning of his utterance.”
“Then, householders, listen and attend closely to what I shall say.”
“Yes, venerable sir,” they replied.
The Blessed One said this:
“Householders, there are three ways in which one does not observe bodily conduct in accordance with the Dhamma, one of unrighteous conduct, four ways in which one does not observe verbal conduct in accordance with the Dhamma, one of unrighteous conduct, three ways in which one does not observe mental conduct in accordance with the Dhamma, one of unrighteous conduct.
“And how, householders, in three ways one does not observe bodily conduct in accordance with the Dhamma, one of unrighteous conduct?
Here someone kills living beings;
he is murderous, bloodyhanded, given to blows and violence, merciless to living beings.
He takes what is not given;
he takes by way of theft the wealth and property of others in the village or forest.
He misconducts himself in sensual pleasures;
he has intercourse with women who are protected by their mother, father, mother and father, brother, sister, or relatives, who have a husband, who are protected by law, and even with those who are garlanded in token of betrothal.
That is how in three ways one does not observe bodily conduct in accordance with the Dhamma, one of unrighteous conduct.
“And how, householders, in four ways one does not observe verbal conduct in accordance with the Dhamma, one of unrighteous conduct?
Here someone speaks falsehood;
when summoned to a court, or to a meeting, or to his relatives’ presence, or to his guild, or to the royal family’s presence, and questioned as a witness thus: ‘So, good man, tell what you know,’ not knowing, he says, ‘I know,’ or knowing, he says, ‘I do not know’; not seeing, he says, ‘I see.’ or seeing, he says, ‘I do not see’;in full awareness he speaks falsehood for his own ends, or for another’s ends, or for some trifling worldly end.
He speaks maliciously;
he repeats elsewhere what he has heard here in order to divide those people from these, or he repeats to these people what he has heard elsewhere in order to divide these people from those;thus he is one who divides those who are united, a creator of divisions, who enjoys discord, rejoices in discord, delights in discord, a speaker of words that create discord.
He speaks harshly;
he utters such words as are rough, hard, hurtful to others, offensive to others, bordering on anger, unconducive to concentration.
He is a gossip;
he speaks at the wrong time, speaks what is not fact, speaks what is useless, speaks contrary to the Dhamma and the Discipline;at the wrong time he speaks such words as are worthless, unreasonable, immoderate, and unbeneficial.
That is how in four ways one does not observe verbal conduct in accordance with the Dhamma, one of unrighteous conduct.
“And how, householders, in three ways one does not observe mental conduct in accordance with the Dhamma, one of unrighteous conduct?
Here someone is covetous; he covets the wealth and property of others thus: ‘Oh, may what belongs to another be mine! ‘
Or he has a mind of ill will and intentions of hate thus: ‘May these beings be slain and slaughtered, may they be cut off, perish, or be annihilated!’
Or he has wrong view, distorted vision, thus: ‘There is nothing given, nothing offered, nothing sacrificed; no fruit or result of good and bad actions; no this world, no other world; no mother, no father; no beings who are reborn spontaneously; no good and virtuous recluses and brahmins in the world who have themselves realised by direct knowledge and declare this world and the other world.’
That is how in three ways one does not observe mental conduct in accordance with the Dhamma, one of unrighteous conduct.
So, householders, it is by reason of such conduct not in accordance with the Dhamma, by reason of such unrighteous conduct that some beings here on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappear in states of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, even in hell.
“Householders, there are three ways in which one observes bodily conduct in accordance with the Dhamma, one of righteous conduct, four ways in which one observes verbal conduct in accordance with the Dhamma, one of righteous conduct, three ways in which one observes mental conduct in accordance with the Dhamma, one of righteous conduct.
“And how, householders, in three ways one observes bodily conduct in accordance with the Dhamma, one of righteous conduct?
Here someone, abandoning the killing of living beings, abstains from killing living beings; with rod and weapon laid aside, gentle and kindly, he abides compassionate to all living beings.
Abandoning the taking of what is not given, he abstains from taking what is not given;he does not take by way of theft the wealth and property of others in the village or in the forest.
Abandoning misconduct in sensual pleasures, he abstains from misconduct in sensual pleasures;he does not have intercourse with women who are protected by their mother, father, mother and father, brother, sister, or relatives, who have a husband, who are protected by law, or with those who are garlanded in token of betrothal.
That is how in three ways one observes bodily conduct in accordance with the Dhamma, one of righteous conduct.
“And how, householders, in four ways one observes verbal conduct in accordance with the Dhamma, one of righteous conduct?
Here someone, abandoning false speech, abstains from false speech
when summoned to a court, or to a meeting, or to his relatives’ presence, or to his guild, or to the royal family’s presence, and questioned as a witness thus: ‘So, good man, tell what you know.’ not knowing, he says, ‘I do not know.’ or knowing, he says, ‘I know’; not seeing, he says, ‘I do not see.’ or seeing, he says, ‘I see’;he does not in full awareness speak falsehood for his own ends, or for another’s ends, or for some trifling worldly end.
Abandoning malicious speech, he abstains from malicious speech;he does not repeat elsewhere what he has heard here in order to divide those people from these, nor does he repeat to these people what he has heard elsewhere in order to divide these people from those; thus he is one who reunites those who are divided, a promoter of friendships, who enjoys concord, rejoices in concord, delights in concord, a speaker of words that promote concord.
Abandoning harsh speech, he abstains from harsh speech; he speaks such words as are gentle, pleasing to the ear, and loveable, as go to the heart, are courteous, desired by many, and agreeable to many.
Abandoning gossip, fie abstains from gossip;he speaks at the right time, speaks what is fact, speaks on what is good, speaks on the Dhamma and the Discipline; at the right time he speaks such words as are worth recording, reasonable, moderate, and beneficial.
That is how in four ways one observes verbal conduct in accordance with the Dhamma, one of righteous conduct.
“And how, householders, in three ways one observes mental conduct in accordance with the Dhamma, one of righteous conduct?
Here someone is not covetous;
he does not covet the wealth and property of others thus: ‘Oh, may what belongs to another be mine!
’ His mind is without ill will and he has intentions free from hate thus: ‘May these beings be free from enmity, affliction and anxiety! May they live happily!
’ He has right view, undistorted vision, thus: ‘There is what is given and what is offered and what is sacrificed; there is fruit and result of good and bad actions; there is this world and the other world; there is mother and father; there are beings who are reborn spontaneously; there are good and virtuous recluses and brahmins in the world who have themselves realised by direct knowledge and declare this world and the other world.’
That is how in three ways one observes mental conduct in accordance with the Dhamma, one of righteous conduct.
So, householders, it is by reason of such conduct in accordance with the Dhamma, by reason of such righteous conduct that some beings here, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappear in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world.
“If, householders, one who observes conduct in accordance with the Dhamma, righteous conduct, should wish: ‘Oh, that on the dissolution of the body, after death, I might reappear in the company of well-to-do nobles! ‘ it is possible that, on the dissolution of the body, after death, he will reappear in the company of well-to-do nobles.
Why is that?
Because he observes conduct that is in accordance with the Dhamma, righteous conduct.
“If, householders, one who observes conduct in accordance with the Dhamma, righteous conduct, should wish: ‘Oh, that on the dissolution of the body, after death, I might reappear in the company of well-to-do brahmins.’ …in the company of well-to-do householders! ‘ it is possible that, on the dissolution of the body, after death, he will reappear in the company of well-to-do householders.
“If, householders, one who observes conduct in accordance with the Dhamma, righteous conduct, should wish: ‘Oh, that on the dissolution of the body, after death, I might reappear in the company of the gods of the heaven of the Four Great Kings!
Why is that?
Because he observes conduct in accordance with the Dhamma, righteous conduct.
Because he observes conduct in accordance with the Dhamma, righteous conduct.
Why is that?
in the company of the gods of the heaven of the Thirtythree…the Yama gods…the gods of the Tusita heaven..the gods who delight in creating…the gods who wield power over others’ creations…the gods of Brahma’s retinue…
the gods of Radiance…
the gods of Limited Radiance…the gods of Immeasurable Radiance…the gods of Streaming Radiance…the gods of Glory…the gods of Limited Glory…the gods of Immeasurable Glory…the gods of Refulgent Glory…the gods of Great Fruit…the Aviha gods…the Atappa gods…the Sudassa gods…the Sudassi gods…the Akanittha gods…the gods of the base of infinite space…the gods of the base of infinite consciousness…the gods of the base of nothingness…the gods of the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception! ‘ it is possible that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he will reappear in the company of the gods of neither-perception-nor-non-perception.
Why is that?
Why is that?
Because he observes conduct that is in accordance with the Dhamma, righteous conduct.
Because he observes conduct that is in accordance with the Dhamma, righteous conduct.
Because he observes conduct that is in accordance with the Dhamma, righteous conduct.
Why is that?
“If, householders, one who observes conduct in accordance with the Dhamma, righteous conduct, should wish: ‘Oh, that by realising for myself with direct knowledge I might here and now enter upon and abidfe in the deliverance of mind and deliverance by wisdom that are taintless with the destruction of the taints! ‘ it is possible that, by realising for himself with direct knowledge, he will here and now enter upon and abide in the deliverance of mind and deliverance by wisdom that are taintless with the destruction of the taints.
Why is that?
Because he observes conduct in accordance with the Dhamma, righteous conduct.”
When this was said, the brahmin householders of Sala said to the Blessed One: “Magnificent, Master Gotama! Magnificent, Master Gotama!
Master Gotama has made the Dhamma clear in many ways, as though he were turning upright what had been overthrown, revealing what was hidden, showing the way to one who was lost, or holding up a lamp in the darkness for those with eyesight to see forms.
We go to Master Gotama for refuge and to the Dhamma and to the Sangha of bhikkhus.
From today let Master Gotama accept us as lay followers who have gone to him for refuge for life.”
Welcome to Master Ananda!
and asked the venerable Ananda: 5. “Master Ananda, is there any single bhikkhu who possesses in each and every way all those qualities that were possessed by Master Gotama, accomplished and fully enlightened?”
and when this courteous and amiable talk was finished, he sat down at one side
when you arrived.”
…Thus with their aspects and particulars he recollects his manifold past lives.
surely they honour one who should be honoured…and venerate one who should be venerated.
Several bhikkhus, having heard about this,
…he purifies his mind from doubt.
you should train thus .
of gods and humans?
and in many ways he gave a talk about meditation.
and he praised every type of meditation.”
Now on that occasion some brahmin householders of Veranja were on a visit to Savatthi for some business or other.
“Whoso cut of,” etc.—This story the Master, while dwelling at Jetavana, told about a wrathful Brother.
The incident that gave rise to the story has been already described.
The Master asked that Brother, saying, “Why after taking orders under the dispensation of the Buddha who knows not what wrath is, do you show anger? Wise men in bygone days, though they suffered a thousand stripes, and had their hands and feet and ears and nose cut off, showed no anger against another.” And he then told a story of the olden time.
Once upon a time a king of Kāsi named Kalābu reigned at Benares.
At that time the Bodhisatta came to life in a brahmin family endowed with eighty crores of treasure, in the form of a youth named Kuṇḍakakumāra. And when he was of age, he acquired a knowledge of all the sciences at Takkasilā and afterwards settled down as a householder. On the death of his parents, looking at his pile of treasure he thought: “My kinsmen who amassed this treasure are all gone without taking it with them: now it is for me to own it and in my turn to depart.” Then he carefully selected persons, who by virtue of their almsgiving deserved it, and gave all his wealth to them, and entering the Himālaya country he adopted the ascetic life. There he dwelt a long time, living on wild fruits. And descending to the inhabited parts for the sake of procuring salt and vinegar he gradually made his way to Benares, where he took up his abode in the royal park. Next day he went his rounds in the city for alms, till he came to the door of the commander-in-chief.
And he being pleased with the ascetic for the propriety of his deportment, brought him into the house and fed him with the food prepared for himself. And having gained his consent he got him to take up his abode in the royal park.
Now one day king Kalābu being inflamed with strong drink came into the park in great pomp, surrounded by a company of dancers. Then he had a couch spread on the royal seat of stone, and lay with his head on the lap of a favourite of the harem,
while the nautch girls who were skilful in vocal and instrumental music and in dancing provided a musical entertainment—So great was his magnificence, like to that of Sakka, Lord of heaven—And the king fell asleep.
Then the women said, “He for whose sake we are providing music, is gone to sleep. What need is there for us to sing? “ Then they cast aside their lutes and other musical instruments hither and thither, and set out for the garden, where tempted on by the flowers and fruit-bearing shrubs they were soon disporting themselves.
At this moment the Bodhisatta was seated in this garden, like a royal elephant in the pride of his vigour, at the foot of a flowering Sāl tree, enjoying the bliss of retirement from the world.
So these women in wandering about came upon him and said, “Come hither, ladies, and let us sit down and hear somewhat from the priest who is resting at the foot of this tree, until the king awakes.” Then they went and saluted him and sitting in a circle round about him, they said, “Tell us something worth hearing.”
So the Bodhisatta preached the doctrine to them.
Meanwhile the royal favourite with a movement of her body woke up the king.
And the king on waking up, and not seeing the women asked, “Where are those wretches gone?”
“Your Highness,” she said, “they are gone away and are sitting in attendance on a certain ascetic.”
The king in a rage seized his sword and went off in haste, saying, “I will give this false ascetic a lesson.”
Then those of the women that were most in favour, when they saw the king coming in a rage, went and took the sword from the king’s hand and pacified him.
Then he came and stood by the Bodhisatta and asked, “What doctrine are you preaching, Monk?”
“The doctrine of patience, Your Majesty,” he replied.
“What is this patience? “ said the king.
“The not being angry, when men abuse you and strike you and revile you.”
Said the king, “I will see now the reality of your patience,” and he summoned his executioner.
And he in the way of his office took an axe and a scourge of thorns, and clad in a yellow robe and wearing a red garland, came and saluted the king and said, “What is your pleasure, Sire?”
“Take and drag off this vile rogue of an ascetic,” said the king, “and throwing him on the ground, with your lash of thorns scourge him before and behind and on both sides, and give him two thousand stripes.”
This was done.
The king again asked, “What doctrine do you preach, Monk?”
“The doctrine of patience, Your Highness,” he replied.
“You fancy that my patience is only skin deep. It is not skin deep, but is fixed deep within my heart, where it cannot be seen by you,
Sire.”
Again the executioner asked, “What is your pleasure, Sire?”
The king said, “Cut off both the hands of this false ascetic.”
So he took his axe, and placing the victim within the fatal circle, he cut off both his hands.
Then the king said, “Off with his feet,” and his feet were chopped off.
And the blood flowed from the extremities of his hands and feet like lac juice from a leaking jar.
Again the king asked what doctrine he preached.
“The doctrine of patience, Your Highness,” he replied.
“You imagine, Sire, that my patience dwells in the extremities of my hands and feet. It is not there, but it is deep seated somewhere else.”
The king said, “Cut off his nose and ears.”
The executioner did so. His whole body was now covered with blood.
Again the king asked of his doctrine.
And the asetic said, “Think not that my patience is seated in the tips of my nose and ears: my patience is deep seated within my heart.”
The king said, “Lie down, false Monk, and thence exalt your patience.” And so saying, he struck the Bodhisatta above the heart with his foot, and betook himself off.
When he was gone, the commander-in-chief wiped off the blood from the body of the Bodhisatta, putting bandages on the extremities of his hands, feet, ears and nose, and then having gently placed him on a seat, he saluted him and sitting on one side he said, “If, Reverend Sir, you would be angry with one who has sinned against you, be angry with the king, but with no one else.” And making this request, he repeated the first stanza:—
Whoso cut off thy nose and ear, and lopped off foot and hand,
With him be wroth, heroic soul, but spare, we pray, this land.
Long live the king, whose cruel hand my body thus has marred,
Pure souls like mine such deeds as these with anger ne’er regard.
And just as the king was leaving the garden and at the very moment when be passed out of the range of the Bodhisatta’s vision, the mighty earth that is two hundred and forty thousand leagues in thickness split in two, like unto a strong stout cloth garment, and a flame issuing forth from Avīci seized upon the king, wrapping him up as it were with a royal robe of scarlet wool.
Thus did the king sink into the earth just by the garden gate and was firmly fixed in the great Hell of Avīci.
And the Bodhisatta died on that same day.
And the king’s servants and the citizens came with perfumes and wreaths and incense in their hands and performed the Bodhisatta’s obsequies.
And some said that the Bodhisatta had gone straight back to the Himālayas. But in this they said the thing that was not.
and inner skins were cut through to the flesh, and the blood flowed.
The Bodhisatta on hearing this uttered the second stanza:—
A saint of old, as men have told,  Great courage did display:
That saint so strong to suffer wrong  The Kāsi king did slay.
Alas! the debt of vain regret  That king will have to pay;
When doomed to dwell in lowest Hell,  Long will he rue the day.
These two stanzas were inspired by Perfect Wisdom.
The Master, his lesson ended, revealed the Truths and identified the Birth:—At the conclusion of the Truths the choleric Brother attained fruition of the Second Path, while many others attained fruition of the First Path:
—“At that time Devadatta was Kalābu king of Kāsi, Sāriputta was the Commander-in-Chief, and I myself was the Ascetic, the Preacher of Patience.”
Now 1 begins the meditation-subject consisting of the Thirty-two-fold Aspect of the body, which is a treatise on maintaining concentration in being, etc., by means of the bodily parts under Mindfulness Occupied With The Body . When a clansman is already established in virtue and has purified his means by the Training Precepts in the way stated, this meditation subject has for its purpose the purification of his ends and it has for its aim his maintaining profitable cognizance in being. It is never promulgated except after an Enlightened One’s arising and is outside the province of any sectarians. It has been commended by the Blessed One in various ways in different Suttas thus
‘ Bhikkhus, when one idea is maintained in being and developed it leads to a great sense of urgency,
What is that one idea?
It is mindfulness occupied with the body ’ .
And thus ‘ Bhikkhus, they do not savour the deathless who do not savour mindfulness occupied with the body,
They have not savoured the deathless who have not savoured mindfulness occupied with the body, they have savoured… They have neglected… They have not neglected… They have missed… They have found the deathless who have found mindfulness occupied with the body ’ .
to realization of the fruit of true-knowledge and deliverance.
to a pleasant abiding here and now,
to obtainment of knowledge and seeing,
to great mindfulness and full awareness,
to great safety from bondage,
to great benefit,
they savour the deathless who savour mindfulness occupied with the body.
‘ And how, bhikkhus, does a bhikkhu maintain mindfulness occupied with the body in being?… Again, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu reviews this body up from the soles of the feet and down from the top of the hair and contained within the skin as full of many kinds of impurity thus: in this body there are head-hairs, body-hairs, nails, teeth, skin; flesh, sinews, bones, bone-marrow, kidney; heart, liver, midriff, spleen, lights; bowels, entrails, gorge, dung; bile, phlegm, pus, blood, sweat, fat; tears, grease, spittle, snot, oil-of-the-joints, urine 5 
And it has been taught thus
and matthake matthalungam  ‘ brain in the head ’ , including ‘ brain ’ under bone-marrow in numerous contexts in which this description appears. So here is the commentary on the meaning of that meditation subject.
for it is the physical frame that is called ‘ body ’ because it is a conglomeration of impurity, since such vile things as the head-hairs, etc., have it as their origin .
Body : the physical frame;
In this : in this, which is expressed thus ‘up from the soles of the feet and down from the top of the hair and contained within the skin as full of many kinds of impurity
Herein, There are means that they are factually known.
Head-hairs , . . . brain : these things beginning with head-hairs are thirty-two aspects of it. The construction here should be understood in this way: In this body there are head- hairs, in this body there are body-hairs.
It is that no one who searches earnestly throughout the whole of this fathom-long carcase, starting from the soles of the feet upwards, starting from the top of the hair downwards, and starting from the skin all round, ever sees even the minutest atom of pureness in it such as a pearl or a crystal or a beryl or aloes or sandalwood or saffron or camphor or talcum-powder, etc.; on the contrary, he sees nothing but various very malodorous offensive drab-looking sorts of impurity consisting of the head-hairs, body-hairs, and the rest.
What is expressed by that?
This is the commentary on the word-construction here, in the first place.
Now for the sake of facility in acquaintanceship with the commentary on this same thirty-two-fold aspect the following general method should be understood.
Then the Venerable Punna approached the Blessed One … and said to him “Venerable sir, it would be good if the Blessed One would teach me the Dhamma in brief, so that, having heard the Dhamma from the Blessed One, I might dwell alone, withdrawn, diligent, ardent, and resolute.”
And the Bodhisatta’s outer
“Punna, there are forms cognizable by the eye that are desirable, lovely, agreeable, pleasing, sensually enticing, tantalizing.
If a bhikkhu seeks delight in them, welcomes them,
With the arising of delight, Punna, there is the arising of suffering, I say. There are, Punna, sounds cognizable by the ear … mental phenomena cognizable by the mind that are desirable, lovely, agreeable, pleasing, sensually enticing, tantalizing.
If a bhikkhu seeks delight in them, welcomes them,
With the arising of delight, Punna there is the arising of suffering, I say.”
Punna, here are forms cognizable by the eye …
mental phenomena cognizable by the mind that are desirable, lovely, agreeable, pleasing, sensually enticing, tantalizing.
“Now that you have received this brief exhortation from me, Punna, in which country will you dwell?”
“There is, venerable sir, a country named Sunaparanta. I will dwell there.”
“Punna, the people of Sunaparanta are wild and rough.
If they abuse and revile you, what will you think about that?”
“Venerable sir, if the people of Sunaparanta abuse and revile me, then I will think: ‘These people of Sunaparanta are excellent, truly excellent, in that they do not give me a blow with the fist.’
Then I will think thus, Blessed One; then I will think thus, Fortunate One.”
“But, Punna, if the people of Sunaparanta do give you a blow with the fist, what will you think about that?”
“Venerable sir, if the people of Sunaparanta give me a blow with the fist, then I will think: ‘These people of Sunaparanta are excellent, truly excellent, in that they do not give me a blow with a clod.’
Then I will think thus, Blessed One; then I will think thus, Fortunate One.”
“But, Punna, if the people of Sunaparanta do give you a blow with a clod, what will you think about that?”
“ Venerable sir, if the people of Sunaparanta give me a blow with a clod, then I will think: ‘These people of Sunaparanta are excellent, truly excellent, in that they do not give me a blow with a rod.’
Then I will think thus, Blessed One; then I will think thus, Fortunate One.”
“But, Punna, if the people of Sunaparanta do give you a blow with a rod, what will you think about that?”
“Venerable sir, if the people of Sunaparanta give me a blow with a rod, then I will think: ‘These people of Sunaparanta are excellent, truly excellent, in that they do not stab me with a knife.’
Then I will think thus, Blessed One; then I will think thus, Fortunate One.”
“But, Punna, if the people of Sunaparanta do stab you with a knife, what will you think about that?”
“Venerable sir, if the people of Sunaparanta stab me with a knife, then I will think ‘These people of Sunaparanta are excellent, truly excellent, in that they do not take my life with a sharp knife.’
Then I will think thus, Blessed One; then I will think thus, Fortunate One.”
“But, Punna, if the people of Sunaparanta do take your life with a sharp knife, what will you think about that?”
“Venerable sir, if the people of Sunaparanta take my life with a sharp knife, then I will think: ‘There have been disciples of the Blessed One who, being repelled, humiliated, and disgusted by the body and by life, sought for an assailant. But I have come upon this assailant even without a search.’
Then I will think thus, Blessed One; then I will think thus, Fortunate One.”
“Good, good, Punna!
Endowed with such self-control and peacefulness, you will be able to dwell in the Sunaparanta country.
Now, Punna , you may go at your own convenience.”
Then, having delighted and rejoiced in the Blessed One’s statement, the Venerable Punna raise from his seat, paid homage to the Blessed One, and departed, keeping him on his right. He then set his lodging in order, took his bowl and outer robe, and set out to wander towards the Sunaparanta country.
Wandering by stages, he eventually arrived in the Sunaparanta country,
Then, during that rains, the Venerable Punna established five hundred male lay followers
And during that same rains he attained final Nibbana.
Then a number of bhikkhus approached the Blessed One … and said to him: “Venerable sir, the clansman named Punna, who was given a brief exhortation by the Blessed One, has died.
What is his destination? What is his future bourn?”
“Bhikkhus, the clansman Punna was wise. He practiced in accordance with the Dhamma and did not trouble me on account of the Dhamma.
The clansman Punna has attained final Nibbana.”
and remains holding to them, delight arises in him.
and remains holding to them, delight arises in him.
If a bhikkhu does not seek delight in them, does not welcome them, and does not remain holding to them, delight ceases in him.
With the cessation of delight, Punna, there is the cessation of suffering, I say.
and five hundred female lay followers in the practice,
and he himself, during that same rains, realized the three true knowledges.
where he dwelt.
By sign, characteristic, elements.
By voidness, categories, and the rest: We put this Thirty-two-fold Aspect’s Exposition to the test.
Herein, ‘ by sign there are one hundred and sixty signs in this thirty-two-fold aspect, by means of which the meditator discerns the thirty-two-fold aspect by parts,
‘ By characteristic ’: there are a hundred and twenty-eight specific characteristics in this thirty-two-fold aspect, by means of which the meditator gives attention to the thirty-two-fold aspect by specific characteristic,
‘By elements’: with the elements mentioned in the passage ‘ Bhikkhu, this man consists of four elements ’ there are in the case of the thirty-two-fold aspect a hundred and twenty-eight instances of the elements, by means of which a meditator discerns the thirty-two-fold aspect by elements,
that is to say: the stiffenedness in the head-hairs is the earth element, the cohesion in them is the water element, the maturing in them is the fire element, and the distension in them is the air element, which make four elements;
‘ By voidness ‘: there are a hundred and twenty-eight kinds of voidness in the thirty-two-fold aspect, by means of which a meditator has insight by voidness into the thirty-two-fold aspect,
‘ By categories and the rest in the thirty-two-fold aspect when head-hairs, etc., are included under- categories, etc., the exposition should be known in the way beginning: How many of the five categories of form, feeling, perception, determinations, and consciousness, are represented in head-hairs? How many of the twelve in-oneself/external bases beginning with the pair eye-cum-forms? How many of the eighteen elements? How many of the four Truths? How many of the four Foundations of Mindfulness?
When he knows thus, the body seems to him comparable to a mass of grass and sticks,
according as it is said:
as it is called thus:
‘ He comprehends the categories’ ‘ Rise and then their subsidence,
The explanation of the Thirty-two-fold Aspect in the Illustrator of Ultimate Meaning, the Commentary on the Minor Books, is ended.
This was said by the Blessed One, said by the Arahant, so I have heard:
Why is that?
“By associating with monks of this sort, sharing with them, attending on them, the as-yet-unculminated aggregate of virtue goes to the culmination of its development, the as-yet-unculminated aggregate of concentration goes to the culmination of its development, the as-yet-unculminated aggregate of discernment goes to the culmination of its development, the as-yet-unculminated aggregate of release goes to the culmination of its development, the as-yet-unculminated aggregate of knowledge & vision of release goes to the culmination of its development.
Monks of this sort are said to be teachers, leaders, abandoners of harm, dispellers of darkness, makers of light, makers of radiance, makers of brightness, makers of brilliance, bringers of illumination, noble ones, endowed with eyes that see.”
“Those monks who are consummate in virtue, consummate in concentration, consummate in discernment, consummate in release, consummate in the knowledge & vision of release; who exhort, demonstrate, instruct, urge, rouse & encourage; who are competent rightly to point out the true Dhamma: seeing them, I tell you, accomplishes a great deal; listening to them, approaching them, attending to them, recollecting them, following them in going forth accomplishes a great deal.
This is a condition creating joy for those who know:
living the Dhamma of the noble ones, composed,
who brighten the true Dhamma, illumine it, shining brilliantly,
that is to say: the head-hairs’ colour-sign, shape-sign, direction-sign, location-sign, and delimitation-sign;
so too in the case of body-hairs and the rest.
who are makers of light, enlightened, abandoners of harm, who have eyes that see.
that is to say: the head-hairs characteristic of stiffenedness, characteristic of cohesion, characteristic of heat, and characteristic of motion, make four specific characteristics,
and so too with the body-hairs and the rest.
Having heard their message with right gnosis, the wise
directly knowing the ending of birth, come to no further becoming.
and so too with body-hairs and the rest.
that is to say: in the case of head-hairs, firstly, the earth element is void of the water element and the rest; likewise the water element is void of the earth element and the rest; and in this way there are four kinds of voidness;
and so too with body-hairs and the rest.
’ There is no creature, human, male; ‘ No person can be apprehended;
‘ This body, as it is, is void ‘ As any mass of grass and sticks ’ .
‘ One such as this 68 with quieted mind ‘ Retires to an empty place
’ And his true insight in the Ideal ‘ Gives him superhuman delight ’ .
Then he is not far from the superhuman delight .
then it will not be long before be realizes the deathlessness that is extinction , which has no ageing or death and is frequented by Noble People.
And so soon thereafter as his existence becomes coessential with the happiness and gladness stated to pertain to insight thus 
‘ There finding happiness and gladness ‘ Because he knows that to be deathless ’ ,
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Savatthi in Jeta’s Grove, Anathapindika’s Park.
There he addressed the bhikkhus thus: “Bhikkhus.”
- “Venerable sir,” they replied.
The Blessed One said this: 2. “Bhikkhus, there are four ways of undertaking things.
What are the four?
There is a way of undertaking things that is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pain. There is a way of undertaking things that is painful now and ripens in the future as pain. There is a way of undertaking things that is painful now and ripens in the future as pleasure. There is a way of undertaking things that is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pleasure.
“What, bhikkhus, is the way of undertaking things that is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pain?
Bhikkhus, there are certain recluses and brahmins whose doctrine and view is this: ‘There is no harm in sensual pleasures.’
They take to gulping down sensual pleasures
They say thus: ‘What future fear do these good recluses and brahmins see in sensual pleasures when they speak of abandoning sensual pleasures and describe the full understanding of sensual pleasures?
Pleasant is the touch of this woman wanderer’s tender soft downy arm!’ Thus they take to gulping down sensual pleasures,
and having done so, on the dissolution of the body, after death, they reappear in a state of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, even in hell.
There they feel painful, racking, piercing feelings.
They say thus: ‘This is the future fear those good recluses and brahmins saw in sensual pleasures when they spoke of abandoning sensual pleasures and described the full understanding of sensual pleasures. For it is by reason of sensual pleasures, owing to sensual pleasures, that we are now feeling painful, racking, piercing feelings.’
“Bhikkhus, suppose that in the last month of the hot season a maluva-creeper pod burst open
Then a deity living in that tree became fearful, perturbed, and frightened;
But no peacock swallowed that seed, no wild animal ate it, no forest fire bumed it, no woodsmen carried it off, no white ants devoured it, and it was in fact fertile. Then, being moistened by rain from a rainbearing cloud, the seed in due course sprouted
and the maluva creeper’s tender soft downy tendril wound itself around that sala tree.
Then the deity living in the sala tree thought: ‘What future fear did my friends and companions, kinsmen and relatives … see in that maluva-creeper seed when they gathered together and reassured me as they did? Pleasant is the touch of this maluva creeper’s tender soft downy tendril! ‘
“So too, bhikkhus, there are certain recluses and brahmins whose doctrine and view is this: “There is no harm in sensual pleasures.’
… They say thus: ‘This is the future fear those good recluses and brahmins saw in sensual pleasures…
“And what, bhikkhus, is the way of undertaking things that is painful now and ripens in the future as pain?
Here, bhikkhus, someone goes naked, rejecting conventions, licking his hands, not coming when asked, not stopping when asked… 
Thus in such a variety ways he dwells pursuing the practice of tormenting and martyring the body.
On the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in a state of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, perdition, even in hell.
This is called the way of undertaking things that is painful now and ripens in the future as pain.
“And what, bhikkhus, is the way of undertaking things that is painful now and ripens in the future as pleasure?
Here, bhikkhus, someone by nature has strong lust, and he constantly experiences pain and grief born of lust; by nature he has strong hate, and he constantly experiences pain and grief born of hate; by nature he has strong delusion, and he constantly experiences pain and grief born of delusion.
Yet in pain and grief, weeping with tearful face, he leads the perfect and pure holy life.
On the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world.
This is called the way of undertaking things that is painful now and ripens in the future as pleasure.
“And what, bhikkhus, is the way of undertaking things that is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pleasure?
Here, bhikkhus, someone by nature does not have strong lust, and he does not constantly experience pain and grief born of lust; by nature he does not have strong hate, and he does not constantly experience pain and grief born of hate; by nature he does not ‘have strong delusion, and he does not constantly experience pain and grief born of delusion.
Quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, he enters Upon and abides in the first jhana…
This is called the way of undertaking things that is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pleasure.
These, bhikkhus, are the four ways of undertaking things.”
That is what the Blessed One said.
The bhikkhus were satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
and divert themselves with women wanderers who wear their hair bound in a topknot.
and a maluva-creeper seed fell at the foot of a sala tree.
but the deity’s friends and companions, kinsmen and relatives - garden deities, park deities tree deities, and deities inhabiting medicinal herbs, grass, and forest-monarch trees - gathered together and reassured that deity thus: ‘Have no fear, sir, have no fear. Perhaps a peacock will swallow the maluva-creeper seed or a wild animal will eat it or a forest fire will burn it or woodsmen will carry it off or white ants will devour it or it may not even be fertile.’
Then the creeper enfolded the sala tree,
made a canopy over it,
draped a curtain all around it,
Because of that maluva-creeper seed I am now feeling painful, backing, piercing feelings.’
The deity who lived in the tree then realised: ‘This is the future fear they saw in that maluva-creeper seed.
This is called the way of undertaking things that is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pain.
…He dwells pursuing the practice of bathing in water three times daily including the evening.
With the stilling of applied and sustained thought, he enters upon and abides in the second jhana… With the fading away as well of rapture…he enters upon and abides in the third jhana… With the abandoning of pleasure and pain…he enters upon and abides in the fourth jhana…
On the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world.
that we are now feeling painful, racking, piercing feelings.’
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Savatthi in Jeta’s Grove, Anathapindika’s Park.
There he addressed the bhikkhus thus: “Bhikkhus.”
- “Venerable sir,” they replied.
The Blessed One said this: 2. “Bhikkhus, for the most part beings have this wish, desire, and longing: ‘If only unwished for, undesired, disagreeable things would diminish and wished for, desired, agreeable things would increase!’
Yet although beings have this wish, desire, and longing, unwished for, undesired, disagreeable things increase for them and wished for, desired, agreeable things diminish.
Now, bhikkhus, what do you think is the reason for that?”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One, guided by the Blessed One, have the Blessed One as their resort.
It would be good if the Blessed One would explain the meaning of these words. Having heard it from the Blessed One, the bhikkhus will remember it.”
“Then listen, bhikkhus, and attend closely to what I shall say.”
“Yes, venerable sir,” they replied.
The Blessed One said this.
“Here, bhikkhus, an untaught ordinary person who has no regard for noble ones and is unskilled and undisciplined in their Dhamma, who has no regard for true men and is unskilled and undisciplined in their Dhamma, does not know what things should be cultivated and what things should not be cultivated, he does not know what things should be followed and what things should not be followed.
Not knowing this, he cultivates things that should not be cultivated and does not cultivate things that should be cultivated, he follows things that should not be followed and does not follow things that should be followed.
It is because he does this that unwished for, undesired, disagreeable things increase for him and wished for, desired, agreeable things diminish.
Why is that?
That is what happens to one who does not see.
“The well-taught noble disciple who has regard for noble ones and is skilled and disciplined in their Dhamma, who has regard for true men and is skilled and disciplined in their dhamma, knows what things should be cultivated and what things should not be cultivated, he knows what things should be -followed and what things should not be followed.
Knowing this, he cultivates things that should be cultivated and does not cultivate things that should not be cultivated, he follows things that should be followed and does not follow things that should not be followed.
It is because he does this that unwished for, undesired, disagreeable things diminish for him and wished for, desired, agreeable things increase.
Why is that?
That is what happens to one who sees.
“Bhikkhus, there are four ways of undertaking things.
What are the four?
There is a way of undertaking things that is painful now and ripens in the future as pain. There is a way of undertaking things that is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pain. There is a way of undertaking things that is painful now and ripens in the future as pleasure. There is a way of undertaking things that is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pleasure.
 “Now, bhikkhus, one who is ignorant, not knowing this way of undertaking things that is painful now and ripens in the future as pain, does not understand it as it actually is thus: “This way of undertaking things is painful now and ripens in the future as pain.’
Not knowing it, not understanding it as it actually is, the ignorant one cultivates it and does not avoid it;
Why is that?
That is what happens to one who does not see.
“Now, bhikkhus, one who is ignorant, not knowing this way of undertaking things that is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pain, does not understand it as it actually is thus: ‘This way of undertaking things is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pain.’
Not knowing it, not understanding it as it actually is, the ignorant one cultivates it and does not avoid it;
Why is that?
That is what happens to one who does not see.
“Now, bhikkhus, one who is ignorant, not knowing this way of undertaking things that is painful now and ripens in the future as pleasure, does not understand it as it actually is thus: ‘This way of undertaking things is painful now and ripens in the future as pleasure.’
Not knowing it, not understanding it as it actually is, the ignorant one does not cultivate it but avoids it;
Why is that?
That is what happens to one who does not see.
“Now, bhikkhus, one who is ignorant, not knowing the way of undertaking things that is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pleasure, does not understand it as it actually is thus: ‘This way of undertaking things is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pleasure.’
Not knowing it, not understanding it as it actually is, the ignorant one does not cultivate it but avoids it;
Why is that?
That is what happens to one who does not see.
 10. “Now, bhikkhus, one who is wise, knowing this way of undertaking things that is painful now and ripens in the future as pain, understands it as it actually is thus: ‘This way of undertaking things is painful now and ripens in the future as pain.’
Knowing it, understanding it as it actually is, the wise one does not cultivate it but avoids it;
Why is that?
That is what happens to one who sees.
“Now, bhikkhus, one who is wise, knowing this way of undertaking things that is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pain, understands it as it actually is thus: ‘This way of undertaking things is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pain.’
Knowing it, understanding it as it actually is, the wise one not cultivate it but avoids it;
Why is that?
That is what happens to one who sees.
“Now, bhikkhus, one who is wise, knowing this way of undertaking things that is painful now and ripens in the future as pleasure, understands it as it actually is thus: ‘This way of undertaking things is painful now and ripens in the future as pleasure.’
Knowing it, understanding it as it actually is, the wise one does not avoid it but cultivates it;
Why is that?
That is what happens to one who sees.
“Now, bhikkhus, one who is wise, knowing this way of undertaking things that is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pleasure, understands it as it actually is thus: ‘This way of undertaking things is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pleasure.’
Knowing it, understanding it as it actually is, the wise one does not avoid it but cultivates it;
Why is that?
That is what happens to one who sees.
 14. “What, bhikkhus, is the way of undertaking things that is painful now and ripens in the future as pain?
Here, bhikkhus, someone in pain and grief kills living beings, and he experiences pain and grief that have killing of living beings as condition. In pain and grief he takes what is not given…misconducts himself in sensual pleasures…speaks falsehood…speaks maliciously… speaks harshly…gossips…is covetous…has a mind of ill will…holds wrong view, and he experiences pain and grief that have wrong view as condition.
On the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in a state of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, even in hell.
This is called the way of undertaking things that is painful now and ripens in the future as pain.
“What, bhikkhus, is the way of undertaking things that is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pain?
Here, bhikkhus, someone in pleasure and joy kills living beings, and he experiences pleasure and joy that have killing of living beings as condition. In pleasure and joy he takes what is not given… …holds wrong view, and he experiences pleasure and joy that have wrong view as condition.
On the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in a state of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, even in hell.
This is called the way of undertaking things that is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pain.
“What, bhikkhus, is the way of undertaking things that is painful now and ripens in the future as pleasure?
Here, bhikkhus, someone in pain and grief abstains from killing living beings, and he experiences pain and grief that have abstention from killing living beings as condition. In pain and grief he abstains from taking what is not given…from misconduct in sensual pleasures…from speaking falsehood…from speaking maliciously… from speaking harshly… from gossiping… he is not covetous…he does not have a mind of ill will… …he holds right view, and he experiences pain and grief that have right view as condition.
On the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world.
This is called the way of undertaking things that is painful now and ripens in the future as pleasure.
“What, bhikkhus, is the way of undertaking things that is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pleasure?
Here, bhikkhus, someone in pleasure and joy abstains from killing living beings, and he experiences pleasure and joy that have abstention from killing living beings as condition. In pleasure and joy he abstains from taking what is not given…he holds right view, and he experiences pleasure and joy that have right view as condition.
On the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world.
This is called the way of undertaking things that is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pleasure.
 18. “Bhikkhus, suppose there were a bitter gourd mixed with poison,
and they told him: ‘Good man, this bitter gourd is mixed with poison. Drink from it if you want;
Then he drank from it without reflecting and did not relinquish it.
As he drank from it, its colour, smell, and taste did not agree with him, and after drinking from it, he came to death or deadly suffering.
Similar to that, I say, is the way of undertaking things that is painful now and ripens in the future as pain.
“Suppose there were a bronze cup of beverage possessing a good colour, smell, and taste,
and they told him: ‘Good man, this bronze cup of beverage possesses a good colour, smell, and taste,
Then he drank from it without reflecting and did not relinquish it.
As he drank from it, its colour, smell, and taste agreed with him, but after drinking from it, he came to death or deadly suffering.
Similar to that, I say, is the way of undertaking things that is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pain.
“Suppose there were fermented urine mixed with various medicines,
and a man came sick with jaundice,
Then he drank from it after reflecting, and did not relinquish it.
As he drank from it, its colour, taste, and smell did not agree with him, but after drinking from it, he became well.
Similar to that, I say, is the way of undertaking things that is painful now and ripens in the future as pleasure.
“Suppose there were curd, honey, ghee, and molasses mixed together,
and a man with dysentery came,
Then he drank from it after reflecting, and did not relinquish it.
As he drank from it, its colour, smell, and taste agreed with him, and after drinking from it, he became well.
Similar to that, I say, is the way of undertaking things that is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pleasure.
“Just as, in autumn, in the last month of the rainy season, when the sky is clear and cloudless, the sun rises above the earth dispelling all darkness from space with its shining and beaming and radiance, so too, the way of undertaking things that is pleasant now and ripens in the future as pleasure dispels with its shining and beaming and radiance any other doctrines whatsoever of ordinary recluses and brahmins.”
That is what the Blessed One said.
The bhikkhus were satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
because he does so, unwished for, undesired, disagreeable things increase for him and wished for, desired, agreeable things diminish.
because he does so, unwished for…things increase for him and wished for…things diminish.
because he does so, unwished for…things increase for him and wished for…things diminish.
because he does so, unwished for…things increase for him and wished for…things diminish.
because he does so, unwished for, undesired, disagreeable things diminish for him and wished for, desired, agreeable things increase.
because he does so, unwished for…things diminish for him and wished for…things increase.
because he does so, unwished for things…diminish for him and wished for…things increase.
because he does so, unwished for…things diminish for him and wished for…things increase.
and a man came who wanted to live, not to die, who wanted pleasure and recoiled from pain,
as you drink from it, its colour, smell, and taste will not agree with you, and after drinking from it, you will come to death or deadly suffering.’
but it was mixed with poison,
and a man came who wanted to live, not to die, who wanted pleasure and recoiled from pain,
but it is mixed with poison. Drink from it if you want;
as you drink from it, its colour, smell, and taste will agree with you, but after drinking from it, you will come to death or deadly suffering.’
as you drink from it, its colour, smell, and taste will not agree with you, but after drinking from it, you will be well.’
and they told him: ‘Good man, this fermented urine is mixed with various medicines. Drink from it if you want;
and they told him: ‘Good man, this is curd, honey, ghee, and molasses mixed together. Drink from it if you want;
as you drink from it, its colour, smell, and taste will agree with you, and after drinking from it you will be well.’
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Kosambi in Ghosita’s Park.
Now on that occasion the bhikkhus at Kosambi had taken to quarrelling and brawling and were deep in disputes, stabbing each other with verbal daggers.
They could neither convince each other nor be convinced by others; they could neither persuade each other nor be persuaded by others.
Then a certain bhikkhu went to the Blessed One, and after paying homage to him, he sat down at one side
“Yes, friend,” they replied, and they went to the Blessed One, and after paying homage to him, they sat down at one side.
The Blessed One then asked them: “Bhikkhus, is it true that you have taken to quarrelling and brawling and are deep in disputes, stabbing each other with verbal daggers; that you can neither convince each other nor be convinced by others, that you can neither persuade each other nor be persuaded by others?”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Bhikkhus, what do you think? When you take to quarrelling and brawling and are deep in disputes, stabbing each other with verbal daggers, do you on that occasion maintain acts of loving-kindness by body, speech, and mind in public and in private towards your companions in the holy life?”
“So, bhikkhus, when you take to quarrelling and brawling and are deep in disputes, stabbing each other with verbal daggers, on that occasion you do not maintain acts of loving-kindness by body, speech, and mind in public and in private towards your companions in the holy life.
Misguided men, what can you possibly know, what can you see, that you take to quarrelling and brawling and are deep in disputes, stabbing each other with verbal daggers? That you can neither convince each other nor be convinced by others, that you can neither persuade each other nor be persuaded by others?
Misguided men, that will lead to your harm and suffering for a long time.”
Then the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus thus: “Bhikkhus, there are these six memorable qualities that create love and respect and conduce to helpfulness, to non-dispute, to concord, and to unity.
What are the six?
“Here a bhikkhu maintains bodily acts of loving-kindness both in public and in private towards his companions in the holy life.
This is a memorable quality that creates love and respect, and conduces to helpfulness, to non-dispute, to concord, and to unity.
“Again, a bhikkhu maintains verbal acts of loving-kindness both in public and in private towards his companions in the holy life.
This is a memorable quality that creates love and respect, and conduces to…unity.
“Again, a bhikkhu maintains mental acts of loving-kindness both in public and in private towards his companions in the holy life.
This is a memorable quality that creates love and respect, and conduces to…unity.
“Again, a bhikkhu uses things in common with his virtuous companions in the holy life; without making reservations, he shares with them any gain of a kind that accords with the Dhamma and has been obtained in a way that accords with the Dhamma, including even the contents of his bowl.
This is a memorable quality that creates love and respect, and conduces to…unity.
“Again, a bhikkhu dwells both in public and in private possessing in common with his companions in the holy life those virtues that are unbroken, untorn, unblotched, unmottled, liberating, commended by the wise, not misapprehended, and conducive to concentration.
This too is a memorable quality that creates love and respect, and conduces to…unity.
“Again, a bhikkhu dwells both in public and in private possessing in common with his companions in the holy life that view that is noble and emancipating, and leads one who practises in accordance with it to the complete destruction of suffering.
This too is a memorable quality that creates love and respect, and conduces to helpfulness, to non-dispute, to concord, and to unity.
“These are the six memorable qualities that create love and respect, and conduce to helpfulness, to non-dispute, to concord, and to unity.
“Of these memorable qualities, the highest, the most comprehensive, the most conclusive is this view that is noble and emancipating, and leads the one who practises in accordance with it to the complete destruction of suffering.
Just as the highest, the most comprehensive, the most conclusive part of a pinnacled building is the pinnacle itself, so too, of these six memorable qualities, the highest…is this view that is noble and emancipating…
“Here a bhikkhu, gone to the forest or to the root of a tree or to an empty hut, considers thus: ‘Is there any obsession unabandoned in myself that might so obsess my mind that I cannot know or see things as they actually are?’
If a bhikkhu is obsessed by sensual lust, then his mind is obsessed.
If he is obsessed by ill will, then his mind is obsessed.
If he is obsessed by sloth and torpor, then his mind is obsessed.
If he is obsessed by restlessness and remorse, then his mind is obsessed.
If he is obsessed by doubt, then his mind is obsessed.
If a bhikkhu is absorbed in speculation about this world, then his mind is obsessed.
If a bhikkhu is absorbed in speculation about the other world, then his mind is obsessed.
If a bhikkhu takes to quarrelling and brawling and is deep in disputes, stabbing others with verbal daggers, then his mind is obsessed.
“He understands thus: ‘There is no obsession unabandoned in myself that might so obsess my mind that I cannot know and see things as they actually are.
My mind is well disposed for awakening to the truths.’
This is the first knowledge attained by him that is noble, supramundane, not shared by ordinary people.
“Again, a noble disciple considers thus: ‘When I pursue, develop, and cultivate this view, do I obtain internal serenity, do I personally obtain stillness?’
“He understands thus: ‘When I pursue, develop, and cultivate this view, I obtain internal serenity, I personally obtain stillness.’
This is the second knowledge attained by him that is noble, supramundane, not shared by ordinary people.
“Again, a noble disciple considers thus: ‘Is there any other recluse or brahmin outside the Buddha’s Dispensation possessed of a view such as I possess?
’ “He understands thus: “There is no other recluse or brahmin outside the Buddha’s Dispensation possessed of a view such as I possess.’
This is the third knowledge attained by him that is noble, supramundane, not shared by ordinary people.
“Again, a noble disciple considers thus: ‘Do I possess the character of a person who possesses right view?’
What is the character of a person who possesses right view?
This is the character of a person who possesses right view: although he may commit some kind of offence for which a means of rehabilitation has been laid down still he at once confesses, reveals, and discloses it to the Teacher or to wise companions in the holy life, and having done that, he enters upon restraint for the future.
Just as a young, tender infant lying prone at once draws back when he puts his hand or his foot on a live coal, so too, that is the character of a person who possesses right view.
This is the fourth knowledge attained by him that is noble, supramundane, not shared by ordinary people.
“Again, a noble disciple considers thus: ‘Do I possess the character of a person who possesses right view?’
What is the character of a person who possesses right view?
This is the character of a person who possesses right view: although he may be active in various matters for his companions in the holy life, yet he has a keen regard for training in the higher virtue, training in the higher mind, and training in the higher wisdom.
Just as a cow with a new calf, while she grazes watches her calf, so too, that is the character of a person who possesses right view.
“He understands thus: ‘I possess the character of a person who possesses right view.’
This is the fifth knowledge attained by him that is noble, supramundane, not shared by ordinary people.
“Again, a noble disciple considers thus: ‘Do I possess the strength of a person who possesses right view?’
What is the strength of a person who possesses right view?
This is the strength of a person who possesses right view: when the Dhamma and Discipline proclaimed by the Tathagata is being taught, he heeds it, gives it attention, engages it with all his mind, hears the Dhamma as with eager ears.
“He understands thus: ‘I possess the strength of a person who possesses right view.’
This is the sixth knowledge attained by him that is noble, supramundane, not shared by ordinary people.
“Again, a noble disciple considers thus: ‘Do I possess the strength of a person who possesses right view?’
What is the strength of a person who possesses right view?
This is the strength of a person who possesses right view: when the Dhamma and Discipline proclaimed by the Tathagata is being taught, he gains inspiration in the meaning, gains inspiration in the Dhamma, gains gladness connected with the Dhamma.
He understands thus: ‘I possess the strength of a person who possesses right view.’
This is the seventh knowledge attained by him that is noble, supramundane, not shared by ordinary people.
“When a noble disciple is thus possessed of seven factors, he has well sought the character for realisation of the fruit of stream-entry.
When a noble disciple is thus possessed of seven factors, he possesses the fruit of stream-entry.”
That is what the Blessed One said.
The bhikkhus were satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
Then the Blessed One addressed a certain bhikkhu thus: “Come, bhikkhu, tell those bhikkhus in my name that the Teacher calls them.”
- “Yes, venerable sir,” he replied, and he went to those bhikkhus and told them: “The Teacher calls the venerable ones.”
and informed him of what was happening.
“No, venerable sir.”
“And how does this view that is noble and emancipating lead the one who practises in accordance with it to the complete destruction of suffering?
“He understands thus: ‘I possess the character of a person who possesses right view.’
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the venerable Maha Moggallana was living in the Bhagga country at Sumsumaragira in the Bhesakala Grove, the Deer Park.
Now on that occasion the venerable Maha Moggallana was walking up and down in the open.
And on that occasion Mara the Evil One went into the venerable Maha Moggallana’s belly and entered his bowels.
Then the venerable Maha Moggallana considered thus: “Why is my belly so heavy?
One would think it full of beans.”
Thus he left the walk and went into his dwelling, where he sat down on a seat made ready.
When he had sat down, he gave thorough attention to himself,
When he saw this, he said: “Come out, Evil One! Come out, Evil One!
Do not harass the Tathagata, do not harass the Tathagata’s disciple, .”
Then Mara the Evil One thought: “This recluse does not know me, he does not see me when he says that.
Then the venerable Maha Moggallana said: “Even thus I know you, Evil One. Do not think: ‘He does not know me.’
You are Mara, Evil One.You were thinking thus, Evil One: ‘This recluse does not know me, he does not see me when he says that.
Then Mara the Evil One thought: “The recluse knew me, he saw me when he said that,”
The venerable Maha Moggallana saw him standing there and said: “I see you there too, Evil One. Do not think: ‘He does not see me.’
You are standing against the door bar, Evil One.
“It happened once, Evil One, that I was a Mara named Dusi, and I had a sister named Kali.
You were her son,
“Now on that occasion the Blessed One Kakusandha, accomplished and fully enlightened, had appeared in the world.
The Blessed One Kakusandha, accomplished and fully enlightened, had an auspicious pair of chief disciples named Vidhura and Sanjiva.
Among all the disciples of the Blessed One Kakusandha, accomplished and fully enlightened,
That was how the venerable Vidhura came to have the designation ‘Vidhura.’
But the venerable Sanjiva, gone to the forest or to the root of a tree or to an empty hut, entered without difficulty upon the cessation of perception and feeling.
“It happened once, Evil One, that the venerable Sanjiva had seated himself at the root of a certain tree and entered upon the cessation of perception and feeling.
Some cowherds, shepherds, and ploughmen passing by saw the venerable Sanjiva sitting at the root of the tree having entered upon the cessation of perception and feeling, and they thought: ‘It is wonderful, sirs, it is marvellous!
There is this recluse sitting here dead.
Let us cremate him.’
Then the cowherds, shepherds, and ploughmen collected grass, wood, and cow dung, and having piled it up against the venerable Sanjiva’s body, they set fire to it and went on their way.
“Now, Evil One, when the night had ended, the venerable Sanjiva emerged from the attainment.He shook his robe, and then, it being morning, he dressed, and taking his bowl and outer robe, he went into the village for alms.
The cowherds, shepherds, and ploughmen passing by saw the venerable Sanjiva wandering for alms, and they thought: ‘It is wonderful, sirs, it is marvellous!
This recluse who was sitting there dead has come back to life!’
That was how the venerable Sanjiva came to have the designation ‘Sanjiva.’
“Then, Evil One, the Mara Dusi considered thus: ‘There are these virtuous bhikkhus of good character, but I do not know their coming or their going.
Let me now take possession of the brahmin householders, telling them: “Come now, abuse, revile, scold, and harass the virtuous bhikkhus of good character;
“Then, Evil One, the Mara Dusi took possession of those brahmin householders, telling them: ‘Come now, abuse, revile, scold, and harass the virtuous bhikkhus of good character;
Then, when the Mara Dusi had taken possession of the brahmin householders, they abused, reviled, scolded, and harassed the virtuous bhikkhus of good character thus: ‘These bald-pated recluses, these swarthy menial offspring of the Kinsman’s feet, claim: “We are meditators, we are meditators! “ and with shoulders drooping, heads down and all limp, they meditate, premeditate, outmeditate, and mismeditate.
Just as an owl on a branch waiting for a mouse meditates, premeditates, out-meditates, and mismeditates,
or just as a jackal on a river-bank waiting for fish meditates, premeditates, out-meditates, and mismeditates,
Now, Evil One, on that occasion most of those human beings, when they died, reappeared on the dissolution of the body, after death, in a state of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, even in hell.
“Then the Blessed One Kakusandha, accomplished and fully enlightened, addressed the bhikkhus thus: ‘Bhikkhus, the Mara Dusi has taken possession of the brahmin householders, telling them: “Come now, abuse, revile, scold and harass the virtuous bhikkhus of good character; then perhaps, when they are abused, reviled, scolded, and harassed by you, some change will come about in their mind whereby the Mara Dusi may find an opportunity.”
Come, bhikkhus, abide pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with loving-kindness, likewise the second, likewise the third, likewise the fourth;
Abide pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with compassion…with a mind imbued with appreciative joy…with a mind imbued with equanimity abundant,
“So, Evil One, when those bhikkhus had been thus advised and instructed by the Blessed One Kakusandha, accomplished and fully enlightened, then, gone to the forest or to the root of a tree or to an empty hut, they abided pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with loving-kindness…
“Then, Evil One, the Mara Dusi considered thus: “Though I do as I am doing, still I do not know the coming or the going of these virtuous bhikkhus of good character. Let me now take possession of the brahmin householders, telling them: “Come now, honour, respect, revere, and venerate the virtuous bhikkhus of good character; then perhaps, when they are honoured, respected, revered, and venerated by you, some change will come about in their minds whereby the Mara Dusi may find an opportunity.’“
“Then, Evil One, the Mara Dusi took possession of those brahmin householders, telling them: ‘Come now, honour, respect, revere, and venerate the virtuous bhikkhus of good character; then perhaps, when they are honoured, respected, revered, and venerated by you, some change will come about in their minds whereby the Mara Dusi may find an opportunity.’
Then, when the Mara Dusi had taken possession of the brahmin householders, they honoured, respected, revered, and venerated the virtuous bhikkhus of good character.
Now, Evil One, on that occasion most of those human beings, when they died, reappeared on the dissolution of the body, after death, in a happy destination, even the heavenly world.
“Then, Evil One, the Blessed One Kakusandha, accomplished and fully enlightened, addressed the bhikkhus thus: ‘Bhikkhus, the Mara Dusi has taken possession of those brahmin householders, telling them: “Come now, honour, respect, revere, and venerate the virtuous bhikkhus of good character; then perhaps, when they are honoured, respected, revered, and venerated by you, some change will come about in their minds whereby the Mara Dusi may find an opportunity.”
Come, bhikkhus, abide contemplating foulness in the body, perceiving repulsiveness in nutriment, perceiving disenchantment with all the world, contemplating impermanence in all formations.’
“So, Evil One, when those bhikkhus had been thus addressed and instructed by the Blessed One Kakusandha, accomplished and fully enlightened, then, gone to the forest or to the root of a tree or to an empty hut, they abided contemplating foulness in the body, perceiving repulsiveness in nutriment, perceiving disenchantment with all the world, contemplating impermanence in all formations.
“Then, when it was morning, the Blessed One Kakusandha, accomplished and fully enlightened, dressed, and taking his bowl and outer robe, he went into the village for alms with the venerable Vidhura as his attendant.
“Then the Mara Dusi took possession of a certain boy, and picking up a stone, he struck the venerable Vidhura on the head with it and cut his head.
With blood running from his cut head, the venerable Vidhura followed close behind the Blessed One Kakusandha, accomplished and fully enlightened.
Then the Blessed One Kakusandha, accomplished and fully enlightened, turned around and looked at him with the elephant look: ‘This Mara Dusi knows no bounds.’
And with that look, Evil One, the Mara Dusi fell from that place and reappeared in the Great Hell.
“Now, Evil One, there are three names for the Great Hell: the hell of the six bases for contact, the hell of the impalement with stakes, and the hell to be felt for oneself.
Then, Evil One, the wardens of hell came up to me and said: ‘Good sir, when stake meets stake in your heart,
then you will know: “I have been roasting in hell for a thousand years.’“
My body had the same form as a human body, Evil One,
and he saw that Mara the Evil One had gone into his belly and had entered his bowels.
or it will lead to your harm and suffering for a long time.
Even his teacher would not know me so soon, so how can this disciple know me?”
Even his teacher would not know me so soon, so how can this disciple know me?”
whereupon he came up from the venerable Maha Moggallana’s mouth and stood against the door bar.
so you were my nephew.
there was none equal to the venerable Vidhura in teaching the Dhamma.
then perhaps, when they are abused, reviled, scolded, and harassed by you, some change will come about in their minds whereby the Mara Dusi may find an opportunity.’“
then perhaps, when they are abused, reviled, scolded, and harassed by you, some change will come about in their minds whereby the Mara Dusi may find an opportunity.’
or just as a cat by a door-post or a dust-bin or a drain, waiting for a mouse, meditates, premeditates, out-meditates, and mismeditates,
or just as a donkey unladen, standing by a door-post or a dust-bin or a drain, meditates, premeditates, out-meditates, and mismeditates, so too, these bald-pated recluses, these swarthy menial offspring of the Kinsman’s feet, claim: “We are meditators, we are meditators!” and with shoulders drooping, heads down and all limp, they meditate, premeditate, out-meditate, and mismeditate.’
so above, below, around, and everywhere, and to all as to yourselves, abide pervading the all-encompassing world with a mind imbued with loving-kindness, abundant, exalted, immeasurable, without hostility and without ill will.
exalted, immeasurable, without hostility and without ill will.’
with his mind obsessed by sloth and torpor, a prey to sloth and torporwith his mind obsessed by restlessness and remorse, a prey to restlessness and remorsewith his mind obsessed by doubt,
with a mind imbued with compassion…with a mind imbued with appreciative joy…with a mind imbued with equanimity…
without hostility and without ill will.
For ten millennia I roasted in the auxiliary of that Great Hell, experiencing the feeling called that of emergence from ripening.
but my head had the form of a fish’s head.
“What can hell be well compared to Wherein Dusi roasted, assailant
Of Vidhura the disciple And the brahmin Kakusandha?
Stakes of steel, even a hundred, Each one suffered separately;
These can hell be well compared to Wherein Dusi roasted, assailant
Of Vidhura the disciple And the brahmin Kakusandha.
An Enlightened One’s disciple Who directly knows this fact.
“In the middle of the ocean There are mansions aeon-lasting,
Sapphire-shining, fiery-gleaming With a clear translucent lustre,
Where iridescent sea-nymphs dance In complex, intricate rhythms.
Dark One, you have much to suffer…
“I am one who, when exhorted By the Enlightened One in person, the Order watching.
Shook Migara’s Mother’s Palace With his toe.
Dark One, you have much to suffer…
wielding firmly Strength of supernormal powers, to incite the gods
Dark One, you have much to suffer…
‘Do you know then, friend, deliverance Due to craving’s full destruction?’
Whereupon Sakka then answered Truly to the question asked him
Dark One, you have much to suffer…
“I am one who thought of posing Brahma this question In Sudhamma Hall in heaven:
‘Is there still found in you, friend, The wrong view you once accepted?
Is the radiance of heaven Clearly seen by you as passing?’
Brahma then answered my question Truthfully and in due sequence:
‘There is found in me no longer, Sir, the wrong view that once I held;
All the radiance of heaven I now clearly see as passing;
I disclaim my prior claim That it is permanent, eternal
Dark One, you have much to suffer…
“I am one who, by liberation, Has touched the peak of Mount Sineru,
Visited India and Pubbavideha And all the regions of the earth
Dark One, you have much to suffer By assaulting such a bhikkhu,
“There has never been found a fire Which intends, ‘Let me burn the fool,’
But a fool who assaults a fire Burns himself by his own doing.
So it is with you, O Mara: By assaulting the Tathagata,
Like a fool who plays with fire You only burn yourself alone.
By assaulting the Tathagata, You generate much demerit.
Evil One, do you imagine That your evil will not ripen?
Doing thus, you store up evil Which will last long, O End-maker!
Mara, shun the Enlightened One, Play no more your tricks on bhikkhus.”
So the bhikkhu chastened Mara In the Bhesakala thicket
Whereupon the sombre spirit Disappeared right then and there.
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Campa on the banks of the Gaggara Lake with a large Sangha of bhikkhus.
Then Pessa, the elephant driver’s son, and Kandaraka the wanderer went to the Blessed One. Pessa, after paying homage to the Blessed One, sat down at one side,
Standing there, he surveyed the Sangha of bhikkhus sitting in complete silence, and then he said to the Blessed One: 2. “It is wonderful, Master Gotama, it is marvellous how the Sangha of bhikkhus has been led to practise the right way by Master Gotama.
Those who were Blessed Ones, accomplished and fully enlightened in the past, at most only led the Sangha of bhikkhus to practise the right way as is done by Master Gotama now.
And those who will be Blessed Ones, accomplished and fully enlightened in the future, at most will only lead the Sangha of bhikkhus to practise the right way as is done by Master Gotama now.”
“So it is, Kandaraka, so it is!
Those who were Blessed Ones, accomplished and fully enlightened in the past, at most only led the Sangha of bhikkhus to practise the right way as is done by me now.
And those who will be Blessed Ones, accomplished and fully enlightened in the future, at most will only lead the Sangha of bhikkhus to practise the right way as is done by me now.
“Kandaraka, in this Sangha of bhikkhus there are bhikkhus who are arahants with taints destroyed, who have lived the holy life, done what had to be done, laid down the burden, reached the true goal, destroyed the fetters of being, and who are completely liberated through final knowledge.
In this Sangha of bhikkhus there are bhikkhus in higher training, of constant virtue, living a life of constant virtue, sagacious, living a life of constant sagacity. They abide with their minds well established in the four foundations of mindfulness.
What four?
Here, Kandaraka, a bhikkhu abides contemplating the body as a body, ardent, fully aware, and mindful, having put away covetousness and grief for the world. He abides contemplating feelings as feelings, ardent, fully aware, and mindful, having put away covetousness and grief for the world. He abides contemplating mind as mind, ardent, fully aware, and mindful, having put away covetousness and grief for the world. He abides contemplating mind-objects as mind-objects, ardent, fully aware, and mindful, having put away covetousness and grief for the world.”
When this was said, Pessa, the elephant driver’s son, said: “It is wonderful, venerable sir, it is marvellous
From time to time, venerable sir, we white-clothed lay people also abide with our minds well established in these four foundations of mindfulness.
Here, venerable sir, we abide contemplating the body as a body…feelings as feelings…mind as mind…mind-objects as mind-objects, ardent, fully aware, and mindful, having put away covetousness and grief for the world.
It is wonderful, venerable sir, it is marvellous
For humankind is a tangle but the animal is open enough.
Venerable sir, I can drive an elephant to be tamed,
But those who are called our slaves, messengers, and servants behave in one way with the body, in another way by speech, while their minds work in still another way.
It is wonderful, venerable sir, it is marvellous
how amid man’s tangle, corruption, and deceptions, the Blessed One knows the welfare and harm of beings. For humankind is a tangle but the animal is open enough.”
Humankind is a tangle but the animal is open enough.
Pessa, there are four kinds of persons to be found existing in the world.
What four?
Here a certain kind of person torments himself and pursues the practice of torturing himself. Here a certain kind of person torments others and pursues the practice of torturing others. Here a certain kind of person torments himself and pursues the practice of torturing himself, and he also torments others and pursues the practice of torturing others. Here a certain kind of person does not torment himself or pursue the practice of torturing himself, and he does not torment others or pursue the practice of torturing others.
Since he torments neither himself nor others, he is here and now hungerless, extinguished, and cooled, and he abides experiencing bliss, having himself become holy.
Which of these four kinds of persons satisfies your mind, Pessa?”
“The first three do not satisfy my mind, venerable sir,
“But, Pessa, why don’t the first three kinds of persons satisfy your mind?”
“Venerable sir, the kind of person who torments himself and pursues the practice of torturing himself, torments and tortures himself though he desires pleasure and recoils from pain; that is why this kind of person does not satisfy my mind.
And the kind of person who torments others and pursues the practice of torturing others, torments and tortures others who desire pleasure and recoil from pain; that is why this kind of person does not satisfy my mind.
And the kind of person who torments himself and pursues the practice of torturing himself, and who also torments others and pursues the practice of torturing others, torments and tortures himself and others, both of whom desire pleasure and recoil from pain; that is why this kind of person does not satisfy my mind.
But the kind of person who does not torment himself or pursue the practice of torturing himself and who does not torment others or pursue the practice of torturing others; who, since he torments neither himself nor others, is here and now hungerless, extinguished, and cooled, and abides experiencing bliss, having himself become holy - he does not torment and torture either himself or others, both of whom desire pleasure and recoil from pain. That is why this kind of person satisfies my mind.
And now, venerable sir, we depart We are busy and have much to do.”
“Now is the time, Pessa, to do as you think fit.”
Then Pessa, the elephant driver’s son, having delighted and rejoiced in the Blessed One’s words, rose from his seat, and after paying homage to the Blessed One, keeping him on his right, he departed.
Soon after he had left, the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus thus: “Bhikkhus, Pessa, the elephant driver’s son, is wise, he has great wisdom.
If he had sat a while longer until I had expounded for him in detail these four kinds of persons, he would have greatly benefited.
Still he has already greatly benefited even as it is.”
“This is the time, Blessed One, this is the time, Sublime One, for the Blessed One to expound in detail these four kinds of persons.
Having heard it from the Blessed One, the bhikkhus will remember it.”
“Then, bhikkhus, listen and attend closely to what I shall say.”
“Yes, venerable sir,” the bhikkhus replied.
The Blessed One said this:
Here a certain person goes naked, rejecting conventions, licking his hands, not coming when asked, not stopping when asked; he does not accept food brought or food specially made or an invitation to a meal; he receives nothing from a pot, from a bowl, across a threshold, across a stick, across a pestle, from two eating together, from a pregnant woman, from a woman giving suck, from a woman lying with a man, from where food is advertised to be distributed, from where a dog is waiting, from where flies are buzzing; he accepts no fish or meat, he drinks no liquor, wine, or fermented brew.
He keeps to one house, to one morsel; he keeps to two houses to two morsels;…he keeps to seven houses, to seven morsels. He lives on one saucerful a day, on two saucerfuls a day…on seven saucerfuls a day. He takes food once a day, once every two days…once every seven days, and so on up to once every fortnight; he dwells pursuing the practice of taking food at stated intervals.
He is an eater of greens or millet or wild rice or hide-parings or moss or ricebran or rice-scum or sesamum flour or grass or cowdung. He lives on forest roots and fruits, he feeds on fallen fruits. He clothes himself in hemp, in hemp-mixed cloth, in shrouds, in refuse rags, in tree bark, in antelope hide, in strips of antelope hide, in kusa-grass fabric, in bark fabric, in wood-shavings fabric, in head-hair wool, in animal wool, in owls’ wings.
He is one who pulls out hair and beard, pursuing the practice of pulling out hair and beard. He is one who stands continuously, rejecting seats. He is one who squats continuously, devoted to maintaining the squatting position. He is one who uses a mattress of spikes; he makes a mattress of spikes his bed. He dwells pursuing the practice of bathing in water three times daily including the evening. Thus in such a variety of ways he dwells pursuing the practice of tormenting and mortifying the body.
This is called the kind of person who torments himself and pursues the practice of torturing himself.
“What kind of person, bhikkhus, torments others and pursues the practice of torturing others?
Here a certain person is a butcher of sheep, a butcher of pigs, a fowler, a trapper of wild beasts, a hunter, a fisherman, a thief, an executioner, a prison warden, or one who follows any other such bloody occupation.
This is called the kind of person who torments others and pursues the practice of torturing others.
“What kind of person, bhikkhus, torments himself and pursues the practice of torturing himself and also torments others and pursues the practice of torturing others?
Here some person is a head-anointed noble king or a well-to-do brahmin.
Having had a new sacrificial temple built to the east of the city, and having shaved off his hair and beard, dressed himself in rough hide, and greased his body with ghee and oil, scratching his back with a deer’s horn, he enters the sacrificial temple together with his chief queen and his brahmin high priest.
There he lies down on the bare ground with the grass on it.
The king lives on the milk in the first teat of a cow with a calf of the same colour while the chief queen lives on the milk in the second teat and the brahmin high priest lives on the milk in the third teat; the milk in the fourth teat they pour onto the fire, and the calf lives on what is left.
He says thus: ‘Let so many bulls be slaughtered for sacrifice, let so many bullocks be slaughtered for sacrifice, let so many heifers be slaughtered for sacrifice, let so many goats be slaughtered for sacrifice, let so many sheep be slaughtered for sacrifice, let so many trees be felled for the sacrificial posts, let so much grass be cut for the sacrificial grass.’
And then his slaves, messengers, and servants make preparations, weeping with tearful faces, being spurred on by threats of punishment and by fear.
This is called the kind of person who torments himself and pursues the practice of torturing himself and who torments others and pursues the practice of torturing others.
“What kind of person, bhikkhus, does not torment himself or pursue the practice of torturing himself and does not torment others or pursue the practice of tormenting others - the one who, since he torments neither himself nor others, is here and now hungerless, extinguished, and cooled, and abides experiencing bliss, having himself become holy?
“Here, bhikkhus, a Tathagata appears in the world, accomplished, fully enlightened, perfect in true knowledge and conduct, sublime, knower of worlds, incomparable leader of persons to be tamed, teacher of gods and humans, enlightened, blessed.
He declares this world with its gods, its Maras, and its Brahmas, this generation with its recluses and brahmins, its princes and its people, which he has himself realised by direct knowledge.
He teaches the Dhamma good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing, and he reveals a holy life that is utterly perfect and pure.
“A householder or householder’s son or one born in some other clan hears that Dhamma.
On hearing the Dhamma he acquires faith in the Tathagata.
Possessing that faith, he considers thus: ‘Household life is crowded and dusty; life gone forth is wide open.
It is not easy, while living in a home, to lead the holy life utterly perfect and pure as a polished shell.
Suppose I shave off my hair and beard, put on the yellow robe, and go forth from the home life into homelessness.’
On a later occasion, abandoning a small or a large fortune, abandoning a small or a large circle of relatives, he shaves off his hair and beard, puts on the yellow robe, and goes forth from the home life into homelessness.
“Having thus gone forth and possessing the bhikkhus training and way of life, abandoning the killing of living beings, he abstains from killing living beings; with rod and weapon laid aside, gentle and kindly, he abides compassionate to all living beings.
Abandoning the taking of what is not given, he abstains from taking what is not given; taking only what is given, expecting only what is given, by not stealing he abides in purity.
Abandoning incelibacy, he observes celibacy, living apart, abstaining from the vulgar practice of sexual intercourse.
“Abandoning false speech, he abstains from false speech; he speaks truth, adheres to truth, is trustworthy and reliable, one who is no deceiver of the world.
Abandoning malicious speech, he abstains from malicious speech; he does not repeat elsewhere what he has heard here in order to divide those people from these, nor does he repeat to these people what he has heard elsewhere in order to divide these people from those; thus he is one who reunites those who are divided, a promoter of friendships, who enjoys concord, rejoices in concord, delights in concord, a speaker of words that promote concord.
Abandoning harsh speech, he abstains from harsh speech; he speaks such words as are gentle, pleasing to the ear, and loveable, as go to the heart, are courteous, desired by many and agreeable to many.
Abandoning gossip, he abstains from gossip; he speaks at the right time, speaks what is fact, speaks on what is good, speaks on the Dhamma and the Discipline; at the right time he speaks such words as are worth recording, reasonable, moderate, and beneficial.
“He abstains from injuring seeds and plants. He practises eating only in one part of the day, abstaining from eating at night and outside the proper time. He abstains from dancing, singing, music, and theatrical shows. He abstains from wearing garlands, smartening himself with scent, and embellishing himself with unguents. He abstains from high and large couches. He abstains from accepting gold and silver. He abstains from accepting raw grain. He abstains from accepting raw meat. He abstains from accepting women and girls. He abstains from accepting men and women slaves. He abstains from accepting goats and sheep. He abstains from accepting fowl and pigs. He abstains from accepting elephants, cattle, horses, and mares. He abstains from accepting fields and land. He abstains from going on errands and running messages. He abstains from buying and selling. He abstains from false weights, false metals, and false measures. He abstains from cheating, deceiving, defrauding, and trickery. He abstains from wounding, murdering, binding, brigandage, plunder, and violence.
“He becomes content with robes to protect his body and with almsfood to maintain his stomach,
Just as a bird, wherever it goes, flies with its wings as its only burden, so too, the bhikkhu becomes content with robes to protect his body and with almsfood to maintain his stomach,
Possessing this aggregate of noble virtue, he experiences within himself a bliss that is blameless.
“On seeing a form with the eye, he does not grasp at its signs and features.
Since, if he left the eye faculty unguarded, evil unwholesome states of covetousness and grief might invade him, he practises the way of its restraint, he guards the eye faculty, he undertakes the restraint of the eye faculty.
On hearing a sound with the ear…On smelling an odour with the nose…On tasting a flavour with the tongue…On touching a tangible with the body…On cognizing a mind-object with the mind, he does not grasp at its signs and features.
Since, if he left the mind faculty unguarded, evil unwholesome states of covetousness and grief might invade him, he practises the way of its restraint, he guards the mind faculty, he undertakes the restraint of the mind faculty.
Possessing this noble restraint of the faculties, he experiences within himself a bliss that is unsullied.
“He becomes one who acts in full awareness when going forward and returning; who acts in full awareness when looking ahead and looking away; who acts in full awareness when flexing and extending his limbs; who acts in full awareness when wearing his robes and carrying his outer robe and bowl; who acts in full awareness when eating, drinking, consuming food, and tasting; who acts in full awareness when defecating and urinating; who acts in full awareness when walking, standing, sitting, falling asleep, waking up, talking, and keeping silent.
“Possessing this aggregate of noble virtue, and this noble restraint of the faculties, and possessing this noble mindfulness and full awareness, he resorts to a secluded resting place: the forest, the root of a tree, a mountain, a ravine, a hillside cave, a charnel ground, a jungle thicket, an open space, a heap of straw.
“On returning from his almsround, after his meal he sits down, folding his legs crosswise, setting his body erect, and establishing mindfulness before him.
Abandoning covetousness for the world, he abides with a mind free from covetousness; he purifies his mind from covetousness. Abandoning ill will and hatred, he abides with a mind free from ill will, compassionate for the welfare of all living beings; he purifies his mind from ill will and hatred. Abandoning sloth and torpor, he abides free from sloth and torpor, percipient of light, mindful and fully aware; he purifies his mind from sloth and torpor. Abandoning restlessness and remorse, he abides unagitated with a mind inwardly peaceful; he purifies his mind from restlessness and remorse. Abandoning doubt, he abides having gone beyond doubt, unperplexed about wholesome states; he purifies his mind from doubt.
“Having thus abandoned these five hindrances, imperfections of the mind that weaken wisdom, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, he enters upon and abides in the first jhana, which is accompanied by applied and sustained thought, with rapture and pleasure born of seclusion. 21. “Again, with the stilling of applied and sustained thought, he enters upon and abides in the second jhana, which has selfconfidence and singleness of mind without applied and sustained thought, with rapture and pleasure born of concentration. 22. “Again, with the fading away as well of rapture, he abides in equanimity, and mindful and fully aware, still feeling pleasure with the body, he enters upon and abides in the third jhana, on account of which noble ones announce: ‘He has a pleasant abiding who has equanimity and is mindful.’ 23. “Again, with the abandoning of pleasure and pain, and with the previous disappearance of joy and grief, he enters upon and abides in the fourth jhana, which has neither-painnor- pleasure and purity of mindfulness due to equanimity.
“When his concentrated mind is thus purified, bright, unblemished, rid of imperfection, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, he directs it to knowledge of the recollection of past lives.
He recollects his manifold past lives, that is, one birth, two births, three births, four births, five births, ten births, twenty births, thirty births, forty births, fifty births, a hundred births, a thousand births, a hundred thousand births, many aeons of world-contraction, many aeons of worldexpansion, many aeons of world-contraction and expansion: ‘There I was so named, of such a clan, with such an appearance, such was my nutriment, such my experience of pleasure and pain, such my life-term; and passing away from there, I reappeared elsewhere; and there too I was so named, of such a clan, with such an appearance, such was my nutriment, such my experience of pleasure and pain, such my life-term; and passing away from there, I reappeared here.’
Thus with their aspects and particulars he recollects his manifold past lives.
“When his concentrated mind is thus purified, bright, unblemished, rid of imperfection, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, he directs it to knowledge of the passing away and reappearance of beings.
With the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the Tiuman, he sees beings passing away and reappearing, inferior and superior, fair and ugly, fortunate and unfortunate. He understands how beings pass on according to their actions thus: ‘These worthy beings who were ill-conducted in body, speech, and mind, revilers of noble ones, wrong in their views, giving effect to wrong view in their actions, on the dissolution of the body, after death, have reappeared in a state of deprivation, in a bad destination, in perdition, even in hell; but these worthy beings who were wellconducted in body, speech, and mind, not revilers of noble ones, right in their views, giving effect to right view in their actions, on the dissolution of the body, after death, have reappeared in a good destination, even in the heavenly world.’
Thus with the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, he sees beings passing away and reappearing, inferior and superior, fair and ugly, fortunate and unfortunate, and he understands how beings pass on according to their actions.
“When his concentrated mind is thus purified, bright, unblemished, rid of imperfection, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, he directs it to knowledge of the destruction of the taints.
He understands as it actually is: ‘This is suffering’;
When it is liberated there comes the knowledge: ‘It is liberated.’
He understands: ‘Birth is destroyed, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more coming to any state of being.’
“This, bhikkhus, is called the kind of person who does not torment himself or pursue the practice of torturing himself and who does not torment others or pursue the practice of torturing others
That is what the Blessed One said.
The bhikkhus were satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
while Kandaraka exchanged greetings with the Blessed One,
how well the four foundations of mindfulness have been made known by the Blessed One: for the purification of beings, for the surmounting of sorrow and lamentation, for the disappearance of pain and grief, for the attainment of the true way, for the realisation of Nibbana.
how amid man’s tangle, corruption, and deceptions, the Blessed One knows the welfare and harm of beings.
and in the time it takes to make a trip back and forth in Campa, that elephant will show every kind of deception, duplicity, crookedness, and fraud he is capable of.
but the last one satisfies my mind.”
“Bhikkhus, what kind of person torments himself and pursues the practice of torturing himself?
and wherever he goes he sets out taking only these with him.
and wherever he goes he sets out taking only these with him.
he understands as it actually is: ‘This is the origin of suffering’;
he understands as it actually is: ‘This is the cessation of suffering’;
he understands as it actually is: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’
He understands as it actually is: ‘These are the taints’;
he understands as it actually is: ‘This is the origin of the taints’;
he understands as it actually is: ‘This is the cessation of the taints’;
he understands as it actually is: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of the taints.’
“When he knows and sees thus, his mind is liberated from the taint of sensual desire, from the taint of being, and from the taint of ignorance
- the one who, since he torments neither himself nor others, is here and now hungerless, extinguished, and cooled, and abides experiencing bliss, having himself become holy.”
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Venerable Ananda was living at Beluvagamaka near Vesali.
Now on that occasion the householder Dasama of Atthakanagara had arrived at Pataliputta for some business or other.
Then he went to a certain bhikkhu in Kukkuta’s Park, and after paying homage to him, he sat down at one side
and asked him: “Where does the venerable Ananda live now, venerable sir?
“The venerable Ananda is living at Beluvagamaka near Vesall, householder.”
When the householder Dasama had completed his business at Pataliputta, he went to the venerable Ananda at Beluvagamaka near Vesall.
After paying homage to him, he sat down at one side and asked him: “Venerable Ananda, has any one thing been proclaimed by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, wherein if a bhikkhu abides diligent, ardent, and resolute, his unliberated mind comes to be liberated, his undestroyed taints come to be destroyed, and he attains the supreme security from bondage that he had not attained before?”
“Yes, householder, one such thing has been proclaimed by the Blessed One.”
“What is that one thing, venerable Ananda?”
He considers this and understands it thus: This first jhana is conditioned and volitionally produced.55
But whatever is conditioned and volitionally produced is impermanent, subject to cessation.’
Standing upon that, he attains the destruction of the taints.
“This is one thing proclaimed by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, wherein if a bhikkhu abides diligent, ardent, and resolute, his unliberated mind comes to be liberated, his undestroyed taints come to be destroyed, and he attains the supreme security from bondage that he had not attained before.
“Again, with the stilling of applied and sustained thought, a bhikkhu enters and abides in the second jhana…
He considers this and understands it thus: ‘This second jhana is conditioned and volitionally produced. But whatever is conditioned and volitionally produced is impermanent, subject to cessation.’
Standing upon that, he attains the destruction of the taints.
But if he does not attain the destruction of the taints…without ever returning from that world.“This too is one thing proclaimed by the Blessed One … wherein if a bhikkhu abides diligent, ardent, and resolute…he attains the supreme security from bondage that he had not attained before. 6. “Again, with the fading away as well of rapture, a bhikkhu… enters upon and abides in the third jhana…He considers this and understands it thus: ‘This third jhana is conditioned and volitionally produced. But whatever is conditioned and volitionally produced is-impermanent, subject to cessation.’ Standing upon that, he attains the destruction of the taints. But if he does not attain the destruction of the taints…without ever returning from that world. “This too is one thing proclaimed by the Blessed One… Wherein if a bhikkhu abides diligent, ardent, and resolute…he attains the supreme security from bondage that he had not attained before.
“Again, with the abandoning of pleasure and pain…a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the fourth jhana…He considers this and understands it thus: ‘This fourth jhana is conditioned and volitionally produced. But whatever is conditioned and volitionally produced is impermanent, subject to cessation.’ Standing upon that, he attains the destruction of the taints. But if he does not attain the destruction of the taints…without ever returning from that world.
“This too is one thing proclaimed by the Blessed One… wherein if a bhikkhu abides diligent, ardent, and resolute…he attains the supreme security from bondage that he had not attained before.
“Again, a bhikkhu abides pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with loving-kindness, likewise the second, likewise the third, likewise the fourth;
He considers this and understands it thus: ‘This deliverance of mind through loving-kindness is conditioned and volitionally produced.
But whatever is conditioned and volitionally produced is impermanent, subject to cessation.’
Standing upon that, he attains the destruction of the taints. But if he does not attain the destruction of the taints…without ever returning from that world. “This too is one thing proclaimed by the Blessed One… wherein if a bhikkhu abides diligent, ardent, and resolute…he attains the supreme security from bondage that he had not attained before.
“Again, a bhikkhu abides pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with compassion…without ill will. He considers this and understands it thus: This deliverance of mind through compassion is conditioned and volitionally produced. But whatever is conditioned and volitionally produced is impermanent, subject to cessation.’ Standing upon that, he attains the destruction of the taints. But if he does not attain the destruction of the taints…without ever returning from that world. “This too is one thing proclaimed by the Blessed One.- wherein if a bhikkhu abides diligent, ardent, and resolute..-he attains the supreme security from bondage that he had not attained before. 10. “Again, a bhikkhu abides pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with appreciative joy…without ill willi considers this and understands it thus: ‘This deliverance of mind through appreciative joy is conditioned and volitionally produced. But whatever is conditioned and volitionally produced is impermanent, subject to cessation.’ Standing upon that, he attains the destruction of the taints. But if he does not attain the destruction of the taints…without ever returning from that world. “This too is one thing proclaimed by the Blessed One… wherein if a bhikkhu abides diligent, ardent, and resolute…he attains the supreme security from bondage that he had not attained before.
“Again, a bhikkhu abides pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with equanimity…without ill will.
He considers this and understands it thus: ‘This deliverance of mind through equanimity is conditioned and volitionally produced.
But whatever is conditioned and volitionally produced is impermanent, subject to cessation.’
Standing upon that, he attains the destruction of the taints. But if he does not attain the destruction of the taints… without ever returning from that world. “This too is one thing proclaimed by the Blessed One… wherein if a bhikkhu abides diligent, ardent, and resolute… he attains the supreme security from bondage that he had not attained before.
“Again, with the complete surmounting of perceptions of form, with the disappearance of perceptions of sensory impact, with non-attention to perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite,’ a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the base of infinite space.
He considers this and understands it thus: ‘This attainment of the base of infinite space is conditioned and volitionally produced.
But whatever is conditioned and volitionally produced is impermanent, subject to cessation.’
Standing upon that, he attains the destruction of the taints. But if he does not attain the destruction of the taints… without ever returning from that world. “This too is one thing proclaimed by the Blessed One… Wherein if a bhikkhu abides diligent, ardent, and resolute…he attains the supreme security from bondage that he had not attained before.
“Again, by completely surmounting the base of infinite space, aware that ‘consciousness is infinite,’ a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the base of infinite consciousness.
He considers this and understands it thus: “This attainment of the base of infinite consciousness is conditioned and volitionally produced.
But whatever is conditioned and volitionally produced is impermanent, subject to cessation.’
Standing upon that, he attains the destruction of the taints. But if he does not attain the destruction of the taints… without ever returning from that world. “This too is one thing proclaimed by the Blessed One., wherein if a bhikkhu abides diligent, ardent, and resolute…he attains the supreme security from bondage that he had not attained before.
“Again, by completely surmounting the base of infinite consciousness, aware that ‘there is nothing,’ a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the base of nothingness.
He considers this and understands it thus: ‘This attainment of the base of nothingness is conditioned and volitionally produced.
But whatever is conditioned and volitionally produced is impermanent, subject to cessation.’
Standing upon that, he attains the destruction of the taints.
But if he does not attain the destruction of the taints, then because of that desire for the Dhamma, that delight in the Dhamma, with the destruction of the five lower fetters he becomes one due to reappear spontaneously in the Pure Abodes and there attain final Nibbana without ever returning from that world.
“This too is one thing proclaimed by the Blessed One who knows and Sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, wherein if a bhikkhu abides diligent, ardent, and resolute, his unliberated mind comes to be liberated, his undestroyed taints come to be destroyed, and he attains the supreme security from bondage that he had not attained before.”
When venerable Ananda had spoken, the householder Dasama of Atthakanagara said to him: “Venerable Ananda, just as if a man seeking one entrance to a hidden treasure came all at once upon eleven entrances to a hidden treasure, so too, while I was seeking one door to the Deathless, I have come all at once to hear of eleven doors to the Deathless.
Just as if a man had a house with eleven doors and when that house caught on fire, he could flee to safety by any one of these eleven doors, so I can flee to safety by any one of these eleven doors to the Deathless.
Venerable sir, these sectarians will even seek a teacher’s fee for their teachers; why shouldn’t I make an offering to the venerable Ananda?”
Then the householder Dasama of Atthakanagara assembled the Sangha of bhikkhus from Pataliputta and Vesali, and with his own hands he served and satisfied them with various kinds of good food. He presented a pair of cloths to each bhikkhu, and he presented a triple robe to the venerable Ananda, and he had a dwelling worth five hundred built for the venerable Ananda.
I wish to see the venerable Ananda.”
“Here, householder, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the first jhana, which is accompanied by applied and sustained thought, with rapture and pleasure born of seclusion.
But if he does not attain the destruction of the taints, then because of that desire for the Dhamma, that delight in the phamma, with the destruction of the five lower fetters he becomes one due to reappear spontaneously in the Pure Abodes and there attain final Nibbana without ever returning from that world.
When a clansman, as a beginner who has already purified his means by his becoming thus established in this virtue divided into the Training-Precepts of abstinence from killing breathing things and the rest, wants to devote himself to the practice of maintaining in being the meditation subject consisting of the Thirty-two-fold Aspect in order to arrive at purity of ends, then firstly he may find that he has the impediment consisting of abode, clan, gain, class of pupils, supervision of building work, a prospective journey, relatives, books, or sickness, which, together with either the impediment of supernormal power or the impediment of reputation, come to ten impediments .
Now these ten impediments should be severed by abandoning preoccupation with abodes, clan, gain, class of pupils, relatives, and reputation, by uninterest in building work, journeys, and books, and by curing any sickness. Then when he has severed his impediments without severing his eagerness for renunciation, while never abandoning the behaviour prescribed by the Vinaya in respect of the lesser and minor Rules 3 by his embracing a mode of life governed by effacement 4 brought to its acme, he should, in a manner that accords with the instructions in the Vinaya, 5 approach a teacher who will be the giver of his meditation subject and who possesses the particular distinctions of ‘ scripture ’ and ‘ scribing ’ 6 or who possesses one or other of these two factors, and he should acquaint him of his own intention to learn the meditation subject, after he has propitiated him by undertaking the prescribed duties.
The teacher will know by signs and by his inclinations, temperament and resoluteness if this meditation subject is suitable for him. If it is, then the teacher can give it to him in brief , if he is willing to live in the same monastery as himself;
or if he wants to five elsewhere, the teacher can expound it to him in detail straight through, showing by an exposition of what must be abandoned, discerned, etc., its objective and showing by an exposition of what suits one of lustful temperament, etc., its classification.
When he has learnt the text of the meditation subject with its objective and its classification, then, after asking permission from the teacher, he can go to live elsewhere.
‘ A large abode, a new abode, One tumbling down, one near a road,
When he does so, he should avoid the.
Here, bhikkhus, a resting-place is not too far and not too near in respect of the alms resort, and has a path for going and coming. It is little frequented by day with little sound and few voices by night. There is little contact with gadflies, flies, wind, burning by the sun and creeping things.
One who lives in that resting- place easily obtains robes, alms food, resting-place, and the requisite of medicine as cure for the sick.
In that resting-place there are older bhikkhus living who are learned, versed in the Scriptures, observers of the True Idea, observers of the Discipline, observers of the Codes, 7 and when from time to time one asks them questions thus “ How is this, venerable sirs? What is the meaning of this?
”, then those venerable ones reveal the unrevealed, explain the unexplained, and remove doubt about the many ideas that raise doubts.
This, bhikkhus, is how a resting- place has five factors ‘ .
such a resting-place as has the five factors described thus .
And he should approach . 9. When he has done all his tasks connected with his meal, etc. he should review the danger in sensual desires and the blessings in renunciation, and he should infuse his cognizance with confidence by recollecting how truly enlightened the Enlightened One is, how truly ideal the True Idea is, and how truly entered upon the good way the Community is, 10.
It is in this and no other way that a beginner can maintain in being the Thirty-two-fold Aspect in all aspects.
Herein, at the outset the Skin Pentad should firstly be taken, even in the case of one who knows the whole Tipitaka, and it should be recited forward in the way beginning ‘ Head-hairs, body-hairs,… ’ and when that is familiar, backwards in the way beginning ‘ Skin, teeth,… ’, and when that too is familiar, then in both ways, forwards and backwards. This recitation should be done verbally for the purpose of cutting off outward-straying thoughts and gaining familiarity with the text, and it should be done mentally for the purpose of discerning the individual essences of the parts; and this should be kept up for the space of half a month;
for the verbal maintenance of it in being, by its cutting off outward-straying thoughts, is a condition for the mental maintenance of it in being through familiarity with the text, while the mental maintenance of it in being is a condition for discerning the parts by way of either their loathesomeness or their colour or their characteristics. 12. Next the Kidney Pentad should be treated in the same way for half a month, after which both pentads for half a month. After that the Lights Pentad for half a month and then the three pentads for half a month. Next, after including ‘ brain ’ immediately after dung’—since, although mentioned at the end in the Patisa- mbhidamagga, it nevertheless belongs, for the purpose of maintaining the meditation subject in being, together with the rest of the aspects of the earth-element here —the Brain Pentad should be similarly treated for half a month; after which the four pentads for half a month. Next the Fat Septad for half a month, after which the five pentads together with the Fat Septad for half a month. Next the Urine Septad for half a month, after which the whole Thirty-two-fold Aspect for half a month. 13. The maintenance of the meditation subject in being for six months as stated in this way, along with definition by colour, shape, direction, location, and delimitation,
is designed for a person of medium understanding.
It should be maintained in being by one of dull understanding for as long as life lasts. But the maintenance of it in being soon brings success in the case of one of keen understanding.
Here it will be asked: But how does he define this Thirty-two-fold Aspect by colour and so on?
—When he is maintaining in being this meditation subject consisting of the Thirty-two-fold Aspect with its divisions beginning with the Skin Pentad in the way begin- ning ‘There are in this body head-hairs,…,then her defines it as follows: 15. He defines head-hairs, firstly, by colour as ‘black’ or coloured according as they are seen by him,
He defines them by direction in this way: feince what is above the navel is called the upper direction in this body and what is below it is called the lower direction, consequently they are found un this body’s upper direction’.
He defines them by location in this way: ‘They are found in in the moist unner skin of the head delimited by the edge if the forehead, the roots of the ears, and the nape of the neck.
And herein, just as kunta-grasses on the top of an ant-hill do not know “ We are found on the top of an ant- hi nor does the top of the ant-hill know “ kunta-grasses are found on me’, so too the head-hairs do not know ‘We are found in the moist inner skin of a head’ nor does the moist inner skin of the head know ‘Head-hairs are found in me’
By delimitation : there is twofold delimitation, namely, by the similar and by the dissimilar.
Herein, he defines them according to delimitation by the similar thus: ‘ Head-hairs are each delimited by the surface of the moist inner skin in which they are fixed and by their own roots fixed in that moist inner skin by entering to the extent of a rice grain; they are each delimited above by space, and all round by each other; this is the delimitation by the similar.’ ‘ Head-hairs are not the remaining thirty-one aspects,
This, firstly, is how he defines head-hairs by colour and the rest.
He defines body-hairs, among the remainder, by colour as ‘ mostly black ’ or according as they are seen by him,
And herein, just as grasses found on the site of an old village do not know “ We are found on the site of an old village ”, nor does the site of the old village know “ Dabba- grasses are found on me ”, so too, the body-hairs do not know “ We are found in the moist inner skin of a physical frame ”, nor does the moist inner skin of the physical frame know “ Body-hairs are found in me
He defines them by delimitation thus ‘ They are each delimited below by the surface of the moist inner skin in which they are fixed and by their own roots fixed in that by their entering to the amount of a likkha by space, and all round by each other,
which is the delimitation by the similar; but the delimitation by the dissimilar is the same as that of head-hairs’. This is how he defines body-hairs by colour and the rest.
Next he defines nails, which number twenty in one who has them complete,
He defines them by shape as ‘ each the shape of the location where it is fixed, or mostly the shape of ynadhuka- fruit kernels, or the shape offish scales.
And herein, just as madhuka- fruit kernels fixed on the ends of sticks by village children do not know “ We are fixed on sticks ” nor do the sticks know “ Madhuka- fruit kernels are fixed on us ”, so too, the nails do not know “ We are found on tips of fingers and toes ” nor do the fingers and toes know “ Nails are found on us’;
He defines them by delimitation as ‘delimited each below and at the root by the flesh of the fingers and toes, above and at the tip by space, on both sides by the skin of the fingers and toes on each side of them,
which is the delimitation by the similar; but the delimitation by the dissimilar is the same as that of the head-hairs and so on ’. This is how he defines nails by colour and the rest.
Next to that he defines teeth , which number thirty-two in one who has them complete,
Taking them two by two below and above from the ends of both rows of teeth, there are eight teeth which are four-pointed, four- rooted, and bench-shaped; on the near side of these there are, set in the same order, eight teeth which are three-pointed, three-rooted and tripod-shaped.11
Next, taking the four below and four above in the middle of both rows of teeth, there are eight teeth which are one-pointed, one-rooted and pumpkin-pip-shaped’.
and by location thus ‘ the upper ones are set in the upper jaw-bone points down- wards while the lower ones are set in the lower jaw-bone points upwards.
And herein, just as posts fixed by a builder in a lower layer of stones and inserted in an upper layer do not know “ We are fixed in a lower layer of stones and inserted in an upper layer ” nor does the lower layer of stones know “ Posts are fixed in me ” nor does the upper layer of stones know “ Posts are inserted in me ”, so too, the teeth do not know “ We are fixed in a lower jaw-bone and inserted in an upper jaw-bone ” nor does the lower jaw-bone know “ Teeth are fixed in me ” nor does the upper jaw-bone know “ Teeth are inserted in me “;
for these are ideas destitute of mutual concern by and reviewing, they are…not a person.’
He defines them by delimitation as ‘ delimited below by their sockets in the jaw-bones and by the surface of their own roots fixed into the jaw-bones, above by space, and all round by each other,
which is the delimitation by the similar; but the delimitation by the dissimilar is the same as that of the head-hairs and so on’. This is how he defines teeth by colour and the rest.
Next to that he defines skin, which covers up the conglomeration of different kinds of ordure 12 inside the physical frame, by colour as ‘ white;
He defines it by shape briefly as ‘the shape of a mail-coat’, but in detail as ‘ variously shaped;
The meditator who is discerning skin should work his cognizance between the flesh and the skin, and, beginning with the upper lip, should first define the inner skin of the face; next the skin of the head, then the skin of the back of the neck; 13 next the skin of the right arm forwards and backwards, then the skin of the left arm in the same way; next the skin of the back, then the skin of the buttocks; next the skin of the right leg forwards and backwards,
then the skin of the left leg in the same way; next the skin of the private parts, the paunch, the bosom, and the front of the neck, 13 and then the skin of the lower jaw-bone,
And herein, just as when a box is covered with moist hide, the moist hide does not know “ A box is covered by me ” nor does the box know I am covered by moist hide ”, so too, the skin does not know This physical frame consisting of the four great entities of hardness, cohesion, temperature, and motion is enveloped by me nor does this physical frame consisting of the four great entities know I am enveloped by skin ” ;
for these are ideas destitute of mutual concern and reviewing, they are…not a person,
but only
“ A tumour where nine holes abide “ Wrapped in a coat of clammy hide “
And trickling filth on every side, “ Polluting the air with stenches far and wide ” ’ .
He defines it by delimitation as ‘ delimited below by the flesh or by its surface fixed thereto, and above by the cuticle,
which is the delimitation by the similar; but the delimitation by the dissimilar is the same as that of the head-hairs and so on ’. This is how he defines skin by colour and the rest.
Next to that he defines flesh, which is classed as the nine hundred pieces of meat in the physical frame, by colour as ‘ red, with the hue of palibaddhaka flowers.
He defines it by shape as ‘ variously shaped;
the flesh of the thighs is the shape of a rolling-pin for crushing lime; the flesh of the buttocks is the shape of the end of an oven; the flesh of the back is the shape of slabs of palm sugar; the flesh between each two ribs is the shape of clay mortar squeezed thin and put in a place where there is a flattened14 opening between bamboos. The flesh of the breast is the shape of a lump of wet clay rounded 15 and flung down. The flesh of the two upper-arms is the shape of a large rat after the tail, head and paws have been cut off and the skin removed—some say it is the shape of a meat- sausage 16 —;
the flesh of the cheeks 17 is the shape of a karanja seed put in a part of the cheek 18 —
He defines it by direction as ‘ found in the two directions ’
And herein, just as when a wall is plastered with thick clay the thick clay does not know “ A wall is plastered with me ” nor does the wall know “ I am plastered with thick clay ”, so too, the flesh consisting of the nine hundred pieces does not know “ Three hundred bones are plastered over by me” nor do the three hundred bones know “We are plastered over with nine hundred pieces of flesh”;
for these are ideas destitute of mutual concern and reviewing, they are…not a person,
He defines it by delimitation as ‘ each piece delimited below by the framework of bones or by the surface placed thereon, above by the skin, and all round by each other, which is the delimitation by the similar; but the delimitation by the dissimilar is the same as that of the head-hairs and so on.
This is how he defines flesh by colour and the rest.
Next to that he defines sinews, which are those classed as the nine hundred in the physical frame, by colour as ‘ white ’—some say ‘ honey-coloured 5
for herein, the biggest sinews are the shape of yam shoots, the next smaller are the shape of the ropes in nets for catching boars, those still smaller are the shape of a stinking-creeper. Those still smaller are the shape of the large strings in the kind of lute used by the Sinhalese. Those still smaller are the shape of coarse thread. The sinews on the backs of the hands and backs of the feet are the shape of birds’ claws. The sinews in the head are the shape of the open criss-cross net of dukula fibres that village boys put on their heads. The sinews on the back are the shape of a wet fishing-net spread out in the sun. The rest of the sinews extending over the several limbs in this physical frame are the shape of a net of mail close-fitted to the physical frame ’.
He defines them by direction as ‘ found in the two directions ’,
and also as follows: c Among these, there are five large sinews called “ tendons ” that start out from the base of the right ear and go in front and behind binding the left side, and there are five that start out from the base of the left ear and go in front and behind binding the right side; then there are five that start out from the right base of the neck and go in front and behind on the left side, and there are five that start out from the left base of the neck and go in front and behind binding the right side; then there are ten large sinews likewise called “ tendons that go down to bind the right hand, five in front and five behind,
He defines them by location as ‘ found in the whole physical frame in between the bones and the skin and in between the bones and the flesh, binding the bones.
And herein, just as when wall-wattles are bound by creeper-thongs, the creeper- thongs do not know “ Wall-wattles are bound together by us ” nor do the wall-wattles know “We are bound together by creeper- thongs ”, so too, the sinews do not know “ Three hundred bones are bound together by us ” nor do the three hundred bones know “We are bound together by sinews”;
but only
He defines them by delimitation as ‘ delimited below by the three hundred bones or by their surface fixed thereto, above by skin and flesh, and all round by each other,
which is the delimitation by the similar, but the delimitation by the dissimilar is the same as that of the head-hairs and so on This is how he defines sinews by colour and the rest.
Next to that he defines bones. Now leaving aside the 32 tooth-bones already dealt with separately , there are in the physical frame 64 hand-bones, 64 foot-bones, 64 soft bones dependent on the flesh, and 2 heel-bones; then in each leg, 2 ankle- bones, 2 shin-bones, 1 knee-bone, 1 thigh-bone; then 2 hip-bones, 18 spine-bones, 24 rib-bones, 14 breast-bones, 1 heart-bone , 2 collar-bones, 2 shoulderblade bones, 2 upper-arm bones, 2 pairs of forearm-bones, 21 7 neck-bones, 2 jaw-bones, 1 nose-bone, 1 forehead- bone, 9 skull-bones, and so on. He defines all these by colour as ‘ white.
He defines them by shape as ‘ variously shaped ;
for herein the end-bones of the toes are the shape of kataka seeds; those next to them in the middle sections are the shape of incomplete jack-fruit seeds; the bones of the base sections are the shape of small drums—some say they are the shape of peacocks’ crests—.22
The bones of the back of the foot are the shape of a bunch of crushed yam tubers. The heel-bones are the shape of palmyra, seeds in single- stoned fruits. The ankle-bones are the shape of two play-balls bound together. Of the shin-bones, the smaller is the shape of a bow-stick, while the larger is the shape of the back of a rat-snake 23 shrunken by hunger and thirst. The place in the shin-bones where they rest on the ankle-bones is the shape of a khajjurika shoot with the sheath removed. 24 The place in the shin-bones where they are fixed on the knee-bone is the shape of the top of a tabor. The knee-bone is the shape of a lump of froth pressed down on one side. 25 The thigh-bones are the shape of badly pared 26 handles for axes or hatchets. The place in the thigh-bone where it is fixed on the hip-bone is the shape of goldsmiths’ fire-kindling twig-faggot. 27 The location where it is fixed in that is the shape of a punnaga fruit with the top cut off. The two hip-bones, when fastened together, are the shape of a cradle 28 made by potters—some say they are the shape of an ascetic’s bolster—.
The buttock bones are the shape of ap inverted snake’s hood; they are perforated in seven places. The 18 spine-bones are internally the shape of lead-sheet rolls put one on top of the other; externally they are the shape of a string of beads, and they each have two or three projections that rest one on the other and resemble the teeth of a saw. Of the 24 rib-bones, the complete ones are the shape of complete Sinhalese sickles 29 while the incomplete ones are the shape of incomplete Sinhalese sickles 29 — some say that all together they are the shape of the outspread pair of wings of a white cock—.
The 14 breast-bones are the shape of an old chariot’s row of planks. The heart-bone 30 is the shape of the bowl of a wooden spoon. The collar-bone is the shape of a small metal hatchet handle. The bone below them is the shape of a half-moon. The rear-arm-bones are the shape of axe blades—some say they are the shape of half-worn-away Sinhalese hoes—.
The upper-arm bones are the shape of looking-glass handles—some say they are the shape of big hatchet handles—.
The forearm-bones are the shape of a twin palm’s trunks. The wrist-bones are the shape of lead-sheet rolls stuck together. The bones of the backs of the hands are the shape of a flattened bunch of yams. The bones of the fingers’ base sections are the shape of small drums; those of the middle sections are the shape of incomplete jack-fruit seeds; and those of the end sections are the shape of kataka seeds. The seven neck-bones are the shape of slices 31 of bamboo stems threaded one after another on a stick. The lower jaw-bone is the shape of a smith’s iron hammer fastening. 32 The upper jaw-bone is the shape of a scraping knife. The bones of the eye-sockets and nostril-sockets are the shape of young palmyra seeds with the kernels removed. The frontal bone is the shape of an inverted broken oyster-shell dish. 33 The bones of the ear-bases are the shape of barbers’ razor-boxes. The sinciput bones in the place where a cloth is tied above the frontal bone and the ear-bases are the shape of pieces of crust on a pan of thickening ghee. 34 The occiput-bone is the shape of a lop-sided coconut with a hole cut in the end. The head-bones together are the shape of a worn-out gourd-vessel held together with stitches ’.
He defines them by direction as ‘ found in both directions ’
and by location indiscriminately as ‘ lying throughout the whole physical frame ’, but in particular thus ‘ the head-bones rest on the neck-bones, the neck-bones on the spine-bones, the spine-bones on the hip-bones, the hip-bones on the thigh-bones, the thigh-bones on the knee-bones, the knee-bones on the shin-bones, the shin-bones on the ankle-bones, the ankle-bones on the bones of the backs of the feet; and the bones of the backs of the feet hold up the ankle-bones, the ankle-bones… the neck-bones hold up the head-bones; and the remaining bones can be understood accordingly.
And herein, just as in the case of a structure of bricks and rafters, etc., the bricks, etc., above do not know “ We rest on those below us ” nor do those below know “ We stand holding up those above us ”, so too, the head-bones do not know “We rest on neck-bones ”,… nor do the ankle-bones know “ We rest on the bones of the backs of feet ” nor do the bones of the backs of the feet know “We stand holding up ankle-bones
for these are ideas destitute of mutual concern and reviewing, they are…not a person.
In fact this is only some three hundred and odd bones bound together by nine hundred sinews, plastered over with nine hundred pieces of flesh, wrapped in a single coat 35 of hide, moistened with the moisture that traverses the seven hundred stimulant-channels, the whole oozing sweat-drops that well from the 99,000 body-hair pores, and housing the eighty clans of worms; and these are reckoned as a “ body ”, wherein a meditator, seek as he will for an individual essence, finds nothing at all worth grasping, but only a bony skeleton bound together with sinews and mixed up with various kinds of ordure’.
Seeing this as it actually is, he acquires the status of a son of Him with the Ten Powers,
Ordure in ordure generated, filth in pollution,
Stench in a stench, Something that to fall is fated
He defines them by delimitation as ‘ each delimited inside by the bone-marrow, above by the flesh, and at the ends and the roots by each other,
Next to that he defines bone-marrow , which is in the physical frame inside the bones classed in the way already stated, by colour as ‘ white
And herein, just as curd and treacle inside bamboo tubes, etc., do not know “ We are inside bamboo tubes, etc. ” and the bamboo tubes, etc., do not know “ Curd and treacle are inside us ”, so too, the bone-marrow does not know “ I am inside bones ” nor do the bones know “ Bone-marrow is inside us
for these are ideas destitute of mutual concern and reviewing, they are…not a person ’.
He defines them by delimitation as ‘ delimited by the insides of the bones and by what is similar to bone-marrow,
Next to that he defines kidney , which is classed as the two balls of flesh in the interior of the physical frame, by colour as ‘ dull red, the colour of pdlibhaddaka seeds ‘.
He defines it by shape as ‘ the shape of village boys’ play-balls of wound thread—some say the shape of twin mango fruits with a single stalk— ’.
He defines it by direction as ‘ found in the upper direction ’
And herein, just as a pair of twin mango fruits fastened by a single stalk does not know “ I am fastened by a stalk ” nor does the stalk know “ A pair of twin mango fruits is fastened by me ”, so too, the kidney does not know “ I am fastened by a stout sinew ” nor does the stout sinew know ‘ ‘ Kidney is fastened by me ”;
for these are ideas destitute of mutual concern and reviewing, they are…not a person’.
He defines it by delimitation as ‘ kidney delimited by what is similar to kidney, which is the delimitation by the similar; but the delimitation by the dissimilar is the same as that of the head-hairs and so on ’.
This is how he defines kidney by colour and the rest.
Next to that he defines heart, which is in the interior of the physical frame, by colour as ‘ red, the colour of the back of a red-lotus petal ’,
by shape as ‘ the shape of a lotus bud with the outer petals removed and turned upside-down. And it is open on one side 38 like a punndga fruit with its end cut off; it is smooth outside, and inside it is like the inside of a kosataki fruit.
In those who have much understanding it is a little expanded; in those with weak understanding it is still only a bud.
Except for the material form in it dependent on which the mind-element and the mind-consciousness-element occur, 39 the rest of it consists of what is counted as the piece of flesh inside which half a pasata-measure of blood is kept, which in one of lustful temperament is red, in one of hating temperament is black, in one of deluded temperament is like water that meat has been washed in, in one of speculative- thinking temperament is the colour of lentil soup, in one of faithful temperament is the colour of yellow kanikdra flowers, and in one of understanding temperament is limpid, clear, as unturbid as polished crystal, and seems to shine
And herein, just as the mullion 40 between two window shutters does not know “ I stand between two window shutters ” nor do the window shutters know “ A mullion is between us ”, so too, the heart does not know “ I stand between two breasts ” nor do the breasts know “ A heart stands between us ”;
for these are ideas destitute of mutual concern and reviewing, they are…not a person ’.
He defines it by delimitation as ‘ heart delimited by what is similar to heart,
Next to that he defines the twin piece of flesh known as liver , which is in the interior of the physical frame, by colour as ‘ red, the colour of the red backs of the outer petals of a white lotus.
He defines it by shape as ‘ the shape of a kovilara leaf, having a single root and twin ends. In sluggish people it is single and large, while in those with understanding there are two or three small ones ’.
He defines it by direction as ‘ found in the upper direction ’
And herein, just as a lump of meat stuck on the side of a saucepan does not know ‘ ‘ I am stuck on the side of a saucepan ’ ’ nor does the saucepan know “ A lump of meat is stuck on me ”, so too, the fiver does not know “ I am near a right side, inside from two breasts ” nor does the right side inside from the two breasts know “ A liver is near me ’ ’;
for these are ideas destitute of mutual concern and reviewing, they are…not a person ’.
He defines it by delimitation as ‘ fiver delimited by what is similar to fiver,
which is the delimitation by the similar; but the delimitation by the dissimilar is the same as that of the head-hairs and so on ’. This is how he defines liver by colour and the rest.
Next to that he defines midriff, which is twofold in the physical frame as concealed and unconcealed, by colour as ‘ white, the colour of dukula rags ’.
He defines it by shape as ‘ the shape of its location ’ ,
And herein, just as a rag in which meat is wrapped does not know “ Meat is wrapped in me ” nor does the meat know “ I am wrapped in a rag ”, so too, the midriff does not know “ Heart and kidney and flesh under the skin in a whole physical frame are wrapped in me ”
He defines it by delimitation as ‘ delimited below by flesh, above by skin, and all round by what is similar to midriff,
which is the delimitation by the similar; but the delimitation by the dissimilar is the same as that of the head-hairs and so on ’. This is how he defines midriff by colour and the rest.
Next to that he defines spleen , which is in the interior of the physical frame, by colour as ‘ bluish, the colour of withered niggundi flowers ’.
He defines it by shape as ‘ usually seven fingers in size, without attachments, and the shape of a black calf’s tongue ’,
And herein, just as a lump of cow-dung near the upper side of a barn does not know “ 1 am near the upper side of a barn ” nor does the upper side of the barn know “ A lump of cowdung is near me ”, so too, the spleen does not know “ I am near the upper side of a belly’s lining ” nor does the upper side of the belly’s lining know’ A spleen is near me’;
for these are ideas destitute of mutual concern and reviewing, they are…not a person ’.
He defines it by delimitation as ‘ spleen delimited by what is similar to spleen,
Next to that he defines lights, which are in the interior of the physical frame and classed as two or three bits of flesh, 41 by colour as ‘ red, the colour of not very ripe udumbara figs ’.
He defines them by shape as ‘ the shape of an unevenly cut thick slice of cake—some say it is the shape of a heap of bits of roof-tiles—,
He defines them by direction as ‘ found in the upper direction ’
And herein, just as a bird’s nest hanging on the inside of an old barn does not know “ I am hanging on the inside of an old bam ” nor does the inside of the old barn know “ A bird’s nest is hanging on me ”, so too, the fights do not know “ I am hanging on the interior of a physical frame in a part inside from the two breasts ” nor does the part inside from the two breasts in the interior of the physical frame know “ Lights are hanging on me “
for these are ideas destitute of mutual concern and reviewing, they are…not a person ’.
He defines them by delimitation as ‘ delimited by what is similar to lights,
Next to that he defines the bowel , Which is inside the physical frame and is thirty-two hands long in a man and twenty-eight hands long in a woman and looped in twenty-one places, by colour as ‘ white, the colour of sand with lime ’.
by direction as ‘ found in the two directions ’
And herein, just as the decapitated carcase of a rat-snake put into a trough of blood does not know “ I am in a trough of blood ” nor does the trough of blood know “ A decapitated rat-snake’s carcase is in me ”, so too, the bowel does not know “ I am inside a physical frame ” nor does the inside of the physical frame know “ A bowel is in me ”;
for these are ideas destitute of mutual concern and reviewing, they are…not a person ’.
He defines it by delimitation as ‘ delimited by what is similar to bowel,
which is the delimitation by the similar; but the delimitation by the dissimilar is the same as that of the head- hairs and so on ’. This is how he defines bowel by colour and the rest.
Next to that he defines entrail, which is inside the physical frame between the bowel coils, by colour as ‘ the colour of white edible water-lily roots ’, 42
And herein, just as the strings that sew together the rope-rings of a foot-wiper do not know “We sew together rope-rings of a foot- wiper ” nor does the rope-ring of the foot-wiper know “ strings sew me together ”, so too, the entrail does not know “ I fasten a bowel in twenty-one loops ” nor does the bowel know “ Entrail fastens me”
for these are ideas destitute of mutual concern and reviewing, they are…not a person ’.
He defines it by delimitation as ‘ entrail delimited by what is similar to entrail,
Next to that he defines gorge, which is inside the physical frame, by colour as ‘ the colour of swallowed food,
And what is called “ stomach ” is one part of the bowel membrane which resembles the swelling of air produced in the middle of a length of cloth when it is being twisted and wrung out from the two ends. It is smooth outside, while inside it is like a balloon of cloth 44 soiled by wrapping up meat refuse—some say it is like the inside of a rotten jack fruit—.
It is this place where worms dwell seething in tangles: the thirty-two families of worms such as round worms, swelling-producing worms, “ palm-fibre ” worms, “ needle- mouth ” worms, tape-worms, thread-worms, and the rest. 45 When there is no food and drink, etc., present, they leap up screeching and pounce upon the heart’s flesh; and when food and drink, etc., are swallowed, they wait with mouths uplifted and scramble to snatch the first two or three mouthfuls swallowed.
It is these worms’ maternity-home, privy, hospital and charnel-ground. Just as when it has rained heavily in a time of drought and what has been carried by the water into the cesspit at the gate of an outcaste village—the various kinds of ordure such as urine, excrement, bits of hide and bones and sinews, as well as spittle, snot, blood, etc ., 46 gets mixed up with the mud and water already collected there; and after two or three days the families of worms appear, and it ferments, warmed by the energy of the sun’s heat, frothing and bubbling on the top, quite black in colour, and so utterly stinking and loathe- some that one can s’carcely go near it or look at, much less smell it or taste it; so too, the stomach is the place where the assortment of food and drink, etc., falls after being pounded up by the pestle of the teeth and turned over by the hand of the tongue and stuck together with spittle, losing at that moment its special qualities of colour, smell, taste, etc., and taking on the appearance of koleyya paste 47 and dog’s vomit, then to get soused in the bile and phlegm and wind that have collected there, where it ferments with the energy of the stomach-fire’s heat, seethes with the families of worms, frothing and bubbling on the top, till it turns into utterly stinking nauseating muck,
even to hear about 48 which takes away any appetite for food, drink, etc., let alone to see it with the eye of understanding.
And when the food and drink, etc., fall into it, they get divided into five parts: the worms devour one part, the stomach- fire burns up another part, another part becomes urine, another part becomes excrement, and one part is turned into nourishment and sustains the blood, flesh and so on.
And herein, just as dog’s vomit lying in an utterly disgusting dog’s trough does not know “ I am lying in a dog’s trough ” nor does the dog’s trough know “ Dog’s vomit is lying in me ”,
for these are ideas destitute of mutual concern and reviewing, they are…not a person
which is the delimitation by the similar; but the delimitation by the dissimilar is the same as that of the head-hairs and so on’. This is how he defines gorge by colour and the rest.
Next to that he defines dung, which is inside the physical frame, by colour as ‘ usually the colour of swallowed food ’,
Now the receptacle for digested food is the place in the lowest part at the end of the bowel, between the navel and the root of the spine, which measures eight finger-breadths in height and resembles the inside of a bamboo tube; and just as rain water that falls on a higher level runs down to fill a lower level and stays there, so too, any food, drink, etc., after falling into the receptacle for undigested food and being continuously cooked and simmered by the stomach-fire till they have got as soft as flour in a pulverizer, run on down through the cavity of the bowel, to be pressed down till they remain impacted there like brown clay crammed into a bamboo tube.
And herein, just as brown clay crammed into a bamboo tube and pressed down does not know “ I am in a bamboo tube ” nor does the bamboo tube know “ Brown clay is in me ”, so too, the dung does not know “ I am in a receptacle for digested food ” nor does the receptacle for digested food know “ Dung is in me ”;
He defines it by delimitation as ‘ dung delimited by what is similar to dung,
which is the delimitation by the similar; but the delimitation by the dissimilar is the same as that of the head-hairs and so on ’. This is how he defines dung by colour and the rest.
Next to that he defines brain, which is in the physical frame in the interior of the skull, by colour as ‘ white, the colour of a piece of toadstool—
for these are ideas destitute of mutual concern and reviewing, they are…not a person’.
He defines it by delimitation as ‘ brain delimited by what is similar to brain,
which is the delimitation by the similar; but the delimitation by the dissimilar is the same as that of the head-hairs and so on ’. This is how he defines brain by colour and the rest.
Next to that he defines bile, which is in the physical frame and twofold classed as local bile and free bile, by colour as ‘ the colour of thick madhuka- oil—s
And herein, just as oil extending over water does not know “ I extend over water ” nor does the water know “ Oil extends over me ”, so too, the free bile does not know “ I extend over a physical frame ” nor does the physical frame know “ Free bile extends over me ”,
for these are ideas destitute of mutual concern and reviewing, they are…not a person ’.
He defines it by delimitation as ‘ bile delimited by what is similar to bile, ‘
which is the delimitation by the similar; but the delimitation by the dissimilar is the same as that of the head-hairs and so on.’ This is how he defines bile by colour and the rest.
Next to that he defines phlegm, which is in the interior of the physical frame and measures a bowlful, by colour as white, the colour of a kacchaka- fig tree’s leaf-juice ,
And just as duckweed and green scum on the surface of water divide when a stick or a potsherd is dropped into the water and then spread together again, so too, at the time of eating and drinking, etc., when the food and drink, etc., fall into the stomach the phlegm divides and then spreads together again; and if it gets weak, the stomach becomes utterly disgusting with a smell of ordure, like a ripe boil or a rotten hen’s egg,
And herein, just as the surface of froth on a cesspit does not know “lam on a cesspit ” nor does the cesspit know “ A surface of froth is on me ”, so too, the phlegm does not know “I am on a stomach’s surface ” nor does the stomach’s surface know “ Phlegm is in me
for these are ideas destitute of mutual concern and reviewing, they are…not a person ’.
He defines it by delimitation as ‘ phlegm delimited by what is similar to phlegm,
which is the delimitation by the similar; but the delimitation by the dissimilar is the same as that of the head-hairs and so on ’. This is how he defines phlegm by colour and the rest.
Next to that he defines pus, which is in the physical frame, by colour as ‘ the colour of bleached foliage ’, by shape as ‘
And herein, just as the gum that collects in a place on a tree hit by, say, the blade of an axe does not know “ 1 am in a place on a tree where it has been hit ” nor does the hit place on the tree know Gum is in me ”, so too, pus does not know “ I am in a place in a physical frame wounded here and there by stumps, thorns, etc., or in a place where a boil or & carbuncle has arisen ” nor does the place in the physical frame know “ Pus is in me
for these are ideas destitute of mutual concern and reviewing, they are…not a person.’
He defines it by delimitation as ‘ pus delimited by what is similar to pus,
which is the delimitation by the similar; but the delimitation by the dissimilar is the same as that of the head-hairs and so on ’. This is how he defines pus by colour and the rest.
Next to that he defines blood , which is in the physical frame and has the twofold classification of stored blood and mobile blood, by colour thus ‘ stored blood is the colour of cooked and thickened lac solution, while mobile blood is the colour of clear lac solution ’.
and by location as ‘ except for the flesh-free parts of the head-hairs, body-hairs, teeth, nails, and the hard dry skin, mobile blood extends over the whole clung-to 51 physical frame by following the network of veins,
And herein, just as the water in a worn-out pot that wets clods of earth, etc., below it does not know “ I am in a worn-out pot wetting clods of earth, etc. ” nor does the worn-out pot know “ Water is in me ” nor do the clods of earth, etc., below know “ It is wetting us ”, so too, the blood does not know “ I am in the lower part of a liver’s site wetting a kidney, heart, etc.” nor does the lower part of the liver’s site know “ Blood is in me ” nor do the kidney, heart, etc., know “It is wetting us ”;
for these are ideas destitute of mutual concern and reviewing, they are…not a person ’.
He defines it by delimitation as ‘ blood delimited by what is similar to blood,
which is the delimitation by the similar; but the delimitation by the dissimilar is the same as that of the head-hairs and so on’. This is how he defines blood by colour and the rest.
Next to that he defines sweat, which is in the physical frame, by colour as ‘ the colour of clear sesamum oil
And herein, just as the water trickling from the openings in the bunch of lily-bud stems and lotus stalks does not know “ I trickle from openings in a bunch of lily-bud stems and lotus stalks ” nor do the openings in the bunch of lily-bud stems and lotus stalks know “ Water trickles from us ”, so too, sweat does not know “ I trickle from pore openings of head-hairs and body- hairs ” nor do the pore-openings of the head-hairs and body-hairs know “ Sweat trickles from us”;
He defines it by delimitation as ‘ sweat delimited by what is similar to sweat,
which is the delimitation by the similar: but the delimitation by the dissimilar is the same as that of the head-hairs and so on’. This is how he defines sweat by colour and the rest.
Next to that he defines fat, which is in the physical frame between the skin and the flesh, by colour as ‘ the colour of sliced turmeric ’
He defines it by direction as ‘ found in the two directions ’,
And herein, just as a turmeric-dyed muslin rag next to a pile of flesh does not know “ I am next to a pile of flesh ” nor does the pile of flesh know “ I am next to a turmeric-dyed rag ”, so too, the fat does not know “ I am next to flesh in a whole physical frame, or on the shanks, etc.” nor does the flesh know “Fat is next to me”
He defines it by delimitation as ‘ delimited below by the flesh, above by the skin, and all round by what is similar to fat,
which is the delimitation by the similar; but the delimitation by the dissimilar is the same as that of the head-hairs and so on ’. This is how he defines fat by colour and the rest.
Next to that he defines tears , which are in the physical frame, by colour as ‘ the colour of clear sesamum oil ‘,
But they are not stored in the eye-sockets all the while as the bile is in the gall-bladder. However, when creatures feel joy and laugh uproariously or feel grief and weep and lament or eat particular kinds of abnormal food or when their eyes are affected by smoke, dust, dirt, etc., then, being originated by the joy, grief, abnormal food, etc., tears fill up the eye-sockets or overflow from them.
And the Former Teachers comment that “ a meditator who is discerning tears should give attention to tears only as present in virtue of their filling the eye-sockets ”.
And herein, just as water in the sockets of young palmyra nuts with the ends cut off does not know “ I am in sockets of young palmyra nuts with the ends cut off ” nor do the sockets of the young palmyra nuts with the ends cut off know “ Water is in us ”, so too, tears do not know “ We are in eye- sockets ” nor do the eye-sockets know “ Tears are in us”
for these are ideas destitute of mutual concern and reviewing, they are…not a person.
which is the delimitation by the similar; but the delimitation by the dissimilar is the same as that of the head-hairs and so on’. This is how he defines tears by colour and the rest.
Next to that he defines the melted unguent in the physical frame called grease by colour as ‘ the colour of oil sprinkled on gruel ’,
And it is not always found in the melted state in these locations, but when these parts get hot with the heat of a fire, the sun’s heat, upset of temperature, or upset of elements, then it melts and runs there like a film 53 on water-baths of clear water.
And herein, just as a film that has spread over water-baths does not know “ I am spread over water-baths ” nor do the water-baths know “ A film has spread over us ”, so too, the grease does not know “ I am spread over the palms of the hands, etc.” nor do the palms of the hands, etc., know “ Grease is spread over us ”;
for these are ideas destitute of mutual concern and reviewing, they are…not a person’.
He defines it by delimitation as ‘ grease delimited by what is similar to grease,
Next to that he defines spittle, which is in the physical frame in the interior of the mouth, by colour as ‘ white, the colour of froth ’,
And it is not always found stored there; but when creatures see particular kinds of food or remember it or put something hot or bitter or pungent or salt or sour into their mouths
It is thin at the tip of the tongue and thick at the root of the tongue. It is capable of wetting unhusked rice or husked rice or anything else chewable that is put into the mouth, like water in a pit scooped out in a river sand-bank.
And herein, just as the water collected on the surface of a pit scooped out in a river sand-bank does not know “ I am on the surface of a pit ” nor does the surface of the pit know “ Water is on me ”, so too, spittle does not know “ I am collected on the surface of a tongue after descending from cheeks on both sides ’ ’ nor does the tongue’s surface know “ Spittle has collected on me after descending from cheeks on both sides”;
for these are ideas destitute of mutual concern and reviewing, they are… not a person.’
He defines it by delimitation as ‘ spittle delimited by what is similar to spittle,
which is delimitation by the similar. But the delimitation by the dissimilar is the same as that of the head-hairs and so on how he defines spittle by colour and the rest.
Next to that he defines snot , which is in the physical frame, by colour as ‘ white, the colour of a young palmyra kernel
And it is not always found stored there; but just as though a man tied up curd in a lotus leaf, which he then pricked underneath with a thorn, and bits of curd oozed out and dripped, so too, when creatures weep or suffer disturbance of elements produced by wrong food of temperature, then the brain inside the head turns into stale phlegm and it ooozes out and comes down by the opening in the palate and fills the nostril cavities and stays there.
And herein, just as rotten curd put in a bag54 does not know “I am in a bag” no does the bag know “Rotten curd is in me ”, so too, snot does not know “ I am in nostril cavities ” nor do the nostril cavities know “ Snot is in us ”;
He defines it by delimitation as c snot delimited by what is similar to snot,
which is the delimitation by the similar; but the delimitation by the dissimilar is the same as that of the head-hairs and so on This is how he defines snot by colour and the rest.
If it is weak, when a man gets up or sits down, moves forward or moves backward, bends or stretches, then his bones creak, and he goes about making a noise like the snapping of fingers, and when he has walked only one or two leagues’ distance his air-element gets upset and his limbs pain him; but if a man has plenty of it, his bones do not creak when he gets up, sits down, etc., and even when he has walked a long distance his air-element does not get upset and his limbs do not pain him.
And herein, just as lubricating oil does not know “ I lubricate an axle ” nor does the axle know “ Oil lubricates me ”, so too, the oil-of-the-joints does not know “ I lubricate a hundred and eighty joints ” nor do the hundred and eighty joints know “ Oil-of- the-joints lubricates us”;
for these are ideas destitute of mutual concern and reviewing, they are…not a person ’.
He defines it by delimitation as ‘ oil-of-the-joints delimited by what is similar to oil- of-the-joints,
which is the delimitation by the similar; but the delimitation by the dissimilar is the same as that of the head-hairs and so on’. This is how he defines oil-of-the-joints by colour and the rest.
Next to that he defines urine, which is inside the physical frame, by colour as ‘the colour of bean-brine’,
for the bladder-sack is what is called “ bladder ”. And just as when a porous pot 55 is put upside-down in a cesspool, and then the solution from the cesspool enters it though no way of entry is evident, so too the urine from the physical frame enters the bladder though no way of entry is evident. But the way of exit is evident, and when the bladder is full of urine, creatures set about making water.
And herein, just as the solution from a cesspool in a porous pot placed upside-down in a cesspool does not know “ I am in a porous pot which is upside-down ” nor does the porous pot know “ Solution from a cesspool is in me ”, so too, the urine does not know “ I am in a bladder ” nor does the bladder know “ Urine is in me”;
He defines it by delimitation as ‘ delimited by what is inside the bladder and by what is similar to urine,
which is the delimitation by the similar; but the delimitation by the dissimilar is the same as that of the head-hairs and so on ’. This is how he defines urine by colour and the rest.
This is how he defines this thirty-two-fold aspect by colour and the rest.
As he does so, then, owing to his devotion to the maintenance of this meditation subject in being in the various instances, the head-hairs and the rest become familiar to him and establish their appearance 56 as parts.
From then on, just as when a man with good sight is observing a garland of flowers of thirty-two colours knotted on a single thread and all the flowers become evident to him, as it were, simultaneously, so too, when the meditator observes this body thus ‘ There are in this body head-hairs ’, then all these ideas become evident to him simultaneously.
When head-hairs are adverted to, mindfulness proceeds as far as urine, as if tying them together with string.57
From then on, human beings, animals, etc., as they go about, seem to him divested of their aspect of creatures and establish their appearance as just assemblages of parts. And when drink, food, etc., is being swallowed by them, this appears as though it were being put in among the assemblage of parts.
Now it may be asked: What more should be done by him?
— It can be answered as follows: That same sign should be cultivated, maintained in being, developed and made thoroughly defined by him.
—He ‘ cultivates ’ that sign in the head-hairs, etc., of established appearance as parts, which means that with mindfulness he sticks to it, frequents it, approaches it, implants it in the womb of mindfulness;
He ‘ develops ’ it, means that he has it struck at again and again by thought and exploration.
He ‘ makes it thoroughly well defined means that he defines it, upholds it, anchors it with mindfulness, so that once well defined it does not vanish any more.
Or else, following the Tenfold Skill in Attention mentioned above as by following the order, not too quickly, not too slowly, by warding off distraction, 58 by surmounting the description, by successive letting go, by characteristic etc., 69 and the three Suttantas.
Herein, it can be understood that one who gives attention by following the order ‘ cultivates ’ it, who does so not too quickly or not too slowly ‘ maintains it in being who does so by warding off distraction 58 ‘ develops ’ it, and who does so by surmounting the description ‘ makes it thoroughly well defined’.
Here it may be asked: But how does he give attention to these ideas by following the order and so on?
It may be replied: After giving attention to head-hairs, he next gives attention to body- hairs, not to nails;
Why?
Because, just as when a man with no skill climbs a thirty-two-rung ladder using the rungs out of their order, 60 he tires his body and falls from the ladder without completing the climb, so too, if he gives them attention out of their order, he tires his cognizance through failure to arrive at the gratification to be arrived at by completing the maintenance of the meditation subject in being, and so he falls from the maintenence of the thirty-twofold aspect in being without completing it.
Also when he gives attention following the order, he should give attention thus ‘ head-hairs, body-hairs ’ not too quickly;
And just as he should give attention not too quickly, so also not too slowly;
And one who gives attention not too slowly should also do so warding off 58 distraction.
And as to warding off distraction, he gives attention in such a way that cognizance is not distracted among other things such as building-work, and so on;
for one whose cognizance is distracted outwardly with his cognizance and thoughts not concentrated on head-hairs, etc., instead of bringing his maintenance of the meditation subj ect in being to completion comes to ruin and disaster like the Bodhisatta’s companions in the journey to Taxila ,
but one whose cognizance is undistracted, with his cognizance and thoughts concentrated only on head-hairs, etc., brings the maintenance of his meditation subject in being to completion, like the Bodhisatta completing his journey to Taxila.
When he gives attention in this way by warding off 58 distraction, then, according to his practice done in previous lives, his temperament, and his resolve, 61 those ideas establish their appearance for him either as loathesome or as a colour or as void.62
Then he should give attention by surmounting the description.
This means that after surmounting, rejecting, such verbal usage as ‘ head-hairs ’, ‘ body-hairs ’ he gives attention only to the loathesomeness or colour or voidness according as the appearance is established.
How?
Just as when people go to live in a forest abode, then since they are unacquainted with the area they make a sign by breaking branches, etc., for the purpose of perceiving a place where there is water, and so they find water by following up that sign; but once they are acquainted with the area, then they approach the water place and find the water without bothering about the sign and giving it no further attention; so too, when these ideas to which he first gave attention by way of the various terms of verbal usage beginning with ‘ head-hairs ‘ body-hairs ’ have established their appearance in one of the three ways beginning with loathe- someness, then surmounting, ignoring, the term of verbal usage, he gives attention to them as loathesome or whichever of the other two it may be.
And here it may be asked: But how do these ideas establish their appearance for him as loathesome? How as a colour? How as void? And how does he give attention to them as loathesome, as a colour, and as void?
 Head-hairs establish their appearance for him as loathesome in five ways: as to colour, shape, odour, habitat, and location. He gives attention to them in these five ways
as follows, Head-hairs are so utterly repulsive and disgusting as to colour
that when people by night touch a head-hair-shaped fibre or thread that has fallen into their drink or food, they throw away even appetising drink or food or are nauseated by them through perception of them as head-hairs,
as well that, sprouting and coming to growth, increase and maturity as they do on the products of bile, phlegm, pus, and blood, they resemble herbs, etc., growing on the multifarious products of human impurities in a midden,
So too with the body-hairs and the rest.
That in the first place is how he gives attention to these ideas as loathesome when they have established their appearance as loathesome.
 But if they establish their appearance for him as a colour then head-hairs establish their appearance through the blue universal , 63 and likewise body-hairs.
Teeth do so through the white universal.
So in each case he gives attention to them by way of the appropriate universal.
That is how he gives attention to them as a colour when they have established their appearance as a colour.
 But if they establish their appearance for him as void, then head-hairs establish their appearance through analysis of the apparently compact 64 into elements or through that of the apparent mass into the octad with nutritive-essence as eighth.65
Likewise body-hairs, and the rest.
He gives attention to each according as its appearance is established for him.
And when he has given attention thus, he also gives attention to these ideas ‘ by successive letting go ’.
This means when he gives attention by letting go of head-hairs that have established their appearance in one of the three ways beginning with loathe- someness.
Just as a leech 66 standing on the place grasped by its tail scans and then grasps another place with its mouth, and when it has grasped that, it lets go of the first place, so too, standing on the head-hairs and scanning, he gives attention to body-hairs, and when his attention is established on body-hairs he lets go of the head- hairs.
And so in each instance.
Now when he has given attention with successive letting go in this way, those ideas which are establishing their appearance for him in one of the three ways beginning with loathesomeness do so unreservedly and become more evident in the appearance already established.
 In the case of one to whom these ideas appear as loathesome , then just as a monkey being pursued by a huntsman in a palm-grove of thirty-two palms might run on without stopping in any one tree till, being constantly turned back, it became tired and then stopped beside a palm-spike surrounded by dense palm leaves, so too, the cognizance-monkey, being pursued by that same meditator thus in the thirty-two parts of this body, runs on without stopping in any one part till owing to lack of further inclination to run about among a variety of objects through its being constantly turned back, it becomes tired,
and then it stands still in access concentration beside that idea among those beginning with head- hairs with which the meditator is most familiar or which best suit his temperament or on which he has had practice in previous lives;
then by treating that sign again and again with thought of and about it he eventually comes to arouse th first jhana . Using that as the foundation for analysis, he develops insight till he reaches the plane of the Noble Ones .
 In the case of one for whom these ideas establish their appearance as a colour , then just as a monkey… … and then it stands still in access concentration beside that idea among those beginning with head-hairs with which the meditator is most familiar or which best suit his temperament or on which he has had practice in previous lives.
Then by treating that sign again and again with thought of and about it he eventually comes to the five form-sphere jhanas by way of the blue universal or yellow universal . Using any of these as the foundation for analysis, he develops insight and reaches the plane of the Noble Ones.
 In the case of one to whom these ideas appear as void , he gives attention to them by specific characteristics , and by doing so he reaches access jhana by way of the Definition of the Four Elements ,
By developing this insight and practising it progressively he reaches the plane of the Noble Ones.
At this point the question asked above, namely, ‘ How does he give attention to these ideas by following the order?’ has been answered.
And the meaning of what was said as well, namely, ‘ This commentary should be understood as follows according to the maintenance in being ’ has been explained.
eighteen kinds of resting-place called ‘ to be avoided ’ thus .
One with a pond, or leaves, or flowers, Or fruits, or one that people seek;
In cities, among timber, fields, Where people quarrel, in a port,
In outlands, or on frontiers, Unsuitableness, and no Good Friend:
These are the eighteen instances A wise man needs to recognize
And give them full as wide a berth As any footpad-haunted road ’ .
‘ And how has a resting-place five factors, bhikkhus?
Both verbally and mentally, By colour, shape, and by direction,
Location, and delimitation.
The wise man learns in seven ways, or from the seven-fold 8 Skill in Attention stated thus: by following the order, not too quickly, not too slowly, by warding off distraction, by surmounting the description, by successive letting go, by absorption etc., with the ‘ three Suttantas ’.
Then he can begin work on the maintenance of the Thirty-two- fold Aspect in being without diverging either from the Sevenfold Skill in Learning stated thus .
and by shape as ‘long and round like measuring rods.
for these are ideas destitute of mutual concern and reviewing, they are incognizant, actionally undeclarable, void, disgusting and repulsive owing to their very malodorousness, not a living creature, not a person’.
the remaining thirty-one aspects are not head-hairs’ He defines them according to delimitation by the dissimilar thus .
by shape as ‘ the shape of downbent bows or as the shape of palm fibres crooked at the tops ‘ , 9 by direction as ‘ found in the two directions and by location as ‘ except for the palms of the hands and the soles of the feet, they are found in most of the rest of the moist inner skin of the physical frame.
for these are ideas destitute of mutual concern and reviewing, they are incognizant, actionally indeterminate, void, disgusting and repulsive owing to their very malodorousness, not a living creature, not a person ’.
colour as ‘ all white in the location where free from flesh and copper-coloured where attached to flesh.’
He defines them by direction as ‘ found in the two directions and by location as ‘ fixed on the tips of the fingers and toes.
for these are ideas destutute of mutual concern and reviewing, they are … not a person’.
by colour as ‘ all white in colour ’,
‘seeming in one who has even-shaped ones like a shell- plate cut into a saw-blade and like an evenly knotted garland of white flower buds,
and seeming in one who has uneven-shaped ones of different shapes like a row of chairs in an old waiting-room.’ and by shape as 
and on the near side of these there are, set in the same order, four tusk-teeth which are one-pointed, one-rooted and jasmine-bud-shaped.
Taking them now one by one below and above, on the near side of the latter, there are, set in the same order, four teeth which are two-pointed, two-rooted and shaped like the socket-post of a waggon;
He them by direction as ‘ found in the upper direction ’,
for even if it is seen as though differing in colour, say, black or fair and so on, owing to its being dyed by the dye of the outer cuticle, still it is actually white in colour by its individual essence,
which whiteness becomes evident when the outer cuticle is destroyed by burns or the impact of a blow and so in’.
for the skin of the toes is the shape of silk-worms’ coloons; the skin of the calf is the shape of a palm-leaf bag for cooked rice; the skin of the thighs is the shape of a long sack full of paddy; the skin of the buttock is the shape of a cloth strainer full of water; the skin of the back is the shape of hide stretched over a plank; the skin of the belly is the shape of hide stretched over the body of a lute; the skin of the chest is more or less square; the skin of both arms is the shape of hide stretched over a quiver; the skin of the backs of the hands is the shape of a razor- box or the shape of a comb-bag; the skin of the fingers is the shape of a key-box; the skin of the neck is the shape of a throat-collar; the skin of the face is the shape of a caterpillars’ nest full of holes; the skin of the head is the shape of a bowl-bag.
He defines it by direction as ‘ found in both directions
and by location as ‘ enveloping the whole physical frame.
till he comes back again to the skin of the upper lip.
a prey to doubt, and he does not understand as it actually is the escape from arisen doubt.
With the stilling of applied and sustained thought, he enters upon and abides in the second jhana…With the fading away as well of rapture…he enters upon and abides in the third jhana…With the abandoning of pleasure and pain…he enters upon and abides in the fourth jhana…
The Blessed One praised that kind of meditation.”
so above, below, around, and everywhere, and to all as to himself, he abides pervading the allencompassing world with a mind imbued with loving-kindness, abundant, exalted, immeasurable, without hostility and without ill will.
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Savatthi in the Eastern Park, in the Palace of Migara’s Mother.
Then the brahmin Ganaka Moggallana went to the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him. When this courteous and amiable talk was finished,
And also among accountants1025 like us, who earn our living by accountancy, there can be seen gradual training…that is, in computation.
For when we get an apprentice first we make him count: one one, two twos, three threes, four fours, five fives, six sixes, seven sevens, eight eights, nine nines, ten tens; and we make him count a hundred too.
Now is it also possible, Master Gotama, to describe gradual training, gradual practice, and gradual progress in this Dhamma and Discipline?”
“It is possible, brahmin, to describe gradual training, gradual practice, and gradual progress in this Dhamma and Discipline.
Just as, brahmin, when a clever horse-trainer obtains a fine thoroughbred colt, he first makes him get used to wearing the bit, and afterwards trains him further,1026 so when the Tathagata obtains a person to be tamed he first disciplines him thus: ‘Come, bhikkhu, be virtuous, restrained with the restraint of the Patimokkha, be perfect in conduct and resort, and seeing fear in the slightest fault, train by undertaking the training precepts.’
“When, brahmin, the bhikkhu is virtuous…and seeing fear in the slightest fault, trains by undertaking the training precepts, then the Tathagata disciplines him further: ‘Come, bhikkhu, guard the doors of your sense faculties.
On seeing a form with the eye, do not grasp at its signs and features. Since, if you were to leave the eye faculty unguarded, evil unwholesome states of covetousness and grief might invade you, practise the way of its restraint, guard the eye faculty, undertake the restraint of the eye faculty.
On hearing a sound with the ear…On smelling an odour with the nose…On tasting a flavour with the tongue…On touching a tangible with the body…On cognizing a mind-object with the mind, do not grasp at its signs and features.
Since, if you were to leave the mind faculty unguarded, evil unwholesome states might invade you, practise the way of its restraint, guard the mind faculty, undertake the restraint of the mind faculty.’
“When, brahmin, the bhikkhu guards the doors of his sense faculties, then the Tathagata disciplines him further: ‘Come, bhikkhu, be moderate in eating.
Reflecting wisely, you should take food neither for amusement nor for intoxication nor for the sake of physical beauty and attractiveness, but only for the endurance and continuance of this body, for ending discomfort, and for assisting the holy life, considering: “Thus I shall terminate old feelings without arousing new feelings and I shall be healthy and blameless and shall live in comfort.’“
“When, brahmin, the bhikkhu is moderate in eating, then the Tathagata disciplines him further: ‘Come, bhikkhu, be devoted to wakefulness. During the day, while walking back and forth and sitting, purify your mind of obstructive states. In the first watch of the night, while walking back and forth and sitting, purify your mind of obstructive states. In the middle watch of the night you should lie down on the right side in fhe lion’s pose with one foot overlapping the other, mindful and fully aware, after noting in your mind the time for rising. After rising, in the third watch of the night, while walking back and forth and sitting, purify your mind of obstructive states.’
“When, brahmin, the bhikkhu is devoted to wakefulness, then the Tathagata disciplines him further: ‘Come, bhikkhu, be possessed of mindfulness and full awareness. Act in full awareness when going forward and returning; act in full awareness when looking ahead and looking away; act in full awareness when flexing and extending your limbs; act in full awareness when wearing your robes and carrying your outer robe and bowl; act in full awareness when eating, drinking, consuming food, and tasting; act in full awareness when defecating and urinating; act in full awareness when walking, standing, sitting, falling asleep, waking up, talking, and keeping silent.’
“When, brahmin, the bhikkhu possesses mindfulness and full awareness, then the Tathagata disciplines him further: ‘Come, bhikkhu, resort to a secluded resting place: the forest, the root of a tree, a mountain, a ravine, a hillside cave, a charnel ground, a jungle thicket, an open space, a heap of straw.’
“He resorts to a secluded resting place: the forest…a heap of straw.
On returning from his almsround, after his meal he sits down, folding his legs crosswise, setting his body erect, and establishing mindfulness before him.
Abandoning covetousness for the world, he abides with a mind free from covetousness; he purifies his mind from covetousness. Abandoning ill will and hatred, he abides with a mind free from ill will, compassionate for the welfare of all living beings; he purifies his mind from ill will and hatred. Abandoning sloth and torpor, he abides free from sloth and torpor, percipient of light, mindful and fully aware; he purifies his mind from sloth and torpor. Abandoning restlessness and remorse, he abides unagitated with a mind inwardly peaceful; he purifies his mind from restlessness and remorse. Abandoning doubt, he abides having gone beyond doubt, unperplexed about wholesome states; he purifies his mind from doubt.
“Having thus abandoned these five hindrances, imperfections of the mind that weaken wisdom, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, he enters upon and abides in the first jhana, which is accompanied by applied and sustained thought, with rapture and pleasure born of seclusion.
With the stilling of applied and sustained thought, he enters upon and abides in the second jhana, which has self-confidence and singleness of mind without applied and sustained thought, with rapture and pleasure born of concentration.
With the fading away as well of rapture, he abides w equanimity, and mindful and fully aware, still feeling pleasure with the body, he enters upon and abides in the third jhana, on account of which noble ones announce: ‘He has a pleasant abiding who has equanimity and is mindful.’
With the abandoning of pleasure and pain, and with the previous disappearance of joy and grief, he enters upon and abides in the fourth jhana, which has neither-pain-nor-pleasure and purity of mindfulness due to equanimity.
“This is my instruction, brahmin, to those bhikkhus who are in the higher training, whose minds have not yet attained the goal, who abide aspiring to the supreme security from bondage.
But these things conduce both to a pleasant abiding here and now and to mindfulness and full awareness for those bhikkhus who are arahants with taints destroyed, who have lived the holy life, done what had to be done, laid down the burden, reached the true goal, destroyed the fetters of being, and are completely liberated through final knowledge.”1027
When this was said, the brahmin Ganaka Moggallana asked the Blessed One: “When Master Gotama’s disciples are thus advised and instructed by him, do they all attain Nibbana, the ultimate goal, or do some not attain it?”
“When, brahmin, they are thus advised and instructed by me, some of my disciples attain Nibbana, the ultimate goal, and some do not attain it.”
“Master Gotama, since Nibbana exists and the path leading to Nibbana exists and Master Gotama is present as the guide, what is the cause and reason why, when Master Gotama’s disciples are thus advised and instructed by him, some of them attain Nibbana, the ultimate goal, and some do not attain it?”
“As to that, brahmin, I will ask you a question in return.
Answer it as you choose.
What do you think, brahmin? Are you familiar with the road leading to Rajagaha?”
“Yes, Master Gotama, I am familiar with the road leading to Rajagaha.”
“What do you think, brahmin? Suppose a man came who wanted to go to Rajagaha,
and he approached you and said: ‘Venerable sir, I want to go to Rajagaha. Show me the road to Rajagaha.’
Then you told him: ‘Now, good man, this road goes to Rajagaha.
Follow it for awhile and you will see a certain village, go a little further and you will see a certain town, go a little further and you will see Rajagaha with its lovely parks, groves, meadows, and ponds.’
Then, having been thus advised and instructed by you, he would take a wrong road and would go to the west.
Then a second man came who wanted to go to Rajagaha,
Then you told him: ‘Now, good man, this road goes to Rajagaha.
Follow it for a while…and you will see Rajagaha with its lovely parks, groves, meadows, and ponds.’
Then, having been thus advised and instructed by you, he would arrive safely in Rajagaha.
Now, brahmin, since Rajagaha exists and the path leading to Rajagaha exists and you are present as the guide, what is the cause and reason why, when those men have been thus advised and instructed by you, one man takes a wrong road and goes to the west and one arrives safely in Rajagaha?”
“What can I do about that, Master Gotama?
I am one who shows the way.”
“So too, brahmin, Nibbana exists and the path leading to Nibbana exists and I am present as the guide. Yet when my disciples have been thus advised and instructed by me, some of them attain Nibbana, the ultimate goal, and some do not attain it.
What can I do about that, brahmin?
The Tathagata is one who shows the way.”1028
When this was said, the brahmin Ganaka Moggallana said to the Blessed One :1029 “There are persons who are faithless and have gone forth from the home life into homelessness not out of faith but seeking a livelihood, who are fraudulent, deceitful, treacherous, haughty, hollow, personally vain, rough-tongued, loose-spoken, unguarded in their sense faculties, immoderate in eating, undevoted to wakefulness, unconcerned with recluseship, not greatly respectful of training, luxurious, careless, leaders in backsliding, neglectful of seclusion, lazy, wanting in energy, unmindful, not fully aware, unconcentrated, with straying minds, devoid of wisdom, drivellers. Master Gotama does not dwell together with these.
“But there are clansmen who have gone forth out of faith from the home life into homelessness, who are not fraudulent, deceitful, treacherous, haughty, hollow, personally vain, rough-tongued, and loose-spoken; who are guarded in their sense faculties, moderate in eating, devoted to wakefulness, concerned with recluseship, greatly respectful of training, not luxurious or careless, who are keen to avoid backsliding, leaders in seclusion, energetic, resolute, established in mindfulness, fully aware, concentrated, with unified minds, possessing wisdom, not drivellers. Master Gotama dwells together with these.
“Just as black orris root is reckoned as the best of root perfumes and red sandalwood is reckoned as the best of wood perfumes and jasmine is reckoned as the best of flower perfumes, so too, Master Gotama’s advice is supreme among the teachings of today.1030
Master Gotama has made the Dhamma clear in many ways, as though he were turning upright what had been overturned, revealing what was hidden, showing the way to one who was lost, or holding up a lamp in the dark for those with eyesight to see forms.
Let Master Gotama remember me as a lay follower who has gone to him for refuge for life.”
for herein, the flesh of the calves is the shape of cooked rice in a palm-leaf bag—some say “ the shape of an unopened ketaki bud ’ ;
some say it is the shape of a nuhi 19 leaf—; the flesh of the nose is the shape of a bag made of a rolled leaf and put upside-down; the flesh of the eye-socket is the shape of a half-fig; the flesh of the head is the shape of a thin smearing of oil on the vessel of the bowl when it is being baked ’ 20
And when the meditator is discerning flesh, only these gross pieces of flesh need be defined by shape;
for when he defines them thus, the subtle pieces of flesh come within the horizon of his knowledge too.
and by location as ‘ plastered over the three hundred and odd bones.
but only
A carcase daubed with bits of meat Nine times a hundred when complete, Where swarming clans of worms compete To share the rotting midden for their seat’.
—and by shape as ‘ variously shaped;
and similarly with the left hand, and with the right and left feet; so these sixty great sinews are the “ physical-frame supporters frame guiders ” ’.
for these are ideas destitute of mutual concern and reviewing, they are…not a person,
Nine hundred sinews all around In this fathom-long carcase found
Whereby its bony frame is bound, As creepers serve a building to compound ‘.
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living in the Sakyan country at Kapilavatthu in Nigrodha’s Park.
Now on that occasion a new assembly hall had recently been built for the Sakyans of Kapilavatthu and it had not yet been inhabited by any recluse or brahmin or human being at all.
Then the Sakyans of Kapilavatthu went to the Blessed One. After paying homage to him, they sat down at one side
and said to him: “Venerable sir, a new assembly hall has recently been built here for the Sakyans of Kapilavatthu and it has not yet been inhabited by any recluse or brahmin or human being at all.
Venerable sir, let the Blessed One be the first to use it.
When the Blessed One has used it first, then the Sakyans of Kapilavatthu will use it afterwards.
That will lead to their welfare and happiness for a long time.”
The Blessed One consented in silence.
Then, when they saw that he had consented, they got up from their seats, and after paying homage to him, keeping him on their right, they went to the assembly hall. They covered it completely with coverings and prepared seats, and they put out a large water jug and hung up an oil-lamp.Then they went to the Blessed One, and after paying homage to him, they stood at one side
and said: “Venerable sir, the assembly hall has been covered completely with coverings and seats have been prepared, a large water jug has been put out and an oil-lamp hung up.
Now is the time for the Blessed One to do as he thinks fit.”
Then the Blessed One dressed, and taking his bowl and outer robe, he went with the Sangha of bhikkhus to the assembly hall. When he arrived, he washed his feet and then entered the hall and sat down by the central pillar facing the east.
And the bhikkhus washed their feet and then entered the hall and sat down by the western wall facing the east, with the Blessed One before them.
And the Sakyans of Kapilavatthu washed their feet and entered the hall and sat down by the eastern wall facing the west, with the Blessed One before them.
Then, when the Blessed One had instructed, urged, roused, and encouraged the Sakyans of Kapilavatthu with talk on the Dhamma for much of the night, he said to the venerable Ananda: “Ananda, speak to the Sakyans of Kapilavatthu about the disciple in higher training who has entered upon the way.
My back is uncomfortable. I will rest it.”
“Yes, venerable sir,” the venerable Ananda replied.
Then the Blessed One prepared his patchwork cloak folded in four and lay down on his right side in the lion’s pose, with one foot overlapping the other, mindful and fully aware, after noting in his mind the time for rising.
Then the venerable Ananda addressed Mahanama the Sakyan thus: “Mahanama, here a noble disciple is possessed of virtue, guards the doors of his sense faculties, is moderate in eating, and devoted to wakefulness; he possesses seven good qualities; and he is one who obtains at will, without trouble or difficulty, the four jhanas that constitute the higher mind and provide a pleasant abiding here and now.
“And how is a noble disciple possessed of virtue?
Here a noble disciple is virtuous, he dwells restrained with the restraint of the Patimokkha, he is perfect in conduct and resort, and seeing fear in the slightest fault, he trains by undertaking the training precepts.
This is how a noble disciple is possessed of virtue.
“And how does a noble disciple guard the doors of his sense faculties?
On seeing a form with the eye, a noble disciple does not grasp at its signs and features.
Since, if he left the eye faculty unguarded, evil unwholesome states of covetousness and grief might invade him, he practises the way of its restraint, he guards the eye faculty, he undertakes the restraint of the eye faculty.
On hearing a sound with the ear… On smelling an odour with the nose…On tasting a flavour with the tongue…On touching a tangible with the body…on cognizing a mind-object with the mind, a noble disciple does not grasp at its signs and features.
Since, if he left the mind faculty unguarded, evil unwholesome states of covetousness and grief might invade him, he practises the way of its restraint, he guards the mind faculty, he undertakes the restraint of the mind faculty.
That is how a noble disciple guards the doors of his sense faculties.
“And how is a noble disciple moderate in eating?
Here, reflecting wisely, a noble disciple takes food neither for amusement nor for intoxication nor for the sake of physical beauty and attractiveness, but only for the endurance and continuance of this body, for ending discomfort, and for assisting the holy life, considering:
‘Thus I shall terminate old feelings without arousing new feelings and I shall be healthy and blameless and shall live in comfort.’
“And how is a noble disciple devoted to wakefulness?
Here, during the day, while walking back and forth and sitting, a noble disciple purifies his mind of obstructive states. In the first watch of the night, while walking back and forth and sitting, he purifies his mind of obstructive states. In the middle watch of the night he lies down on the right side in the lion’s pose with one foot overlapping the other, mindful and fully aware, after noting in his mind the time for rising. After rising, in the third watch of the night, while walking back and forth and sitting, he purifies his mind of obstructive states.
That is how a noble disciple is devoted to wakefulness.
“And how does a noble disciple possess seven good qualities?
Here a noble disciple has faith; he places his faith in the Tathagata’s enlightenment thus: ‘The Blessed One is accomplished, fully enlightened, perfect in true knowledge and conduct, sublime, knower of worlds, incomparable leader of persons to be tamed, teacher of gods and humans, enlightened, blessed.’
“He has shame; he is ashamed of misconduct in body, speech, and mind, ashamed of engaging in evil unwholesome deeds.
“He has fear of wrongdoing; he is afraid of misconduct in body, speech, and mind, afraid of engaging in evil unwholesome deeds.
Such teachings as are good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end with the right meaning and phrasing, and affirm a holy life that is utterly perfect and pure - such teachings as these he has learned much of, remembered, recited verbally, investigated with the mind and penetrated well by view.
“He is energetic in abandoning unwholesome states and in undertaking wholesome states; he is steadfast, firm in striving, not remiss in developing wholesome states.
“He has mindfulness; he possesses the highest mindfulness and skill; he recalls and recollects what was done long ago and spoken long ago.
“He is wise; he possesses wisdom regarding rise and disappearance that is noble and penetrative and leads to the complete destruction of suffering.
That is how a noble disciple possesses seven good qualities.
“And how is a noble disciple one who obtains at will, without trouble or difficulty, the four jhanas that constitute the higher mind and provide a pleasant abiding here and now?
Here, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, a noble disciple enters upon and abides in the first jhana… With the stilling of applied and sustained thought, he enters upon and abides in the second jhana…With the fading away as well of rapture…he enters upon and abides in the third jhana… With the abandoning of pleasure and pain… he enters upon and abides in the fourth jhana, which has neither-pain-nor-pleasure and purity of mindfulness due to equanimity.
That is how a noble disciple is one who obtains at will, without trouble or difficulty, the four jhanas that constitute the higher mind and provide a pleasant abiding here and now.
“When a noble disciple has thus become one who is possessed of virtue, who guards the doors of his sense faculties, who is moderate in eating, who is devoted to wakefulness, who possesses seven good qualities, who obtains at will, without trouble or difficulty, the four jhanas that constitute the higher mind and provide a pleasant abiding here and now, he is called one in higher training who has entered upon the way. His eggs are unspoiled; he is capable of breaking out, capable of enlightenment, capable of attaining the supreme security from bondage.
“Suppose there were a hen with eight or ten or twelve eggs, which she had covered, incubated, and nurtured properly. Even though she did not wish: ‘Oh, that my chicks might pierce their shells with the points of their claws and beaks and hatch out safely! ‘ yet the chicks are capable of piercing their shells with the points of their claws and beaks and hatching out safely.
So too, when a noble disciple has thus become one who is possessed of virtue…he is called one in higher training who has entered upon the way. His eggs are unspoiled; he is capable of breaking out, capable of enlightenment, capable of attaining the supreme security from bondage.
“Having arrived at that same supreme mindfulness whose purity is due to equanimity, this noble disciple recollects his manifold past lives……Thus with their aspects and particulars he recollects his manifold past lives. This is his first breaking out like that of the hen’s chicks from their shells.
“Having arrived at that same supreme mindfulness whose purity is due to equanimity, with the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, this noble disciple sees beings passing away and reappearing……he understands how beings pass on according to their actions. This is his second breaking out like that of the hen’s chicks from their shells.
“Having arrived at that same supreme mindfulness whose purity is due to equanimity, by realising for himself with direct knowledge, this noble disciple here and now enters upon and abides in the deliverance of mind and deliverance by wisdom that are taintless with the destruction of the taints. This is his third breaking out like that of the hen’s chicks from their shells.
“When a noble disciple is possessed of virtue, that is his conduct. When he guards the doors of his sense faculties, that is his conduct. When he is moderate in eating, that is his conduct. When he is devoted to wakefulness, that is his conduct. When he possesses seven good qualities, that is his conduct.When he is one who obtains at will, without trouble or difficulty, the four jhanas that constitute the higher mind and provide a pleasant abiding here and now, that is his conduct.
“When he recollects his manifold past lives…with their aspects and particulars, that is his true knowledge. When, with the divine eye…he sees beings passing away and reappearing and understands how beings pass on according to their actions, that is his true knowledge.
When, by realising for himself with direct knowledge, he here and now enters upon and abides in the deliverance of mind and deliverance by wisdom that are taintless with the destruction of the taints, that is his true knowledge.
“This noble disciple is thus said to be perfect in true knowledge, perfect in conduct, perfect in true knowledge and conduct.
And this stanza was uttered by the Brahma Sanankumara:
‘The noble clan is held to be The best of people as to lineage;
Then the Blessed One rose and addressed the venerable Ananda thus: “Good, good, Ananda! It is good that you have spoken to the Sakyans of Kapilavatthu about the disciple in higher training who has entered upon the way.”
That is what the venerable Ananda said.
The Teacher approved.
The Sakyans of Kapilavatthu were satisfied and delighted in the venerable Ananda’s words.
That is how a noble disciple is moderate in eating.
“He has learned much, remembers what he has learned, and consolidates what he has learned.
But best of gods and humans is one Perfect in true knowledge and conduct.’
“Now that stanza was well sung by the Brahma Sanankumara, not ill-sung; it was well spoken, not ill-spoken; it has a meaning, and is not meaningless; and it was approved by the Blessed One.”
he sat down at one side
and said to the Blessed One:
“Master Gotama, in this Palace of Migara’s Mother there can be seen gradual training, gradual practice, and gradual progress, that is, down to the last step of the staircase.1024 Among these brahmins too, there can be seen gradual training, gradual practice, and gradual progress, that is, in study. Among archers too, there can be seen gradual training…that is, in archery.
since it is told as follows how this body is simply
Bones in a pattern ordered Standing end to end
With many joints, whose shaping On no one does depend;
By sinews held together, Menaced by ageing’s threat,
Incognizant, resembling A wooden marionette.
Turn from this filthy body, then; And as a son be thou received Of Him that Wields the Powers Ten.
Born in what suffers dissolution ; 36 Bone-bag in bone-bag conceived.
which is the delimitation by the similar; but the delimitation by the dissimilar is the same as that of the head-hairs and so on This is how he defines bones by colour and the rest.
that is to say, that found inside the biggest bones is the shape of large cane-shoots boiled twisted together in bamboo-tube segments ; 37 that found inside the lesser and minor bones is the shape of appropriate-sized cane-shoots boiled twisted together in lesser and minor bamboo-tube segments
’ He defines it by shape as ‘ the shape of its own location,
He defines it by direction as ‘ found in both directions ’
and by location as ‘ established inside the bones.
which is the delimitation by the similar; but the delimitation by the dissimilar is the same as that of the head-hairs and so on This is how he defines bone-marrow by colour and the rest.
and by location as ‘lying on either side of the heart-flesh, being fastened by a stout sinew that starts out with one root from the base of the neck and divides into two after going a short way.
He defines it by direction as ‘ found in the upper direction ’
and by location as ‘ lying in the middle between the two breasts, inside the physical frame’.
which is the delimitation by the similar; but the delimitation by the dissimilar is the same as that of the head-hairs and so on This is how he defines heart by colour and the rest.
and by location as ‘ lying near the right side, inside from the two breasts.
by direction as ‘ found in both directions ’
and by location as ‘ concealed midriff lying surrounding the heart and kidney, and unconcealed midriff lying covering the flesh under the skin in the whole physical frame.
nor do the heart and kidney and the flesh under the skin in the whole physical frame know “We are wrapped in a midriff
for these are ideas destitute of mutual concern and reviewing, they are…not a person.
by direction as ‘ found in the upper direction ’,
and by location as lying near the upper side of the belly-lining on the left of the heart; and when it comes out through a wound, a creature’s life is terminated.
which is the delimitation by the similar; but the delimitation by the dissimilar is the same as that of the head-hairs and so on This is how he defines spleen by colour and the rest.
and it is insipid inside and lacks nutritive-essence, like a lump of chewed straw, because it is affected by the heat of the fire element born of past action which springs up when there is nothing eaten and drunk’.
and by location as ‘ lying inside the physical frame between the two breasts, overhanging and covering the heart and fiver.
which is the delimitation by the similar; but the delimitation by the dissimilar is the same as that of the head-hairs and so on This is how he defines fights by colour and the rest.
He defines it by shape as ‘ the shape of a rat-snake 23 with its head cut off and put coiled up in a trough of blood ’,
and by location as ‘ fastened above to the gullet and below to the excrement passage , and so lying inside the physical frame between the limits of the gullet and the excrement passage.
by shape as ‘ the shape of those roots some say they are gomutta 43 shaped ’—,
by direction as ‘ found in the two directions ’
and by location as ‘ lying inside the twenty-one loops of the bowel, like the strings that he inside the rope-rings of a foot-wiper sewing them together, and fastening the bowel-loops together so that they do not slip down in those working with hoes, axes, etc., as the marionette-strings do the marionette’s wooden limbs at the time of the marionette’s being pulled along.
which is the delimitation by the similiar; but the delimitation by the dissimilar is the same as that of the head-hairs and so on This is how he defines entrail by colour and the rest.
by shape as ‘ the shape of rice loosely tied in a cloth strainer ’,
by direction as ‘ found in the upper direction ’,
and by location as ‘ lying in the stomach.’
He defines it by delimitation as ‘ gorge delimited by what is similar to gorge,
so too, the gorge does not know “ I am lying in this utterly stinking loathesome stomach ” nor does the stomach know “ Gorge lies in me
by shape as ‘ the shape of its location ’, by direction as ‘ found in the lower direction ’, and by location as ‘ lying in the receptacle for digested food .
for these are ideas destitute of mutual concern and reviewing, they are…not a person
And herein, just as a lump of dough—or curdled milkings 49 —put into an old gourd dish does not know “ I am in an old gourd dish ” nor does the old gourd dish know “A lump of dough - or curdled milkings— is in me ”, so too, the brain does not know “ I am inside a skull ” nor does the skull know “ A brain is inside me”;
and by location as ‘ what is classed as the four pieces of brain lying inside the skull, like four lumps of dough, put together to correspond with the skulks four seams.
by direction as ‘ lying in the upper direction ’,
by shape as ‘ the shape of its location ’,
some say it is the colour of curdled milkings 49 —’,
He defines by location the free bile as ‘ lying spread over the physical frame, like a drop of oil on water, except for the flesh-free parts of the head-hairs, body-hairs, teeth, nails, and the hard dry skin, which kind of bile, when upset, yellows the eyes and makes them roll and makes the limbs shiver and itch ’;
and he defines the local bile as ‘ situated near the liver’s flesh between the heart and fights and lying inside the bile-container , which resembles a red kosdtaki pip, which kind of bile, when disturbed, maddens creatures and drives them crazy and makes them throw aside conscience and shame and do what ought not to be done, say what ought not to be said and think what ought not to be thought.
and by direction as c found in both directions
by shape as ‘ the shape of its location ’,
ome say the free bile is the colour of withered akuli 50 flowers—’
and just as rain-water in a loofah-gourd pip does not know “ I am in a loofah-gourd pip ” nor does the loofah-gourd pip know “ Rain-water is in me ”, so too, the local bile does not know “ I am in a gall-bladder ” nor does the gall-bladder know “ Local bile is in me ”;
by shape as the shape of its receptacle ’,
by direction as found in the upper direction ,
and by location as ‘ lying on the stomach’s surface.
and then the regurgitations and the mouth reek with such a rotting-ordure-like stench coming up from the stomach that the man has to be told “Go away, your breath stinks But when it is abundant it holds down the reek of ordure beneath the stomach’s surface, acting like the wooden lid of a privy.
the shape of its location
by direction as ‘ found in both directions
and by location as ‘ pus without fixed location lying wherever it may gather;
where blood stagnates and goes bad in some part of the physical frame damaged by wounds made by stumps, thorns, burns with fire, etc., or where boils, carbuncles, etc., appear, there it lies.
He defines it by shape as ‘ the shape of its own location,
by direction as ‘ stored blood found in the upper direction and mobile blood in both directions
while the stored blood fills the lower part of the liver’s site measuring a single bowlful, and by its splashing little by little over the heart, kidney and lights, it keeps the kidney, heart, liver and lights moist, since it is when it fails to moisten the kidney, heart, etc., that creatures become thirsty.
by shape as ‘ the shape of its location
by direction as ‘ found in the two directions ’
and by location as ‘ sweat without fixed location where it could always he like blood;
but when the physical frame is heated by the heat of a fire, by the sun’s heat, by a change of temperature, etc., then it trickles from all the pore-openings of the head-hairs and body-hairs as water does from a bunch of unevenly cut lily-hud stems and lotus stalks just pulled up from the water
and so he defines it as ‘ shaped in accordance with the pore-openings of the head-hairs and body-hairs:
and it is said by the Former Teachers that “ The meditator who is discerning sweat should give attention to sweat only as present in virtue of its filling the pore-openings of the head- hairs and body-hairs ”.
for these are ideas destitute of mutual concern and reviewing, they are… not a person’.
and by shape as ‘ the shape of its location;
for in the case of one who is happy and has a stout physical frame it extends over the interval between the skin and the flesh and is the shape of dukula rags dyed in turmeric, while in the case of one with a lean physical frame it is the shape of scraps of dukula rags dyed in turmeric placed as wrapping on the shank flesh, thigh flesh, back flesh, backbone, and belly-covering flesh ’.
and by location as ‘ extending over the whole physical frame in one with a stout physical frame and found on the shank flesh, etc., in one with a lean physical frame. And even though it is described as “ unguent ” still it is neither used as oil for the head nor as oil to be taken by mouth 52 nor as lamp fuel because of its utter disgustingness.
for these are ideas destitute of mutual concern and reviewing, they are…not a person.
He defines them by delimitation as ‘ tears delimited by what is similar to tears,
by shape as ‘ the shape of their location
by direction as ‘ found in the upper direction ‘,
and by location as ‘ lying in the eye-sockets.
by shape as ‘ the shape of its location ’,
by direction as ‘ found in the two directions ’,
and by location as ‘ lying on the palms of the hands, backs of the hands, soles of the feet, backs of the feet, tip of the nose, forehead, and points of the shoulders.
which is the delimitation by the similar; but the delimitation by the dissimilar is like that of the head-hairs and so on This is how he defines grease by colour and the rest.
by shape as ‘the shape of its location—some say it is the shape of sea froth—’,
by direction as ‘ found in the upper direction ’,
and by location as ‘ lying on the tongue after it has descended from the cheeks on both sides.
or when their hearts are faint or when nausea arises on some account, then spittle appears and runs down from the cheeks on both sides to settle on the tongue.
by shape as ‘ the shape of its location—some say it is the shape of a boiled cane-shoot inserted unbroken into the nostril cavity—’,
by direction as ‘ found in the upper direction ‘,
and by location as ‘ lying filling the nostril cavities.
for these are ideas destitute of mutual concern and reviewing, they are…not a person.
and by location as ‘ lying inside the hundred and eighty joints, serving the function of lubricating the bones’ joints.
by direction as ‘ found in both directions ’,
by shape as ‘the shape of its location
by colour as ‘the colour of kanikara gum’,
Next to that he defines oil-of-the-joints, which is the slimy ordure in the interior of the joints inside the physical frame,
by shape as ‘the shape of water inside a water-pot placed upside-down’,
by direction as ‘found in the lower direction’,
and by location as ‘lying inside the bladder;
for these are ideas destitute of mutual concern and reviewing, they are … not a person’.
—How does he do that?
or else, by increasing the mindfulness obtained in that sign he is said to ‘ maintain it in being’.
he next gives attention to nails, not to teeth;
and so in each instance.
for just as when a man goes on a journey and travels very quickly he is unable to take note of such signs as even and uneven places, trees, hills, valleys, and road-forks, and thereby remains unskilled in the path when his journey is ended, so too, when the meditator gives attention too quickly, he is unable to take note of the signs of the meditation subject consisting in the colour, shape, etc., and thereby remains unskilled in the thirty-two-fold aspect when his meditation subject is ended.
for just as while a man is travelling on a journey, if he loiters on the way among trees, rocks, pools, etc., then instead of reaching the place he wants to reach he reaches ruin and disaster through lions, tigers, etc., while still on the way, so too, when the meditator gives attention too slowly, then instead of reaching completion of the maintenance of the thirty-two-fold aspect in being he reaches ruin and disaster through thoughts of sensual desires, etc., which interrupt the maintenance of the meditation subject in being.
that when people see by day a fibre or a thread the colour of a head-hair fallen into their drink or food, they throw away even appetising drink or food or are nauseated by them through perception of them as head-hairs.
 They are so loathesome as to shape as well
 They are so loathesome as to odour
as well that the odour of head-hairs lacking anointing with oil and preparations of flowers, scents, and the like, is quite nauseating; and when creatures smell the odour of a head-hair put in a flame they stop their noses and make a wry face.
 They are so loathesome as to habitat
 They are so loathesome as to location as well
that, growing as they do on the utterly disgusting heap of the thirty-one remaining kinds of ordure beginning with the body-hairs and in the moist inner skin that envelops human beings’ heads, they resemble herbs, etc., on a midden.
which is the method of insight in his case.
and then 67 he gives attention by way of the Three Suttas on the three general characteristics of impermanence, suffering, and not-self,
The turn has now come for a comment on the Lovingkindness Sutta, which is placed next to the Treasure-Store Sutta.
So after stating the purpose of placing it here,
Herein, excellence of merit consisting in giving, virtue, etc., was what was stated in the Treasure-Store Sutta, and this Loving-kindness Sutta is placed here next to that in order to show how helpful lovingkindness is to that excellence of merit, since when lovingkindness is practised towards creatures, that excellence of merit becomes very fruitful and capable of bringing advancement right up to the plane of Enlightenment. Or alternatively, for those who have entered upon the Dispensation by means of the Refuges and have established themselves in virtue by means of the Training Precepts he has already shown a meditation subject with the Thirty- two Aspects that is capable of causing the abandonment of lust, and a meditation subject with the Boy’s Questions that is capable of causing the abandonment of delusion; and then with the Good- Omen Sutta self-protection is shown as the good-omen-ness in the occurrence of that abandoning, and with the Jewel Sutta protection of others that conforms with that good-omen-ness, and then with the Without-the-Walls Sutta is shown failure in the occurrence of that abandoning of the kind already mentioned, and that discourse points out certain kinds of beings among the beings already mentioned in the Jewel Sutta; and then with the Treasure-Store Sutta is shown the excellence that is the opposite of the failure already mentioned in the Without-the-Walls Sutta. But so far no meditation subject has been shown that is capable of causing the abandonment of hate; and so it was in order to show a meditation subject capable of causing abandonment of hate that this Loving-kindness Sutta was placed here:
for in this way the Minor Readings are brought to full completion. This is the purpose of placing it here.
which illustrates as well By whom ’twas spoken, when, where, why,
next I shall set out to clarify Its Source, And then a comment I shall tell.
Now it was said in the Schedule above:
Herein, this Lovingkindness Sutta was spoken by the Blessed One, not by disciples, etc.; and that was when bhikkhus, who had been harassed by deities on the slopes of the Himalayas, had gone to the Blessed One’s presence; and it was uttered then at Savatthi as a meditation subject with the purpose of providing a Safeguard for those bhikkhus. That, it should be understood in brief to start with, is how the clarification of the source illustrates those questions.
But in detail it should be understood as follows. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Savatthi when the time for the taking up of the Residence for the Rains 1 was near at hand. Now on that occasion many bhikkhus from various countries, who were desirous of taking up residence for the rains in various places after taking a meditation subject in the Blessed One’s presence, had approached the Blessed One.
which illustrates as well By whom ’twas spoken, when, where, why,
‘ I shall set out to clarify Its Source, And then a comment I shall tell.’
It being placed here thus, here is a schedule of the commentary on its meaning:
How the Discourse was included in the Tipitaka  4. Herein, firstly the half-stanza ‘ By whom ’twas spoken, when, wherefore, Are matters that should first be told ’ refers to the introductory paragraph Thus I heard. On one occasion the Blessed One … he addressed him in 8 verses thus.
For this is expressed in the manner of having been heard by someone: but the Blessed One, on the contrary, was self-become, without a teacher; consequently, that much is not the word of the Blessed One, accomplished and fully enlightened.
That is why it has to be asked: By whom were these words spoken? When and why were they spoken?
It can be stated that they were spoken by the venerable Ananda, and that that was at the time of the First Great Rehearsal .
Now to begin with, the First Great Rehearsal, as it is called, has to be understood in order to gain skill in dealing with the Sources of all Suttas.
It was in the early hours of the Visakha Full-moon Day that the Blessed One, 1 the Helper of the world, attained final extinction with the element of extinction without residue of clinging left. That event took place between the twin said trees in the Mallians’ said- tree grove at the turn into Kusinara after he had been doing an Enlightened One’s work from the time beginning with his turning the Wheel of the True Idea down to his disciplining the Wanderer Subhadda . 6. Now the venerable Maha Kassapa was the senior Elder of the community of 700,000 bhikkhus who had foregathered for the Blessed One’s final extinction. He remembered how, seven days after the Blessed One’s extinction, the other Subhadda, who had gone forth into homelessness in old age, 2 had said ‘ Enough, friends, do not sorrow, do not lament; we are well rid of that Great Monk. We have been obstructed by his saying “ This is allowed to you; this is not allowed to you now, however, we shall do what we want, and shall not do what we do not want ” ’ . He therefore considered as follows: It is possible that bad bhikkhus, conceiving this to be a doctrine with a defunct teacher, may create factions and soon make the True Object of Faith disappear.
But as long as the True Idea and Discipline last, this is no doctrine with a defunct teacher;
for the Blessed One said
‘ Ananda, the True Idea and Discipline that I have shown and described to you will be your teacher after I am gone ’ .
Now suppose I had the True Idea and Discipline rehearsed so that this Dispensation might become viable and long-lasting;
for I by the Blessed One
was helped when he shared the use of robes with me and asked me ‘ Kassapa, will you wear my cast-off hempen refuse-rag clothing?’ 
‘ Bhikkhus, whenever I wish, then, quite secluded from sensual desires, secluded from unprofitable ideas, I enter upon and abide in the first jhana, which is accompanied by thinking and exploring, with happiness and pleasure born of seclusion; and Kassapa, too, whenever he wishes, then quite secluded from sensual desires,… enters upon and abides in the first jhana, pleasure born of seclusion ’ .
and when he placed me on the same level as himself in the matter of the more-than-human-ideas consisting in the nine successive abidings and the six direct-knowledges 3 in the way beginning . How else indeed can that be recompensed?
And did not the Blessed One also help me with the help unshared by any other in giving this warning ‘ This one will be my heritage-founder in the True Idea 5 , just as a Wheel-turning Monarch does by the bestowal of his own armour and sovereignty? 7. So he got the bhikkhus to take interest in the rehearsal of the True Idea and Discipline,
according as it is said
‘ Then the venerable Maha Kassapa addressed the bhikkhus thus: “ Friends, on one occasion, journeying on the road from Pava to Kusinara with a large community of bhikkhus, with as many as five hundred bhikkhus, , the whole of which account in the Subhadda Chapter should be cited in full.
After that he said
‘ Friends, let us rehearse the True Idea and Discipline before wrong ideas and wrong discipline are courted and right ideas and right discipline are flouted, before upholders of wrong ideas and wrong discipline become strong and upholders of right ideas and right discipline become weak ’ .
The bhikkhus said ‘ Then, venerable sir, let the Elder convoke an assembly of bhikkhus ’.
Passing over many hundred, many thousand bhikkhus who were ordinary men, Stream-enterers, Once-retumers, Non-returners, and Bare-insight-worker 4 Arahant bhikkhus with taints exhausted, all of whom were bearers of the Scriptures consisting of the whole of the Teacher’s nine-factored 5 Dispensation, the Elder summoned one less than five hundred bhikkhus with taints exhausted who were bearers of all the classes of Scripture in the Tipitaka, who had reached the Discriminations, who were very mighty, being many of them included by the Blessed One in the Foremost-in-this Discourse , and who were possessors of the three True Knowledges, and so on,
But why did the Elder make it one less than five hundred?
In order to give an opportunity to the Elder Ananda.
Now the rehearsal could neither be held with nor without that venerable one; for he was only an Initiate, with a task still to be done, and so it could not be held with him.
But since there was nothing taught by Him of the Ten Powers among the Threads of Argument , Songs , etc., that the venerable Ananda had not learned in that Blessed One’s presence, it could therefore not be held without him.
In order, then, to avoid others’ criticism to the effect that ‘ If that is so, then he should have been included by the Elder in the convocation because of his helpfulness to the rehearsal of the True Idea, even if he is only an Initiate, and so why was he not included in the convocation?’
, the Elder, being in fact much exercised about the venerable Ananda,
had exhorted him with the ‘ Boy Admonition ’ though there were white hairs growing on his head, saying ‘ And still this boy does not know his measure!’.
But on the other hand, the venerable Ananda had been born into a Sakyan clan as the son of the Perfect One’s uncle, 6 and bhikkhus might have conceived his inclusion as a slight and criticised it thus ‘ The Elder has passed over many bhikkhus who have attained the Adept’s Discriminations and has included in the convocation Ananda, who has only attained the Initiate’s Discriminations ’.
So in order to forestall such criticism by others, he provisionally left him out of his convocation, thinking ‘ Though the rehearsal cannot be held without him, I shall act only in accordance with the opinion of the bhikkhus ’.
Then the bhikkhus themselves asked the Elder on Ananda’s behalf, according
‘ The bhikkhus said to the venerable Maha Kassapa “ Venerable sir, there is the venerable Ananda.Though he is only an Initiate, still he is incapable of going to an unhappy destination through desire, anger, delusion, or fear. He has mastered in the Blessed One’s presence much of the True Idea and Discipline of wide variety. Let the Elder include the venerable Ananda in his convocation too ”.
So the venerable Maha Kassapa included the venerable Ananda in his convocation ’ .
When he had been included in the convocation thus in accordance with the bhikkhus’ opinion, there were then five hundred Elders together with that venerable one.
‘ Then the elder bhikkhus thought “ Where shall we do the rehearsing of the True Idea and Discipline?
” Then the elder bhikkhus thought “ Rajagaha is a big resort with plenty of accommodation. Suppose we spend the coming Rains in Rajagaha and rehearse the True Idea and Discipline there, and suppose no other bhikkhus take up residence for these Rains in Rajagaha? ” ’ .
But why did they think thus?
They thought ‘ This is our work of consolidation. Some dissenting person might enter into the midst of the Community and create discord ’.
How the venerable Maha Kassapa then instituted proceedings for an act involving Enactment Second Upon the Resolution
When seven days had passed by in ceremonies after the Perfect One’s final extinction, and seven more days in paying homage to the relics, the Elder Maha Kassapa observed ‘ Half a month has gone by. It is now the last month-and-a-half of the Hot Season and the Taking Up Residence for the Rains is approaching ’, and saying ‘ Let us go to Rajagaha, friends ’, he took one road with a part of the Community of Bhikkhus
while the Elder Anuruddha took another road to Rajagaha with a part of the Community of Bhikkhus. 13. The venerable Ananda wanted to take the Blessed One’s bowl and robes to Savatthi with a community of bhikkhus and then go on to Rajagaha.
Wherever the venerable Ananda went there was great lamentation: ‘ You have come, venerable Ananda, but where have you left the Teacher?’
When the Elder eventually arrived at Savatthi there was as much lamenting as at the time of the Blessed One’s final extinction.
Thereupon the venerable Ananda instructed the multitude with discourse on the True Idea in relation to impermanence, after which he entered Jeta’s Wood. 14. He opened the door of the Scented Cell where He of the Ten Powers had lived. Then he took out the bed and chair, dusted them, swept out the Scented Cell, threw away the stale flowers, and returned the bed and chair to their usual places: in fact, he performed all the duties that used to be done in the time of the Blessed One’s presence.
Now with overmuch standing and sitting since the Blessed One’s final extinction the Elder’s body suffered a disturbance of the elements, and in order to cure it he drank a milk purge on the following day and remained seated in the monastery.
It was on this account that he told the student sent by the student Subha ‘ It is not the time, student, today I have drunk a medicine. Perhaps we may come tomorrow ’ .
On the following day he went with the Elder Cetaka as his attendant monk, and on being questioned by the student Subha, he delivered the tenth Sutta in the Long Collection called the Subha Sutta.
The Elder then had what was broken and dilapidated repaired in Jeta’s Wood, after which he went to Rajagaha for the approaching Taking Up Residence for the Rains.
And the Elder Maha Kassapa and the Elder Anuruddha went likewise, with all the Community of Bhikkhus, to Rajagaha.
At that time there were eighteen principal monasteries in Rajagaha,
When the elders arrived there, they thought ‘ Let us during the first month have what is broken and dilapidated repaired both in order to do honour to the Blessed One’s word and in order to escape the criticism of sectarians of other religions ’;
And this is said
They went next day to wait at the king’s portals.
King Ajatasattu came and paid homage to them, and he invited them to tell their needs: ‘ What do I do, venerable sirs? What is necessary?’
The Elders made it known that labour was needed for the repair of the eighteen principal monasteries.
‘ Good, venerable sirs ’ the king replied, and he provided men for the labour.
During the first month the Elders had all the monasteries repaired.
Then they told the king ‘ Great king, the repair of the monasteries is finished. Now we shall do the collating of the True Idea and Discipline ‘
— ‘ Good, venerable sirs. You do well. Let mine be the Wheel of Commands and yours be the Wheel of the True Idea.
Command, then, venerable sirs; what do I make?’
—‘ Great king, a meeting place for the bhikkhus who do the collating.’
—‘ Where do I make it, venerable sirs?’
—‘ Great king, it would be well to have it made at the door of the Sattapanni Cave on the slopes of the Vebhara Rock.’
—‘ Good, venerable sirs ’ king Ajatasattu replied, and he had a great pavilion constructed such as might have been created by Vissakamma, 7 with well-built walls and pillars and stairs, with many kinds of garland-work and creeper-work decoration and having a vault ornamented with a profusion of pendent festoons of many sorts of flowers like a jewelled brocade bedecked with gems. He had it adorned with a well-finished pavement-work embellished with representations of many sorts of flower-offerings like that of a High Divinity’s mansion, and in the great pavilion itself he had five hundred priceless but allowable rugs prepared for the five hundred bhikkhus. The Elder’s seat he had prepared against the south side facing north, and, as a seat for the announcing of the True Idea, a seat worthy of the Enlightened One, the Blessed One, in the centre of the pavilion facing east, and there he had an ivory- inlaid fan placed. Then he had it announced to the Community of Bhikkhus ‘ Venerable sirs, my work is finished ’.
The bhikkhus told Ananda ‘ Friend, the meeting is tomorrow, but you are still only an Initiate with a task still to be done. It is not well for you to go to the meeting thus. Be diligent ’.
Then the venerable Ananda thought ‘ The meeting is tomorrow. It is not seemly for me to go to the meeting as an Initiate ’. He spent much of the night in contemplation of the body. When the night was near dawn, he came down from the walk and entered his dwelling, thinking ‘ I shall lie down ’. He adverted to the body.
As he did so, his two feet had left the ground but his head had not yet reached the pillow. In that interval his cognizance was liberated from taints through not clinging.
In fact, when this venerable one found he was unable to produce any distinction by spending the time outside on the walk, he thought: Did not the Blessed One say ‘ You have made much merit, Ananda; pursue your endeavour, and you will soon be free from taints ’ ?
And the Buddhas’ word is infallible. Now my energy is over-exerted and so my cognizance tends to agitation. I shall therefore see to balancing my energy. 8 So he came down from the walk, and standing in the foot-washing place, he washed his feet. Then he entered the dwelling, and thinking ‘ I shall sit on the bed and rest a little he extended his body on the bed.
In his doing so his two feet had left the floor though his head had not yet reached the pillow. In that interval his cognizance was liberated from taints through not clinging:
the Elder attained Arahantship without any of the four postures.
Hence if it can be said that ‘ In this Dispensation a bhikkhu has reached Arahantship while not lying down, not sitting, not standing, and not walking ’, it is right to say it of the venerable Ananda.
Next day, after the elder bhikkhus had finished their meal, they put away their bowls and outer robes, and they met together in the assembly-hall for the rehearsal of the True Idea.
But the Elder Ananda did not go with the bhikkhus because he wanted to make his attainment of Arahantship known.
The bhikkhus sat down each in his own seat by seniority, and every seat except the Elder Ananda’s was occupied.
When it was asked ‘ Whose seat is that?’ , the reply was ‘ It is Ananda’s ‘
— And that was the occasion when the Elder thought ‘ Now it is time for me to go
When he was seated thus, the Elder Maha Kassapa addressed the bhikkhus ‘ Friends, which shall we rehearse first, the True Idea or the Discipline?’
The bhikkhus replied ‘ Venerable Kassapa, the Discipline is called the life of the Enlightened One’s Dispensation. As long as the Discipline lasts the Dispensation will last. Therefore let us first rehearse the Discipline ’ .
—’ Whose task shall it be made?’
— ‘ The venerable Upali’s.’
Having done that, they took their seats in order of seniority on the seat for announcing the True Idea,
The Elder Maha Kassapa interrogated the Elder Upali on the whole Discipline, making the first Defeat the beginning. The Elder Upali answered.
All the five hundred bhikkhus made a group recitation together, taking the first Defeat along’ with its Source.
So too with the rest. All of this too should be taken as it is given in the Vinaya Commentary.
When they had recited in this way the whole Vinaya Pitaka including the two Suttavibhangas, the Khandhakas , and the Parivara, 9 the Elder Upali put down the ivory-inlaid fan, and descending from the seat for announcing the True Idea, he paid homage to the senior bhikkhus and sat down in his own seat.
After the rehearsing of the Discipline was done, the Elder Maha Kassapa wished to rehearse the True Idea, and so he asked the bhikkhus ‘ What person is given the task of rehearsing the True Idea by those who are to rehearse the True Idea?’.
The bhikkhus replied ‘ The Elder Ananda should be given the task ‘
Then the Elder Maha Kassapa placed a resolution before the Community as follows:
“ Friends, let the Community hear me; if it seems proper to the Community, I shall interrogate the venerable Ananda on the True Idea
Then the venerable Ananda rose from his seat, and, after arranging his robe on one shoulder and paying homage to the Elder bhikkhus, he sat down on the seat for announcing the True Idea and took up the ivory-inlaid fan.
The Elder Maha Kassapa interrogated the Elder Ananda on the True Idea, the manner of which interrogation is given in the text, too, according as it is said ‘ Then the venerable Maha Kassapa said to the venerable Ananda “ Friend Ananda, where was the Brahmajala Sutta delivered?’”
—On whose account?
” “On account of the wanderer Suppiya and the sudent Brahmadatta ” ’ .
Then when the venerable Maha Kassapa had interrogated the venerable Ananda about the source of the Brahmajala and about the person by whom it was delivered, he asked ‘
— ‘ With king Ajatasattu Vedehiputta, venerable sir.’
Then when the venerable Maha Kassapa had interrogated the venerable Ananda about the source of the Samannaphala, and about the person by whom it was delivered,
This First Rehearsal , held as it was by five hundred Arahants, is the one which in the world was
During the process of the First Rehearsal the venerable Maha Kassapa interrogated the venerable Ananda on the whole of the Long Collection , the Middle-length Collection , and the rest. 10 Eventually, during the interrogation on the Minor Collection , he came, at the end of the interrogation beginning thus ‘ Friend Ananda, where was the Good-Omen Discourse delivered?’ , to interrogate him about the source and about the person by whom it was delivered. So after giving the details of the source when interrogated about it, the venerable Ananda next desired to tell all about how it was delivered, by whom heard, when heard, by whom delivered, where delivered, and to whom delivered. And in order to show that it was delivered thus, heard by me, heard on an occasion, delivered by the Blessed One, delivered at Savatthi, and delivered to a deity ’, he said : —Thus I heard. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Savatthi in Jeta’s Wood, Anathapindika’s Park. A certain deity then in the night’s last extreme , the extreme of whose brilliance set the whole of J eta’s Wood aglow, approached the Blessed One, and, after showing respect to him, stood at one side, and that being done, the deity addressed the Blessed One in verses thus.
That is how it should be understood that this came to be ‘ spoken by the venerable Ananda; and that was at the time of the First Great Rehearsal ’ .
Now as to the question ‘ Wherefore was it spoken?’ , it can be said: It was spoken because the venerable Ananda had been interrogated about the source by the Elder Maha Kassapa.
Or else it was because when certain deities saw the venerable Ananda sitting in the seat for announcing the True Idea surrounded by a group of those who had attained mastery in it, the thought arose in them ‘ This venerable one, the Videhan Seer, is the Blessed One’s natural heir as a scion of the Sakyan clans, and he was five times signalized in the Foremost-in-this Discourse and possesses the Four Wonderful and Marvellous Ideas that make him dear and precious to the four kinds of assembly ; so surely, after inheriting the kingdom of the Blessed One’s True Idea, he has become an Enlightened One!’
Knowing with his mind the thoughts in those deities’ minds, he did not connive at such misattribution to him of non-existent special qualities. Consequently, in order to show his own discipleship, he said: Thus I heard. On one occasion the Blessed One… addressed … in verses thus.
Meanwhile the five hundred Arahants and many thousand deities applauded the venerable Ananda, saying ‘ Good, good ’, while there was a great earth-tremor with a rain of various kinds of flowers falling from the sky and many other manifested marvels, and in many deities a sense of urgency arose with the thought ‘ What we heard in the Blessed One’s presence is now reproduced in his absence too!’
So it can be understood that this was said for this reason as well by the venerable Ananda when he spoke at the First Great Rehearsal.
At this point the meaning of the half-stanza in the Schedule, namely, ‘ By whom ’twas spoken, when, wherefore, Are matters that should first be told has been explained.
By whom ’twas spoken, when, wherefore, Are matters that should first be told;
A varied comment then we unfold On the word ‘ thus ’ and some words more,
To give their sense, before we tell The Sutta’s origin as well;
Defining the Omen as we go, We show, lastly, how that is so.
with reference to which fact it is said ‘ Then the venerable Maha Kassapa convoked an assembly of one less than five hundred Arahants ’ .
as it is said
is told in the Rehearsal Chapter of the Cullavagga in the Vinaya Pitaka.
which were all forsaken, dilapidated and dirty;
for with the Blessed One’s final extinction all the bhikkhus had taken their bowls and outer robes and forsaken their monasteries and cells to go to Kusinara.
that sectarians might say ‘ The monk Gotama’s disciples cared for the monasteries only while the Teacher was present; but after his final extinction they forsook them’.
for what is meant by the words ‘ They thought… in order to escape the criticism ’ of those is in fact .
‘ Then the elder bhikkhus considered “ The repair of what is broken and dilapidated was commended by the Blessed One. So, friends, let us during the first month see to the repair of what is broken and dilapidated. In the middle month let us meet together and rehearse the True Idea and Discipline ” ’ .
— ‘ Where has Ananda gone?’
and showing his might, he dived into the earth and then showed himself sitting in his own seat.
Then the Elder Maha Kassapa obtained authority for himself to interrogate about the Discipline,
and the Elder Upali obtained authority to answer the interrogation.
then the venerable Ananda placed a resolution before the Community as follows:
“ Venerable sirs, let the Community hear me; if it seems proper to the Community, I, being interrogated on the True Idea by the venerable Maha Kassapa, shall answer ” ’ .
—“ Between Rajagaha and Nalanda, venerable sir, in the King’s Rest-House at Ambalatthika.”
Friend Ananda, where was the Samannaphala Sutta
At Rajagaha, venerable sir, in Jlvaka’s Mango Wood
With whom?’
he proceeded in this way to interrogate him on the contents of the five Collections , and the venerable Ananda answered each time he was questioned.
The ‘ Council of Five Hundred ’ called Because five hundred had it done,
And ‘ Council of the Elders ’ called Because the Elders had it done.
Now in order to explain the meaning included by that part of the Schedule beginning thus ‘ A varied comment then we unfold On the word “ thus ” and some words more it may be said as follows. 27. This word evam should be regarded as having the several meanings of simile, giving directions, praise, reproof, acceptance of a statement, mode, demonstration, memorizing, 11 and so on.
For it is met with as a simile in such passages as Much profitable action can by one thus mortal born be done ,
as giving directions in such passages as You should move forward thus and move backward thus ,
as praise in such passages as ‘ So it is, Blessed One, so it is, Sublime One 5 ,
as reproof in such passages as ‘ This is the way that this miserable woman speaks praise of that shaveling monk at every opportunity ’ ,
as acceptance of a statement in such passages as ‘ “ Even so , 12 venerable sir ”, the bhikkhus replied to the Blessed One ’ ;
as a mode in such passages as ‘ Precisely thus , venerable sir, do I understand the True Idea to be taught by the Blessed One ,
as demonstration in such passages as ‘ Come, student, go to the monk Ananda and ask in my name whether the monk Ananda is free from affliction, free from ailment, and is healthy, strong and living in comfort:
The student Subha Todeyyaputta asks whether the monk Ananda is… living in comfort ”. And say thus : “ It would be good if Master Ananda came to the house of the student Subha Todeyyaputta out of compassion ” ’ ,
in such passages as ‘ How do you conceive this, Kalamans: are these ideas profitable or unprofitable?
—Unprofitable, venerable sir.
—Blameworthy, venerable sir.
—Condemned by the wise, venerable sir.
— Venerable sir, being undertaken and put into effect, they lead to harm and suffering; that is how it appears to us in this case ’ . - as memorizing .
Here it should be regarded as mode, as demonstration, and as memorizing.
Herein, in the sense of mode he illustrates the meaning by the word thus as follows. Who is there capable of cognizing in all its modes that Blessed One’s word, which is that of one expert in many methods, originated by the several sorts of inclination, perfect in the meaning and the letter, possessing the various marvels, 13 profound in teaching and penetrating ideas and meanings, suitable to all creatures, each in his own speech, as soon as it comes to their ears? However, thus I heard—there is one mode in which it was heard by me.
In the sense of demonstration he points out, by excluding himself, the following meaning thus: I am not self-become; this has not been first realized by me; and he also demonstrates the whole Sutta now to be related when he says: Thus I heard—by me it was heard thus.
In the sense of memorizing he points out the following meaning. By showing his own power of remembering such that it was commended by the Blessed One thus ‘ Bhikkhus, foremost among the bhikkhus, my disciples, who are well versed is Ananda … who are mindful… who are well conducted … who are courageous… who are attendants is Ananda ’ he stimulates creatures’ desire to hear in this way: Thus I heard— that should be regarded thus only and not otherwise, neither less nor more, as to the meaning and the letter.
Now the word me in the phrase evam me sutam , ‘ thus I heard ’ or ‘ thus me heard ’ is met with in three senses.
For in such passages as ‘ What has been earned by stanzas is uneatable by me ’ the meaning is in the instrumental case ‘by me ’ ;
in such passages as ‘ It would be good, venerable sir, if the Blessed One would teach me the True Idea in brief ’ the meaning is in the dative case ‘ to me ’ ;
and in such passages as ‘ Bhikkhus, be my heirs in the True Idea ’ the meaning is in the genitive case ‘ of me, my ’ .
Here, however, the two meanings, ‘ by me heard ’ and ‘ my heard experience ’, namely, the instrumental and genitive, are appropriate.
As to the word sutam : this word suta, with and without prefixes, is classifiable under numerous meanings, namely, going, celebrated, overcome by lust, 14 heaped up, devotion to, cognizable by the ear, cognized in the ear-door, and so on.
For in such passages as ‘ Proceeding with an army ’ the meaning is going .
In such passages as ‘ Of one who sees the famous True Idea ‘ the meaning is: of the celebrated True Idea.
In such passages as ‘ people…  invaded by lust gave to the bhikkhus… invaded by lust ’ the meaning is: for one overcome by lust .
In such passages as ‘ And how great merit can be stored away by you ’ the meaning is heaped up .
In such passages as ‘ Those steadfast ones intent on jhana ’ the meaning is devoted to jhana.
In such passages as ‘ Seen, heard , sensed 15 the meaning is cognizable by the ear .
In such passages as ‘ He remembers what he has heard , stores up what he has heard ‘ the meaning is: one who bears in mind what is cognized in the ear-door .
But here the meaning of sutam is properly ‘ what has been recorded by a given series of consciousnesses 16 ushered in by ear-consciousness ’, or it is the ‘ act of recording ‘.
Herein, when the meaning of the word me is taken as the instrumental ‘ by me ’, then the construction is: Thus by me heard, recorded by a series of consciousnesses ushered in by ear-consciousness.
When the meaning of the word me is taken as the genitive ‘my’, then the construction is: Thus is my heard experience, act of recording by a series of consciousnesses ushered in by ear- consciousness.
So as regards these words, evam is the demonstration of consciousness’s function as ear-consciousness, etc.;
Similarly, evam demonstrates that the kinds of cognizance beginning with hearing have actually occurred in the various ways with respect to an object;
Similarly, evam demonstrates something about to be demonstrated;
sutam demonstrates consciousness’s function;
Similarly, evam demonstrates a state;
Herein, the words evam and me are, in the true sense and ultimate sense, a description in terms of the non- factual, 19
while sutam is an appositional description because it that is, the heard, is so called in apposition to the seen and the rest.
Here too, by the word evam he points out non-confusion and by the word sutam non-forgetting of what was heard.
Similarly, by the word evam he points out reasoned attention because when someone gives unreasoned attention penetration of difference in kind is absent in him,
And by ‘ reasoned attention ’ he establishes the pair of Blessings namely, Right Self-direction and Previously-performed Merit, while by ‘ non-distraction ’ he establishes the other pair of Blessings , namely, Hearing the True Idea and Waiting on True Men.
‘ 37. By this auspicious mode expressed by the term evam he shows his own excellence in the second pair of auspicious Blessings, and by this occupation with hearing 21 expressed by the term sutam he shows his own excellence in the first pair of auspicious Blessings.
Similarly, with the former there is established purity of ends also and with the latter purity of means.22 And with the purity of the ends there is established particular distinction 23 in the ‘ scribing and with the purity of the material particular distinction in the ‘ scripture’.
Also, by the word evam , which shows penetration of difference in kind, he shows his own excellence in the Discriminations of Meaning and Perspicuity,
Also, in uttering the word evam , which shows reasoned attention, he makes it known that ‘ These ideas have been looked over by the mind, and properly penetrated by right view by me ’.
In uttering the word sutam , which shows his occupation with hearing, he makes it known that ‘ Many ideas have been heard, remembered, consolidated by word ‘.24
In showing by both words the completeness of the meaning and the letter he inspires reverence in hearing.
With the whole phrase evam me sutam the venerable Ananda passes beyond the plane of those who are not true Men by his not usurping for his own the True Idea penetrated by the Perfect One, and he alights upon the plane of True Men by acknowledging his discipleship.
Similarly, he has his cognizance emerge from what is not the True Idea and establishes it upon the True Idea .
In showing that ‘ All this is only heard by me, but it is the word of the Blessed One himself,  104  accomplished and fully enlightened ’ he effaces himself and bears witness to the Master, he fixes 25 the Victor’s words and establishes the True Idea as the guide.
Furthermore, when disclaiming with the whole phrase evam me sutam his own invention: “This was acquired by me in the very presence of that Blessed One, possessor of the four kinds of Intrepid- ity, bearer of the Ten Powers, occupier of the Herd-leader’s Place, roarer of the Lion’s Roar , Highest of All Creatures, Lord of the True Idea, King of the True Idea, Sovereign of the True Idea, Island of the True Idea, Refuge of the True Idea, Wheel-turner of the True Object of Faith, Fully and completely Enlightened;
so here there need be no hesitation or doubt about meanings or ideas or phrases or syllables.” and disclosing that he had previously heard it he annihilates all gods’ and human beings’ lack of faith in this Idea and instils excellence of faith in them in this way 
And here is an appropriate stanza:
On the remaining words in the Source 43. On one shows delimitation by number.
Occasion shows what is so delimited.
On one occasion shows indefiniteness.
Herein, the word samaya 26
For in such passages as ‘ Perhaps we may come tomorrow, depending on the time and the occasion ’ the meaning is event .
In such passages as ‘ Bhikkhus, there is only one moment and occasion for living the Divine Life ’ it is moment .
In such an expression as ‘ occasion of heat, occasion of fever ’ it is time .
In such passages as ‘ The great concourse on the mountain side ’ it is a mass .
In such passages as ‘ Bhaddali, you did not penetrate the circumstance that “ The Blessed One is living at Savatthi and the Blessed One will come to know me thus: ‘ The bhikkhu called Bhaddali is one who does not carry out the training in the Teacher’s Dispensation ’ ”. This circumstance was not penetrated by you ’ it is a cause .
In such passages as ‘Now on that occasion the Wanderer Samanama- ndikaputta was staying in Mallika’s Single-hall Tinduka-tree- plantation Park for Debating Opinions ’ it is a view .
In such passages as ‘ There is welfare that is here and now, And welfare in the lives to come:
A man is reckoned wise if he Is skilful to attain welfare ’ 
it is obtainment .
In such passages as ‘ With complete attainment of understanding of conceit 27 he has made an end of suffering ’ it is abandonment .
In such passages as ‘ Suffering’s meaning of oppression, meaning of being determined, meaning of torment, meaning of change, is its meaning of attainment abhisamaya) ’ it is penetration .
Here, however, its meaning is time.
Hence with the words ekam samayam what is meant is: one occasion among the occasions counted as year, season, month, half-month, night-and-day, morning, noon, evening, first watch, middle watch, last watch, hour, and so on.
Or else what is meant is: among the Blessed One’s several times specially evident to gods and men and counted as Occasions, such as the Occasion of the Conception in the Womb, Occasion of the Birth, Occasion of the Sense of Urgency, Occasion of the Renunciation, Occasion of the Austerities, Occasion of the Conquest of Mara, Occasion of the Enlightenment, Occasion of the Pleasant Abiding Here and Now, Occasion of the Teaching, Occasion of the Final Extinction.
Here it may be asked: Then why is the accusative case, ekam samayam one occasion ’), used here instead of the locative case as is done in the Abhidhamma, namely, ‘ yasmim samaye kamavacaram ’ and in Sutta passages other than this, namely, , and instead of the instrumental case as is done in the Vinaya , namely, ‘ Tena samayena Budddho Bhagava ‘ ?
It may be said that the meaning implied here is different from what it is in those passages.
For there, that is, in the Abhidhamma passage and in the Sutta passages other than this firstly, the locative conveys the meaning of container 30 and the meaning of characterization of one substantive by another substantive.31
Now the ‘ container ’ is the time counted as occasion and the mass counted as occasion being the ‘ container ’ of the ideas beginning with contact stated there in the first paragraph of the Dhammasangani ; and also the substantive essence of those ideas is characterized by the substantive essence of the type of moment, event, and root-cause, called their ‘ occasion ‘. 32 So the locative case is used there in order to illustrate that meaning.
Then in the Vinaya the instrumental case implies the meaning of cause and the meaning of reason for an act.
For it was difficult for Sariputta and the others to get to know the occasion of the announcement of a training precept, and so, when the Blessed One announced training precepts he did so on a particular, that is, convenient occasion that was thus the cause and the reason for his so acting, and he stayed in such and such places having regard to that as the cause for the announcing of training precepts. So the instrumental case is used there in order to illustrate that meaning.
Here, however, and in other such Sutta passages as this, the meaning implied is that of direct governance.33
For the Blessed One lived that occasion with an abiding of direct compassion, when he preached this or any other Sutta.
So it can be understood that the accusative case is used here in order to illustrate that meaning.
And here is an appropriate stanza:
Occasion is expressed elsewhere But here ’Tis done by the accusative.
according as it is said:
Now names are of four kinds: denoting a period of fife, 34 denoting a particular mark, denoting a particular sign, and fortuitously arisen,
Herein, a name ‘ denoting a period of life ’ is one such as ‘ yearling-calf ’ , ‘ steer-to-be-trained ‘ , ‘ yoke- ox ’ . That ‘ denoting a particular mark’ is one such as ‘ staff-bearer ’ , ‘ parasol-bearer ‘ , ‘ topknot- wearer ’ , ‘ hand-possessor’ . That ‘ denoting a particular sign ’ is one such as ‘ possessor-of-the-three- true-knowledges ’ , ‘ possessor-of-the-six-direct-knowledges ’ . The ‘ fortuitously-arisen ’ is one such as Sirivaddhaka , or Dhanavaddhaka ; for it has nothing to do with the meanings of the words.
This name ‘ Blessed ’ is one denoting a particular sign, namely, certain special qualities; it is not made by Queen Mahamaya or by King Suddhodana or by the eighty thousand kinsmen or by such distinguished deities as Sakka, Santusita, and so on,
according as the Elder Sariputta said: 36 ‘ “ Blessed this is not a name made by a mother…This name “ Blessed 59 … is a realistic description of the Enlightened Ones,… Enlightenment Tree ’ .
Now in order to explain also the special qualities, of which this name is a particular sign they cite the following stanza:
The meaning of this should be understood in the way given in the Niddesa .37
But there is this other way:
Herein, by using the Characteristic of Language, namely, ‘ augmentation of syllables, alteration and elision of syllables ’, 38 or by using the Characteristic of Insertion according to the 4 Pisodara, etc.’ 39 grammatical method, it may be known that he can be called ‘ blessed ‘ when he can be called ‘ fortunate ’ owing to his having the fortunateness that has reached the further shore of the ocean of the Perfections of Giving, Virtue, etc., 40 which generate mundane and supramundane pleasure.
Similarly he can also be called ‘ blessed ’ when he can be called ‘ possessed of abolishment ’ owing to the following flaws having been abolished. For he has abolished all the hundred thousand kinds of trouble, fever and defilement classed as lust, as hate, as delusion, and as mistaken attention; as consciencelessness and shamelessness, as anger and revenge, as contempt and domineering, as envy and avarice, as deceit and fraud, as obduracy and presumption, as conceit and pride, as vanity and negligence, and as craving and ignorance; as the three roots of the unprofitable, kinds of misconduct, defilements, stains, fictitious perceptions, thoughts, and diversifications; as the four perversenesses, taints, ties, floods, bonds, bad ways, cravings, and clingings; as the five wildernesses in the heart, shackles in the heart, hindrances, and kinds of relishing; as the six roots of discord, and bodies of craving; as the seven underlying tendencies; as the eight worldly ideas; as the nine ideas rooted in craving; as the ten courses of unprofitable action; as the sixty-two kinds of wrong views; as the hundred and eight ways of behaviour of craving ; 41 or erroneous perceptions ’: those connected with lust, hate and delusion . “ thoughts those of sensual desire, ill will, and cruelty . in brief the five Maras, that is, the Maras of defilement, of the categories, and of determinative acts, Mara as Mortality, and Mara as the son of a god.
And in this context it can be said:
And by his possession of fortunateness is shown the excellence of his form-body, which bears a hundred characteristics of merit; and by his abolishment of defects is shown the excellence of his True-Idea-body.
Likewise, by the former is shown the esteem of the worldly and by the latter that of those who resemble him. And by the former it is shown how he is fit to be relied on 42 by laymen and by the latter how he is fit to be relied on by those gone forth into homelessness;
and how, when the former have thus relied on him, they become strong in the removal of bodily and mental pain, and how, when the latter are helped with his gifts of material sustenance and of the True Idea,
He is also called ‘ Blessed ’ since he is ‘ associated with blessings ’ , such as those of the following kinds, in the sense that he ‘ has these blessings ’ . Now in the world outside the Dispensation the word ‘ blessing ’ is used for six ideas, namely, sovereignty, ideal, fame, splendour, desire, and vocation. He has supreme sovereignty over his own cognizance, either of the kind reckoned as mundane and consisting in minuteness, lightness etc., 43 or that complete in all aspects; and likewise the supramundane Ideal. And he has the exceedingly pure fame spread throughout the three worlds, which he acquired through real special qualities. And he has splendour of all limbs, perfect in every aspect, which is capable of inspiring confidence in the eyes and minds of people eager to see his form-body; And he has his desire, in other words, the production of what is wanted, since whatever is wanted and needed by him as beneficial to himself or to others is then and there produced for him. And he has right effort called vocation, which is the reason why he has gained the veneration of the whole world.
He can also be called ‘ blessed ’ when he can be called a ‘ possessor of what has been analysed ’ , owing to his having analysed all ideas into the three classes of the profitable, unprofitable, and undeclared; or the profitable, etc., ideas into such classes as the categories, bases, elements, truths, faculties, dependent arising, etc.; or the Noble Truth of Suffering into the four meanings of oppressing, being determined, tormenting, and changing, and that of its Origin into the four meanings of accumulating, source, bond, and impediment, and that of its Cessation into the four meanings of escape, seclusion, being undetermined, and deathless, and that of the Path into the four meanings of outlet, root-cause, seeing, and predominant organization . Having analysed and revealed and shown them, is what is meant.
He can also be called ‘ blessed ’ when he can be called one who ‘ has frequented ’ owing to his having frequented , cultivated, developed, such mundane and supra- mundane higher-than-human ideas as the heavenly, the divine, and the noble, abidings, 44 as bodily seclusion, mental seclusion, and seclusion from the essentials of existence, 45 as the void, the desire- less, and the signless, liberations, and others as well.
He can also be called ‘ blessed ’ when he can be called ‘ one who has rejected going in the kinds of being ’ because the craving for, called ‘ going ’ to , the three kinds of being has been rejected by him. And the syllables bha from the word bhava and ga from the word gamana and va from the vanta with the letter a lengthened make the word bha-ga-va, just as is done in the world of grammarians outside the Dispensation with the word mekhala since MEhanassa KHAssa mdLA can be said.46
Up to this point, with the words ‘ thus I heard ’ he has revealed for direct experience the Blessed One’s True-Idea-Body by showing it according as he had heard it. He thereby comforts people who are disappointed at not seeing the Blessed One and assures them ‘ This is no doctrine with a defunct teacher; this is your Teacher ’.
Then in showing with the phrase ‘ one occasion the Blessed One ’ that the Blessed One was nevertheless on that occasion no longer factual, he points out the final extinction of the Form-Body.
Hence by evoking the thought ‘ Even that Blessed One, the Teacher of this Noble True Idea, the Bearer of the Ten Powers, whose body resembled a diamond cluster, eventually attained final extinction, so how can anyone else build hopes of lasting life on this form-body?’ he instils a sense of urgency in people intoxicated with the vanity of life, and he stirs them to enthusiasm for the True Idea.
And by his saying ‘ thus ’ he demonstrates the excellence of the teaching, by his saying ‘ I heard ’, the excellence of the dis- cipleship, by his saying ‘ on one occasion ’, the excellence of the time, and by his saying ‘ the Blessed One ’, the excellence of the Teacher.
Was living at Savatthi : here Savatthi is the city 47 that had been the dwelling-place of the Seer Savattha, and so ‘ Savatthi ’ is said with change to the feminine gender just as with Kakandi and Makandi: so the etymologists who go by letters have it.
But the Teachers of the Commentary say ‘ Whatever is of use and profit to man is all here , that is why it is called Savatthi.
And when caravans meet and it is asked “ What goods are there there? ”, then, on account of the invariable reply “ There is everything ” , it is called Savatthi.
’ Now every sort of merchandise They always trade at Savatthi;
Grown to fullness, its people are Successful, prosperous; fair withal,
But here it signifies occupation with one or other of the postures among those classed as standing, walking, sitting, and lying down. So it can be understood that the Blessed One was so abiding either when standing or walking or seated or lying down.
For by terminating the discomfort of one posture by replacing it with one of the others, he carried his selfhood on, made it proceed onwards, without letting it fall;
In Jeta’s Wood : he vanquishes people who are his own enemies, thus he is a Victor . Or alternatively, when the people who were his own and the king’s enemies were vanquished , he was born , thus he was Victor . Or alternatively, he was so named out of desire that his name should be one to bring him good omens, thus he was Victor .
It is what one would , thus it is a wood ; it creates fondness in creatures for its own excellence; the meaning is that it arouses affection in them towards itself .
Or alternatively, it would , thus it is a wood ; the meaning is that with cries of cuckoos and other air-borne creatures intoxicated by the profusion of scents and fragrance of many sorts of flowers, and with its canopy 48 of tree branches, fruits and verdant foliage swaying in the gentle breeze, it is, as it were, begging all creatures to ‘ Come and enjoy me ’.
‘ Jeta Wood ’ is the wood of Jeta ;
Anathapindika’s Park : this householder was named Sudatta, as to the name given to him by his parents. But because all his desires had been granted and because he was devoid of avarice or stain and endowed with the special qualities of compassion and the rest, he constantly gave food to the helpless , and so he came to be known as Anathapindika .
Here breathing things take delight, take pleasure, , or especially those gone forth into homelessness take delight, take pleasure, thus it is a ‘ park ’ ; the meaning is that because of the beauty of its flowers, fruits and foliage, etc. in the first case, and because of its excellence in the five factors of the bhikkhu’s resting-place , being neither too far from the alms resort nor too near to it, etc., in the second case, they come from wherever it might be and delight in it, take delight in it, and abide there undisappointed.
Or alternatively, because of its excellence of the kind already stated it draws back again and delights within its confines those who had gone out to wherever it might be, thus it is a ‘ park ’ .
The householder Anathapindika had purchased it from the hands of Prince Jeta by spreading 18 kotis of gold pieces over it and had had resting-places built in it for an outlay of a further 18 kotis of gold pieces and had had an inaugural ceremony prepared costing a further 18 kotis of gold pieces, making thus a total outlay of 54 kotis of gold pieces, after which he assigned it to the Community headed by the Enlightened One. That is why it was called ‘ Anathapindika’s Park ’ .
In that Anathapindika’s Park.
The words ‘ in Jeta’s Wood ’ commemorate the former owner while the words ‘ Anathapindika’s Park ’ commemorate the latter owner.
But what is the purpose of commemorating them?
It can be said that it is done as a service: first as a definitive answer to the question ‘ Where was it delivered?’ , and second as an exhortation to others, who desire to make merit, similarly to give effect to right view.49
For, in the building of the gate-house mansion, the 18 kotis of gold pieces received from the sale of the land, and also trees worth many kotis were Jeta’s outlay, while Anathapindika’s was 54 kotis.
Consequently, by his commemorating these two the venerable Ananda showed how those who desired to make merit did so, and thereby he exhorted others desirous of making merit similarly to give effect to right view.
That is how it should be understood that the purpose of the commemoration here was to exhort those who desire merit similarly to give effect to right view.
It may be objected: If the Blessed One was living at Savatthi, firstly, then ‘ in Jeta’s Wood, Anathapindika’s Park ’ cannot be said;
For the word ‘ Savatthi ’ is mentioned in order to denote his alms- resort town, and the other words are mentioned in order to denote a suitable dwelling-place for one gone forth into homelessness.
Herein, by commemorating Savatthi the venerable Ananda points out the Blessed One’s compassion for the laity; and by commemorating Jeta’s Wood, his compassion for those gone forth.
Likewise, by the first he points out the Blessed One’s avoidance of pursuit of self-mortification and his acceptance of the four requisite- conditions for the bhikkhu’s fife, namely, robes, alms food, lodging, and medicine, and by the second he points out his avoidance of pursuit of indulgence in sensual pleasures in his abandoning of objective sensual desires.
And by the first he points out the Blessed One’s occupation with preaching the True Idea, and by the second his resoluteness upon seclusion;
Then is in the sense of non-interruption, kho is a particle in the sense of indicating a new subject- matter.50
By its means he points out that, while the Blessed One’s living there Savatthi remained uninterrupted, a new subject-matter had arisen.
What is that?
‘ A certain deity ’ and so on.
Herein, a certain is an indefinite demonstrative;
A Deity is a god , and the noun of feminine gender is common to both the male and female sex.
Here, however, this was a male, being a god’s son; but he is called a ‘ deity ’ because that word is common to both sexes.51
In the night’s last extreme : now the word abhikkanta is met with as exhaustion, lunar quarter-day, 52 good, handsome, agreement, and so on.
Herein, in such passages as ‘ Venerable sir, the night is nearing its last extreme , the first watch is ending, the Community of bhikkhus has been sitting long. Venerable sir, let the Blessed One recite the Rule to the bhikkhus ’ it is exhaustion .
In such passages as ‘ This is the most outstanding and superior of those four persons ’ it is good .
In such passages as ‘ Who at my feet pays homage here Shining with renowned success,
So that his loveliness extreme Lights up each quarter bright and clear?’ 
it is handsome .
In such passages as ‘ Magnificent , Master Gotama, magnificent , Master Gotama!’ it is agreement .
Here it is in the sense of exhaustion;
hence ‘ in the night’s last extreme ’ means c when the night was becoming exhausted
Herein, in such passages as ‘ Blessed One, thou art gold-complexioned ’ it is skin .
In such passages as ‘ When did you concoct that hymn of praise to the monk Gotama, householder?’ it is eulogy .
In such passages as ‘ There are these four castes , Master Gotama ’ it is a group of clans .
In such passages as ‘ Then by what token can one tell A man to be a thief of scents?’ it is a reason .
In such passages as ‘ Having created the appearance of a huge royal elephant ’ it is shape .
In such passages as ‘ The three sizes for a bowl ’ it is measure .
In such passages as ‘ Colour , odour, flavour, nutritive-essence ’ it is the visible-form base .
Here it should be understood as skin .
Consequently ‘ the extreme of whose brilliance ’ means ‘the beauty of whose skin 
For in such passages as ‘ A Divine Life as utterly perfect and pure… ’ the meaning is remainderlessness .
In such passages as ‘ The whole of Anga and Magadha will come bringing quantities of food ’ it is the most part .
In such passages as ‘ There is an origin to this whole category of suffering ’ it is unmixedness .
In such passages as ‘ Surely it is only by mere faith that this venerable one… ’ it is with nothing extra .
In such passages as ‘ This co-resident of the venerable Anuruddha’s named Bahika has taken his stand entirely for the schism in the Community ’ it is firmness .
In such passages as ‘ One who has reached the absolute lived out the life, is called the Supreme Man ’ it is dissociation .
Here, however, the meaning intended is remainderlessness.
Then the word kappa has also many meanings such as exercise of faith, lawfulness, time, description, cutting, interpretation, fraction, 55 surroundings, and so on.
For in such passages as ‘ That must be believed as a statement of Master Gotama’s since he is accomplished and fully enlightened 5 the meaning is exercise of faith .
In such passages as ‘ Bhikkhus, I allow fruits to be eaten in accordance with the five kinds of permissibility for the monk ’ it is lawfulness .
In such passages as ‘ In which I constantly abide ’ it is time .
In such passages as ‘ So the venerable Kappa… ’ it is a description .i.e. a proper name.
In such passages as ‘ Adorned, with hair and beard trimmed ’ it is cutting .
In such passages as ‘ The two-finger-breadths allowance is permissible ’ it is interpretation .
In such passages as ‘ There is a while for lying down ’ it is fraction .
In such passages as ‘ Set the whole of the Bamboo Wood aglow ’ it is the surroundings .
Here, however, the meaning of surroundings is intended.
Consequently, ‘the whole Jeta’s Wood’ should be regarded as meaning ‘Jeta’s Wood together with its surroundings without remainder’.
Set…aglow : pervaded with radiace like the full moon and like the sun; the meaning is ‘ made all into one glow, all into one illumination ‘.
Approached the Blessed One : The instrumental case of the words yena…tena  has the sense of the locative case;
consequently, the meaning to be understood here is ‘ Where the Blessed One was, there he approached ‘.
Also the meaning here can be regarded causatively as follows: ‘ For what reason the Blessed One may be approached by gods and men, for that very reason he approached ‘.
And for what reason may the Blessed One be approached?
With intent to find the distinction of many special qualities, just as a great constantly-fruiting tree may be approached by avian flocks with intent to make use of the wholesome fruit.
‘ Approached ’ means ‘ gone to ‘.
And : 56 this indicates the termination of the approaching;
After showing respect to him : after paying homage to, saluting, venerating, the Blessed One.
At one side : this is a neuter adverbial form; what is meant is ‘ one place, one flank ‘.
Or else it is accusative in the locative sense.
Stood : this denies sitting and the rest; the meaning is that he took his stand, was standing.
But in what way did he stand that he is said to have ‘ stood at one side ’?
Not behind and not before, Nor too near, nor far,
But why did he only stand and not sit down?
Out of desire to get away quickly.
For when deities come for any purpose to the human world, they do so like a man of clean habits coming to a privy.
In fact, the human world is naturally repulsive to them even at a hundred leagues’ distance owing to its stench, and they find no delight in it. So this deity refrained from sitting down since he wanted to get away quickly as soon as he had done what he came to do.
And also deities have none of the fatigue latent in the postures of walking, etc., in order to dispel which human beings sit down; so that too is why he did not sit down;
Furthermore, he did not sit down out of reverence for the Blessed One himself;
And so standing means that deity, who was standing at one side for these reasons in this way.
The deity addressed the Blessed One in verses thus: the meaning is that he addressed the Blessed One with speech governed by rules of prosody in its syllables and feet.
How?
By saying Gods and men there are full many Speculating on good omens. Which, they hope, will bring them safety: Tell, then, the supreme good omen.
THUS HAVE I HEARD.On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Rajagaha in the Mango Grove of Jivaka Komarabhacca
Then Jivaka Komarabhacca went to the Blessed One, and after paying homage to him, he sat down at one side
Venerable sir, do those who speak thus say what has been said by the Blessed One, and not misrepresent him with what is contrary to fact? Do they explain in accordance with the Dhamma in such a way that nothing which provides a ground for censure can be legitimately deduced from their assertions?”
“Jivaka, those who speak thus do not say what has been said by me, but misrepresent me with what-is untrue and contrary to fact.
I say that there are three instances in which meat may be eaten:
when it is not seen, not heard, and not suspected that the living being has been slaughtered for the bhikkhu, I say that meat may be eaten in these three instances.
“Here, Jivaka, some bhikkhu lives in dependence upon a certain village or town.
He abides pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with loving-kindness, likewise the second, likewise the third, likewise the fourth;
Then a householder or a householder’s son comes to him and invites him for the next day’s meal.
The bhikkhu accepts, if he likes.
When the night is ended, in the morning he dresses, and taking his bowl and outer robe, goes to the house of that householder or householder’s son and sits down on a seat made ready.
Then the householder or householder’s son serves him with good almsfood.
He does not think: ‘How good that the householder or householder’s son serves me with good almsfood!
If only a householder or householder’s son might serve me with such good almsfood in the future! ‘ He does not think thus.
He eats that almsfood without being tied to it, infatuated with it, and utterly committed to it, seeing the danger in it and understanding the escape from it.
What do you think, Jivaka? Would that bhikkhu on such an occasion choose for his own affliction, or for another’s affliction, or for the affliction of both?”
- “No, venerable sir.”
- “Does not that bhikkhu sustain himself with blameless food on that occasion?”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
I have heard this, venerable sir: ‘Brahma abides in loving-kindness.’
Venerable sir, the Blessed One is my visible witness to that; for the Blessed One abides in loving-kindness.”
“Jivaka, any lust, any hate, any delusion whereby ill will might arise have been abandoned by the Tathagata, cut off at the root, made like a palm stump, done away with so that they are no longer subject to future arising.
If what you said referred to that, then I allow it to you.”
“Venerable sir, what I said referred to precisely that.”
“Here, Jivaka, a bhikkhu lives in dependence upon a certain village or town.
He abides pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with compassion…with a mind imbued with appreciative joy…with a mind imbued with equanimity, likewise the second, likewise the third, likewise the fourth;
Then a householder or a householder’s son comes to him and invites him for the next day’s meal.
The bhikkhu accepts, if he likes…
What do you think, Jivaka? Would that bhikkhu on such an occasion choose for his own affliction, or for another’s affliction, or for the affliction of both?”
- “No, venerable sir.”
- “Does not that bhikkhu sustain himself with blameless food on that occasion?”
“Yes, venerable sir.
I have heard this, venerable sir: ‘Brahma abides in equanimity.’
Venerable sir, the Blessed One is my visible witness to that; for the Blessed One abides in equanimity.”
“Jivaka, any lust, any hate, any delusion whereby cruelty or discontent or aversion might arise have been abandoned by the Tathagata, cut off at the root, made like a palm stump, done away with so that they are no longer subject to future arising.
If what you said referred to that, then I allow it to you.”
“Venerable sir, what I said referred to precisely that.”
“If anyone slaughters a living being for the Tathagata or his disciple, he lays up much demerit in five instances.
When he says: ‘Go and fetch that living being,’ this is the first instance in which he lays up much demerit.
When that living being experiences pain and grief on being led along with a neck-halter, this is the second instance in which he lays up much demerit.
When he says: ‘Go and slaughter that living being,’ this is the third instance in which he lays up much demerit.
When that living being experiences pain and grief on being slaughtered, this is the fourth instance in which he lays up much demerit.
When he provides the Tathagata or his disciple with food that is not permissible, this is the fifth instance in which he lays up much
and said to the Blessed One: 3. “Venerable sir, I have heard this: ‘They slaughter living beings for the recluse Gotama; the recluse Gotama knowingly eats meat prepared for him from animals killed for his sake.’
“Jivaka, I say that there are three instances in which meat should not be eaten:
when it is seen, heard, or suspected that the living being has been slaughtered for the bhikkhu. I say that meat should not be eaten in these three instances.
so above, below, around, and everywhere, and to all as to himself, he abides pervading the allencompassing world with a mind imbued with loving-kindness abundant, exalted, immeasurable, without hostility and without ill will.
so above, below, around, and everywhere, and to all as to himself, he abides pervading the all-encompassing world with a mind imbued with equanimity, abundant, exalted, immeasurable, without hostility and without ill will.
When this was said, Jivaka Komarabhacca said to the Blessed One: “It is wonderful, venerable sir, it is marvellous!
The bhikkhus sustain themselves with permissible food. The bhikkhus sustain themselves with blameless food.
Magnificent, venerable sir! Magnificent, venerable sir!…From today let the Blessed One remember me as a lay follower who has gone to him for refuge for life.”
Anyone who slaughters a living being for the Tathagata or his disciple lays up much demerit in these five instances.”
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Nalanda in Pavarika’s Mango Grove.
Now on that occasion the Nigantha Nataputta was staying at Nalanda with a large assembly of Niganthas.
Then, when the Nigantha named Digha Tapassi had wandered for alms in Nalanda and had returned from his almsround, after his meal he went to Pavarika’s Mango Grove to see the Blessed One.
He exchanged greetings with the Blessed One, and when this courteous and amiable talk was finished, he stood at one side.
As he stood there, the Blessed One said to him: “There are seats, Tapassi, sit down if you like.”
When this was said, Digha Tapassi took a low seat and sat down at one side.
Then the Blessed One asked him: “Tapassi, how many kinds of action does the Nigantha Nataputta describe for the performance of evil action, for the perpetration of evil action?”
“Friend Gotama, the Nigantha Nataputta is not accustomed to use the description ‘action, action’; the Nigantha Nataputta is accustomed to use the description ‘rod, rod.’“
“Then, Tapassi, how many kinds of rod does the Nigantha Nataputta describe for the performance of evil action, for the perpetration of evil action?”
“Friend Gotama, the Nigantha Nataputta describes three kinds of rod for the performance of evil action, for the perpetration of evil action; that is, the bodily rod, the verbal rod, and the mental rod.”
“How then, Tapassi, is the bodily rod one, the verbal rod another, and the mental rod still another?”
“The bodily rod is one, friend Gotama, the verbal rod is another, and the mental rod is still another.”
“Of these three kinds of rod, Tapassi, thus analysed and distinguished, which kind of rod does the Nigantha Nataputta describe as the most reprehensible for the performance of evil action, for the perpetration of evil action: the bodily rod or the verbal rod or the mental rod?”
“Of these three kinds of rod, friend Gotama, thus analysed and distinguished, the Nigantha Nataputta describes the bodily rod as the most reprehensible for the performance of evil action, for the perpetration of evil action, and not so much the verbal rod and the mental rod.”
“Do you say the bodily rod, Tapassi?”
“I say the bodily rod, friend Gotama.”
“Do you say the bodily rod, Tapassi?”
“I say the bodily rod, friend Gotama.”
“Do you say the bodily rod, Tapassi?”
“I say the bodily rod, friend Gotama.”
Thus the Blessed One made the Nigantha Digha Tapassi maintain his statement up to the third time.
Then the Nigantha Digha Tapassi asked the Blessed One: “And you, friend Gotama, how many kinds of rod do you describe for the performance of evil action, for the perpetration of evil action?”
“Tapassi, the Tathagata is not accustomed to use the description ‘rod, rod’; the Tathagata is accustomed to use the description’action, action.’“
“But, friend Gotama, how many kinds of action do you describe for the performance of evil action, for the perpetration of evil action?”
“Tapassi, I describe three kinds of action for the performance of evil action, for the perpetration of evil action: that is, bodily action, verbal action, and mental action.”
“How then, friend Gotama, is bodily action one, verbal action another, and mental action still another?”
“Bodily action is one, Tapassi, verbal action is another, and mental action is still another.”
“Of these three kinds of action, friend Gotama, thus analysed and distinguished, which kind of action do you describe as the most reprehensible for the performance of evil action, for the perpetration of evil action: bodily action or verbal action or mental action?”
“Of these three kinds of action, Tapassi, thus analysed and distinguished, I describe mental action as the most reprehensible for the performance of evil action, for the perpetration of evil action, and not so much bodily action and verbal action.”
“Do you say mental action, friend Gotama?”
“I say mental action, Tapassi.”
“Do you say mental action, friend Gotama?”
“I say mental action, Tapassi.”
“Do you say mental action, friend Gotama?”
“I say mental action, Tapassi.”
Thus the Nigantha Digha Tapassi made the Blessed One maintain his statement up to the third time, after which he rose from his seat and went to the Nigantha Nataputta.
Now on that occasion the Nigantha Nataputta was seated together with a very large assembly of laymen from Balaka, most prominent among them being Upali.
The Nigantha Nataputta saw the Nigantha Digha Tapassi coming in the distance and asked him: “Now where are you coming from in the middle of the day, Tapassi?”
“I am coming from the presence of the recluse Gotama, venerable sir.”
“Did you have some conversation with the recluse Gotama, Tapassi?”
“I had some conversation with the recluse Gotama, venerable sir.”
“What was your conversation with him like, Tapassi?”
Then the Nigantha Digha Tapassi related to the Nigantha Nataputta his entire conversation with the Blessed One.
When this was said, the Nigantha Nataputta told him: “Good, good, Tapassi!
The Nigantha Digha Tapassi has answered the recluse Gotama like a well-taught disciple who understands his teacher’s dispensation rightly.
What does the trivial mental rod count for in comparison with the gross bodily rod?
On the contrary, the bodily rod is the most reprehensible for the performance of evil action, for the perpetration of evil action, and not so much the verbal rod and the mental rod.”
When this was said, the householder Upali said to the Nigantha Nataputta: “Good, good, venerable sir, on the part of Digha Tapassi!
The venerable Tapassi has answered the recluse Gotama like a well-taught disciple who understands his teacher’s dispensation rightly.
What does the trivial mental rod count for in comparison with the gross bodily rod?
On the contrary, the bodily rod is the most reprehensible for the performance of evil action, for the perpetration of evil action, and not so much the verbal rod and the mental rod.
Now, venerable sir, I shall go and refute the recluse Gotama’s doctrine on the basis of this statement.
If the recluse Gotama maintains before me what the venerable Digha Tapassi made him maintain, then just as a strong man might seize a long-haired ram by the hair and drag him to and drag him fro and drag him round about, so in debate I will drag the recluse Gotama to and drag him fro and drag him round about.
Just as a strong brewer’s workman might throw a big brewer’s sieve into a deep water tank, and taking it by the corners, might drag it to and drag it fro and drag it round about, so in debate I will drag the recluse Gotama to and drag him fro and drag him round about.
Just as a strong brewer’s mixer might take a strainer by the corners and shake it down and shake it up and thump it about, so in debate I will shake the recluse Gotama down and shake him up and thump him about.
And just as a sixty-year-old elephant might plunge into a deep pond and enjoy playing the game of hemp-washing, so I shall enjoy playing the game of hemp-washing with the recluse Gotama.
Venerable sir, I shall go and refute the recluse Gotama’s doctrine on the basis of this statement.”
“Go, householder, and refute the recluse Gotama’s doctrine on the basis of this statement.
For either I should refute the recluse Gotama’s doctrine or else the Nigantha Digha Tapassi or you yourself.”
When this was said, the Nigantha Digha Tapassi said to the Nigantha Nataputta: “Venerable sir, I do not think that the householder Upali should try to refute the recluse Gotama’s doctrine.
For the recluse Gotama is a magician and knows a converting magic by which he converts disciples of other sectarians.”
“It is impossible, Tapassi, it cannot happen that the householder Upali should go over to discipleship under the recluse Gotama;
Go, householder, and refute the recluse Gotama’s doctrine.
For either I should refute the recluse Gotama’s doctrine or else the Nigantha Digha Tapassi or you yourself.”
For the second time…For the third time, the Nigantha Digha Tapassi said to the Nigantha Nataputta: “Venerable sir, I do not think that the householder Upali should try to refute the recluse Gotama’s doctrine.
For the recluse Gotama is a magician and knows a converting magic by which he converts disciples of other sectarians.”
“It is impossible, Tapassi, it cannot happen that the householder Upali should go over to discipleship under the recluse Gotama;
Go, householder, and refute the recluse Gotama’s doctrine.
For either I should refute the recluse Gotama’s doctrine or else the Nigantha Digha Tapassi or you yourself.”
“Yes, venerable sir,” the householder Upali replied, and he rose from his seat, and after paying homage to the Nigantha Nataputta, keeping him on his right, he left to go to the Blessed One in Pavarika’s Mango Grove.
There, after paying homage to the Blessed One, he sat down at one side and asked the Blessed One: “Venerable sir, did the Nigantha Digha Tapassi come here?”
“The Nigantha Digha Tapassi came here, householder.”
“Venerable sir, did you have some conversation with him?”
“I had some conversation with him, householder.”
“What was your conversation with him like, venerable sir?”
Then the Blessed One related to the householder Upali his entire conversation with the Nigantha Digha Tapassi.
When this was said, the householder Upali said to the Blessed One: “Good, good, venerable sir, on the part of Tapassi!
The Nigantha Digha Tapassi has answered the Blessed One like a well-taught disciple who understands his teacher’s dispensation rightly.
What does the trivial mental rod count for in comparison with the gross bodily rod?
On the contrary, the bodily rod is the most reprehensible for the performance of evil action, for the perpetration of evil action, and not so much the verbal rod and the mental rod.”
“Householder, if you will debate on the basis of truth, we might have some conversation about this.”
“I will debate on the basis of truth, venerable sir, so let us have some conversation about this.”
“What do you think, householder? Here some Nigantha might be afflicted, suffering, and gravely ill with an needing treatment by cold water, which his vows prohibit and he might refuse cold water though mentally longing for it and use only the permissible hot water thus keeping his vows bodily and verbally.
Because he does not get cold water he might die.
Now, householder, where would the Nigantha Nataputta describe his rebirth as taking place?”
“Venerable sir, there are gods called ‘mind-bound’; he would be reborn there.
Why is that?
Because when he died he was still bound by attachment in the mind.”
“Householder, householder, pay attention how you reply!
Yet you made this statement: ‘I will debate on the basis of truth, venerable sir, so let us have some conversation about this.’“
“Venerable sir, although the Blessed One has spoken thus, yet the bodily rod is the most reprehensible for the performance of evil action, for the perpetration of evil action, and not so much the verbal rod and the mental rod.”
“What do you think, householder? Here some Nigantha might be restrained with four checks - curbed by all curbs, clamped by all curbs, cleansed by all curbs, and claimed by all curbs -
and yet when going forward and returning he brings about the destruction of many small living beings.
What result does the Nigantha Nataputta describe for him?”
“Venerable sir, the Nigantha Nataputta does not describe what is not willed as greatly reprehensible.”
“But if one wills it, householder?”
“Then it is greatly reprehensible, venerable sir.”
“But under which of the three rods does the Nigantha Nataputta describe willing, householder?”
“Under the mental rod, venerable sir.”
“Householder, householder, pay attention how you reply!
What you said before does not agree with what you said afterwards, nor does what you said afterwards agree with what you said before.
Yet you made this statement: ‘I will debate on the basis of truth, venerable sir, so let us have some conversation about this.’“
“Venerable sir, although the Blessed One has spoken thus, yet the bodily rod is the most reprehensible for the performance of evil action, for the perpetration of evil action, and not so much the verbal rod and the mental rod.”
“What do you think, householder? Is this town of Nalanda successful and prosperous, is it populous and crowded with people?”
“Yes, venerable sir, it is.”
“What do you think, householder? Suppose a man came here brandishing a sword
and spoke thus: ‘In one moment, in one instant, I will make all the living beings in this town of Nalanda into one mass of flesh, into one heap of flesh.
’ What do you think, householder, would that man be able to do that?”
“Venerable sir, ten, twenty, thirty, forty, or even fifty men would not be able to make all the living beings in this town of Nalanda into one mass of flesh, into one heap of flesh in one moment or instant,
“What do you think, householder? Suppose some recluse or brahmin came here possessed of supernormal power and attained to mastery of mind,
and he spoke thus: ‘I will reduce this town of Nalanda to ashes with one mental act of hate.’
What do you think, householder, would such a recluse or brahmin be able to do that?”
“Venerable sir, such a recluse or brahmin possessed of supernormal power and attained to mastery of mind would be able to reduce ten, twenty, thirty, forty, or even fifty Nalandas to ashes with one mental act of hate,
“Householder, householder, pay attention how you reply!
What you said before does not agree with what you said afterwards, nor does what you said afterwards agree with what you said before.
Yet you made this statement: ‘I will debate on the basis of truth, venerable sir, so let us have some conversation about this.’“
“Venerable sir, although the Blessed One has spoken thus, yet the bodily rod is the most reprehensible for the performance of evil action, for the perpetration of evil action, and not so much the verbal rod and the mental rod.”
“What do you think, householder? Have you heard how the Dandaka, Kalinga, Mejjha, and Matanga forests became forests?”
- “Yes, venerable sir.”
- “As you heard it, how did they become forests?”
- “Venerable sir, I heard that they became forests by means of a mental act of hate on the part of the seers.”
“Householder, householder, pay attention how you reply!
What you said before does not agree with what you said afterwards, nor does what you said afterwards agree with what you said before.
Yet you made this statement: ‘I will debate on the basis of truth, venerable sir, so let us have some conversation about this.’“
“Venerable sir, I was satisfied and pleased by the Blessed One’s very first simile.
Nevertheless, I thought I would oppose the Blessed One thus since I desired to hear the Blessed One’s varied solutions to the problem.
Magnificent, venerable sir! Magnificent, venerable sir!
The Blessed One has made the Dhamma clear in many ways, as though he were turning upright what had been overthrown, revealing what was hidden, showing the way to one who was lost, or holding up a lamp in the dark for those with eyesight to see forms.
Let the Blessed One remember me as a lay follower who has gone to him for refuge for life.”
“Investigate thoroughly, householder. It is good for such well-known people like you to investigate thoroughly.”
“Venerable sir, I am even more satisfied and pleased with the Blessed One for telling me that.
But, on the contrary, the Blessed One tells me: ‘Investigate thoroughly, householder. It is good for such well-known people like you to investigate thoroughly.’
So for the second time, venerable sir, I go to the Blessed One for refuge and to the Dhamma and to the Sangha of bhikkhus.
Let the Blessed One remember me as a lay follower who has gone to him for refuge for life.”
“Householder, your family has long supported the Niganthas and you should consider that alms should be given to them when they come.”
“Venerable sir, I am even more satisfied and pleased with the Blessed One for telling me that.
Venerable sir, I have heard that the recluse Gotama says thus: ‘Gifts should be given only to me; gifts should not be given to others. Gifts should be given only to my disciples; gifts should not be given to others’ disciples. Only what is given to me is very fruitful, not what is given to others. Only what is given to my disciples is very fruitful, not what is given to others’ disciples.’
But, on the contrary, the Blessed One encourages me to give gifts to the Niganthas.
Anyway we shall know the time for that, venerable sir.
So for the third time, venerable sir, I go to the Blessed One for refuge and to the Dhamma and to the Sangha of bhikkhus.
Let the Blessed One remember me as a lay follower who has gone to him for refuge for life.”
Then the Blessed One gave the householder Upali progressive instruction, that is, talk on giving, talk on virtue, talk on the heavens; he explained the danger, degradation, and defilement in sensual pleasures and the blessing of renunciation.
When he knew that the householder Upali’s mind was ready, receptive, free from hindrances, elated, and confident, he expounded to him the teaching special to the Buddhas: suffering, its origin, its cessation, and the path.
Just as a clean cloth with all marks removed would take dye evenly, so too, while the householder Upali sat there, the spotless immaculate vision of the Dhamma arose in him: “All that is subject to arising is subject to cessation.”
Then the householder Upali saw the Dhamma, attained the Dhamma, understood the Dhamma, fathomed the Dhamma; he crossed beyond doubt, did away with perplexity, gained intrepidity, and became independent of others in the Teacher’s Dispensation. Then he said to the Blessed One: “Now, venerable sir, we must go. We are busy and have much to do.”
“Now is the time, householder, to do as you think fit.”
Then the householder Upali, having delighted and rejoiced in the Blessed One’s words, rose from his seat, and after paying homage to the Blessed One, keeping him on his right, he left to return to his own house. There he addressed the doorkeeper thus: “Good doorkeeper, from today on I close my door to the Niganthas and the Niganthis, and I open my door to the Blessed One’s bhikkhus, bhikkhunls, men lay followers, and women lay followers.
If any Nigantha comes, then tell him thus: ‘Wait, venerable sir, do not enter.
From today on the householder Upali has gone over to discipleship under the recluse Gotama.
He has closed his door to the Niganthas and Niganthis, and he has opened it to the Blessed One’s bhikkhus, bhikkhunls, men lay followers, and women lay followers.
Venerable sir, if you need alms, wait here; they will bring it to you here.’“
- “Yes, venerable sir,” the doorkeeper replied.
The Nigantha Digha Tapassi heard: “The householder Upali has gone over to discipleship tinder the recluse Gotama.”
Then he went to the Nigantha Nataputta and told him: “Venerable sir, I have heard thus: “The householder Upali has gone over to discipleship under the recluse Gotama.’“
“It is impossible, Tapassi, it cannot happen that the householder Upali should go over to discipleship under the recluse Gotama;
A second time…And a third time the Nigantha Digha Tapassi told the Nigantha Nataputta: “Venerable sir, I have heard thus: ‘The householder Upali has gone over to discipleship under the recluse Gotama.’“
“Venerable sir, shall I go and find out whether or not the householder Upali has gone over to discipleship under the recluse Gotama? “It is impossible, Tapassi, it cannot happen…”
“Go, Tapassi, and find out whether or not he has gone over to discipleship under the recluse Gotama.”
Then the Nigantha Digha Tapassi went to the householder Upali’s house.
The doorkeeper saw him coming in the distance
From today on the householder Upali has gone over to discipleship under the recluse Gotama.
He has closed his door to the Niganthas and Niganthis, and he has ppened it to the Blessed One’s bhikkhus, bhikkhunls, men lay followers, and women lay followers.
Venerable sir, if you need alms, wait here; they will bring it to you here.”
“I do not need alms, friend,” he said, and he turned back and went to the Nigantha Nataputta and told him: “Venerable sir, it is only too true that the householder Upali has gone over to discipleship under the recluse Gotama.
Venerable sir, I did not get your consent when I told you: ‘Venerable sir, I do not think that the householder Upali should try to refute the recluse Gotama’s doctrine.
For the recluse Gotama is a magician and knows a converting magic by which he converts disciples of other sectarians.’
And now, venerable sir, your householder Upali has been converted by the recluse Gotama with his converting magic!
“It is impossible, Tapassi, it cannot happen that the householder Upali should go over to discipleship under the recluse Gotama;
A second time…
And a third time the Nigantha Digha Tapassi told the Nigantha Nataputta: “Venerable sir, it is only too true that the householder Upali has gone over to discipleship under the recluse Gotama … with his converting magic!” “It is impossible, Tapassi, it cannot happen…it can happen that the recluse Gotama might come over to discipleship under the householder Upali.
Now I shall go myself and find out whether or not he has gone over to discipleship under the recluse Gotama.”
Then the Nigantha Nataputta went with a large assembly of Niganthas to the householder Upali’s house.
The doorkeeper saw him coming in the distance
From today on the householder Upali has gone over to discipleship under the recluse Gotama.
He has closed his door to the Niganthas and Niganthis, and he has opened his door to the Blessed One’s bhikkhus, bhikkhunls, men lay followers, and women lay followers.
Venerable sir, if you need alms, wait here; they will bring it to you here.”
“Good doorkeeper, go to the householder Upali and tell him: ‘Venerable sir, the Nigantha Nataputta is standing at the outer gate with a large assembly of Niganthas; he wishes to see you.’“
“Yes, venerable sir,” he replied, and he went to the householder Upali and told him: “Venerable sir, the Nigantha Nataputta is standing at the outer gate with a large assembly of Niganthas; he wishes to see you.”
“In that case, good doorkeeper, make seats ready in the hall of the central door.”
“Yes, venerable sir,” he replied, and after he had made seats ready in the hall of the central door, he returned to the householder Upali and told him: “Venerable sir, the seats are made ready in the hall of the central door.
Now it is time to do as you think fit.”
Then the householder Upali went to the hall of the central door and sat down on the highest, best, chief, most excellent seat there. Then he told the doorkeeper: “Now, good doorkeeper, go to the Nigantha Nataputta and tell him ‘Venerable sir, the householder Upali says: “Enter, venerable sir, if you wish.’“
“ “Yes, venerable sir,” he replied, and he went to the Nigantha Nataputta and told him: “Venerable sir, the householder Upali says: ‘Enter, venerable sir, if you wish.’“
Previously, when the householder Upali saw the Nigantha Nataputta coming in the distance, he used to go out to meet him, dust off the highest, best, chief, most excellent seat there with an upper robe, and having arranged it all around, have him seated on it. But now, while seated himself on the highest, best, chief, most excellent seat, he told Nigantha Nataputta: “Venerable sir, there are seats; sit down if you wish.”
When this was said, the Nigantha Nataputta said: “Householder, you are mad, you are an imbecile.
You went saying: ‘Venerable sir, I shall refute the recluse Gotama’s doctrine,’ and you have come back all caught up in a vast net of doctrine.
Just as if a man went to castrate someone and came back castrated on both sides, just as if a man went to put out someone’s eyes and came back with both his eyes put out; so you too, householder, went saying: ‘Venerable sir, I shall refute the recluse Gotama’s doctrine,’ and you have come back all caught up in a vast net of doctrine.
Householder, you have been converted by the recluse Gotama with his converting magic!”
“Auspicious is that converting magic, venerable sir, good is that converting magic! Venerable sir, if my beloved kinsmen and relatives were to be converted by this conversion, it would lead to the welfare and happiness of my beloved kinsmen and relatives for a long time. If all nobles were to be converted by this conversion, it would lead to the welfare and happiness of the nobles for a long time. If all brahmins… all merchants… all workers were to be converted by this conversion, it would lead to the welfare and happiness of the workers for a long time. If the world with its gods, its Maras, and its Brahmas, this generation with its recluses and brahmins, its princes and its people, were to be converted by this conversion, it would lead to the welfare and happiness of the world for a long time.
As to this, venerable sir, I shall give you a simile;
Then she told him: ‘Go, brahmin, buy a young monkey in the market and bring it back to me as a playmate for my child.’
He replied: ‘Wait, madam, till you have borne the child.
If you bear a boy, then I will go to the market and buy a young male monkey and bring it back to you as a playmate for your little boy;
For the second time she made the same request and received the same answer. For the third time she made the same request.
Then, since his mind was bound to her with love, he went to the market, bought a young male monkey, brought it back, and told her: ‘I have bought this young male monkey in the market and brought it back to you as a playmate for your child.’
Then she told him: ‘Go, brahmin, take this young male monkey to Rattapani the dyer’s son and tell him: “Good Rattapani, I want this young male monkey dyed the colour called yellow-unguent, pounded and re-pounded, and smoothened out on both sides.’“
Then, since his mind was bound to her with love, he took the young male monkey to Rattapani the dyer’s son and told him: ‘Good Rattapani, I want this young male monkey dyed the colour called yellow-unguent, pounded and re-pounded, and smoothened out on both sides.’
Rattapani the dyer’s son told him: ‘Venerable sir, this young male monkey will take a dyeing but not a pounding or a smoothening out.’
So too, venerable sir, the doctrine of the foolish Niganthas will give delight to fools but not to the wise, and it will not withstand testing or being smoothened out.
“Then, venerable sir, on another occasion that brahmin took a pair of new garments to Rattapani the dyer’s son and told him: ‘Good Rattapani, I want this pair of new garments dyed the colour called yellow-unguent, pounded and re-pounded, and smoothened out on both sides.’
Rattapani the dyer’s son told him: ‘Venerable sir, this pair of new garments will take a dyeing and a pounding and a smoothening out.’
So too, venerable sir, the doctrine of that Blessed One, accomplished and fully enlightened, will give delight to the wise but not to fools, and it will withstand testing and being smoothened out.”
“Householder, the assembly and the king know you thus: ‘The householder Upali is a disciple of the Nigantha Nataputta.’
Whose disciple should we consider you to be?”
When this was said, the householder Upali rose from his seat, and arranging his upper robe on one shoulder, he extended his hands in reverential salutation in the direction of the Blessed One and told the Nigantha Nataputta: 29. “In that case, venerable sir, hear whose disciple I am:
but it is possible, it can happen that the recluse Gotama might come over to discipleship under the householder Upali.
but it is possible, it can happen that the recluse Gotama might come over to discipleship under the householder Upali.
What you said before does not agree with what you said afterwards, nor does what you said afterwards agree with what you said before.
so what does a single trivial man count for?”
so what does a single trivial Nalanda count for?”
Venerable sir, I go to the Blessed One for refuge and to the Dhamma and to the Sangha of bhikkhus.
For the other sectarians, on acquiring me as their disciple, would carry a banner all over Nalanda announcing: ‘The householder Upali has come to discipleship under us.’
but it is possible, it can happen that the recluse Gotama might come over to discipleship under the householder Upali.”
and told him: “Wait, venerable sir, do not enter.
but it is possible, it can happen that the recluse Gotama might come over to discipleship under the householder Upali.”
and told him: “Wait, venerable sir, do not enter.
Then the Nigantha Nataputta went with the large assembly of Niganthas to the hall of the central door.
for some wise men here understand the meaning of a statement by a simile
“Venerable sir, there was once a brahmin who was old, aged, and burdened with years, and he had as a wife a young brahmin girl who was pregnant and near her confinement.
but if you bear a girl, then I will go to the market and buy a young female monkey and bring it back to you as a playmate for your little girl.’
He is the Wise One who has cast off delusion, abandoned the heart’s wilderness, victor in battle;
He knows no anguish, is perfectly even-minded, mature in virtue, of excellent wisdom;
Beyond all temptations, he is without stain: The Blessed One is he, and I am his disciple.
Free from perplexity, he abides contented, spurning worldly gains, a vessel of gladness
A human being who has done the recluse’s duty, a man who bears his final body;
He is utterly peerless and utterly spotless: The Blessed One is he, and I am his disciple.
He is free from doubt and skilful, the discipliner and excellent leader.
None can surpass his resplendent qualities; without hesitation, he is the illuminator;
Having severed conceit, he is the hero: The Blessed One is he, and I am his disciple.
The leader of the herd, he cannot be measured, his depths are unfathomed, he attained to the silence;
Provider of safety, possessor of knowledge, he stands in the Dhamma, inwardly restrained;
Having overcome all bondage, he is liberated: The Blessed One is he, and I am his disciple.
The immaculate tusker, living in remoteness, with fetters all shattered, fully freed;
Skilled in discussion, imbued with wisdom, his banner lowered, he no longer lusts;
Having tamed himself, he no more proliferates: The Blessed One is he, and I am his disciple.
The best of seers, with no deceptive schemes, gained the triple knowledge, attained to holiness;
His heart cleansed, a master of discourse, he lives ever tranquil, the finder of knowledge;
The first of all givers, he is ever capable: The Blessed One is he, and I am his disciple.
He is the Noble One, developed in mind, who has gained the goal and expounds the truth;
Endowed with mindfulness and penetrative insight, he leans neither forwards nor back;
Free from perturbation, attained to mastery: The Blessed One is he, and I am his disciple.
He has fared rightly and abides in meditation, inwardly undefiled, in purity perfect;
He is independent and altogether fearless, living secluded, attained to the summit;
Having crossed over himself, he leads us across: The Blessed One is he, and I am his disciple.
Of supreme serenity, with extensive wisdom, a man of great wisdom, devoid of all greed;
He is the Tathagata, he is the Sublime One, the person unrivalled, the one without equal;
He is intrepid, proficient in all: The Blessed One is he, and I am his disciple.
He has severed craving and become the Enlightened One, cleared of all clouds, completely untainted;
Most worthy of gifts, most mighty of spirits, most perfect of persons, beyond estimation;
The greatest in grandeur, attained the peak of glory: The Blessed One is he, and I am his disciple.”
“When did you concoct that hymn of praise to the recluse Gotama, householder?”
“Venerable sir, suppose there were a great heap of many kinds of flowers and then a clever garland-maker or garland-maker’s apprentice were to knot them into a multicoloured garland; so too, venerable sir, the Blessed One has many praiseworthy qualities, many hundred praiseworthy qualities.
Who, venerable sir, would not praise the praiseworthy?”
Then, since the Nigantha Nataputta was unable to bear this honour done to the Blessed One, hot blood then and there gushed from his mouth.
and he approached you and said: ‘Venerable sir, I want to go to Rajagaha.’
“Magnificent, Master Gotama! Magnificent, Master Gotama!
I go to Master Gotama for refuge and to the Dhamma and to the Sangha of bhikkhus.
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living in the Koliyan country at a town of the Koliyans named Haliddavasana.
Then Punna, son of the Koliyans, an ox-duty ascetic, and also Seniya, a naked dog-duty ascetic, went to the Blessed One. Punna, the ox-duty ascetic, paid homage to the Blessed One and sat down at one side,
Punna, the ox-duty ascetic, said to the Blessed One: “Venerable sir, this Seniya is a naked dog-duty ascetic who does what is hard to do: he eats his food when it is thrown to the ground.
He has long taken up and practised that dog-duty.
What will be his destination? What will be his future course?”
“Enough, Punna, let that be. Do not ask me that.”
A second time…And a third time Punna, the ox-duty ascetic, said to the Blessed One: “Venerable sir, this Seniya is a naked dog-duty ascetic who does what is hard to do: he eats his food when it is thrown to the ground.
He has long taken up and practised that dog-duty.
What will be his destination? What will be his future course?”
“Well, Punna, since I certainly cannot persuade you when I say:
‘Enough, Punna, let that be. Do not ask me that,’ I shall therefore answer you.
“Here, Punna, someone develops the dog-duty fully and uninterruptedly; he develops the dog-habit fully and uninterruptedly; he develops the dog-mind fully and uninterruptedly; he develops dog-behaviour fully and uninterruptedly.
Having done so, on the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in the company of dogs.
But if he has such a view as this: ‘By this virtue or observance or asceticism or holy life I shall become a great god or some lesser god.’ that is wrong view in his case.
Now there are two destinations for one with wrong view, I say: hell or the animal realm.
So, Punna, if his dog-duty succeeds, it will lead him to the company of dogs; if it fails, it will lead him to hell.”
When this was said, Seniya the naked dog-duty ascetic cried out and burst into tears.
Then the Blessed One told Punna, son of the Koliyans, the ox-duty ascetic: “Punna, I could not persuade you when I said:
‘Enough, Punna, let that be.Do not ask me that.’”
Then Seniya the naked dog-duty ascetic said: “Venerable sir, I am not crying because the Blessed One has said this about me, but because I have long taken up and practised this dog-duty.
Venerable sir, this Punna, son of the Koliyans, is an ox-duty ascetic.
He has long taken up and practised that ox-duty.
What will be his destination? What will be his future course?”
“Enough, Seniya, let that be. Do not ask me that.”
A second time…And a third time Seniya the naked dog-duty ascetic asked the Blessed One: “Venerable sir, this Punna, son of the Koliyans, is an ox-duty ascetic.
He has long taken up and practised that ox-duty.
What, will be his destination? What will be his future course?”
“Well, Seniya, since I certainly cannot persuade you when I say:
‘Enough, Seniya, let that be. Do not ask me that.’ I shall therefore answer you.
“Here, Seniya, someone develops the ox-duty fully and uninterruptedly; he develops the ox-habit fully and uninterruptedly; he develops the ox-mind fully and uninterruptedly; he develops ox-behaviour fully and uninterruptedly.
Having done so, on the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in the company of oxen.
But if he has such a view as this: ‘By this virtue or observance or asceticism or holy life I shall become a great god or some lesser god,’ that is wrong view in his case.
Now there are two destinations for one with wrong view, I say: hell or the animal realm.
So, Seniya, if his ox-duty succeeds, it will lead him to the company of oxen; if it fails, it will lead him to hell.”
When this was said, Punna, son of the Koliyans, the ox-duty ascetic cried out and burst into tears.
Then the Blessed One told Seniya the naked dog-duty ascetic: “Seniya, I could not persuade you when I said:
‘Enough, Seniya, let that be.Do not ask me that.’“
Then Punna the ox-duty ascetic said: “Venerable sir, I am not crying because the Blessed One has said this about me, but because I have long taken up and practised this ox-duty.
Venerable sir, I have confidence in the Blessed One thus: ‘The Blessed One is capable of teaching me the Dhamma in such a way that I can abandon this ox-duty and that this Seniya the naked dog-duty ascetic can abandon that dog-duty.’“
“Then, Punna, listen and attend closely to what I shall say.”
- “Yes, venerable sir,” he replied.
The Blessed One said this:
What are the four?
There is dark action with dark result; there is bright action with bright result; there is dark-and-bright action with dark-and-bright result; and there is action that is neither dark nor bright with neither-dark-nor-bright result, action that leads to the destruction of action.
“And what, Punna, is dark action with dark result?
Here someone generates an afflictive bodily formation, an afflictive verbal formation, an afflictive mental formation.
Having generated an afflictive bodily formation, an afflictive verbal formation, an afflictive mental formation, he reappears in an afflictive world.
When he has reappeared in an afflictive world, afflictive contacts touch him.
Being touched by afflictive contacts, he feels afflictive feelings, extremely painful, as in the case of the beings in hell.
Thus a being’s reappearance is due to a being: one reappears through the actions one has performed. When one has reappeared, contacts touch one.
Thus I say beings are the heirs of their actions.
This is called dark action with dark result.
“And what, Punna, is bright action with bright result?
Here someone generates an unafflictive bodily formation, an unafflictive verbal formation, an unafflictive mental formation.
Having generated an unafflictive bodily formation, an unafflictive verbal formation, an unafflictive mental formation, he reappears in an unafflictive world.
When he has reappeared in an unafflictive world, unafflictive contacts touch him.
Being touched by unafflictive contacts, he feels unafflictive feelings, extremely pleasant, as in the case of the gods of Refulgent Glory.
Thus a being’s reappearance is due to a being; one reappears through the actions one has performed. When one has reappeared, contacts touch one.
Thus I say beings are the heirs of their actions.
This is called bright action with bright result.
“And what, Punna, is dark-and-bright action with darkand- bright result?
Here someone generates a bodily formation that is both afflictive and unafflictive, a verbal formation that is both afflictive and unafflictive, a mental formation that is both afflictive and unafflictive.
Having generated a bodily formation, a verbal formation, a mental formation that is both afflictive and unafflictive, he reappears in a world that is both afflictive and unafflictive.
When he has reappeared in a world that is both afflictive and unafflictive, both afflictive and unafflictive contacts touch him.
Being touched by both afflictive and unafflictive contacts, he feels both afflictive and unafflictive feelings, mingled pleasure and pain, as in the case of human beings and some gods and some beings in the lower worlds.
Thus a being’s reappearance is due to a being: one reappears through the actions one has performed.
When one has reappeared, contacts touch one.
Thus I say beings are the heirs to their actions.
This is called dark-and-bright action with dark-and-bright result.
“And what, Punna, is action that is neither dark nor bright with neither-dark-nor-bright result, action that leads to the destruction of action?
Therein, the volition in abandoning the kind of action that is dark with dark result, and the volition in abandoning the kind of action that is bright with bright result, and the volition in abandoning the kind of action that is dark and bright with dark-and-bright result: this is called action that is neither dark nor bright with neither-dark-nor-bright result, action that leads to the destruction of action.
These are the four kinds of action proclaimed by me after realising them for myself with direct knowledge.”
When this was said, Punna, son of the Koliyans, the oxduty ascetic said to the Blessed One: “Magnificent, venerable sir! Magnificent, venerable sir!
The Blessed One has made the Dhamma clear in many ways…From today let the Blessed One remember me as a lay follower who has gone to him for refuge for life.”
But Seniya the naked dog-duty ascetic said to the Blessed One: “Magnificent, venerable sir! Magnificent, venerable sir!
The Blessed One has made the Dhamma clear in many ways, though he were turning upright what had been overthrown, revealing what was hidden, showing the way to one who was lost, or holding up a lamp in the dark for those with eyesight to see forms.
I would receive the going forth under the Blessed One, I would receive the full admission.”
“Seniya, one who formerly belonged to another sect and desires the going forth and the full admission in this Dhamma and Discipline lives on probation for four months.
At the end of four months, if the bhikkhus are satisfied with him, they give him the going forth and the full admission to the bhikkhus’ state.
But I recognise individual differences in this matter.”
“Venerable sir, if those who formerly belonged to another sect and desire the going forth and the full admission in this Dhamma and Discipline live on probation for four months, and if at the end of the four months the bhikkhus being satisfied with them give them the going forth and the full admission to the bhikkhus’ state, then I will live on probation for four years.
At the end of the four years if the bhikkhus are satisfied with me, let them give me the going forth and the full admission to the bhikkhus’ state.”
Then Seniya the naked dog-duty ascetic received the going forth under the Blessed One, and he received the full admission.
And soon, not long after his full admission, dwelling alone, withdrawn, diligent, ardent, and resolute, the venerable Seniya, by realising for himself with direct knowledge, here and now entered upon and abided in that supreme goal of the holy life for the sake of which clansmen rightly go forth from the home life into homelessness.
He directly knew: “Birth is destroyed, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more coming to any state of being.”
And the venerable Seniya became one of the arahants.
while Seniya, the naked dog-duty ascetic, exchanged greetings with the Blessed One,
and when this courteous and amiable talk was finished, he too sat down at one side curled up like a dog.
“Punna, there are four kinds of action proclaimed by me after realising them for myself with direct knowledge.
I go to the Blessed One for refuge and to the Dhamma and to the Sangha of bhikkhus.
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Rajagaha in the Bamboo Grove, the Squirrels’ Sanctuary.
Then Prince Abhaya went to the Nigantha Nataputta, and after paying homage to him, sat down at one side.
Thereupon the Nigantha Nataputta said to him: 3. “Come, prince, refute the recluse Gotama’s doctrine,
and a good report of you will be spread to this effect: ‘Prince Abhaya has refuted the doctrine of the recluse Gotama, who is so powerful and mighty.’“
“Come, prince, go to the recluse Gotama and say: ‘Venerable sir, would the Tathagata utter speech that would be unwelcome and disagreeable to others?’
If the recluse Gotama, on being asked thus, answers: ‘The Tathagata, prince, would utter speech that would be unwelcome and disagreeable to others,’ then say to him: “Then, venerable sir, what is the difference between you and an ordinary person?
For an ordinary person also would utter speech that would be unwelcome and disagreeable to others.’
But if the recluse Gotama, on being asked thus, answers: “The Tathagata, prince, would not utter speech that would be unwelcome and disagreeable to others,’ then say to him: ‘Then, venerable sir, why have you declared of Devadatta: “Devadatta is destined for the states of deprivation, Devadatta is destined for hell, Devadatta will remain in hell for the aeon, Devadatta is incorrigible”?
Devadatta was angry and dissatisfied with that speech of yours.’
When the recluse Gotama is posed this two-horned question by you, he will not be able either to gulp it down or to throw it up.
If an iron spike were stuck in a man’s throat, he would not be able either to gulp it down or to throw it up; so too, prince, when the recluse Gotama is posed this two-horned question by you, he will not be able either to gulp it down or to throw it up.”
“Yes, venerable sir,” Prince Abhaya replied. Then he rose from his seat, and after paying homage to the Nigantha Nataputta, keeping him on his right, he left and went to the Blessed One.
After paying homage to the Blessed One, he sat down at one side, looked at the sun, and thought: “It is too late today to refute the Blessed One’s doctrine.
I shall refute the Blessed One’s doctrine in my own house tomorrow.” Then he said to the Blessed One: “Venerable sir, let the Blessed One with three others consent to accept tomorrow’s meal from me.”
The Blessed One consented in silence.
Then, knowing that the Blessed One had consented, Prince Abhaya rose from his seat, and after paying homage to him, keeping him on his right, he departed.
Then, when the night had ended, it being morning, the Blessed One dressed, and taking his bowl and outer robe, he went to Prince Abhaya’s house and sat down on the seat made ready.
Then, with his own hands, Prince Abhaya served and satisfied the Blessed One with various kinds of good food.
When the Blessed One had eaten and had withdrawn his hand from the bowl, Prince Abhaya took a low seat, sat down at one side,
“There is no one-sided answer to that, prince.”
“Then, venerable sir, the Niganthas have lost in this.”
“Why do you say this, prince: ‘Then, venerable sir, the Niganthas have lost in this’?”
Prince Abhaya then reported to the Blessed One his entire conversation with the Nigantha Nataputta.
Now on that occasion a young tender infant was lying prone on Prince Abhaya’s lap.
Then the Blessed One said to Prince Abhaya: “What do you think, prince? If, while you or your nurse were not attending to him, this child were to put a stick or a pebble in his mouth, what would you do to him?”
“Venerable sir, I would take it out.
If I could not take it out at once, I would take his head in my left hand, and crooking a finger of my right hand, I would take it out even if it meant drawing blood.
Why is that?
Because I have compassion for the child.”
“So too, prince, such speech as the Tathagata knows to be untrue, incorrect, and unbeneficial, and which is also unwelcome and disagreeable to others: such speech the Tathagata does not utter.
Such speech as the Tathagata knows to be true and correct but unbeneficial, and which is also unwelcome and disagreeable to others: such speech the Tathagata does not utter.
Such speech as the Tathagata knows to be true, correct, and beneficial, but which is unwelcome and disagreeable to others: the Tathagata knows the time to use such speech.
Such speech as the Tathagata knows to be untrue, incorrect, and unbeneficial, but which is welcome and agreeable to others: such speech the Tathagata does not utter.
Such speech as the Tathagata knows to be true and correct but unbeneficial, and which is welcome and agreeable to others: such speech the Tathagata does not utter.
Such speech as the Tathagata knows to be true, correct, and beneficial, and which is welcome and agreeable to others: the Tathagata knows the time to use such speech.
Why is that?
Because the Tathagata has compassion for beings.”
“Venerable sir, when learned nobles, learned brahmins, learned householders, and learned recluses, after formulating a question, then go to the Blessed One and pose it, has there already been in the Blessed One’s mind the thought: ‘If they come to me and ask me thus, I shall answer thus’? Or does that answer occur to the Tathagata on the spot?”
“As to that, prince, I shall ask you a question in return. Answer it as you choose.
What do you think, prince? Are you skilled in the parts of a chariot?”
“Yes, venerable sir, I am.”
“What do you think, prince? When people come to you and ask: ‘What is the name of this part of the chariot?’
has there already been in your mind the thought: ‘If they come to me and ask me thus, I shall answer them thus’? Or does that answer occur to you on the spot?”
“Venerable sir, I am well known as a charioteer skilled in the parts of a chariot.
All the parts of a chariot are well known to me.
That answer would occur to me on the spot.”
“So too, prince, when learned nobles, learned brahmins, learned householders, and learned recluses, after formulating a question, then come to the Tathagata and pose it, the answer occurs to the Tathagata on the spot.
Why is that?
That element of things has been fully penetrated by the Tathagata, through the full penetration of which the answer occurs to the Tathagata on the spot.”
When this was said, Prince Abhaya said: “Magnificent, venerable sir! Magnificent, venerable sir! The Blessed One has made the Dhamma clear in many ways…From today let the Blessed One remember me as a lay follower who has gone to him for refuge for life.”
“But how, venerable sir, shall I refute his doctrine?”
and said to the Blessed One: 6. “Venerable sir, would a Tathagata utter such speech as would be unwelcome and disagreeable to others?”
THUS HAVE I HEARD.1007 On one occasion the Blessed One was living in the Kuru country at a town of the Kurus named Kammasadhamma.
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus thus: “Bhikkhus.”
- “Venerable sir,” they replied.
The Blessed One said this: 2. “Bhikkhus, sensual pleasures1008 are impermanent, hollow, false, deceptive;
Sensual pleasures here and now and sensual pleasures in lives to come, sensual perceptions here and now and sensual perceptions in lives to come - both alike are Mara’s realm, Mara’s domain, Mara’s bait, Mara’s hunting ground.
On account of them, these evil unwholesome mental states such as covetousness, ill will, and presumption arise,
“Therein, bhikkhus, a noble disciple considers thus: ‘Sensual pleasures here and now and sensual pleasures in lives to come…
and with the abandoning of them my mind will be unlimited, immeasurable, and well developed.’
Once there is full confidence, he either attains to the imperturbable now or else he decides upon perfecting wisdom. On the dissolution of the body, after death,
“Again, bhikkhus, a noble disciple considers thus:1012 ‘There are sensual pleasures here and now and sensual pleasures in lives to come, sensual perceptions here and now and sensual perceptions in lives to come; whatever material form there is, all material form is the four great elements and the material form derived from the four great elements.’
When he practises in this way and frequently abides thus, his mind acquires confidence in this base.
Once there is full confidence, he either attains to the imperturbable now or else he decides upon perfecting wisdom. On the dissolution of the body, after death,
This, bhikkhus, is declared to be the second way directed to the imperturbable.
“Again, bhikkhus, a noble disciple considers thus:1013 ‘Sensual pleasures here and now and sensual pleasures in lives to come, sensual perceptions here and now and sensual perceptions in lives to come, material forms here and now and material forms in lives to come, perceptions of forms here and now and perceptions of forms in lives to come - both alike are impermanent.
What is impermanent is not worth delighting in, not worth welcoming, not worth holding to.’
When he practises in this way and frequently abides thus, his mind acquires confidence in this base.
Once there is full confidence, he either attains to the imperturbable now or else he decides upon perfecting wisdom. On the dissolution of the body, after death,
This, bhikkhus, is declared to be the third way directed to the imperturbable.
“Again, bhikkhus, a noble disciple considers thus:1014 ‘Sensual pleasures here and now and sensual pleasures in lives to come, sensual perceptions here and now and sensual perceptions in lives to come, material forms here and now and material forms in lives to come, perceptions of forms here and now and perceptions of forms in lives to come, and perceptions of the imperturbable - all are perceptions.
Where these perceptions cease without remainder, that is the peaceful, that is the sublime, namely, the base of nothingness.’
When he practises in this way and frequently abides thus, his mind acquires confidence in this base.
Once there is full confidence, he either attains to the base of nothingness now or else he decides upon perfecting wisdom. On the dissolution of the body, after death,
This, bhikkhus, is declared to be the first way directed to the base of nothingness.
“Again, bhikkhus, a noble disciple, gone to the forest or to the root of a tree or to an empty hut, considers thus: ‘This is void of a self or of what belongs to a self.’1015
When he practises in this way and frequently abides thus, his mind acquires confidence in this base.
Once there is full confidence, he either attains to the base of nothingness now or else he decides upon perfecting wisdom. On the dissolution of the body, after death,
This, bhikkhus, is declared to be the second way directed to the base of nothingness.
“Again, bhikkhus, a noble disciple considers thus: ‘I am not anything belonging to anyone anywhere, nor is there anything belonging to me in anyone anywhere.’1016
When he practises in this way and frequently abides thus, his mind acquires confidence in this base.
Once there is full confidence, he either attains to the base of nothingness now or else he decides upon perfecting wisdom. On the dissolution of the body, after death,
This, bhikkhus, is declared to be the third way directed to the base of nothingness.
“Again, bhikkhus, a noble disciple considers thus: ‘Sensual pleasures here and now and sensual pleasures in lives to come, sensual perceptions here and now and sensual perceptions in lives to come, material forms here and now and material forms in lives to come, perceptions of forms here and now and perceptions of forms in lives to come, perceptions of the imperturbable, and perceptions of the base of nothingness - all are perceptions.
Where these perceptions cease without remainder, that is the peaceful, that is the sublime, namely, the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception.’
When he practises in this way and frequently abides thus, his mind acquires confidence in this base.
Once there is full confidence, he either attains to the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception now or else he decides upon perfecting wisdom. On the dissolution of the body, after death,
This, bhikkhus, is declared to be the way directed to the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception.”
When this was said, the venerable Ananda said to the Blessed One: “Venerable sir, here a bhikkhu is practising thus: ‘If it were not, it would not be mine; it will not be and it will not be mine. What exists, what has come to be, that I am abandoning.’1017
Thus he obtains equanimity.1018
Venerable sir, does such a bhikkhu attain Nibbana?”
“One bhikkhu here, Ananda, might attain Nibbana, another bhikkhu here might not attain Nibbana.”
“What is the cause and reason, venerable sir, why one bhikkhu here might attain Nibbana, while another bhikkhu here might not attain Nibbana?”
“Here, Ananda, a bhikkhu is practising thus: ‘If it were not, it would not be mine; it will not be and it will hot be mine. What exists, what has come to be, that I am abandoning.’
Thus he obtains equanimity.
He delights in that equanimity, welcomes it, and remains holding to it.
As he does so, his consciousness becomes dependent on it and clings to it.
A bhikkhu, Ananda, who is affected by clinging does not attain Nibbana.”
“But, venerable sir, when that bhikkhu clings, what does he cling to?”
“To the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception, Ananda.”
“When that bhikkhu clings, venerable sir, it seems he clings to the best object of clinging.”
“When that bhikkhu clings, Ananda, he clings to the best object of clinging;
“Here, Ananda, a bhikkhu is practising thus: ‘If it were not, it would not be mine; it will not be and it will not be mine. What exists, what has come to be, that I am abandoning.’
Thus he obtains equanimity.
He does not delight in that equanimity, welcome it, or remain holding to it.
Since he does not do so, his consciousness does not become dependent on it and does not cling to it.
A bhikkhu, Ananda, who is without clinging attains Nibbana.”
“It is wonderful, venerable sir, it is marvellous!
The Blessed One, indeed, has explained to us the crossing of the flood in dependence upon one support or another.1020
“1021 “Here, Ananda, a noble disciple considers thus: ‘Sensual pleasures here and now and sensual pleasures in lives to come, sensual perceptions here and now and sensual perceptions in lives to come, material forms here and now and material forms in lives to come, perceptions of forms here and now and perceptions of forms in lives to come, perceptions of the imperturbable, perceptions of the base of nothingness, and perceptions of the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception - this is personality as far as personality extends.1022
“Thus, Ananda, I have taught the way directed to the imperturbable, I have taught the way directed to the base of nothingness, I have taught the way directed to the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception, I have taught the crossing of the flood in dependence upon one support or another, I haye taught noble liberation.
“What should be done for his disciples out of compassion by a teacher who seeks their welfare and has compassion for them, that I have done for you, Ananda.
There are these roots of trees, these empty huts.
Meditate, Ananda, do not delay, or else you will regret it later.
This is our instruction to you.”
That is what the Blessed One said.
The venerable Ananda was satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
—Blameworthy or blameless?
— Condemned or commended by the wise?
—Being undertaken and put into effect, do they lead to harm and suffering, or not, or how does it appear in this case?
me is the demonstration of the person possessed of the consciousness stated;
and sutam is the demonstration of its being neither less nor more and of undistorted apprehension of it since its not having been heard is denied.
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Savatthi in Jeta’s Grove, Anathapindika’s Park.
Then the carpenter Pancakanga went to the venerable Udayin, and after paying homage to him, he sat down at one side
“Three kinds of feeling have been stated by the Blessed One, householder:
pleasant feeling, painful feeling, and neither-painful- nor-pleasant feeling. These three kinds of feeling have been stated by the Blessed One.”
“Not three kinds of feeling have been stated by the Blessed One, venerable Udayin; two kinds of feeling have been stated by the Blessed One: pleasant feeling and painful feeling.
This neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling has been stated by the Blessed One as a peaceful and sublime kind of pleasure.”
A second time
But the venerable Udayin could not convince the carpenter Pancakanga nor could the carpenter Pancakanga convince the venerable Udayin.
The venerable Ananda heard their conversation.
Then he went to the Blessed One, and after paying homage to him, he sat down at one side
When he had finished, the Blessed One told the venerable Ananda: 5. “Ananda, it was actually a true presentation that the carpenter Pancakanga would not accept from Udayin, and it was actually a true presentation that Udayin would not accept from the carpenter Pancakanga.
I have stated two kinds of feeling in one presentation; I have stated three kinds of feeling in another presentation; I have stated five kinds of feeling in another presentation; I have stated six kinds of feeling in another presentation; I have stated eighteen kinds of feeling in another presentation; I have stated thirty-six kinds of feeling in another presentation; I have stated one hundred and eight kinds of feeling in another presentation.
That is how the Dhamma has been shown by me in different presentations.
“When the Dhamma has thus been shown by me in different presentations, it may be expected of those who will not concede, allow, and accept what is well stated and well spoken by others that they will take to quarreling, brawling, and disputing, stabbing each other with verbal daggers.
“Ananda, there are these five cords of sensual pleasure.
What are the five?
Forms cognizable by the eye that are wished for, desired, agreeable, and likeable, connected with sensual desire and provocative of lust. Sounds cognizable by the ear… Odours cognizable by the nose…Flavours cognizable by the tongue…Tangibles cognizable by the body that are wished for, desired, agreeable, and likeable, connected with sensual desire and provocative of lust.
These are the five cords of sensual pleasure. Now the pleasure and joy that arise dependent on these five cords of sensual pleasure are called sensual pleasure.
“Should anyone say: ‘That is the utmost pleasure and joy that beings experience,’ I would not concede that to him.
Why is that?
Because there is another kind of pleasure loftier and more sublime than that pleasure.
And what is that other kind of pleasure?
Here, Ananda, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the first jhana, which is accompanied by applied and sustained thought, with rapture and pleasure born of seclusion.
This is that other kind of pleasure loftier and more sublime than the previous pleasure.
“Should anyone say: ‘That is the utmost pleasure and joy that beings experience,’ I would not concede that to him.
Why is that?
Because there is another kind of pleasure loftier and more sublime than that pleasure.
And what is that other kind of pleasure?
Here, Ananda, with the stilling of applied and sustained thought, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the second jhana, which has self-confidence and singleness of mind without applied and sustained thought, with rapture and pleasure born of concentration.
This is that other kind of pleasure loftier and more sublime than the previous pleasure.
“Should anyone say…
Here, Ananda, with the fading away as well of rapture, a bhikkhu abides in equanimity, mindful and fully aware, and still feeling pleasure with the body, he enters upon and abides in the third jhana, on account of which noble ones announce: ‘He has a pleasant abiding who has equanimity and is mindful.’
This is that other kind of pleasure loftier and more sublime than the previous pleasure.
“Should anyone say…
Here, Ananda, with the abandoning of pleasure and pain, and with the previous disappearance of joy and grief, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the fourth jhana, which has neitherpain- nor-pleasure and purity of mindfulness due to equanimity.
This is that other kind of pleasure loftier and more sublime than the previous pleasure.
“Should anyone say…
Here, Ananda, with the complete surmounting of perceptions of form, with the disappearance of perceptions of sensory impact, with non-attention to perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite,’ a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the base of infinite space.
This is that other kind of pleasure loftier and more sublime than the previous pleasure.
“Should anyone say…
Here, Ananda, by completely surmounting the base of infinite space, aware that ‘consciousness is infinite,’ a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the base of infinite consciousness.
This is that other kind of pleasure loftier and more sublime than the previous pleasure.
“Should anyone say…
Here, Ananda, by completely surmounting the base of infinite consciousness, aware that ‘there is nothing,’ a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the base of nothingness.
This is that other kind of pleasure loftier and more sublime than the previous pleasure.
“Should anyone say…
Here, Ananda, by completely surmounting the base of nothingness, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception.
This is that other kind of pleasure loftier and more sublime than the previous pleasure.
“Should anyone say: ‘That is the utmost pleasure and joy that beings experience.’ I would not concede that to him.
Why is that?
Because there is another kind of pleasure loftier and more sublime than that pleasure.
And what is that other kind of pleasure?
Here, Ananda, by completely surmounting the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the cessation of perception and feeling.
This is that other kind of pleasure loftier and more sublime than the previous pleasure.
“It is possible, Ananda, that wanderers of other sects might speak thus: ‘The recluse Gotama speaks of the cessation of perception and feeling and he describes that as pleasure.
What is this, and how is this?’
Wanderers of other sects who speak thus should be told: ‘Friends, the Blessed One describes pleasure not only with reference to pleasant feeling; rather, friends, the Tathagata describes as pleasure any kind of pleasure wherever and in whatever way it is found.’“
That is what the Blessed One said.
The venerable Ananda was satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
me demonstrates an individual self;
and sutam demonstrates an idea cognized.
and asked him: 3. “Venerable sir, how many kinds of feeling have been stated by the Blessed One?”
Similarly, evam demonstrates variety of mode by the description of the modes of the cognizances belonging to the cognitive series; 17
and a third time the venerable Udayin stated his position,
me demonstrates an agent; 18
and sutam demonstrates an objective field for action.
and a second time and a third time the carpenter Pancakanga stated his.
Similarly, evam demonstrates a person’s function;
and me demonstrates a person connected with both these functions.
and reported to the Blessed One the entire conversation between the venerable Udayin and the carpenter Pancakanga.
me demonstrates a person;
and sutam demonstrates a function of that person.
while sutam is a description in terms of the factual.
Similarly, evam and me are a derivative description because they are stated derivatively upon this or that fact,
But it may be expected of those who concede, allow, and accept what is well stated and well spoken by others that they will live in concord, with mutual appreciation, without disputing, blending like milk and water, viewing each other with kindly eyes.
and by the word sutam he points out non-distraction because when someone is distracted hearing is absent in him;
for when a distracted person is told quite unmistakably yet he says ‘ I did not hear; say it again ’.
And what is that other kind of pleasure?
And what is that other kind of pleasure?
And what is that other kind of pleasure?
while with this word sutam , which shows penetration of the class of what can be heard, he likewise shows his own excellence in the Discriminations of Ideas and Language.
And what is that other kind of pleasure?
And what is that other kind of pleasure?
And what is that other kind of pleasure?
Dissipates all lack of faith And swells faith in the Master’s word.
Gotama’s disciple, saying In such manner ‘ Thus I heard ’,
Is met with as event, moment, And time, and mass, and cause, and view,
Obtainment, and abandonment, And lastly penetration, too.
And ‘ on one occasion ‘ is also said with reference to any one of the following occasions: the occasion of the function of compassion from the two occasions of the function of knowledge and function of compassion, 28 the occasion of the practising for others’ welfare from the two occasions of practising for one’s own welfare and practising for others’ welfare, the occasion of talking about the True Idea from the two occasions of the two alternative ways in which those who have met together should act, 29 and the occasion of Preaching from the two occasions of preaching and practising.
the Occasion of Teaching called ‘ one occasion ’, which is one .
By instrument and locative; The meaning dictates which.
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Rajagaha in the Bamboo Grove, the Squirrels’ Sanctuary.
Now on that occasion the venerable Rahula was living at Ambalatthika.
Then, when it was evening, the Blessed One rose from meditation and went to the venerable Rahula at Ambalatthika.
The venerable Rahula saw the Blessed One coming in the distance
The Blessed One sat down on the seat made ready
and washed his feet.
Then the Blessed One left a little water in the water vessel and asked the venerable Rahula: “Rahula, do you see this little water left in the water vessel?”
- “Yes, venerable sir.”
- “Even so little, Rahula, is the recluseship of those who are not ashamed to tell a deliberate lie.”
Then the Blessed One threw away the little water that was left and asked the venerable Rahula: “Rahula, do you see that little water that was thrown away?”
- “Yes, venerable sir.”
- “Even so, Rahula, those who are not ashamed to tell a deliberate lie have thrown away their recluseship.”
Then the Blessed One turned the water vessel upside down and asked the venerable Rahula: “Rahula, do you see this water vessel turned upside down?”
- “Yes, venerable sir.”
- “Even so, Rahula, those who are not ashamed to tell a deliberate lie have turned their recluseship upside down.”
Then the Blessed One turned the water vessel right way up again and asked the venerable Rahula: “Rahula, do you see this hollow, empty water vessel?”
- “Yes, venerable sir.”
- “Even so hollow and empty, Rahula, is the recluseship of those who are not ashamed to tell a deliberate lie.”
“Suppose, Rahula, there were a royal tusker elephant with tusks as long as chariot poles, full-grown in stature, high-bred, and accustomed to battle. In battle he would perform his task with his forefeet and his hindfeet, with his forequarters and his hindquarters, with his head and his ears, with his tusks and his tail, yet he would keep back his trunk.
Then his rider would think: ‘This royal tusker elephant with tusks as long as chariot poles… performs his task in battle with his forefeet and his hindfeet… yet he keeps back his trunk.
He has not yet given up his life.’
But when the royal tusker elephant… performs his task in battle with his forefeet and his hindfeet, with his forequarters and his hindquarters, with his head and his ears, with his tusks and his tail, and also with his trunk, then his rider would think: ‘This royal tusker elephant with tusks as long as chariot poles…performs his task in battle with his forefeet and his hindfeet… and also with his trunk.
He has given up his life.
Now there is nothing this royal tusker elephant would not do.’
So too, Rahula, when one is not ashamed to tell a deliberate lie, there is no evil, I say, that one would not do.
Therefore, Rahula, you should train thus: ‘I will not utter a falsehood even as a joke.’
“What do you think, Rahula? What is the purpose of a mirror?”
“For the purpose of reflection, venerable sir.”
“So too, Rahula, an action with the body should be done after repeated reflection; an action by speech should be done after repeated reflection; an action by mind should be done after repeated reflection.
“Rahula, when you wish to do an action with the body, you should reflect upon that same bodily action thus: ‘Would this action that I wish to do with the body lead to my own affliction, or to the affliction of others, or to the affliction of both? Is it an unwholesome bodily action with painful consequences, with painful results?’
When you reflect, if you know: ‘This action that I wish to do with the body would lead to my own affliction, or to the affliction of others, or to the affliction of both; it is an unwholesome bodily action with painful consequences, with painful results,’ then you definitely should not do such an action with the body.
But when you reflect, if you know: ‘This action that I wish to do with the body would not lead to my own affliction, or to the affliction of others, or to the affliction of both; it is a wholesome bodily action with pleasant consequences, with pleasant results.’ then you may do such an action with the body.
“Also, Rahula, while you are doing an action with the body, you should reflect upon that same bodily action thus: ‘Does this action that I am doing with the body lead to my own affliction, or to the affliction of others, or to the affliction of both? Is it an unwholesome bodily action with painful consequences, with painful results?’
When you reflect, if you know: ‘This action that I am doing with the body leads to my own affliction, or to the affliction of others, or to the affliction of both; it is an unwholesome bodily action with painful consequences, with painful results,’ then you should suspend such a bodily action.
But when you reflect, if you know: ‘This action that I am doing with the body does not lead to my own affliction, or to the affliction of others, or to the affliction of both; it is a wholesome bodily action with pleasant consequences, with pleasant results,’ then you may continue in such a bodily action.
“Also, Rahula, after you have done an action with the body, you should reflect upon that same bodily action thus: ‘Does this action that I have done with the body lead to my own affliction, or to the affliction of others, or to the affliction of both? Was it an unwholesome bodily action with painful consequences, with painful results?’
When you reflect, if you know: ‘This action that I have done with the body leads to my own affliction, or to the affliction of others, or to the affliction of both; it was an unwholesome bodily action with painful consequences, with painful results,’ then you should confess such a bodily action, reveal it, and lay it open to the Teacher or to your wise companions in the holy life. Having confessed it, revealed it, and laid it open, you should undertake restraint for the future.
But when you reflect, if you know: ‘This action that I have done with the body does not lead to my own affliction, or to the affliction of others, or to the affliction of both; it was a wholesome bodily action with pleasant consequences, pleasant results,’ you can abide happy and glad, training day and night in wholesome states.
Whatever recluses and brahmins in the future will purify their bodily action, their verbal action, and their mental action, all will do so by repeatedly reflecting thus.
Whatever recluses and brahmins in the present are purifying their bodily action, their verbal action, and their mental action, all are doing so by repeatedly reflecting thus.
That is what the Blessed One said.
The venerable Rahula was satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
and made a seat ready and set out water for washing the feet.
The venerable Rahula paid homage to him and sat down at one side.
Therefore, Rahula, you should train thus: ‘We will purify our bodily action, our verbal action, and our mental action by repeatedly reflecting upon them.’“
“Rahula, whatever recluses and brahmins in the past purified their bodily action, their verbal action, and their mental action, all did so by repeatedly reflecting thus.
“Rahula, when you wish to do an action with the speech, you should reflect upon that same speech action thus: ‘Would this action that I wish to do with the speech lead to my own affliction, or to the affliction of others, or to the affliction of both? Is it an unwholesome speech action with painful consequences, with painful results?’
When you reflect, if you know: ‘This action that I wish to do with the speech would lead to my own affliction, or to the affliction of others, or to the affliction of both; it is an unwholesome speech action with painful consequences, with painful results,’ then you definitely should not do such an action with the speech.
But when you reflect, if you know: ‘This action that I wish to do with the speech would not lead to my own affliction, or to the affliction of others, or to the affliction of both; it is a wholesome speech action with pleasant consequences, with pleasant results.’ then you may do such an action with the speech.
“Also, Rahula, while you are doing an action with the speech, you should reflect upon that same speech action thus: ‘Does this action that I am doing with the speech lead to my own affliction, or to the affliction of others, or to the affliction of both? Is it an unwholesome speech action with painful consequences, with painful results?’
When you reflect, if you know: ‘This action that I am doing with the speech leads to my own affliction, or to the affliction of others, or to the affliction of both; it is an unwholesome speech action with painful consequences, with painful results,’ then you should suspend such a speech action.
But when you reflect, if you know: ‘This action that I am doing with the speech does not lead to my own affliction, or to the affliction of others, or to the affliction of both; it is a wholesome speech action with pleasant consequences, with pleasant results,’ then you may continue in such a speech action.
“Also, Rahula, after you have done an action with the speech, you should reflect upon that same speech action thus: ‘Does this action that I have done with the speech lead to my own affliction, or to the affliction of others, or to the affliction of both? Was it an unwholesome speech action with painful consequences, with painful results?’
When you reflect, if you know: ‘This action that I have done with the speech leads to my own affliction, or to the affliction of others, or to the affliction of both; it was an unwholesome speech action with painful consequences, with painful results,’ then you should confess such a speech action, reveal it, and lay it open to the Teacher or to your wise companions in the holy life. Having confessed it, revealed it, and laid it open, you should undertake restraint for the future.
But when you reflect, if you know: ‘This action that I have done with the speech does not lead to my own affliction, or to the affliction of others, or to the affliction of both; it was a wholesome speech action with pleasant consequences, pleasant results,’ you can abide happy and glad, training day and night in wholesome states.
“Rahula, when you wish to do an action with the mind, you should reflect upon that same mind action thus: ‘Would this action that I wish to do with the mind lead to my own affliction, or to the affliction of others, or to the affliction of both? Is it an unwholesome mind action with painful consequences, with painful results?’
When you reflect, if you know: ‘This action that I wish to do with the mind would lead to my own affliction, or to the affliction of others, or to the affliction of both; it is an unwholesome mind action with painful consequences, with painful results,’ then you definitely should not do such an action with the mind.
But when you reflect, if you know: ‘This action that I wish to do with the mind would not lead to my own affliction, or to the affliction of others, or to the affliction of both; it is a wholesome mind action with pleasant consequences, with pleasant results.’ then you may do such an action with the mind.
“Also, Rahula, while you are doing an action with the mind, you should reflect upon that same mind action thus: ‘Does this action that I am doing with the mind lead to my own affliction, or to the affliction of others, or to the affliction of both? Is it an unwholesome mind action with painful consequences, with painful results?’
When you reflect, if you know: ‘This action that I am doing with the mind leads to my own affliction, or to the affliction of others, or to the affliction of both; it is an unwholesome mind action with painful consequences, with painful results,’ then you should suspend such a mind action.
But when you reflect, if you know: ‘This action that I am doing with the mind does not lead to my own affliction, or to the affliction of others, or to the affliction of both; it is a wholesome mind action with pleasant consequences, with pleasant results,’ then you may continue in such a mind action.
“Also, Rahula, after you have done an action with the mind, you should reflect upon that same mind action thus: ‘Does this action that I have done with the mind lead to my own affliction, or to the affliction of others, or to the affliction of both? Was it an unwholesome mind action with painful consequences, with painful results?’
When you reflect, if you know: ‘This action that I have done with the mind leads to my own affliction, or to the affliction of others, or to the affliction of both; it was an unwholesome mind action with painful consequences, with painful results,’ then you should confess such a mind action, reveal it, and lay it open to the Teacher or to your wise companions in the holy life. Having confessed it, revealed it, and laid it open, you should undertake restraint for the future.
But when you reflect, if you know: ‘This action that I have done with the mind does not lead to my own affliction, or to the affliction of others, or to the affliction of both; it was a wholesome mind action with pleasant consequences, pleasant results,’ you can abide happy and glad, training day and night in wholesome states.
The Blessed One : this is a designation signifying the respect and veneration accorded to the highest of creatures, who is distinguished by special qualities,
“ Blessed ” is the best of words, ‘’ Blessed ” is the finest word,
Deserving awe and veneration: Blessed is his name therefore’.
by which last is meant ‘ capricious ’.
He has gone to the end of being : thus he is called “ Blessed ” ’).
He has well maintained himself in being in many ways,
He has caused abolishing , he is fortunate ,
 has blessings , is a frequenter , a partaker , a possessor of what has been analysed ,
, possessed of abolishment , associated with blessings , and a possessor of what has been analysed ;
He has frequented , and he has rejected, going in the kinds of being , thus he is Blessed .
‘ He has abolished lust and hate, Delusion too; he is free from taints;
Abolished are all evil ideas: ‘ ‘ Blessed ’ ’ his name may rightly be ’.
they become capable of finding both mundane and supramundane pleasure.
Nor e’er the ear ten sounds denies, And offers food and drink for all.
The Kosalans’ fair capital Beguiles the mind, it charms the eyes,
Since all is there —sabbam atthi — Therein the city’s naming lies.
Was living : this is a term signifying without distinction a possessor of one or other of the abidings consisting of the four postures and the three abidings consisting in the heavenly, the divine and the Noble Ones’ abidings.
the locative case is in the sense of ‘ vicinity
At that Savatthi:
The peerless city can recall The Gods’ own Alakamanda
that is why it is said that he ‘ was living ’.
for it was planted by prince Jeta, tended and guarded by him, and he was its owner, which is why it was called Jeta Wood :
in that Jeta’s Wood.
and conversely, if he lived there, then ‘at Savatthi ’ cannot be said;
for he cannot live in both places on one occasion.
—It may be replied as follows: Was it not already said above ‘ The locative case is in the sense of “ vicinity ” ’ ? Consequently, just as, when herds of cattle are wandering in the vicinity of the Ganges, the Jumna, and so on, it is said that ‘ they are wandering “ at ” the ’, ‘ wandering “ at ” the Jumna ’, so too here, there the Wood of Jeta and Park of Anathapindika in the vicinity of Savatthi, when someone is living there, it is said of him that he is ‘ living at Savatthi in Jeta’s Wood, Anathapindika’s Park ’.
and lastly, by the first he points out the Blessed One’s being born in the world and matured in the world, and by the second his being left intact by the world, and so on.
by the first his great helpfulness to men, and by the second his great helpfulness to gods;
by the first the comfortable abiding that has for its sign the not giving up of such pleasure as is in conformity with the True Idea, and by the second the comfortable abiding that has for its sign the pursuit of the more-than-human ideal;
by the first his resoluteness upon procuring creatures’ welfare, and by the second his intactness in the effecting of others’ welfare and pleasure;
by the first his approach through compassion, and by the second his withdrawal through understanding;
for that deity is not specified by name and race, which is why ‘ a certain ’ is said.
The extreme of whose brilliance : here the word ‘ extreme 5 means handsome. But the word vanna is met with as skin , eulogy, group of clans , reason, shape, measure, the visible-form base , and so on.
The whole of : now the word kevala has many meanings such as remainderless, the most part, unmixed, with nothing extra, firm, dissociation, and so on.
or else what is meant is ‘ Being already thus gone towards, having thereupon gone to the vicinity of the Blessed One called “ a nearer place ” ’.
what is more, Nor above to one below, Should one speak, nor up-wind:
so Who these faults has rectified, Him they call ‘ stood at one side ‘.
and he did not sit down out of deference to the Great Disciples who were standing round the Blessed One.
for when deities want to sit down a seat is generated for them, and not wanting that, he stood at one side without turning his mind to sitting.
me demonstrates a person;
and sutam demonstrates the person’s function.
Now with the aim of revealing, expounding and exhibiting the meaning thereof by way of a commentary on the Minor Books that is illustrative of the ultimate meaning this is said ‘
this statement of the Going-for-refuge is the beginning of the Minor Books.
I go for refuge to the Community :
I go for refuge to the True Idea ,
I go for refuge to the Enlightened One ,
I honour the Jewel Threeness first That should be honoured most of all.
Then I shall make a comment versed In certain Minor Books withal. 1
Though their profundity would make Such work too hard an occupation
For one who like myself is not A giver of the Dispensation, 2
Yet still today we find no break In the former Teachers’ Explanation, 3
And we likewise have not forgot The Master’s ninefold Dispensation.
Let love of Truth the motive be, Not liking for self-praise, nor aim
To carp at others and give blame: So listen, then, attentively.
So I this work will undertake Will be my standby, too, I wot,
Because the Ancients’ explanation Beside the Master’s Dispensation.
Herein, since it was said above ‘ Then I shall make a comment versed In certain Minor Books withal ’ I shall accordingly make the commentary after first defining what the Minor Books are.
The ‘ Minor Books ’ are one part of the Minor Collection .
The ‘ Five Collections ’ are:
Herein, the 34 Threads-of-Argument beginning with the Brahmajala Sutta are the Long Collection ,
and the Minor Collection , consists of the rest of the Enlightened One’s utterance not included in the four Collections, that is to say: the Minor Readings , Lines on the True Idea , Exclamations , Sayings , the Chapter of Threads-of-Argument , Stories of Heavenly Mansions , Stories of Ghosts of the Departed , Psalms of the Brethren , Psalms of the Sisters , Birth Stories , the Book of Demonstration , the Path of Discrimination , Legends , the Buddha-Heritage , and the Volume of Good Conduct , as well as the Volume of Discipline and Volume of Basic Ideation . 4
Why is this called the Minor Collection?
Because it is the mass and the home of many minor branches of the True Idea ,
and according to what is said in the non-Buddhist world, namely, ‘ Poṇikanikāyo cikkhallikanikāyo ‘5 grammatically establishing this both according to what is said in the Dispensation, namely .
is these Minor Books , which are included in the Volume of Threads-of-Argument , and the meaning of which it is here intended to reveal, expound and exhibit. Of these Minor Books the book of Minor Readings is the beginning, and it has nine component parts, namely: the Refuges, the Training Precepts, the Thirty-two-fold Aspect, the Boy’s Questions, the Good-Omen, the Jewel, Without-the-Walls, the Treasure-Store, and Lovingkindness. But it is the beginning according to the ‘ pathway ’ for the serial order of recitation of the Tipitaka composed by the line of former teachers, not according to what was spoken first by the Blessed One.
What was actually first said was this:
‘ I travelled through the round of countless births: not finding
‘ House-Builder, you have now been seen; ‘ You shall not build the house again.
’ Your rafters have been broken down; ‘ Your ridge-pole is demolished, too.
’ My mind has now attained the Undetermined ‘ And reached the end of every kind of craving ’ .
And this pair of stanzas was the very beginning of the whole of the Enlightened One’s Utterance;
However, of what was said by him as uttered speech:
‘ When ideas are full manifest ‘
To the ardent and absorbed divine, 7
The Digha, Majjhima, Samyutta, Anguttara and Khuddaka ;
These five Collections are profound In idea and in meaning too.
the 152 Threads-of-Argument beginning with the Mulapariyaya Sutta are the Middle Collection ,
the 7762 Threads-of- Argument beginning with the Oghatarana Sutta are the Associated Collection ,
the 9557 Threads-of-Argument beginning with the Cittapariyadana Sutta are the Numerical Collection ,
since what is a mass and a home is called a ‘ collection ’ .
‘ Bhikkhus, I see no single collection so varied as the breathing things that are animals 5 ,
One part of this Minor Collection 
‘but Seeking the House-Builder ‘ How painful is birth ever and again!
but it was said only with the mind without speech utterance.6
‘ His doubts all vanish; for he knows ‘
That each idea must have its cause’ .
the following stanza was the beginning.
So I shall begin the commentary on the meaning, starting from the beginning of this book of Minor Readings with its nine component parts, itself the beginning of the Minor Books.
Herein, it was laid down in the Schedule thus ‘ A varied comment then we unfold On the word “ thus ” and some words more,
To give their sense, before we tell The Sutta’s origin as well ’ , and this is the opportunity to relate that origin. Therefore, after we have first told the origin of the Good-omen Question, we shall then comment on the meaning of the stanzas.
What was the origin of the Good-omen Question?
they are illusory, the prattle of fools.
and they constitute an obstruction to a noble disciple in training here.
Ānanda asked: “Bhante, how long does it take for the aspiration of buddhas to be achieved?”
The Buddha replied: “For buddhas, Ānanda, it takes at minimum four incalculables and 100,000 eons; at the middling level, eight incalculables and 100,000 eons; at the maximum, sixteen incalculables and 100,000 eons.
And these divisions should be understood respectively in the case of those for whom wisdom is predominant, those for whom faith is predominant, and those for whom energy is predominant.
In those for whom wisdom is predominant, faith is weak and wisdom is sharp .
In those for whom faith is predominant, wisdom is middling .369
In those for whom energy is predominant, faith and wisdom are weak and energy is strong.370
But without having completed four incalculables and 100,000 eons, there is no possibility that one could become a buddha earlier, even if one were to give gifts day after day like those of Vessantara and to accumulate all the other pāramīs, such as good behavior, to a corresponding degree.371
Why not?
Because one’s knowledge would not have commenced, nor expanded, nor reached maturity.
It is just as when grain is growing that needs three, four, or five months to ripen: it is impossible that without having completed that time, the grain might ripen earlier—in a fortnight or a month—even though one fondles it and waters it a thousand times daily.
Why not?
Because the grain would not have commenced, nor expanded, nor reached maturity.
So too, without having completed four incalculables and 100,000 eons, there is no possibility that one could become a buddha.
Therefore the fulfilling of the pāramīs must be pursued over the aforementioned time for the maturation of knowledge.”
When observing the uposatha, they do so after they have assembled on the Jewel Terrace at the foot of the Mañjūsaka tree on Mount Gandhamādana.
They achieve all the psychic powers, meditative attainments, and analytical knowledges. Their excellent qualities are inferior to those of the buddhas but superior to those of disciples. They give others the going forth and train them in proper behavior.380 They observe the uposatha with this advice: “One should practice effacement of the mind and should not come to a stop,” or else they merely say: “Today is the uposatha.”
For they are not able to apply conceptual description to the world-transcending Dhamma and thereby teach it. Their breakthrough to the Dhamma is like a dumb person trying to describe the things he has seen in a dream or like a country-dweller trying to describe the dishes he tasted in the city.
They penetrate the taste of the goal only but not the taste of the Dhamma.
Paccekabuddhas attain enlightenment themselves but do not enlighten others.
Buddhas attain enlightenment themselves and enlighten others.
Without encountering buddhas, paccekabuddhas arise only at a time when buddhas arise.379
When buddhas arise in the world after having fulfilled the pāramīs through this aspiration and this undertaking in the aforesaid amounts of time, they arise in either a khattiya family or a brahmin family. Paccekabuddhas arise in a family of khattiyas, brahmins, or householders. But the chief disciples, like the buddhas, arise only in families of khattiyas or brahmins. Buddhas never arise when the eon is dissolving, but they arise when the eon is evolving.378
The undertaking for all these possesses only two factors: service and desire.
the reason for this should be understood in the way already stated.
It is not possible in less time than this;
For the two chief disciples, one incalculable and 100,000 eons; for the eighty great disciples, 100,000 eons. So too, for the mother, father, attendant, and son of a buddha.
But how much time does it take for the aspiration of disciples to be achieved?
The rest should be understood in the way already stated.
Here, the sight of one devoid of influxes means the sight of a buddha, a paccekabuddha, or an arahant disciple.
service, and desire: these are the causes for the undertaking to reach success.
The human state, the achievement of the gender,the sight of one devoid of influxes,
For one aspiring to become a paccekabuddha in this amount of time, five prerequisites are recognized in making the undertaking:
The reason should be understood in the way stated earlier in the case of buddhas.
It is not possible in less time than this.
For paccekabuddhas, two incalculables and 100,000 eons are required.
But how long does it take for the aspiration of pacceka-buddhas to be fulfilled?
And for one aspiring for buddhahood over such a period of time, eight prerequisites must be met for making the undertaking.
Human status, achievement of the gender, the cause, seeing the Teacher;
the going forth, possession of excellent qualities,service, and strong desire:
through the assemblage of these eight qualitiesthe undertaking reaches success. 
constitute an obstruction to a noble disciple in training here.
Suppose I were to abide with a mind abundant and exalted, having transcended the world and made a firm resolution with the mind.1009
and split the main branches of the tree.
“For many a year, Evil One, for many a century, for many a millennium, I roasted in that Great Hell.
Dark One, you have much to suffer By assaulting such a bhikkhu,
… Who directly knows this fact.
… Who directly knows this fact.
I am one who Shook all Vejayanta Palace With his toe
… Who directly knows this fact.
“I am one who, in that palace, Posed to Sakka this question:
… Who directly knows this fact.
… Who directly knows this fact.
An Enlightened One’s disciple Who directly knows this fact
and when this courteous and amiable talk was finished, he stood at one side.
When I do so, there will be no more evil unwholesome mental states such as covetousness, ill will, and presumption in me,
When he practises in this way and frequently abides thus, his mind acquires confidence in this base.1010
it is possible that this consciousness of his, leading to rebirth, may pass on to rebirth in the imperturbable.1011
This, bhikkhus, is declared to be the first way directed to the imperturbable.
it is possible that this consciousness of his, leading to rebirth, may pass on to rebirth in the imperturbable.
it is possible that this consciousness of his, leading to rebirth, may pass on to rebirth in the imperturbable.
it is possible that this consciousness of his, leading to rebirth, may pass on to rebirth in the base of nothingness.
it is possible that this consciousness of his, leading to rebirth, may pass on to rebirth in the base of nothingness.
it is possible that this consciousness of his, leading to rebirth, may pass on to rebirth in the base of nothingness.
it is possible that this consciousness of his, leading to rebirth, may pass on to rebirth in the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception.
for this is the best object of clinging, namely, the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception.1019
But, venerable sir, what is noble liberation?”
This is the Deathless, namely, the liberation of the mind through not clinging.’
On one occasion the Blessed One was traveling along the highway between Ukkattha and Setavya.
The brahmin Dona was also traveling along the highway between Ukkattha and Setavya.
The brahmin Dona then saw the thousand-spoked wheels of the Blessed One’s footprints, with their rims and hubs, complete in all respects, and thought: “It is astounding and amazing!
These surely could not be the footprints of a human being!”
Then the Blessed One left the highway and sat down at the foot of a tree, folding his legs crosswise, straightening his body, arid establishing mindfulness in front of him.
Tracking the Blessed One’s footprints, the brahmin Dona saw the Blessed One sitting at the foot of the tree— graceful, inspiring confidence, with peaceful faculties and peaceful mind, one who had attained to the highest taming and serenity, like a tamed and guarded bull elephant with controlled faculties.
He then approached the Blessed One and said to him:
“I will not be a deva, brahmin.”.
“Could you be a gandhabba, sir?”
“I will not be a gandhabba, brahmin.”
“Could you be a yakkha, sir?”
“I will not be a yakkha, brahmin.”
“Could you be a human being, sir?
“I will not be a human being, brahmin.”
“When you are asked: ‘Could you be a deva, sir?’ you say: ‘I will not be a deva, brahmin.’
When you aire asked: ‘Could you be a gandhabba, sir?’ you say: ‘I will not be a gandhabba, brahmin.’
When you are asked: ‘Could you be a yakkha, sir?’ you say: ‘I will not be a yakkha, brahmin.’
When you a re asked: ‘Could you be a human being, sir?’ you say: ‘I will not be a human being, brahmin.’
What, then, could you be, sir?”
“Brahmin, I have abandoned those taints because of which I might have become a deva; I have cut them off at the root, made them like palm stumps, obliterated them so that they are no longer subject to future arising.
“Could you be a deva, sir?”
I have abandoned those taints because of which I might have become a gandhabba … … might have become a yakkha … … might have become a human being; I have cut them off at the root, made them like palm stumps, obliterated them so that they are no longer subject to future arising
Just as a blue, red, or white lotus flower, though born in the water and grown up in the water, rises above the water and stands unsoiled by the water, even so, though born in the world and grown up in the world, I have overcome the world and dwell unsoiled by the world.
Remember me, brahmin, as a Buddha.
“I have destroyed those taints by which I might have been reborn as a deva or as a gandhabba that travels through the sky;
by which I might have reached the state of a yakkha, or arrived back at the human state.
have dispelled and cut down these taints.
“As a lovely white lotus is not soiled by the water,
I am not soiled by the world: therefore, O brahmin, I am a Buddha.”
On one occasion the Blessed One was traveling along the road between Ukkattha and Setabya,
Dona the brahman saw, in the Blessed One’s footprints, wheels with 1,000 spokes, together with rims and hubs, complete in all their features. On seeing them, the thought occurred to him, “How amazing! How astounding!
These are not the footprints of a human being! “
Then the Blessed One, leaving the road, went to sit at the root of a certain tree — his legs crossed, his body erect, with mindfulness established to the fore.
Then Dona, following the Blessed One’s footprints, saw him sitting at the root of the tree: confident, inspiring confidence, his senses calmed, his mind calmed, having attained the utmost control & tranquility, tamed, guarded, his senses restrained, a naga.
On seeing him, he went to him and said,
“No, brahman, I am not a deva.”
“Are you a gandhabba? “
“No…”
“… a yakkha? “
“No…”
“… a human being? “
“No, brahman, I am not a human being.”
“When asked, ‘Are you a deva? ‘ you answer, ‘No, brahman, I am not a deva.’
When asked, ‘Are you a gandhabba? ‘ you answer, ‘No, brahman, I am not a gandhabba.’
When asked, ‘Are you a yakkha? ‘ you answer, ‘No, brahman, I am not a yakkha.’
When asked, ‘Are you a human being? ‘ you answer, ‘No, brahman, I am not a human being.’
Then what sort of being are you? “
“Brahman, the fermentations by which — if they were not abandoned — I would be a deva: Those are abandoned by me, their root destroyed, made like a palmyra stump, deprived of the conditions of development, not destined for future arising.
The fermentations by which — if they were not abandoned — I would be a gandhabba… a yakkha… a human being: Those are abandoned by me, their root destroyed, made like a palmyra stump, deprived of the conditions of development, not destined for future arising.
“Just like a red, blue, or white lotus — born in the water, grown in the water, rising up above the water — stands unsmeared by the water, in the same way I — born in the world, grown in the world, having overcome the world — live unsmeared by the world.
Remember me, brahman, as ‘awakened.’
and Dona the brahman was also traveling along the road between Ukkattha and Setabya.
“Master, are you a deva?”
“The fermentations by which I would go to a deva-state, or become a gandhabba in the sky,
or go to a yakkha-state & human-state:
Those have been destroyed by me, ruined, their stems removed.
Like a blue lotus, rising up, unsmeared by water,
unsmeared am I by the world, and so, brahman, I’m awake.”
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Vesall in the Great Wood in the Hall with the Peaked Roof.
Now on that occasion a number of bhikkhus had declared final knowledge in the presence of the Blessed One thus: “We understand: Birth is destroyed, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more coming to any state of being.”
Sunakkhatta, son of the Licchavis,995 heard: “A number of bhikkhus, it seems, have declared final knowledge in the presence of the Blessed One thus: ‘We understand: Birth is destroyed …there is no more coming to any state of being.”
Then Sunakkhatta, son of the Licchavis, went to the Blessed One, and after paying homage to him, he sat down at one side
Did they do so rightly or are there some bhikkhus here who declare final knowledge because they overestimate themselves?”
“When those bhikkhus, Sunakkhatta, declared final knowledge in my presence,
Thus it is in this case, Sunakkhatta, that the Tathagata thinks: ‘Let me teach them the Dhamma.’
But some misguided men here formulate a question, come to the Tathagata, and ask it.
In that case, Sunakkhatta, though the Tathagata has thought: ‘Let me teach them the Dhamma,’ he changes his mind.”998
“This is the time, Blessed One, this is the time, Sublime One, for the Blessed One to teach the Dhamma.
Having heard it from the Blessed One, the bhikkhus will remember it.”
“Then listen, Sunakkhatta, and attend closely to what I shall say.”
“Yes, venerable sir,” Sunakkhatta, son of the Licchavis, replied to the Blessed One.
The Blessed One said this:
What are the five?
Forms cognizable by the eye that are wished for, desired, agreeable, and likeable, connected with sensual desire and provocative of lust. Sounds cognizable by the ear…Odours cognizable by the nose…Flavours cognizable by the tongue…Tangibles cognizable by the body that are wished for, desired, agreeable, and likeable, connected with sensual desire and provocative of lust. These are the five cords of sensual pleasure.
“It is possible, Sunakkhatta, that some person here may be intent on worldly material things.999
But when a person is intent on worldly material things, only talk concerning that interests him, and his thinking and pondering are in line with that, and he associates with that kind of person, and he finds satisfaction through him.when talk about the imperturbable is going on, he will not listen to it or give it ear or exert his mind to understand it. He does not associate with that kind of person, and he does not find satisfaction through him.
“Suppose, Sunakkhatta, a man had left his own village or town a long time ago,
He would ask that man whether the people of that village or town were safe, prosperous, and healthy, and that man would tell him whether the people of that village or town were safe, prosperous, and healthy.
What do you think, Sunakkhatta? Would that first man listen to him, give him ear, and exert his mind to understand?”
- “Yes, venerable sir.”
- “So too, Sunakkhatta, it is possible that some person here may be intent on worldly material things.
When a person is intent on worldly material things…and he does not find satisfaction through him.
He should be understood as a person who is intent on worldly material things.
“It is possible, Sunakkhatta, that some person here may be intent on the imperturbable.1000
When a person is intent on the imperturbable, only talk concerning that interests him, and his thinking and pondering are in line with that, and he associates with that kind of person, and he finds satisfaction through him. But when talk about worldly material things is going on, he will not listen to it or give it ear or exert his mind to understand it. He does not associate with that kind of person, and he does not find satisfaction through him.
“Just as a yellow leaf that has fallen from its stalk is incapable of becoming green again, so too, Sunakkhatta, when a person is intent on the imperturbable he has shed the fetter of worldly material things.
He should be understood as a person not bound by the fetter of worldly material things who is intent on the imperturbable.
“It is possible, Sunakkhatta, that some person here may be intent on the base of nothingness.
When a person is intent on the base of nothingness, only talk concerning that interests him, and his thinking and pondering are in line with that, and he associates with that kind of person, and he finds satisfaction through him. But when talk about the imperturbable is going on, he will not listen to it or give it ear or exert his mind to understand it. He does not associate with that kind of person, and he does not find satisfaction through him.
“Just as a thick stone that has split in two cannot be joined together again, so too, Sunakkhatta, when a person is intent on the base of nothingness his fetter of the imperturbable has been split.
He should be understood as a person not bound by the fetter of the imperturbable who is intent on the base of nothingness.
“It is possible, Sunakkhatta, that some person here may be intent on the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception.
When a person is intent on the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception, only talk concerning that interests him, and his thinking and pondering are in line with that, and he associates with that kind of person, and he finds satisfaction through him. But when talk about the base of nothingness is going on, he will not listen to it or give it ear or exert his mind to understand it. He does not associate with that kind of person, and he does not find satisfaction through him.
“Suppose a person has eaten some delicious food and thrown it up.
What do you think, Sunakkhatta? Could that man have any desire to eat that food again?”
“No, venerable sir.
Why is that?
Because that food is considered repulsive.”
“So too, Sunakkhatta, when a person is intent on the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception, his fetter of the base of nothingness has been rejected.
He should be understood as a person not bound by the fetter of the base of nothingness who is intent on the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception.
“It is possible, Sunakkhatta, that some person here may be completely intent on Nibbana.
When a person is completely intent on Nibbana, only talk concerning that interests him, and his thinking and pondering are in line with that, and he associates with that kind of person, and he finds satisfaction through him. But when talk about the base of neither-perception-nor- non-perception is going on, he will not listen to it or give it ear or exert his mind to understand it. He does not associate with that kind of person, and he does not find satisfaction through him.
“Just as a palm tree with its top cut off is incapable of growing again, so too, Sunakkhatta, when a person is completely intent on Nibbana, his fetter of the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception has been cut off - cut off at the root, made like a palm stump, done away with so that it is no longer subject to future arising.
He should be understood as a person not bound by the fetter of the base of neither-perception-nor-non- perception who is completely intent on Nibbana.
“It is possible, Sunakkhatta, that some bhikkhu here might think thus: ‘Craving has been called an arrow by the Recluse;1001 the poisonous humour of ignorance is spread about by desire, lust, and ill will.
That arrow of craving has been removed from me; the poisonous humour of ignorance has been expelled. I am one who is completely intent on Nibbana.’
Because he falsely thinks of himself thus, 1002
he might pursue those things that are unsuitable for one completely intent on Nibbana. He might pursue the sight of unsuitable forms with the eye, he might pursue unsuitable sounds with the ear, unsuitable odours with the nose, unsuitable flavours with the tongue, unsuitable tangibles with the body, or unsuitable mind-objects with the mind.
When he pursues the sight of unsuitable forms with the eye…unsuitable mind-objects with the mind, lust invades his mind.
With his mind invaded by lust, he would incur death or deadly suffering.
“Suppose, Sunakkhatta, a man were wounded by an arrow thickly smeared with poison,
The surgeon would cut around the opening of the wound with a knife,
Knowing that a trace was left behind,1003 he would say: ‘Good man, the arrow has been pulled out from you; the poisonous humour has been expelled with a trace left behind,
Eat only suitable food; do not eat unsuitable food or else the wound may suppurate.
From time to time wash the wound and from time to time anoint its opening, so that pus and blood do not cover the opening of the wound.
Do not walk around in the wind and sun or else dust and dirt may infect the opening of the wound.
Take care of your wound, good man, and see to it that the wound heals.’
“The man would think: ‘The arrow has been pulled out from me; the poisonous humour has been expelled with no trace left behind,
He would eat unsuitable food,
He would not wash the wound from time to time nor would he anoint its opening from time to time,
He would walk around in the wind and sun,
He would not take care of his wound, nor would he see to it that the wound heals.
Then, both because he does what is unsuitable and because the foul poisonous humour had been expelled with a trace left behind,
“So too, Sunakkhatta, it is possible that some bhikkhu here might think thus: ‘Craving has been called an arrow by the Recluse; the poisonous humour of ignorance is spread about by desire, lust, and ill will.
Because he falsely thinks of himself thus,
“For it is death in the Discipline of the Noble One, Sunakkhatta, when one abandons the training and reverts to the low life; and it is deadly suffering when one commits some defiled offence.1004
That arrow of craving has been removed from me; the poisonous humour of ignorance has been expelled. I am one who is completely intent on Nibbana.’
Being one who really is completely intent on Nibbana, he would not pursue those things that are unsuitable for one completely intent on Nibbana. He would not pursue the sight of unsuitable forms with the eye, he would not pursue unsuitable sounds with the ear, unsuitable odours with the nose, unsuitable flavours with the tongue, unsuitable tangibles with the body, or unsuitable mind-objects with the mind.
Because he does not pursue the sight of unsuitable forms with the eye…unsuitable mind-objects with the mind, lust does not invade his mind.
Because his mind is not invaded by lust, he would not incur death or deadly suffering.
“Suppose, Sunakkhatta, a man were wounded by an arrow thickly smeared with poison,
The surgeon would cut around the opening of the wound with a knife,
Knowing that no trace was left behind, he would say: ‘Good man, the arrow has been pulled out from you; the poisonous humour has been expelled with no trace left behind,
Eat only suitable food; do not eat unsuitable food or else the wound may suppurate.
From time to time wash the wound and from time to time anoint its opening,
Do not walk around in the wind and sun or else dust and dirt may infect the opening of the wound.
Take care of your wound, good man, and see to it that the wound heals.’
“The man would think: ‘The arrow has been pulled out from me; the poisonous humour has been expelled with no trace left behind,
He would eat only suitable food,
From time to time he would wash the wound and from time to time he would anoint its opening,
He would not walk around in the wind and sun,
He would take care of his wound and would see to it that the wound heals.
Then, both because he does what is suitable and because the foul poisonous humour has been expelled with no trace left behind, the wound would heal,
“So too, Sunakkhatta, it is possible that some bhikkhus here might think thus: ‘Craving has been called an arrow by the Recluse; the poisonous humour of ignorance is spread about by desire, lust, and ill will.
Being one who really is completely intent on Nibbana, he would not pursue those things unsuitable for one completely intent on Nibbana……
“Sunakkhatta, I have given this simile in order to convey a meaning.
This is the meaning here: ‘Wound’ is a term for the six internal bases. ‘Poisonous humour’ is a term for ignorance. ‘Arrow’ is a term for craving. ‘Probe’ is a term for mindfulness. ‘Knife’ is a term for noble wisdom. ‘Surgeon’ is a term for the Tathagata, the Accomplished One, the Fully Enlightened One.
“When, Sunakkhatta, a bhikkhu practises restraint in the six bases of contact, and having understood that attachment is the root of suffering,1005 is without attachment, liberated by the destruction of attachment, it is not possible that he would direct his body or arouse his mind towards any object of attachment.
“Suppose, Sunakkhatta, there were a bronze cup of beverage possessing a good colour, smell, and taste, but it was mixed with poison,
What do you think, Sunakkhatta, would that man drink that cup of beverage, knowing: ‘If I drink this I will incur death or deadly suffering’?”
- “No, venerable sir.”
- “So too, when a bhikkhu practises restraint in the six bases of contact, and having understood that attachment is the root of suffering, is without attachment, liberated by the destruction of attachment, it is not possible that he would direct his body or arouse his mind towards any object of attachment.
“Suppose, Sunakkhatta, there were a deadly poisonous snake,
What do you think, Sunakkhatta, would that man give that deadly poisonous snake his hand or his thumb, knowing: ‘If I am bitten by him I will incur death or deadly suffering’?”
- “No, venerable sir.”
- “So too, when a bhikkhu practises restraint in the six bases of contact, and having understood that attachment is the root of suffering, is without attachment, liberated by the destruction of attachment, it is not possible that he would direct his body or arouse his mind towards any object of attachment.”
That is what the Blessed One said.
Sunakkhatta, son of the Licchavis, was satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
On one occasion the Blessed One was dwelling at Rajagaha in the Bamboo Grove, the Squirrel Sanctuary.
Then Talaputa the troupe headman approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side,
and said to him: “Venerable sir, I have heard it said among actors of old in the lineage of teachers: ‘If an actor, in the theatre or the arena, entertains and amuses people by truth and lies, then with the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the company of the laughing devas.’
“Enough, headman, let it be!
Don’t ask me that!”
A second time
“Surely, headman, I am not getting through to you when I say, ‘Enough, headman, let it be! Don’t ask me that!’
But still, I will answer you.
among beings who are not yet free from lust, who are bound by the bondage of lust,
among beings who are not yet free from hatred, who are bound by the bondage of hatred,
among beings who are not yet free from delusion, who are bound by the bondage of delusion,
“Thus, being intoxicated and negligent himself, having made others intoxicated and negligent, with the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the ‘Hell of Laughter.
But should he hold such a view as this: ‘If an actor, in the theatre or the arena, entertains and amuses people by truth and lies, then with the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the company of the laughing devas-that is a wrong view on his part.
For a person with wrong view, I say, there is one of two destinations: either hell or the animal realm.”
When this was said, Talaputa the troupe headman cried out and burst into tears.
The Blessed One said: “SO I did not get through to you when I said, ‘Enough, headman, let it be! Don’t ask me that!
“’ “I am not crying, venerable sir, because of what the Blessed One said to me, but because I have been tricked, cheated, and deceived for a long time by those actors of old in the lineage of teachers who said: ‘If an actor, in the theatre or the arena, entertains and amuses people by truth and lies, then with the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the company of the laughing devas.’
“Magnificent, venerable sir! Magnificent, venerable sir!
The Dhamma has been made clear in many ways by the Blessed One, as though he were turning upright what had been turned upside down, revealing what was hiddea-showing the way to one who was lost, or holding up a lamp in the dark for those with eyesight to see forms.
May I receive the going forth under the Blessed One, venerable sir, may I receive the higher ordination?”
Then Talaputa the troupe headman received the going forth under the Blessed One, he received the higher ordination.
And soon, not long after his higher ordination … the Venerable Talaputa became one of the arahants.
What does the Blessed One say about that?”
and a third time Talaputa the troupe headman said: “Venerable sir, I have heard it said among actors of old in the lineage of teachers: …
What does the Blessed One say about that?”
In the theatre or arena, an actor entertains them with titillating things that excite them even more strongly to lust.
In the theatre or arena, an actor entertains them with infuriating things that excite them even more strongly to hatred.
In the theatre or arena, an actor entertains them with bewildering things that excite them even more strongly to delusion.
I go for refuge to the Blessed One, and to the Dhamma, and to the Bhikkhu Sangha.
Then the headman Yodhajiva the Mercenary approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and said to him: “Venerable sir, I have heard it said by mercenaries of old in the lineage of teachers: ‘When a mercenary is one who strives and exerts himself in battle, if others slay him and finish him off while he is striving and exerting himself in battle, then with the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the company of the battle-slain devas.’
What does the Blessed One say about that?”
“Enough, headman, let it be! Don’t ask me that!”
A second time and a third time Yodhajiva the headman said: - “Venerable sir, I have heard it said by mercenaries of old in the lineage of teachers: …
“Surely, headman, I am not getting through to you when I say, ‘Enough, headman, let it be! Don’t ask me that!’
But still, I will answer you.
When, headman, a mercenary is one who strives and exerts himself in battle, his mind is already low, depraved, misdirected by the thought: ‘let these beings be slain, slaughtered, annihilated, destroyed, or exterminated.’
If others then slay him and finish him off while he is striving and exerting himself in battle, then with the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the ‘Battle-Slain Hell.’
But should he hold such a view as this: ‘When a mercenary strives and exerts himself in battle, if others slay him and finish him off while he is striving and exerting himself in battle, then with the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the company of the battle-slain devas-that is a wrong view on his part.
For a person with wrong view, I say, there is one of two destinations: either hell or the animal realm.”
When this was said, Yodhajiva the headman cried out and burst into tears.
The Blessed One said: “So I did not get through to you when I said, ‘Enough, headman, let it be! Don’t ask me that!”
“I am not crying, venerable sir, because of what the Blessed One said to me, but because I have been tricked, cheated, and deceived for a long time by those mercenaries of old in the lineage of teachers who said: ‘When a mercenary is one who strives and exerts himself in battle, if others slay him and finish him off while he is striving and exerting himself in battle, then with the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the company of the battle-slain devas.’
“Magnificent, venerable sir! … From today let the Blessed One remember me as a lay follower who has gone for refuge for life.”
What does the Blessed One say about that?”
“Bhikkhus, for an immoral person, for one deficient in virtuous behavior, non-regret lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no non-regret, for one deficient in non-regret, joy lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no joy, for one deficient in joy, rapture lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no rapture, for one deficient in rapture, tranquility lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no tranquility, for one deficient in tranquility pleasure lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no pleasure, for one deficient in pleasure, right concentration lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no right concentration, for one deficient in right concentration, the knowledge and vision of things as they really are lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no knowledge and vision of things as they really are, for one deficient in the knowledge and vision of things as they really are, disenchantment lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no disenchantment, for one deficient in disenchantment, dispassion lacks its proximate cause.
When there is no dispassion, for one deficient in dispassion, the knowledge and vision of liberation lacks its proximate cause’
“Suppose, there.is a tree deficient in branches and foliage.
Then its shoots do not grow to fullness; also its bark, softwood, and heartwood do not grow to fullness.
So too, for an immoral person, one deficient in virtuous behavior, non-regret lacks its proximate cause. When there is no non-regret… the knowledge and vision of liberation lacks its proximate cause.
“Bhikkhus, for a virtuous person, for one whose behavior is virtuous, non-regret possesses its proximate cause. When there is non-regret, for one possessing non-regret, joy possesses its proximate cause. When there is joy, for one possessing joy, rapture possesses its proximate cause. When there is rapture, for one possessing rapture, tranquility possesses its proximate cause. When there is tranquility, for one possessing tranquility, pleasure possesses its proximate cause. When there is pleasure, for one possessing pleasure, right concentration possesses its proximate cause. When there is right concentration, for one possessing right concentration, the knowledge and vision of things as they really are possesses its proximate cause. When there is the knowledge and vision of things as they really are, for one possessing the knowledge and vision of things as they really are disenchantment possesses its proximate cause. When there is disenchantment, for one possessing disenchantment, dispassion possesses its proximate cause. When there is dispassion, for one possessing dispassion, the knowledge and vision of liberation possesses its proximate cause.
So too, for a virtuous person, one whose behavior is virtuous, non-regret possesses its proximate cause. When there is non-regret… the knowledge and vision of liberation possesses its proximate cause “
Then its shoots grow to fullness; also its bark, softwood, and heartwood grow to fullness.
“Suppose there is a tree possessing branches and foliage.
’ Bhikkhus, when a forest bhikkhu considers five future perils, it is enough for him to dwell heedful, ardent, and resolute for the attainment of the as-yet-unattained, for the achievement of the as-yet-unachieved, for the realization of the as-yet unrealized.
What five?
“Here, a forest bhikkhu reflects thus: I am now dwelling all alone in the forest.
But while I am living here, a snake might bite me, a scorpion might sting me, or a centipede might sting me. Because of that I might die, which would be an obstacle for me. Let me now arouse energy for the attainment of the as-yet-unattained, for the achievement of the as-yet-unachieved, for the realization of the as-yet-unrealize.’
This is the first future peril considering which it is enough for a forest bhikkhu to dwell heedful, ardent, and resolute … for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
Again, a forest bhikkhu reflects thus: I am now dwelling all alone in the forest.
But while I am living here, I might trip and fall down, or the food that I have eaten might harm me, or my bile or phlegm or sharp winds might become agitated in me. Because of that I might die, which would be an obstacle for me. Let me now arouse energy for the attainment of the as-yet- unattained, for the achievement of the as-yet-unachieved, for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.’
This is the second future peril considering which it is enough for a forest bhikkhu to dwell heedful, ardent, and resolute… for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
“Again, a forest bhikkhu reflects thus: I am now dwelling all alone in the forest.
But while I am living here, I might encounter wild beasts, such as a lion, a tiger, a leopard, a bear, or a hyena, and they might take my life. Because of that I would die, which would be an obstacle for me. Let me now arouse energy for the attainment of the as-yet-unattained, for the achievement of the as-yet-unachieved, for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
This is the third future peril considering which it is enough for a forest bhikkhu to dwell heedful, ardent, and resolute… for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
“Again, a forest bhikkhu reflects thus: I am now dwelling all alone in the forest.
But while I am living here, I might encounter hoodlums escaping a crime or planning one and they might take my life. Because of that I would die, which would be an obstacle for me. Let me now arouse energy for the attainment of the as-yet-unattained, for the achievement of the as-yet-unachieved, for the. realization of the as-yet-unrealized.’
This is the fourth future peril considering which it is enough for a forest bhikkhu to dwell heedful, ardent, and resolute … for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
“Again, a forest bhikkhu reflects thus: I am now dwelling all alone in the forest.
But in the forest there are wild spirits, and they might take my life. Because of that I would die, which would be an obstacle for me. Let me now arouse energy for the attainment of the as-yet-unattained, for the achievement of the as-yet-unachieved, for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.’
This is the fifth future peril considering which it is enough for a forest bhikkhu to dwell heedful, ardent, and resolute … for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
“These, bhikkhus, are the five future perils considering which it is enough for a forest bhikkhu to dwell heedful, ardent, and resolute for the attainment of the as-yet-unattained, for the achievement of the as-yet-unachieved, for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.”
and said to the Blessed One: 4. “I have heard, venerable sir, that a number of bhikkhus have declared final knowledge in the presence of the Blessed One.
there were some bhikkhus who declared final knowledge rightly and there were some who declared final knowledge because they overestimated themselves.996
Therein, when bhikkhus declare final knowledge rightly, their declaration is true. But when bhikkhus declare final knowledge because they overestimate themselves, the Tathagata thinks: ‘Let me teach them the Dhamma.’997
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Savatthi in Jeta’s Grove, Anathapindika’s Park.
Then, when it was morning, the Blessed One dressed, and taking his bowl and outer robe, went into Savatthi for alms.
The venerable Rahula also dressed, and taking his bowl and outer robe, followed close behind the Blessed One.
“Only material form, Blessed One? Only material form, Sublime One?”
“Material form, Rahula, and feeling, perception, formations, and consciousness.”
Then the venerable Rahula considered thus: “Who would go into the town for alms today when personally admonished by the Blessed One? “ Thus he turned back and sat down at the root of a tree, folding his legs crosswise, setting his body erect, and establishing mindfulness in front of him.
The venerable Sariputta saw him sitting there
When mindfulness of breathing is developed and cultivated, it is of great fruit and great benefit.”
Then, when it was evening, the venerable Rahula rose from meditation and went to the Blessed One.
After paying homage to him, he sat down at one side and asked the Blessed One: 7. “Venerable sir, how is mindfulness of breathing developed and cultivated, so that it is of great fruit and great benefit?”
 8. “Rahula, whatever internally, belonging to oneself, is solid, solidified, and clung-to, that is, head-hairs, body-hairs, nails, teeth, skin, flesh, sinews, bones, bone-marrow, kidneys, heart, liver, diaphragm, spleen, lungs, large intestines, small intestines, contents of the stomach, feces, or whatever else internally, belonging to oneself, is solid, solidified, and clung-to: this is called the internal earth element.
Now both the internal earth element and the external earth element are simply earth element.
And that should be seen as it actually is with proper wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not myself.’
When one sees it thus as it actually is with proper wisdom, one becomes disenchanted with the earth element and makes the mind dispassionate towards the earth element.
“What, Rahula, is the water element?
The water element may be either internal or external.
What is the internal water element?
Whatever internally, belonging to oneself, is water, watery, and clung-to, that is, bile, phlegm, pus, blood, sweat, fat, tears, grease, spittle, snot, oil-of-the-joints, urine, or whatever else internally, belonging to oneself, is water, watery, and clungto: this is called the internal water element.
Now both the internal water element and the external water element are simply water element.
And that should be seen as it actually is with proper wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not myself.’
When one sees it thus as it actually is with proper wisdom, one becomes disenchanted with the water element and makes the mind dispassionate towards the water element.
“What, Rahula, is the fire element?
The fire element may be either internal or external.
What is the internal fire element?
Whatever internally, belonging to oneself, is fire, fiery, and clung-to, that is, that by which one is warmed, ages, and is consumed, and that by which what is eaten, drunk, consumed, and tasted gets completely digested, or whatever else internally, belonging to oneself, is fire, fiery, and clung-to: this is called the internal fire element.
Now both the internal fire element and the external fire element are simply fire element.
And that should be seen as it actually is with proper wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
When one sees it thus as it actually is with proper wisdom, one becomes disenchanted with the fire element and makes the mind dispassionate towards the fire element.
“What, Rahula, is the air element?
The air element may be either internal or external.
What is the internal air element?
Whatever internally, belonging to oneself, is air, airy, and clung-to, that is, up-going winds, down-going winds, winds in the belly, winds in the bowels, winds that course through the limbs, in-breath and out-breath, or whatever else internally, belonging to oneself, is air, airy, and clung-to: this is called the internal air element.
Now both the internal air element and the external air element are simply air element.
And that should be seen as it actually is with proper wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
When one sees it thus as it actually is with proper wisdom, one becomes disenchanted with the air element and makes the mind dispassionate towards the air element.
“What, Rahula, is the space element?
The space element may be either internal or external.
What is the internal space element?
Whatever internally, belonging to oneself, is space, spatial, and clung-to, that is, the holes of the ears, the nostrils, the door of the mouth, and that aperture whereby what is eaten, drunk, consumed, and tasted gets swallowed, and where it collects, and whereby it is excreted from below, or whatever else internally, belonging to oneself, is space, spatial, and clung-to: this is called the internal space element.
Now both the internal space element and the external space element are simply space element.
And that should be seen as it actually is with proper wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not myself.’
When one sees it thus as it actually is with proper wisdom, one becomes disenchanted with the space element and makes the mind dispassionate towards the space element.
“Rahula, develop meditation that is like the earth;
Just as people throw clean things and dirty things, excrement, urine, spittle, pus, and blood on the earth, and the earth is not horrified, humiliated, and disgusted because of that, so too, Rahula, develop meditation that is like the earth;
“Rahula, develop meditation that is like water;
Just as people wash clean things and dirty things, excrement, urine, spittle, pus, and blood in water, and the water is not horrified, humiliated, and disgusted because of that, so too, Rahula, develop meditation that is like water;
“Rahula, develop meditation that is like fire;
Just as people bum clean things and dirty things, excrement, urine, spittle, pus, and blood in fire, and the fire is not horrified, humiliated, and disgusted because of that, so too, Rahula, develop meditation that is like fire;
“Rahula, develop meditation that is like air;
Just as the air blows on clean things and dirty things, on excrement, urine, spittle, pus, and blood, and the air is not horrified, humiliated, and disgusted because of that, so too, Rahula, develop meditation that is like air;
“Rahula, develop meditation that is like space;
Just as space is not established anywhere, so too, Rahula, develop meditation that is like space;
“Rahula, develop meditation on loving-kindness;
“Rahula, develop meditation on compassion;
“Rahula, develop meditation on appreciative joy;
“Rahula, develop meditation on equanimity;
“Rahula, develop meditation on foulness;
“Rahula, develop meditation on the perception of impermanence;
“Rahula, develop meditation on mindfulness of breathing.
When mindfulness of breathing is developed and cultivated, it is of great fruit and great benefit.
And how is mindfulness of breathing developed and cultivated, so that it is of great fruit and great benefit?
“Here, Rahula, a bhikkhu, gone to the forest or to the root of a tree or to an empty hut, sits down; having folded his legs crosswise, set his body erect, and established mindfulness in front of him,
“Breathing in long, he understands: ‘I breathe in long’; or breathing out long, he understands: ‘I breathe out long.’ Breathing in short, he understands: ‘I breathe in short’; or breathing out short, he understands: ‘I breathe out short.’
He trains thus: ‘I shall breathe in experiencing the whole body of breath’; he trains thus: ‘I shall breathe out experiencing the whole body of breath.’He trains thus: ‘I shall breathe in tranquillising the bodily formation’; he trams thus: ‘I shall breathe out tranquillising the bodily formation.’
“He trains thus: ‘I shall breathe in experiencing rapture’; he trains thus: ‘I shall breathe out experiencing rapture.’ He trains thus: ‘I shall breathe in experiencing pleasure’; he trains thus: ‘I shall breathe out experiencing pleasure.’ He trams thus: ‘I shall breathe in experiencing the mental formation’; he trains thus: ‘I shall breathe out experiencing the mental formation.’ He trams thus: ‘I shall breathe in tranquillising the mental formation’; he trams thus: ‘I shall breathe out tranquillising the mental formation.’
“He trains thus: I shall breathe in experiencing the mind’; he trains thus: ‘I shall breathe out experiencing the mind-’ He trains thus: ‘I shall breathe in gladdening the mind’; life trains thus: ‘I shall breathe out gladdening the mind.’ He trains thus: ‘I shall breathe in concentrating the mind’; he trains thus: ‘I shall breathe out concentrating the mind.’ He trains thus: ‘I shall breathe in liberating the mind’; he trains thus: ‘I shall breathe out liberating the mind.’
“He trains thus: ‘I shall breathe in contemplating impermanence’; he trains thus: ‘I shall breathe out contemplating impermanence.’ He trains thus: ‘I shall breathe in contemplating fading away’; he trains thus: ‘I shall breathe out contemplating fading away.’ He trains thus; ‘I shall breathe in contemplating cessation’; he trains thus: I shall breathe out contemplating cessation.’ He trains thus: ‘I shall breathe in contemplating relinquishment’; he trains thus: ‘I shall breathe out contemplating relinquishment.’
“Rahula, that is how mindfulness of breathing is developed and cultivated, so that it is of great fruit and great benefit.
When mindfulness of breathing is developed and cultivated in this way, even the final in-breaths and out-breaths are known as they cease, not unknown.”
That is what the Blessed One said.
The venerable Rahula was satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
Then the Blessed One looked back and addressed the venerable Rahula thus: “Rahula, any kind of material form whatever, whether past, future, or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near, all material form should be seen as it actually is with proper wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not myself.’“
and addressed him thus: “Rahula, develop mindfulness of breathing.
for when you develop meditation that is like the earth, arisen agreeable and disagreeable contacts will not invade your mind and remain.
for when you develop meditation that is like the earth, arisen agreeable and disagreeable contacts will not invade your mind and remain.
for when you develop meditation that is like water, arisen agreeable and disagreeable contacts will not invade your mind and remain.
for when you develop meditation that is like water, arisen agreeable and disagreeable contacts will not invade your mind and remain.
for when you develop meditation that is like fire, arisen agreeable and disagreeable contacts will not invade your mind and remain.
for when you develop meditation that is like fire, arisen agreeable and disagreeable contacts will not invade your mind and remain.
for when you develop meditation that is like air, arisen agreeable and disagreeable contacts will not invade your mind and remain.
for when you develop meditation that is like air, arisen agreeable and disagreeable contacts will not invade your mind and remain.
for when you develop meditation that is like space, arisen agreeable and disagreeable contacts will not invade your mind and remain.
for when you develop meditation that is like space, arisen agreeable and disagreeable contacts will not invade your mind and remain.
for when you develop meditation on loving-kindness, any ill will will be abandoned.
for when you develop meditation on compassion, any cruelty will be abandoned.
for when you develop meditation on appreciative joy, any discontent will be abandoned.
for when you develop meditation on equanimity, any aversion will be abandoned.
for when you develop meditation on foulness, any lust will be abandoned.
for when you develop meditation on the perception of impermanence, the conceit ‘I am’ will be abandoned.
ever mindful he breathes in, mindful he breathes out.
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at SavatthI in Jeta’s Grove, Anathapindika’s Park.
There he addressed the bhikkhus thus: “Bhikkhus.”
- “Venerable sir,” they replied.
The Blessed One said this: 2. “Bhikkhus, I eat at a single session. By so doing, I am free from illness and affliction, and I enjoy health, strength, and a comfortable abiding.
Come, bhikkhus, eat at a single session. By so doing, you too will be free from illness and affliction, and you will enjoy health, strength, and a comfortable abiding.”
When this was said, the venerable Bhaddali told the Blessed One: “Venerable sir, I am not willing to eat at a single session; for if I were to do so, I might have worry and anxiety about it.”
“Then, Bhaddali, eat one part there where you are invited and bring away one part to eat.
By eating in that way, you will maintain yourself.”
“Venerable sir, I am not willing to eat in that way either; for if I were to do so, I might also have worry and anxiety about it.”
Then, when this training precept was being made known by the Blessed One, the venerable Bhaddali publicly declared in the Sangha of bhikkhus his unwillingness to undertake the training.
Then the venerable Bhaddali did not present himself to the Blessed One for the whole of that three-month period of the Rains, as he did not fulfil the training in the Teacher’s Dispensation.
Now on that occasion a number of bhikkhus were engaged in making up a robe for the Blessed One, thinking: “With his robe completed, at the end of the three months of the Rains, the Blessed One will set out wandering.”
Then the venerable Bhaddali went to those bhikkhus and exchanged greetings with them,
and when this courteous and amiable talk was finished, he sat down at one side.
With his robe completed, at the end of the three months of the Rains, the Blessed One will set out wandering.
Please, friend Bhaddali, give proper attention to your declaration. Do not let it become more difficult for you later on.”
“Yes, friends,” he replied, and he went to the Blessed One, and after paying homage to him, he sat down at one side
Venerable sir, may the Blessed One forgive my transgression seen as such for the sake of restraint in the future.”
“Surely, Bhaddali, a transgression overcame you, in that like a fool, confused and blundering, when a training precept was being made known by me, you publicly declared in the Sangha of bhikkhus your unwillingness to undertake the training.
“Bhaddali, this circumstance was not recognised by you: ‘The Blessed One is living at Savatthi, and the Blessed One will know me thus: “The bhikkhu named Bhaddali is one who does not fulfil the training in the Teacher’s Dispensation.’“
This circumstance was not recognised by you.
“Also, this circumstance was not recognised by you: ‘Many bhikkhus have taken up residence at Savatthi for the Rains, and they too will know me thus: “The bhikkhu named Bhaddali is one who does not fulfil the training in the Teacher’s Dispensation.’“
This circumstance too was not recognised by you.
“Also, this circumstance was not recognised by you: ‘Many bhikkhunis have taken up residence at Savatthi for the Rains, and they too will know me thus: “The bhikkhu named Bhaddali is one who does not fulfil the training in the Teacher’s Dispensation.’“
This circumstance too was not recognised by you.
“Also, this circumstance was not recognised by you: ‘Many men lay followers…
Many women lay followers are staying at Savatthi, and they too will know me thus: “The bhikkhu named Bhaddali is one who does not fulfil the training in the Teacher’s Dispensation.’“
This circumstance too was not recognised by you.
“Venerable sir, a transgression overcame me, in that like a fool, confused and blundering, when a training precept was being made known by the Blessed One, I publicly declared in the Sangha of bhikkhus my unwillingness to undertake the training.
Venerable sir, may the Blessed One forgive my transgression seen as such for the sake of restraint in the future.”
“Surely, Bhaddali, a transgression overcame you, in that like a fool, confused and blundering, when a training precept was being made known by me, you publicly declared in the Sangha of bhikkhus your unwillingness to undertake the training.
“What do you think, Bhaddali? Suppose a bhikkhu here were one liberated-in-both-ways, and I told him: ‘Come, bhikkhu, be a plank for me to walk across the mud.’ Would he walk across himself, or would he dispose his body otherwise, or would he say ‘No’?”
“No, venerable sir.”
“What do you think, Bhaddali? Suppose a bhikkhu here were one liberated-by-wisdom…a body-witness…one attained-to-view… one liberated-by-faith…a Dhamma-follower…a faith-follower, and I told him: ‘Come, bhikkhu, be a’ plank for me to walk across the mud.’ Wоuld he walk across himself, or would he dispose his body otherwise, or would he say ‘No’?”
“No, venerable sir.”
“What do you think, Bhaddali? Were you on that occasion one liberated-in-both-ways or one liberated-by-wisdom or a body-witness or one attained-to-view or one liberated-by-faith or a Dhamma-follower or a faith-follower?”
“No, venerable sir.”
“Bhaddali, on that occasion were you not an empty, hollow wrong-doer?”
“Yes, venerable sir.
Venerable sir, a transgression overcame me, in that like a fool, confused and blundering, when a training precept was being made known by the Blessed One, I publicly declared in the Sangha of bhikkhus my unwillingness to undertake the training.
Venerable sir, may the Blessed One forgive my transgression seen as such for the sake of restraint in the future.”
“Surely, Bhaddali, a transgression overcame you, in that like a fool, confused and blundering, when a training precept was being made known by me, you publicly declared in the Sangha of bhikkhus your unwillingness to undertake the training.
But since you see your transgression as such and make amends in accordance with the Dhamma, we forgive you;
“Here, Bhaddali, some bhikkhu does not fulfil the training in the Teacher’s Dispensation.
He considers thus: ‘Suppose I were to resort to a secluded resting place: the forest, the root of a tree, a mountain, a ravine, a hillside cave, a charnel ground, a jungle thicket, an open space, a heap of straw -
He resorts to some such secluded resting-place.
While he lives thus withdrawn, the Teacher censures him, wise companions in the holy life who have made investigation censure him, gods censure him, and he censures himself.
Being censured in this way by the Teacher, by wise companions in the holy life, by gods, and by himself, he realises no superhuman state, no distinction in knowledge and vision worthy of the noble ones.
Why is that?
That is how it is with one who does not fulfil the training in the Teacher’s Dispensation.
“Here, Bhaddali, some bhikkhu does fulfil the training in the Teacher’s Dispensation.
He considers thus: ‘Suppose I were to resort to a secluded resting place: the forest, the root of a tree, a mountain, a ravine, a hillside cave, a charnel ground, a jungle thicket, an open space, a heap of straw -
He resorts to some such secluded resting-place.
While he lives thus withdrawn, the Teacher does not censure him, wise companions in the holy life who have made investigation do not censure him, gods do not censure him, and he does not censure himself.
Being uncensured in this way by the Teacher, by wise companions in the holy life, by gods, and by himself, he realises a superhuman state, a distinction in knowledge and vision worthy of the noble ones.
“Quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, he enters upon and abides in the first jhana, which is accompanied by applied and sustained thought, with rapture and pleasure born of seclusion.
Why is that?
That is how it is with one who fulfils the training in the Teacher’s Dispensation.
“With the stilling of applied and sustained thought, he enters upon and abides in the second jhana…
“When his concentrated mind is thus purified and bright, unblemished, rid of imperfection, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability,
Why is that?
That is how it is with one who fulfils the training in the Teacher’s Dispensation.
“When his concentrated mind is thus purified and bright…attained to imperturbability, he directs it to knowledge of the passing away and reappearance of beings…
Why is that?
That is how it is with one who fulfils the training in the Teacher’s Dispensation.
“When his concentrated mind is thus purified and bright…attained to imperturbability,
he directs it to knowledge of the destruction of the taints. He understands as it actually is: ‘This is suffering’……He understands as it actually is: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of the taints.’
“When he knows and sees thus, his mind is liberated from the taint of sensual desire, from the taint of being, and from the taint of ignorance.
When it is liberated there comes the knowledge: ‘It is liberated.’
He understands: ‘Birth is destroyed, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more coming to any state of being.’
Why is that?
That is how it is with one who fulfills the training in the Teacher’s Dispensation.”
Thereupon the venerable Bhaddali asked: “Venerable sir, what is the cause, what is the reason, why they take action against some bhikkhu here by repeatedly admonishing him?
What is the cause, what is the reason, why they do not take such action against some bhikkhu here by repeatedly admonishing him?”
“Here, Bhaddali, some bhikkhu is a constant offender with many offences.
When he is corrected by the bhikkhus, he prevaricates, leads the talk aside, shows disturbance, hate, and bitterness; he does not proceed rightly, he does not comply, he does not clear himself, he does not say: ‘Let me so act that the Sangha will be satisfied.’
Bhikkhus, taking account of this matter, think:
“But here some bhikkhu is a constant offender with many offences.
When he is corrected by the bhikkhus, he does not prevaricate, lead the talk aside, or show disturbance, hate, and bitterness; he proceeds rightly, he complies, he clears himself, he says: ‘Let me so act that the Sangha will be satisfied.’
Bhikkhus, taking account of this matter, think:
“Here some bhikkhu is a chance offender without many offences.
When he is corrected by the bhikkhus, he prevaricates… …
“But here some bhikkhu is a chance offender without many offences.
When he is corrected by the bhikkhus, he does not prevaricate……
“Here some bhikkhu progresses by a measure of faith and love.
In this case bhikkhus consider thus: ‘Friends, this bhikkhu progresses by a measure of faith and love.
Let him not lose that measure of faith and love, as he may if we take action against him by repeatedly admonishing him.’
Suppose a man had only one eye; then his friends and companions, his kinsmen and relatives, would guard his eye, thinking: ‘Let him not lose his one eye.’ So too, some bhikkhu progresses by a measure of faith and love…
“Venerable sir, what is the cause, what is the reason, why there were previously fewer training rules and more bhikkhus became established in final knowledge?
What is the cause, what is the reason, why there are now more training rules and fewer bhikkhus become established in final knowledge?”
“That is how it is, Bhaddali.When beings are deteriorating and the true Dhamma is disappearing, then there are more training rules and fewer bhikkhus become established in final knowledge.
The Teacher does not make known the training rule for disciples until certain things that are the basis for taints become manifest here in the Sangha;
but when certain things that are the basis for taints become manifest here in the Sangha, then the Teacher makes known the training rule for disciples in order to ward off those things that are the basis for taints.
“Those things that are the basis for taints do not become manifest here in the Sangha until the Sangha has reached greatness;
but when the Sangha has reached greatness, then those things that are the basis for taints become manifest here in the Sangha,
“There were few of you, Bhaddali, when I taught the Dhamma through the simile of the young thoroughbred colt.
Do you remember that, Bhaddali?”
“No, venerable sir.”
“To what reason do you attribute that?”
“Venerable sir, I have long been one who did not fulfil the training in the Teacher’s Dispensation.”
“That is not the only cause or the only reason.
But rather, by encompassing your mind with my mind, I have long known you thus: ‘When I am teaching the Dhamma, this misguided man does not heed it, does not give it attention, does not engage it with all his mind, does not hear the Dhamma with eager ears.’
Still, Bhaddali, I will teach you the Dhamma through the simile of the young thoroughbred colt.
Listen and attend closely to what I shall say.”
“Yes, venerable sir,” the venerable Bhaddali replied.
The Blessed One said this:
While the colt is being made to get used to wearing the bit, because he is doing something that he has never done before, he displays some contortion, writhing, and vacillation,
“When the colt has become peaceful in that action, the horse trainer further makes him get used to wearing the harness.
While the colt is being made to get used to wearing the harness, because he is doing something that he has never done before, he displays some contortion, writhing, and vacillation,
“When the colt has become peaceful in that action, the horse trainer further makes him act in keeping in step, in running in a circle, in prancing, in galloping, in charging, in the kingly qualities, in the kingly heritage, in the highest speed, in the highest fleetness, in the highest gentleness.
While the colt is being made to get used to doing these things, because he is doing something that he has never done before, he displays some contortion, writhing, and vacillation,
“When the colt has become peaceful in these actions, the horse-trainer further rewards him with a rubbing down and a grooming.
When a fine thoroughbred colt possesses these ten factors, he is worthy of the king, in the king’s service, and considered one of the factors of a king.
“So too, Bhaddali, when a bhikkhu possesses ten qualities, he is worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of reverential salutation, an unsurpassed field of merit for the world.
What are the ten?
Here, Bhaddali, a bhikkhu possesses the right view of one beyond training, the right intention of one beyond training, the right speech of one beyond training, the right action of one beyond training, the right livelihood of one beyond training, the right effort of one beyond training, the right mindfulness of one beyond training, the right concentration of one beyond training, the right knowledge of one beyond training, and the right deliverance of one beyond training. When a bhikkhu possesses these ten qualities, he is worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of reverential salutation, an unsurpassed field of merit for the world.”
That is what the Blessed One said.
The venerable Bhaddali was satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
“There are, Sunakkhatta, these five cords of sensual pleasure.
and he were to see another man who had only recently left that village or town.
“Bhikkhus, when a forest bhikkhu considers five future perils, it is enough for him to dwell heedful, ardent, and resolute for the attainment of the as-yet-unattained, for the achievement of the as-yet-unachieved, for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
What five?
“Here, a bhikkhu reflects thus: ‘I am now young, a blackhaired young man endowed with the blessing of youth, in the prime of life.
But there will come a time when old age assails this body.
Now when one is old, overcome by old age, it is not easy to attend to the Buddhas’ teaching; it is not easy to resort to remote lodgings in forests and jungle groves.
Before that unwished for, undesirable, disagreeable condition comes upon me, let me in advance arouse energy for the attainment of the as-yet-unattained, for the achievement of the as-yet-unachieved, for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.Thus when I am in that condition, I will dwell at ease even though I am old.’
This is the first future peril considering which it is enough for a bhikkhu to dwell heedful, ardent, and resolute… ‘ for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized;
But there will come a time when illness assails this body.
Now when one is ill, overcome by illness, it is not easy to attend to the Buddhas’ teaching; it is not easy to resort to remote lodgings in forests and jungle groves.
Before that unwished for, undesirable, disagreeable condition comes upon me, let me in advance arouse energy for the attainment of the as-yet-unattained, for the achievement of the as-yet-unachieved, for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized. Thus when I am in that condition, I will dwell at ease even though I am ill.’
This is the second future peril considering which it is enough for a bhikkhu to dwell heedful, ardent, and resolute… for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
“Again, a bhikkhu reflects thus: ‘Food is now plentiful; there has been a good harvest and almsfood is abundant, so that one can easily subsist by means of gleaning.
But there will come a time of famine, a poor harvest, when almsfood is hard to obtain and one cannot easily subsist by means of gleaning.
In a time of famine, people migrate to places where food is plentiful
Now when living conditions are congested and crowded, it is not easy to attend to the Buddhas’ teaching; it is hot easy to resort to remote lodgings in forests and jungle groves.
Before that unwished for, undesirable, disagreeable condition comes upon me, let me in advance arouse energy for the attainment of the as-yet-unattained, for the achievement of the as-yet-unachieved, for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized. Thus when I am in that condition, I will dwell at ease even in a famine.’
This is the third future peril considering which it is enough for a bhikkhu to dwell heedful, ardent, and resolute… for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
“ Again, a bhikkhu reflects thus: ‘People are now dwelling in concord, harmoniously, without disputes, blending like milk and water, viewing each other with eyes of affection.
But there will come a time of peril, of turbulence in the wilderness, when the people of the countryside, mounted on their vehicles, flee on all sides.
In a time of peril people migrate to places where there is safety
and living conditions there are congested and crowded.
Before that unwished for, undesirable, disagreeable condition comes upon me, let me in advance arouse energy for the attainment of the as-yet-unattained, for the achievement of the as-yet-unachieved, for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized. Thus when I am in that condition, I will dwell at ease even in time of peril.’
This is the fourth future peril considering which it is enough for a bhikkhu to dwell heedful, ardent, and resolute… for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
“Again, a bhikkhu reflects thus: ‘The Sahgha is now dwelling at ease— in concord, harmoniously, without disputes, with a single recitation.
But there will come a time when there will be a schism in the Sahgha.
Now when there is a schism in the Sahgha, it is not easy to attend to the Buddhas’ teaching; it is not easy to resort to remote lodgings in forests and jungle groves.
Before that unwished for, undesirable, disagreeable condition comes upon me, let me in advance arouse energy for the attainment of the as-yet-unattained, for the achievement of the as-yet-unachieved, for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized. Thus when I am in that condition, I will dwell at ease even though there is a schism in the Sahgha.’
This is the fifth future peril considering which it is enough for a bhikkhu to dwell heedful, ardent, and resolute… for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
“These, bhikkhus, are the five future perils considering which it is enough for a bhikkhu to dwell heedful, ardent, and resolute for the attainment of the as-yet-unattained, for the achievement of the as-yet-unachieved, for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.”
“Again, a bhikkhu reflects thus: I am now seldom ill or afflicted; I possess an even digestion that is neither too cool nor too hot but moderate and suitable for striving.
and living conditions there are congested and crowded.
Now When living conditions are congested and crowded, it is not easy to attend to the Buddhas’ teaching; it is not easy to resort to remote lodgings in forests and jungle groves.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five future perils as yet unarisen that will arise in the future.
You should recognize themand make an effort to abandon them.
What five?
“In the future, there will be bhikkhus who are undeveloped in body, virtuous behavior, mind, and wisdom.
They will give full ordination to others
These pupils too will be undeveloped in body, virtuous behavior, mind, and wisdom.
They in turn will give full ordination to others
These pupils too will be undeveloped in body, virtuous behavior, mind, and wisdom.
Thus, bhikkhus, through corruption of the Dhamma comes corruption of the discipline, and from corruption of the discipline comes corruption of the Dhamma.
This is the first future peril as yet unarisen that will arise in the future.
You should recognize it and make an effort to abandon it.
“Again, in the future there will be bhikkhus who are undeveloped in body, virtuous behavior, mind, and wisdom.
They will give dependence to others
These pupils too will be undeveloped in body, virtuous behavior, mind, and wisdom.
They in turn will give dependence to others
These pupils too will be undeveloped in body, virtuous behavior, mind, and wisdom.
Thus, bhikkhus, through corruption of the Dhamma comes corruption of the discipline, and from corruption of the discipline comes corruption of the Dhamma.
This is the second future peril as yet unarisen that will arise in the future.
You should recognize it and make an effort to abandon it.
“Again, in the future there will be bhikkhus who are undeveloped in body, virtuous behavior, mind, and wisdom.
While engaged in talk pertaining to the Dhamma, in questions and answers, they will slide down into a dark Dhamma but will not recognize it.
Thus, bhikkhus, through corruption of the Dhamma comes corruption of the discipline, and from corruption of the discipline comes corruption of the Dhamma.
This is the third future peril as yet unarisen that will arise in the future.
You should recognize it and make an effort to abandon it.
“Again, in the future there will be bhikkhus who are undeveloped in body, virtuous behavior, mind, and wisdom.
When those discourses spoken by the Tathagata are being recited that are deep, deep in meaning, world-transcending, connected with emptiness, they will not want to listen to them, will not lend an ear to them, or apply their minds to understand them; they will not think those teachings should be studied and learned.
But when those discourses are being recited that are mere poetry composed by poets, beautiful in words and phrases, created by outsiders, spoken by disciples, they will want to listen to them, lend an ear to them, and apply their minds to understand them; they will think those teachings should be studied and learned.
Thus, bhikkhus, through corruption of the Dhamma comes corruption of the discipline, and from corruption of the discipline comes corruption of the Dhamma.
This is the fourth future peril as yet unarisen that will arise in the future.
You should recognize it and make an effort to abandon it.
“Again, in the future there will be bhikkhus who are undeveloped in body, virtuous behavior, mind, and wisdom.
The elder bhikkhus— being undeveloped in body, virtuous behavior, mind, and wisdom—will be luxurious and lax, leaders in backsliding, discarding the duty of solitude; they will not arouse energy for the attainment of the as-yet-unattained, for the achievement of the as-yet-unachieved, for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
Those in the next generation will follow their example.
They, too, will be luxurious and lax, leaders in backsliding, discarding the duty of solitude; they, too, will not arouse energy for the attainment of the as-yet-unattained, for the achievement of the as-yet-unachieved, for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
Thus, bhikkhus, through corruption of the Dhamma comes corruption of the discipline, and from corruption of the discipline comes corruption of the Dhamma.
This is the fifth future peril as yet unarisen that will arise in the future.
You should recognize it and make an effort to abandon it.
“These, bhikkhus, are the five future perils as yet unarisen that will arise in the future.
You should recognize them and make an effort to abandon them.”
but will not be able to discipline them in the higher virtuous behavior, the higher mind, and the higher wisdom.
but will not be able to discipline them in the higher virtuous behavior, the higher mind, and the higher wisdom.
but will not be able to discipline them in the higher virtuous behavior, the higher mind, and the higher wisdom.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five future perils as yet unarisen that will arise in the future.
You should recognize them and make an effort to abandon them.
What five?
. “In the future, there will be bhikkhus who desire fine robes.
They will give up the use of rag robes, give up remote lodgings in forests and jungle groves, and having converged upon the villages, towns, and capital cities, will take up their residence there; and they will engage in many kinds of wrong and improper searches for the sake of a robe.
This is the first future peril as yet unarisen that will arise in the future.
You should recognize it and make an effort to abandon it.
“Again, in the future there will be bhikkhus who desire fine almsfood.
They will give up going on alms round, give up remote lodgings in forests and jungle groves, and having converged upon the villages, towns, and capital cities, will take up their residence there, seeking the finest delicacies with the tips of their tongues; and they will engage in m any kinds of wrong and improper searches for the sake of almsfood.
This is the second future peril as yet unarisen that will arise in the future.
You should recognize it and make an effort to abandon it.
“Again, in the future there will be bhikkhus who desire fine lodgings.
They will give up dwelling at the foot of a tree, will give up remote lodgings in forests and jungle groves, and having converged upon the villages, towns, and capital cities, will take up their residence there; and they will engage in many kinds of wrong and improper searches for the sake of lodgings.
This is the third future peril as yet unarisen that will arise in the future.
You should recognize it and make an effort to abandon it.
“Again, in the future there will be bhikkhus who bond closely with bhikkhunis, female probationers, and novices.
When they form such close bonds, it can be expected that they will live the spiritual life dissatisfied, commit a certain defiled offense, or give up the training and revert to the lower life.
This is the fourth future peril as yet unarisen that will arise in the future.
You should recognize it and make an effort to abandon it.
“Again, in the future there will be bhikkhus who bond closely with monastery workers and novices.
When they form such close bonds, it can be expected that they will engage in the use of various kinds of stored-up goods and give gross hints in regard to the ground and vegetation.
This is the fifth future peril as-yet-unarisen that will arise in the future.
You should recognize it and make an effort to abandon it.
“These, bhikkhus, are the five future perils as yet unarisen that will arise in the future.
You should recognize them and make an effort to abandon them.”
but will not be able to discipline them in the higher virtuous behavior, the higher mind, and the higher wisdom.
When he had done so, they said to him: “Friend Bhaddali, this robe is being made up for the Blessed One.
and said: “Venerable sir, a transgression overcame me, in that like a fool, confused and blundering, when a training precept was being made known by the Blessed One, I publicly declared in the Sangha of bhikkhus my unwillingness to undertake the training.
for it is growth in the Noble One’s Discipline when one sees one’s transgression as such and makes amends in accordance with the Dhamma by undertaking restraint for the future.
perhaps I might realise a superhuman state, a distinction in knowledge and vision worthy of the noble ones.’
perhaps I might realise a superhuman state, a distinction in knowledge and vision worthy of the noble ones.’
he directs it to knowledge of the recollection of past lives…… Thus with their aspects and particulars he recollects his manifold past lives.
he directs it to knowledge of the passing away and reappearance of beings… …Thus with the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, he understands how beings pass on according to their actions.
“This is the cause, this is the reason, why they take action against some bhikkhu here by repeatedly admonishing him;
this is the cause, this is the reason, why they do not take such action against some bhikkhu here by repeatedly admonishing him.”
and his friends and companions, his kinsmen and relatives, brought a surgeon.
then he would probe for the arrow with a probe,
then he would pull out the arrow and would expel the poisonous humour, leaving a trace of it behind.
but it is incapable of harming you.
and it is incapable of harming me.’
and the wound would suppurate.
and pus and blood would cover the opening of the wound.
and dust and dirt would infect the opening of the wound.
the wound would swell, and with its swelling he would incur death or deadly suffering.
… Even if it should be pursued by knowledge for a hundred or a thousand years, it would be with unthought-of beginning, with unknown beginning. It wouldn’t be possible to know its beginning from here or from there; the meaning is that it is without a delimiting first or last point.
Samsara is the uninterruptedly occurring succession of the aggregates, etc.
he might pursue those things that are unsuitable for one completely intent on Nibbana……
With his mind invaded by lust, he would incur death or deadly suffering.
And the bhikkhus examine that bhikkhu in such a way that the litigation against him is settled quickly.
And the bhikkhus examine that bhikkhu in such a way that the litigation against him is not settled too quickly.
And the bhikkhus examine that bhikkhu in such a way that the litigation against him is not settled too quickly.
And the bhikkhus examine that bhikkhu in such a way that the litigation against him is settled quickly.
‘Let him not lose that measure of faith and love, as he may if we take action against him by repeatedly admonishing him.’
and then the Teacher makes known the training rule for disciples in order to ward off those things that are the basis for taints.
Those things that are the basis for taints do not become manifest here in the Sangha until the Sangha has reached the acme of worldly gain…the acme of fame…the acme of great learning…the acme of long-standing renown;
but when the Sangha has reached the acme of long-standing renown, then those things that are the basis for taints become manifest here in the Sangha, and then the Teacher makes known the training rule for disciples in order to ward off those things that are the basis for taints.
“Bhaddali, suppose a clever horse-trainer obtains a fine thoroughbred colt. He first makes him get used to wearing the bit.
but through constant repetition and gradual practice, he becomes peaceful in that action.
but through constant repetition and gradual practice, he becomes peaceful in that action.
but through constant repetition and gradual practice, he becomes peaceful in those actions.
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living in the country of the Anguttarapans at a town of theirs named Apana.
Then, when it was morning, the Blessed One dressed, and taking his bowl and outer robe, went into Apana for alms.
Having entered the grove, he sat down at the root of a tree for the day’s abiding.
When it was morning, the venerable Udayin dressed, and taking his bowl and outer robe, he too went into Apana for alms.
Having entered the grove, he sat down at the root of a tree for the day’s abiding.
Then, while the venerable Udayin was alone in meditation, the following thought arose in his mind: “How many painful states has the Blessed One rid us of! How many pleasant states has the Blessed One brought us! How many unwholesome states has the Blessed One rid us of! How many wholesome states has the Blessed One brought us!”
Then, when it was evening, the venerable Udayin rose from meditation, went to the Blessed One, and after paying homage to him, he sat down at one side
and told him: 6. “Here, venerable sir, while I was alone in meditation, the following thought arose in my mind: ‘How many painful states has the Blessed One rid us of! …How many wholesome states has the Blessed One brought us!’
Venerable sir, formerly we used to eat in the evening, in the morning, and during the day outside the proper time.
Then there was an occasion when the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus thus: ‘Bhikkhus, please abandon that daytime meal outside the proper time.’
Venerable sir, I was upset and sad, thinking: ‘Faithful householders give us good food of various kinds during the day outside the proper time, yet the Blessed One tells us to abandon it, the Sublime One tells us to relinquish it.’
Out of our love and respect for the Blessed One, and out of shame and fear of wrongdoing, we abandoned that daytime meal outside the proper time.
“Then we ate only in the evening and in the morning.
Then there was an occasion when the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus thus: ‘Bhikkhus, please abandon that night meal, which is outside the proper time.’
Venerable sir, I was upset and sad, thinking: ‘The Blessed One tells us to abandon the more sumptuous of our two meals, the Sublime One tells us to relinquish it.’
Once, venerable sir, a certain man had obtained some soup during the day and he said: ‘Put that aside and we will all eat it together in the evening.’
Nearly all cooking is done at night, little by day.
Out of our love and respect for the Blessed One, and out of shame and fear of wrongdoing, we abandoned that night meal, which was outside the proper time.
“It has happened, venerable sir, that bhikkhus wandering for alms in the thick darkness of the night have walked into a cesspit, fallen into a sewer, walked into a thornbush, and fallen over a sleeping cow; they have met hoodlums who had already committed a crime and those planning one, and they have been sexually enticed by women.
Once, venerable sir, I went wandering for alms in the thick darkness of the night.
A woman washing a pot saw me by a flash of lightning
I told her: ‘Sister, I am no devil, I am a bhikkhu waiting for alms.’ -
‘Then it’s a bhikkhu whose ma’s died and whose pa’s died!
Venerable sir, when I recollected that I thought: ‘How many painful states has the Blessed One rid us of! How many pleasant states has the Blessed One brought us! How many unwholesome states has the Blessed One rid us of! How many wholesome states has the Blessed One brought us!”
“So too, Udayin, there are certain misguided men here who, when told by me ‘Abandon this,’ say: ‘What, such a mere trifle, such a little thing as this? This recluse is much too exacting!’
And they do not abandon that and they show discourtesy towards me
as well as towards those bhikkhus desirous of training. For them that thing becomes a strong, stout, tough, unrotting tether and a thick yoke. 8. “Suppose, Udayin, a quail were tethered by a rotting creeper and would thereby expect injury, captivity, or death.
Now suppose someone said: ‘The rotting creeper by which that quail is tethered and thereby expects injury, captivity, or death, is for her a feeble, weak, rotting, coreless tether.’ Would he be speaking rightly?”
“No, venerable sir.
For that quail the rotting creeper by which she is tethered and thereby expects injury, captivity, or death, is a strong, stout, tough, unrotting tether and a thick yoke.”
“So too, Udayin there are certain misguided men here who, when told by me ‘Abandon this’ …
“Udayin, there are certain clansmen here who, when told by me ‘Abandon this say: ‘What, such a mere trifle, such a little thing to be abandoned as this, the Blessed One tells us to abandon, the Sublime One tells us to relinquish.’
Yet they abandon that and do not show discourtesy towards me
or towards those bhikkhus desirous of training. Having abandoned it, they live at ease, unruffled, subsisting on others’ gifts, with mind as aloof as a wild deer’s.
For them that thing becomes a feeble, weak, rotting, coreless tether. 10. “Suppose, Udayin, a royal tusker elephant with tusks as long as chariot-poles, full-grown in stature, high-bred and accustomed to battle, were tethered by stout leather thongs, but by simply twisting his body a little he could break and burst the thongs and then go where he likes.
Now suppose someone said: ‘The stout leather thongs by which this royal tusker elephant is tethered…are for him a strong, stout, tough, unrotting tether and a thick yoke.’ Would he be speaking rightly?”
“No, venerable sir.
The stout leather thongs by which that royal tusker elephant is tethered, which by simply twisting his body a little he could break and burst and then go where he likes, are for him a feeble, weak, rotting, coreless tether.”
“So too, Udayin, there are certain clansmen here who, when told by me ‘Abandon this’…
abandon that and do not show discourtesy towards me
or towards those bhikkhus desirous of training. Having abandoned it, they live at ease, unruffled, subsisting on others’ gifts, with mind as aloof as a wild deer’s.
“Suppose, Udayin, there were a poor, penniless, destitute man, and he had one dilapidated hovel open to the crows, not the best kind, and one dilapidated wicker bedstead, not the best kind, and some grain and pumpkin seeds in a pot, not the best kind, and one hag of a wife, not the best kind.
He might see a bhikkhu in a monastery park sitting in the shade of a tree, his hands and feet well washed after he had eaten a delicious meal, devoting himself to the higher mind.
He might think: ‘How pleasant the recluse’s state is! How healthy the recluse’s state is!
If only I could shave off my hair and beard, put on the yellow robe, and go forth from the home life into homelessness!’
But being unable to abandon his one dilapidated hovel open to the crows, not the best kind, and his one dilapidated wicker bedstead, not the best kind, and his grain and pumpkin seeds in a pot, not the best kind, and his hag of a wife, not the best kind, he is unable to shave off his hair and beard, put on the yellow robe, and go forth from the home life into homelessness.
Now suppose someone said: ‘The tethers by which that man is tethered so that he cannot abandon his one dilapidated hovel…and his hag of a wife, not the best kind, and shave off his hair and beard, put on the yellow robe, and go forth from the home life into homelessness - for him those are a feeble, weak, rotting, coreless tether.’ Would he be speaking rightly?”
“No, venerable sir.
The tethers by which that man is tethered so that he cannot abandon his one dilapidated hovel…and his hag of a wife, not the best kind, and shave off his hair and beard, put on the yellow robe, and go forth from the home life into homelessness - for him those are a strong, stout, tough, unrotting tether and a thick yoke.”
“So too, Udayin, there are certain misguided men here who, when told by me ‘Abandon this’…do not abandon that and they show discourtesy towards me as well as towards those bhikkhus desirous of training.
as well as towards those bhikkhus desirous of training. For them that thing becomes a strong, stout, tough, unrotting tether and a thick yoke.
“Suppose, Udayin, there were a rich householder or a householder’s son, with great wealth and property, with a vast number of gold ingots, a vast number of granaries, a vast number of fields, a vast amount of land, a vast number of wives, and a vast number of men and women slaves. He might see a bhikkhu in a monastery park sitting in the shade of a tree, his hands and feet well washed after he had eaten a delicious meal, devoting himself to the higher mind.
He might think: ‘How pleasant the recluse’s state is! How healthy the recluse’s state is!
If only I could shave off my hair and beard, put on the yellow robe, and go forth from the home life into homelessness!’
And being able to abandon his vast number of gold ingots, his vast number of granaries, his vast number of fields, his vast amount of land, his vast number of wives, and his vast number of men and women slaves, he is able to shave off his hair and beard, put on the yellow robe, and go forth from the home life into homelessness.
Now suppose someone said: ‘The tethers by which that householder or householder’s son is tethered so that he can abandon his vast number of gold ingots…his vast number of men and women slaves, and shave off his hair and beard, put on the yellow robe, and go forth from the home life into homelessness - for him those are a strong, stout, tough, unrotting tether.’ Would he be speaking rightly?”
“No, venerable sir.
The tethers by which that householder or householder’s son is tethered so that he can abandon his vast number of gold ingots…his vast number of men and women slaves, and shave off his hair and beard, put on the yellow robe, and go forth from the home life into homelessness - for him those are a feeble, weak, rotting, coreless tether.”
“So too, Udayin, there are certain clansmen here who, when told by me ‘Abandon this’…
abandon that and do not show discourtesy towards me
or towards those bhikkhus desirous of training. Having abandoned it, they live at ease, unruffled, subsisting on others’ gifts, with mind as aloof as a wild deer’s.
“Udayin, there are four kinds of persons to be found existing in the world.
What are the four?
“Here, Udayin, some person practises the way to the abandoning of attachment, to the relinquishing of attachment.
When he is practising the way, memories and intentions associated with attachment beset him.
He tolerates them; he does not abandon them, remove them, do away with them, and annihilate them.
Such a person I call fettered, not unfettered.
Why is that?
Because I have known the particular diversity of faculties in this person.
“Here, Udayin, some person practises the way to the abandoning of attachment, to the relinquishing of attachment.
When he is practising the way, memories and intentions associated with attachment beset him.
He does not tolerate them; he abandons them, removes them, does away with them, and annihilates them.
Such a person too I call fettered, not unfettered.
Why is that?
Because I have known the particular diversity of faculties in this person.
“Here, Udayin, some person practises the way to the abandoning of attachment, to the relinquishing of attachment.
When he is practising the way, memories and intentions associated with attachment beset him now and then through lapses of mindfulness. His mindfulness may be slow in arising,
but he quickly abandons them, removes them, does away with them, and annihilates them.
Just as if a man were to let two or three drops of water fall onto an iron plate heated for a whole day, the falling of the water drops might be slow
Such a person too I call fettered, not unfettered.
Why is that?
Because I have known the particular diversity of faculties in this person.
“Here, Udayin, some person, having understood that attachment is the root of suffering, divests himself of attachment and is liberated with the destruction of attachment.
Such a person I call unfettered, not fettered.
Why is that?
Because I have known the particular diversity of faculties in this person.
“There are, Udayin, five cords of sensual pleasure.
What are the five?
Forms cognizable by the eye that are wished for, desired, agreeable, and likeable, connected with sensual desire and provocative of lust. Sounds cognizable by the ear… Odours cognizable by the nose…Flavours cognizable by the tongue… Tangibles cognizable by the body that are wished for, desired, agreeable, and likeable, connected with sensual desire and provocative of lust.
These are the five cords of sensual pleasure.
“Now, Udayin, the pleasure and joy that arise dependent on these five cords of sensual pleasure are called sensual pleasure - a filthy pleasure, a coarse pleasure, an ignoble pleasure. I say of this kind of pleasure that it should not be pursued, that it should not be developed, that it should not be cultivated, that it should be feared.
“Here, Udayin, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the first jhana… With the stilling of applied and sustained thought, he enters upon and abides in the second jhana… With the fading away as well of rapture… he enters upon and abides in the third jhana…With the abandoning of pleasure and pain… he enters upon and abides in the fourth jhana…
“This is called the bliss of renunciation, the bliss of seclusion, the bliss of peace, the bliss of enlightenment. I say of this kind of pleasure that it should be pursued, that it should be developed, that it should be cultivated, that it should not be feared.
“Here, Udayin, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the first jhana… Now this, I say, belongs to the perturbable.
And what therein belongs to the perturbable?
The applied thought and sustained thought that have not ceased therein, that is what belongs to the perturbable.
“Here, Udayin, with the stilling of applied and sustained thought, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the second jhana… Now this, I say, also belongs to the perturbable.
And what therein belongs to the perturbable?
The rapture and pleasure that have not ceased therein, that is what belongs to the perturbable.
“Here, Udayin, with the fading away as well of rapture…a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the third jhana…Now this, I say, also belongs to the perturbable.
And what therein belongs to the perturbable?
The equanimity and pleasure that have not ceased therein, that is what belongs to the perturbable.
“Here, Udayin, with the abandoning of pleasure and pain… a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the fourth jhana… Now this, I say, belongs to the imperturbable.
“Here, Udayin, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the first jhana… That, I say, is not enough. Abandon it, I say; surmount it, I say.
And what surmounts it?
“Here, Udayin, with the stilling of applied and sustained thought, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the second jhana… That surmounts it. But that too, I say, is not enough. Abandon it, I say; surmount it, I say.
And what surmounts it?
“Here, Udayin, with the fading away as well of rapture…a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the third jhana…That surmounts it. But that too, I say, is not enough. Abandon it, I say; surmount it, I say.
And what surmounts it?
“Here, Udayin, with the abandoning of pleasure and pain…a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the fourth jhana… That surmounts it. But that too, I say, is not enough.Abandon it, I say; surmount it, I say.
And what surmounts it?
“Here, Udayin, with the complete surmounting of perceptions of form, with the disappearance of perceptions of sensory impact, with non-attention to perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite,’ a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the base of infinite space. That surmounts it. But that too, I say, is not enough. Abandon it, I say; surmount it, I say.
And what surmounts it?
“Here, Udayin, by completely surmounting the base of infinite space, aware that ‘consciousness is infinite,’ a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the base of infinite consciousness. That surmounts it. But that too, I say, is not enough. Abandon it, I say; surmount it, I say.
And what surmounts it?
“Here, Udayin, by completely surmounting the base of infinite consciousness, aware that ‘there is nothing,’ a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the base of nothingness. That surmounts it. But that too, I say, is not enough. Abandon it, I say; surmount it, I say.
And what surmounts it?
“Here, Udayin, by completely surmounting the base of nothingness, a bhikkhu enters upon and abides in the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception. That surmounts it. But that too, I say, is not enough. Abandon it, I say; surmount it, I say.
And what surmounts it?
“Here, Udayin, by completely surmounting the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception, a bhikkhu enters and abides in the cessation of perception and feeling. That surmounts it. Thus I speak of the abandoning even of the base of neither-perception-nor-non-perception.
Do you see, Udayin, any fetter, small or great, of whose abandoning I do not speak?”
“No, venerable sir.”
That is what the Blessed One said.
The venerable Udayin was satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
When he had wandered for alms in Apana and had returned from his almsround, after his meal he went to a certain grove for the day’s abiding.
When he had wandered for alms in Apana and had returned from his almsround, after his meal he went to that same grove for the day’s abiding.
and screamed out in terror: ‘Mercy me, a devil has come for me!’
Better, bhikkhu, that you get your belly cut open with a sharp butcher’s knife than this prowling for alms for your belly’s sake in the thick darkness of the night!’
do not abandon that and they show discourtesy towards me
as well as towards those bhikkhus desirous of training. For them that thing becomes a strong, stout, tough, unrotting tether and a thick yoke.
“It is possible, Sunakkhatta, that some bhikkhu here might think thus: ‘Craving has been called an arrow by the Recluse; the poisonous humour of ignorance is spread about by desire, lust, and ill will.
and his friends and companions, his kinsmen and relatives, brought a surgeon.
then he would probe for the arrow with a probe, then he would pull out the arrow
and would expel the poisonous humour without leaving a trace of it behind.
and it is incapable of harming you.
so that pus and blood do not cover the opening of the wound.
and it is incapable of harming me.’
and the wound would not suppurate.
and pus and blood would not cover the opening of the wound.
For them that thing becomes a feeble, weak, rotting, coreless tether.
do not abandon that and they show discourtesy towards me
For them that thing becomes a feeble, weak, rotting, coreless tether.
but they would quickly vaporise and vanish.
So too, here some person practises the way…
His mindfulness may be slow in arising,
but he quickly abandons them, removes them, does away with them, and annihilates them.
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Catuma in a myrobalan grove.
Now on that occasion five hundred bhikkhus headed by the venerable Sariputta and the venerable Maha Moggallana had come to Catuma to see the Blessed One.
While the visiting bhikkhus were exchanging greetings with the resident bhikkhus, and were preparing resting places and putting away their bowls and outer robes, they were very loud and noisy.
Then the Blessed One addressed the venerable Ananda thus: “Ananda, who are these loud noisy people? One would think they were fishermen hawking fish.”
“Venerable sir, they are five hundred bhikkhus headed by Sariputta and Moggallana who have come to Catuma to see the Blessed One.
And while the visiting bhikkhus were exchanging greetings with the resident bhikkhus, and were preparing resting places and putting away their bowls and outer robes, they have been very loud and noisy.”
“Then, Ananda, tell those bhikkhus in my name that the Teacher calls the venerable ones.”
“Yes, venerable sir,” he replied, and he went to those bhikkhus and told them: “The Teacher calls the venerable ones.”
“Yes, friend,” they replied, and they went to the Blessed One, and after paying homage to him, sat down at one side.
When they had done so, the Blessed One asked them: “Bhikkhus, why are you so loud and noisy? One would think you were fishermen hawking fish.”
“Venerable sir, we are five hundred bhikkhus headed by Sariputta and Moggallana who have come to Catuma to see the Blessed One.
And it was while we visiting bhikkhus were exchanging greetings with the resident bhikkhus, and were preparing resting places and putting away our bowls and outer robes, that we were very loud and noisy.”
“Go, bhikkhus, I dismiss you. You cannot live with me.”
“Yes, venerable sir,” they replied, and they rose from their seats, and after paying homage to the Blessed One, keeping him on their right, they put away the things in their resting places, and taking their bowls and outer robes, they departed.
Now on that occasion the Sakyans of Catuma had met together in their assembly hall for some business or other.
Seeing the bhikkhus coming in the distance, they went to them and asked: “Where are you going, venerable sirs?”
“Friends, the Sangha of bhikkhus has been dismissed by the Blessed One.”
“Then let the venerable ones be seated awhile. Perhaps we shall be able to restore his confidence.”
“Yes, friends,” they replied.
Then the Sakyans of Catuma went to the Blessed One, and after paying homage to him, they sat down at one side
and said: “Venerable sir, let the Blessed One delight in the Sangha of bhikkhus; venerable sir, let the Blessed One welcome the Sangha of bhikkhus;
If they get no opportunity to see the Blessed One, there may take place in them some change or alteration.
Venerable sir, just as when young seedlings get no water there may take place in them some change or alteration, so too, venerable sir, there are new bhikkhus here, just gone forth, recently come to this Dhamma and Discipline. If they get no opportunity to see the Blessed One, there may take place in them some change or alteration.
Venerable sir, just as when a young calf does not see its mother there may take place in it some change or alteration, so too, venerable sir, there are new bhikkhus here, just gone forth, recently come to this Dhamma and Discipline. If they get no opportunity to see the Blessed One, there may take place in them some change or alteration.
Venerable sir, let the Blessed One delight in the Sangha of the bhikkhus; venerable sir, let the Blessed One welcome the Sangha of bhikkhus;
Then the Brahma Sahampati knew with his mind the thought in the Blessed One’s mind, so just as quickly as a strong man might extend his flexed arm or flex his extended arm, he vanished in the Brahma-world and appeared before the Blessed One.
Then he arranged his upper robe on one shoulder, and extending his hands in reverential salutation towards the Blessed One, he said: 9. “Venerable sir, let the Blessed One delight in the Sangha of bhikkhus; venerable sir, let the Blessed One welcome the Sangha of bhikkhus;……
The Sakyans of Catuma and the Brahma Sahampati were able to restore the Blessed One’s confidence with the similes of the seedlings and the young calf.
Then the venerable Maha Moggallana addressed the bhikkhus thus: “Get up, friends, take your bowls and outer robes.
The Blessed One’s confidence has been restored by the Sakyans of Catuma and the Brahma Sahampati with the similes of the seedlings and the young calf.”
“Yes, friend,” they replied, and taking their bowls and outer robes, they went to the Blessed One, and after paying homage to him, sat down at one side.
When they had done so, the Blessed One asked the venerable Sariputta: “What did you think, Sariputta, when the Sangha of bhikkhus was dismissed by me?”
“Venerable sir, I thought thus: ‘The Sangha of bhikkhus has been dismissed by the Blessed One.
The Blessed One will now abide inactive, devoted to pleasant abiding here and now; and we too shall now abide inactive, devoted to pleasant abiding here and now.’“
“Stop, Sariputta, stop! Such a thought should not be entertamed by you again.”
Then the Blessed One addressed the venerable Maha Moggallana: “What did you think, Moggallana, when the Sangha of bhikkhus was dismissed by me?”
“Venerable sir, I thought thus: ‘The Sangha of bhikkhus has been dismissed by the Blessed One.
The Blessed One will now abide inactive, devoted to pleasant abiding here and now. Now the venerable Sariputta and I shall lead the Sangha of bhikkhus.’
“Good, good, Moggallana!
Either I shall lead the Sangha of bhikkhus or else Sariputta and Moggallana shall lead it.”
Then the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus thus: “Bhikkhus, there are these four kinds of fears to be expected by those who go down to the water.
What are the four?
They are: fear of waves, fear of crocodiles, fear of whirlpools, and fear of sharks. These are the four kinds of fears to be expected by those who go down to the water.
“So too, bhikkhus, there are four kinds of fears to be expected by certain persons who have gone forth from the home life into homelessness in this Dhamma and Discipline.
What are the four?
They are: fear of waves, fear of crocodiles, fear of whirlpools, and fear of sharks.
“What, bhikkhus, is fear of waves?
Here some clansman goes forth out of faith from the home life into homelessness, considering: ‘I am a victim of birth, ageing, and death, of sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair; I am a victim of suffering, a prey to suffering. Surely an ending of this whole mass of suffering can be known.’
Then, after he has gone forth thus, his companions in the holy life advise and instruct him thus: ‘You should move to and fro thus; you should look ahead and look away thus; you should flex and extend the limbs thus; you should wear the patched cloak, bowl, and robes thus.’
Then he thinks: ‘Formerly, when we were in the home life, we advised and instructed others,
And so he forsakes the training and reverts to the low life.
He is called one who has forsaken the training and reverted to the low life because he was frightened by the fear of waves.
Now ‘waves’ is a term for angry despair.
“What, bhikkhus, is fear of crocodiles?
Here some clansman goes forth out of faith from the home life into homelessness, considering: ‘I am a victim of birth, ageing, and death, of sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair; I am a victim of suffering, a prey to suffering. Surely an ending of this whole mass of suffering can be known.’
Then, after he has gone forth thus, his companions in the holy life advise and instruct him thus: ‘This can be consumed by you, this cannot be consumed by you; this can be eaten by you, this cannot be eaten by you; this can be tasted by you, this cannot be tasted by you; this can be drunk by you, this cannot be drunk by you. You can consume what is allowable, you cannot consume what is not allowable; you can eat what is allowable, you cannot eat what is not allowable; you can taste what is allowable, you cannot taste what is not allowable; you can drink what is allowable, you cannot drink what is not allowable. You can consume food within the proper time, you cannot consume food outside the proper time; you can eat within the proper time, you cannot eat outside the proper time; you can taste food within the proper time, you cannot taste food outside the proper time; you can drink within the proper time, you cannot drink outside the proper time.’
“Then he thinks: ‘Formerly, when we were in the home life, we consumed what we liked and did not consume what we did not like; we ate what we liked and did not eat what we did not like; we tasted what we liked and did not taste what we did not like; we drank what we liked and did not drink what we did not like. We consumed what was allowable and what was not allowable; we ate what was allowable and what was not allowable; we tasted what was allowable and what was not allowable; we drank what was allowable and what was not allowable. We consumed food within the proper time and outside the proper time; we ate within the proper time and outside the proper time; we tasted food within the proper time and outside the proper time; we drank within the proper time and outside the proper time.
And so he forsakes the training and reverts to the low life.
He is called one who has forsaken the training and reverted to the low life because he was frightened by the fear of crocodiles.
Now ‘crocodiles’ is a term for gluttony.
“What, bhikkhus, is fear of whirlpools?
Here some clansman goes forth out of faith from the home life into homelessness, considering: ‘I am a victim of birth, ageing, and death, of sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair; I am a victim of suffering, a prey to suffering. Surely an ending of this whole mass of suffering can be known.’
Then, after he has gone forth thus, when it is morning he dresses, and taking his bowl and outer robe, he goes into a village or town
for alms with his body unguarded, with his speech unguarded, with mindfulness unestablished, and with sense faculties unrestrained. He sees some householder there or householder’s son furnished and endowed with the five cords of sensual pleasure enjoying himself with them.
He considers thus: ‘Formerly, when we were in the home life, we were furnished and endowed with the five cords of sensual pleasure and we enjoyed ourselves with them.
My family has wealth;
I can both enjoy wealth and make merit.’
And so he forsakes the training and reverts to the low life.
Now ‘whirlpools’ is a term for the five cords of sensual pleasure.
“What, bhikkhus, is fear of sharks?
Here some clansman goes forth out of faith from the home life into homelessness, considering: ‘I am a victim of birth, ageing, and death, of sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair; I am a victim of suffering, a prey to suffering. Surely an ending of this whole mass of suffering can be known.’
Then, after he has gone forth thus, when it is morning he dresses, and taking his bowl and outer robe, he goes into a village or town for alms
with his body unguarded, with his speech unguarded, with mindfulness unestablished, and with sense faculties unrestrained. He sees a woman there lightly clothed, lightly dressed.
When he sees such a woman, lust infects his mind.
Because his mind has been infected by lust, he forsakes the training and reverts to the low life.
He is called one who has forsaken the training and reverted to the low life because he was frightened by the fear of sharks.
Now ‘sharks’ is a term for women.
“Bhikkhus, these are the four kinds of fears to be expected by certain persons who have gone forth from the home life into homelessness in this Dhamma and Discipline.”
That is what the Blessed One said.
The bhikkhus were satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
venerable sir, let the Blessed One show compassion towards the Sangha of bhikkhus now as he used to show compassion towards it in the past.
Venerable sir, there are new bhikkhus here, just gone forth, recently come to this Dhamma and Discipline.
venerable sir, let the Blessed One show compassion towards the Sangha of bhikkhus now as he used to show compassion towards it in the past.”
and now these bhikkhus, who seem like they might be our sons or our grandsons, think that they can advise and instruct us.’
Now, when faithful householders give us good food of various kinds during the day outside the proper time, it seems these bhikkhus put a muzzle on our mouths.’
He is called one who has forsaken the training and reverted to the low life because he was frightened by the fear of whirlpools.
and dust and dirt would not infect the opening of the wound.
and because it had healed and was covered with skin, he would not incur death or deadly suffering.
Because his mind is not invaded by lust, he would not incur death or deadly suffering.
and a man came who wanted to live, not to die, who wanted pleasure and recoiled from pain.1006
and a man came who wanted to live, not to die, who wanted pleasure and recoiled from pain.
That arrow of craving has been removed from me; the poisonous humour of ignorance has been expelled. I am completely intent upon Nibbana.’
That arrow of craving has been pulled out from me; the poisonous humour of ignorance has been expelled. I am one who is completely intent on Nibbana.’
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living in the Kosalan country at Nalakapana in the Palasa Grove.
Now on that occasion many very well-known clansmen had gone forth out of faith from the home life into homelessness under the Blessed One - the venerable Anuruddha, the venerable Nandiya, the venerable Kimbila, the venerable Bhagu, the venerable Kundadhana, the venerable Revata, the venerable Ananda, and other very well-known clansmen.
And on that occasion the Blessed One was seated in the open surrounded by the Sangha of bhikkhus.
Then, referring to those clansmen, he addressed the bhikkhus thus: “Bhikkhus, those clansmen who have gone forth out of faith from the home life into homelessness under me - do they delight in the holy life?”
When this was said, those bhikkhus were silent.
A second
and a third time, referring to those clansmen, he addressed the bhikkhus thus: “Bhikkhus, those clansmen who have gone forth out of faith from the home life into homelessness under me - do they delight in the holy life?”
For a second and third time, those bhikkhus were silent.
Then the Blessed One considered thus: “Suppose I question those clansmen?”
Then he addressed the venerable Anuruddha thus: “Anuruddha, do you all delight in the holy life?”
“Surely, venerable sir, we delight in the holy life.”
“Good, good, Anuruddha!
It is proper for all you clansmen who have gone forth out of faith from the home life into homelessness to delight in the holy life.
As you are still endowed with the blessing of youth, black-haired young men in the prime of life, you could have indulged in sensual pleasures, yet you have gone forth from the home life into homelessness.
It is not because you have been driven by kings that you have gone forth from the home life into homelessness, or because you have been driven by thieves, or owing to debt, fear, or want of a livelihood.
Rather, did you not go forth out of faith from the home life into homelessness after considering thus: ‘I am a victim of birth, ageing, and death, of sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair; I am a victim of suffering, a prey to suffering. Surely an ending of this whole mass of suffering can be known’?”
- “Yes, venerable sir.”
“What should be done, Anuruddha, by a clansman who has gone forth thus?
While he still does not attain to the rapture and pleasure that are secluded from sensual pleasures and secluded from unwholesome states, or to something more peaceful than that, covetousness invades his mind and remains, ill will invades his mind and remains, sloth and torpor invade his mind and remain, restlessness and remorse invade his mind and remain, doubt invades his mind and remains, discontent invades his mind and remains, weariness invades his mind and remains.
That is so while he still does not attain to the rapture and pleasure that are secluded from sensual pleasures and secluded from unwholesome states, or to something more peaceful than that.
When he attains to the rapture and pleasure that are secluded from sensual pleasures and secluded from unwholesome states, or to something more peaceful than that, covetousness does not invade his mind and remain, ill will… sloth and torpor…restlessness and remorse…doubt…discontent… weariness does not invade his mind and remain.
That is so when he attains to the rapture and pleasure that are secluded from sensual pleasures and secluded from unwholesome states, or to something more peaceful than that.
“How then, Anuruddha, do you all think of me in this way: ‘The Tathagata has not abandoned the taints that defile, bring renewal of being, give trouble, ripen in suffering, and lead to future birth, ageing, and death. That is why the Tathagata uses one thing after reflecting, endures another thing after reflecting, avoids another thing after reflecting, and removes another thing after reflecting’?”
“No, venerable sir, we do not think of the Blessed One in that way.
“Good, good, Anuruddha!
The Tathagata has abandoned the taints that defile, bring renewal of being, give trouble, ripen in suffering, and lead to future birth, ageing, and death; he has cut them off at the root, made them like a palm stump, done away with them so that they are no longer subject to future arising.
Just as a palm tree whose crown is cut off is incapable of further growth, so too, the Tathagata has abandoned the taints that defile…cut them off at the root, made them like a palm stump, done away with them so that they are no longer subject to future arising.
“What do you think, Anuruddha? What purpose does the Tathagata see that when a disciple has died, he declares his reappearance thus: ‘So-and-so has reappeared in such-and-such a place; so-and-so has reappeared in such-and-such a place’?”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One, guided by the Blessed One, have the Blessed One as their resort.
It would be good if the Blessed One would explain the meaning of these words.
Having heard it from the Blessed One, the bhikkhus will remember it.”
“Anuruddha, it is not for the purpose of scheming to deceive people or for the purpose of flattering people or for the purpose of gain, honour, or renown, or with the thought, ‘Let people know me to be thus,’ that when a disciple has died, the Tathagata declares his reappearance thus: ‘So-and-so has reappeared in such-and-such a place; so-and-so has reappeared in such-and-such a place.’
Rather, it is because there are faithful clansmen inspired and gladdened by what is lofty,
“Here a bhikkhu hears thus: ‘The bhikkhu named so-and-so has died; the Blessed One has declared of him: “He was established in final knowledge.’“
And he has either seen that venerable one for himself or heard it said of him: ‘That venerable one’s virtue was thus, his state of concentration was thus, his wisdom was thus, his abiding in attainments was thus, his deliverance was thus.’
Recollecting his faith, virtue, learning, generosity, and wisdom, he directs his mind to such a state.
In this way a bhikkhu has a comfortable abiding.
“Here a bhikkhu hears thus: ‘The bhikkhu named so-and-so has died; the Blessed One has declared of him: “With the destruction of the five lower fetters he has reappeared spontaneously in the Pure Abodes and there will attain final Nibbana without ever returning from that world.’“
And he has either seen that venerable one for himself…
In this way too a bhikkhu has a comfortable abiding.
“Here a bhikkhu hears thus: ‘The bhikkhu named so-and-so has died; the Blessed One has declared of him: “With the destruction of three fetters and with the attenuation of lust, hate, and delusion, he has become a once-returner, returning once to this world to make an end of suffering.’“
And he has either seen that venerable one for himself…
…he directs his mind to such a state.
“Here a bhikkhu hears thus: ‘The bhikkhu named so-and-so has died; the Blessed One has declared of him: “With the destruction of three fetters he has become a stream-enterer, no longer subject to perdition, bound for deliverance, headed for enlightenment.’“
And he has either seen that venerable one for himself…
In this way too a bhikkhu has a comfortable abiding.
“Here a bhikkhuni hears thus: ‘The bhikkhuni named soand- so has died; the Blessed One has declared of her: “She was established in final knowledge.’“
And she has either seen that sister for herself or heard it said of her: ‘That sister’s virtue was thus, her state of concentration was thus, her wisdom was thus, her abiding in attainments was thus, her deliverance was thus.’
Recollecting her faith, virtue, learning, generosity, and wisdom, she directs her mind to such a state.
In this way a bhikkhuni has a comfortable abiding.
“Here a bhikkhuni hears thus: ‘The bhikkhuni named so-and- so has died; the Blessed One has declared of her: “With the destruction of the five lower fetters she has reappeared spontaneously in the Pure Abodes and will there attain final Nibbana without ever returning from that world.”…
‘“He has declared of her: “With the destruction of three fetters and with the attenuation of lust, hate, and delusion, she has become a once-returner, returning once to this world to make an end of suffering.”…
“‘He has declared of her: “With the destruction of three fetters she has become a stream-enterer, no longer subject to perdition, bound for deliverance, headed for enlightenment.’“
And she has either seen that sister for herself…
In this way too a bhikkhuni has a comfortable abiding.
“Here a man lay follower hears thus: ‘The man lay follower named so-and-so has died; the Blessed One has declared of him: “With the destruction of the five lower fetters he has reappeared spontaneously in the Pure Abodes and will there attain final Nibbana without ever returning from that world.”…
‘“He has declared of him: “With the destruction of three fetters and with the attenuation of lust, hate, and delusion, he has become a once-returner, returning once to this world to make an end of suffering.”…
‘“He has declared of him: “With the destruction of three fetters he has become a stream-enterer, no longer subject to perdition, bound for deliverance, headed for enlightenment.’“
And he has either seen that venerable one for himself or heard it said of him: ‘That venerable one’s virtue was thus, his state of concentration was thus, his wisdom was thus, his abiding in attainments was thus, his deliverance was thus.’
Recollecting his faith, virtue, learning, generosity, and wisdom, he directs his mind to such a state.
In this way too a man lay follower has a comfortable abiding.
“Here a woman lay follower hears thus: “The woman lay follower named so-and-so has died; the Blessed One has declared of her: “With the destruction of the five lower fetters she has reappeared spontaneously in the Pure Abodes and will there attain final Nibbana without ever returning from that world.”…
‘“He has declared of her: “With the destruction of three fetters and with the attenuation of lust, hate, and delusion, she has become a once-returner, returning once to this world to make an end of suffering.”…
‘“He has declared of her: “With the destruction of three fetters she has become a stream-enterer, no longer subject to perdition, bound for deliverance, headed for enlightenment.’“
And she has either seen that sister for herself or heard it said of her: ‘That sister’s virtue was thus, her state of concentration was thus, her wisdom was thus, her abiding in attainments was thus, her deliverance was thus.’
Recollecting her faith, virtue, learning, generosity, and wisdom, she directs her mind to such a state.
In this way too a woman lay follower has a comfortable abiding.
“So, Anuruddha, it is not for the purpose of scheming to deceive people or for the purpose of flattering people or for the purpose of gain, honour, and renown, or with the thought, ‘Let people know me to be thus,’ that when a disciple has died, the Tathagata declares his reappearance thus: ‘So-and-so has reappeared in such-and-such a place; so-and-so has reappeared in such-and-such a place.’
Rather, it is because there are faithful clansmen inspired and gladdened by what is lofty,
That is what the Blessed One said.
The venerable Anuruddha was satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Kusinara, in the Grove of Offerings.
There he addressed the bhikkhus thus: “Bhikkhus.”
- “Venerable sir.’ they replied.
The Blessed One said this: 2. “What do you think about me, bhikkhus? That the recluse Gotama teaches the Dhamma for the sake of robes? Or that the recluse Gotama teaches the Dhamma for the sake of almsfood? Or that the recluse Gotama teaches the Dhamma for the sake of a resting place? Or that the recluse Gotama teaches the Dhamma for the sake of some better state of being?”969
“We do not think thus about the Blessed One: ‘The recluse Gotama teaches the Dhamma for the sake of robes, or for the sake of almsfood, or for the sake of a resting place, or for the sake of some better state of being.’“
“So, bhikkhus, you do not think thus about me: ‘The recluse Gotama teaches the Dhamma for the sake of robes…or for the sake of some better state of being.’ Then what do you think about me?”
“Venerable sir, we think thus about the Blessed One: ‘The Blessed One is compassionate and seeks our welfare; he teaches the Dhamma out of compassion.’“
“So, bhikkhus, you think thus about me: ‘The Blessed One is compassionate and seeks our welfare; he teaches the Dhamma out of compassion.’
“So, bhikkhus, these things that I have taught you after directly knowing them - that is, the four foundations of mindfulness, the four right kinds of striving, the four bases for spiritual power, the five faculties, the five powers, the seven enlightenment factors, the Noble Eightfold Path - in these things you should all train in concord, with mutual appreciation, without disputing.
“While you are training in concord, with mutual appreciation, without disputing, two bhikkhus might differ about the higher Dhamma.970
“Now if you should think thus: ‘These venerable ones differ about both the meaning and the phrasing,’ then whichever bhikkhu you think is the more reasonable should be approached and addressed thus: ‘The venerable ones differ about both the meaning and the phrasing.
Then whichever bhikkhu you think is the most reasonable of those who side together on the opposite part should be approached and addressed thus: ‘The venerable ones differ about the meaning and the phrasing.
The venerable ones should know that it is for this reason that there is difference about the meaning and difference about the phrasing;
So what has been wrongly grasped should be borne in mind as wrongly grasped.
Bearing in mind what has been wrongly grasped as wrongly grasped, what is Dhamma and what is Discipline should be expounded.
“Now if you should think thus: ‘These venerable ones differ about the meaning but agree about the phrasing,’ then whichever bhikkhu you think is the more reasonable should be approached and addressed thus: ‘The venerable ones differ about the meaning but agree about the phrasing.
The venerable ones should know that it is for this reason that there is difference about the meaning but agreement about the phrasing;
Then whichever bhikkhu you think is the most reasonable of those who side together on the opposite part should be approached and addressed thus: The venerable ones differ about the meaning but agree about the phrasing.
The venerable ones should know that it is for this reason that there is difference about the meaning but agreement about the phrasing;
So what has been wrongly grasped should be borne in mind as wrongly grasped and what has been rightly grasped should be borne in mind as rightly grasped.
Bearing in mind what has been wrongly grasped as wrongly grasped, and bearing in mind what has been rightly grasped as rightly grasped, what is Dhamma and what is Discipline should be expounded.
“Now if you think thus: ‘These venerable ones agree about the meaning but differ about the phrasing, then whichever bhikkhu you think is the more reasonable should be approached and addressed thus: ‘The venerable ones agree about the meaning but differ about the phrasing.
The venerable ones should know that it is for this reason that there is agreement about the meaning but difference about the phrasing.
But the phrasing is a mere trifle.
Let the venerable ones not fall into a dispute over a mere trifle.’972
Then whichever bhikkhu you think is the most reasonable of those who side together on the opposite part should be approached and addressed thus: ‘The venerable ones agree about the meaning but differ about the phrasing.
The venerable ones should know that it is for this reason that there is agreement about the meaning but difference about the phrasing.
But the phrasing is a mere trifle.
Let the venerable ones not fall into a dispute over a mere trifle.’
So what has been rightly grasped should be borne in mind as rightly grasped and what has been wrongly grasped should be borne in mind as wrongly grasped.
Bearing in mind what has been rightly grasped as rightly grasped, and bearing in mind what has been wrongly grasped as wrongly grasped, what is Dhamma and what is Discipline should be expounded.
“Now if you should think thus: ‘These venerable ones agree about both the meaning and the phrasing,’ then whichever bhikkhu you think is the more reasonable should be approached and addressed thus: ‘The venerable ones agree about both the meaning and the phrasing.
The venerable ones should know that it is for this reason that there is agreement about both the meaning and the phrasing;
Then whichever bhikkhu you think is the most reasonable of those who side together on the opposite part should be approached and addressed thus: ‘The venerable ortes agree about both the meaning and the phrasing.
The venerable ones should know that it is for this reason that there is agreement about both the meaning and the phrasing;
So what has been rightly grasped should be borne in mind as rightly grasped.
Bearing in mind what has been rightly grasped as rightly grasped, what is Dhamma and what is Discipline should be expounded.
“While you are training in concord, with mutual appreciation, without disputing, some bhikkhu might commit an offence or a transgression.973 10. “Now, bhikkhus, you should not hurry to reprove him;
If such occurs to you, bhikkhus, it is proper to speak.
“Then it may occur to you, bhikkhus: ‘I shall not be troubled, but the other person will be hurt, for the other person is given to anger and revenge. However, he is not firmly attached to his view and he relinquishes easily, and I can make that person emerge from the unwholesome and establish him in the wholesome.
It is a mere trifle that the other person will be hurt,
If such occurs to you, bhikkhus, it is proper to speak.
“Then it may occur to you, bhikkhus: ‘I shall be troubled, but the other person will not be hurt;
It is a mere trifle that I shall be troubled,
If such occurs to you, bhikkhus, it is proper to speak.
“Then it may occur to you, bhikkhus: ‘I shall be troubled and the other person will be hurt;
It is a mere trifle that I shall be troubled and the other person hurt,
If such occurs to you, bhikkhus, it is proper to speak.
“Then it may occur to you, bhikkhus: ‘I shall be troubled and the other person will be hurt;
One should not underrate equanimity towards such a person.
“While you are training in concord, with mutual appreciation, without disputing, there might arise mutual verbal friction, domineering views, mental annoyance, bitterness, and dejection.
Then whichever bhikkhu you think is the most reasonable of those who side together on the one part should be approached and addressed thus: ‘While we were training in concord, friend, with mutual appreciation, without disputing, there arose mutual verbal friction, domineering views, mental annoyance, bitterness, and dejection. If the Recluse knew, would he censure that?”974
Answering rightly, the bhikkhu would answer thus: ‘While we were training…If the Recluse knew, he would censure that.’
‘“But, friend, without abandoning that thing, can one realise Nibbana?”
Answering rightly, the bhikkhu would answer thus: ‘Friend, without abandoning that thing, one cannot realise Nibbana.’975
“Then whichever bhikkhu you think is the most reasonable of those who side together on the opposite part should be approached and addressed thus: ‘While we were training in concord, friend, with mutual appreciation, without disputing, there arose mutual verbal friction, domineering views, mental annoyance, bitterness, and dejection. If the Recluse knew, would he censure that?”
Answering rightly, the bhikkhu would answer thus: ‘While we were training…If the Recluse knew, he would censure that.’
‘“But, friend, without abandoning that thing, can one realise Nibbana?”
Answering rightly, the bhikkhu would answer thils: ‘Friend, without abandoning that thing, one cannot realise Nibbana.’
“If others should ask that bhikkhu thus: ‘Was it the venerable one who made those bhikkhus emerge from the unwholesome and established them in the wholesome?”
Answering rightly, the bhikkhu would answer thus: ‘Here, friends, I went to the Blessed One. The Blessed One taught me the Dhamma. Having heard that Dhamma, I spoke to those bhikkhus.
The bhikkhus heard that Dhamma, and they emerged from the unwholesome and became established in the wholesome.’
Answering thus, the bhikkhu neither exalts himself nor disparages others; he answers in accordance with the Dhamma in such a way that nothing which provides a ground for censure can be legitimately deduced from his assertion.”
That is what the Blessed One said.
The bhikkhus were satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
who when they hear that, direct their minds to such a state,
and that leads to their welfare and happiness for a long time.
…he directs his mind to such a state.
In this way too a bhikkhu has a comfortable abiding.
…he directs his mind to such a state.
…she directs her mind to such a state.
who when they hear that, direct their minds to such a state,
and that leads to their welfare and happiness for a long time.”
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Rajagaha in the Bamboo Grove, the Squirrels’ Sanctuary.
Now on that occasion a bhikkhu named Gulissani, a forest-dweller of lax behaviour, had come on a visit to stay in the midst of the Sangha for some business or other.
The venerable Sariputta addressed the bhikkhus with reference to the bhikkhu Gulissani thus:
‘What has this venerable forest-dweller gained by his dwelling alone in the forest, doing as he likes, since he is disrespectful and undeferential towards his companions in the holy life?’
Since there would be those who would say this of him, a forest-dwelling bhikkhu who has come to the Sangha and is living in the Sangha should be respectful and deferential towards his companions in the holy life.
“When a forest-dwelling bhikkhu comes to the Sangha and is living in the Sangha, he should be skilled in good behaviour regarding seats thus: ‘I shall sit down in such a way that I do not encroach upon elder bhikkhus and do not deny new bhikkhus a seat.’
If he is not skilled in good behaviour regarding seats, there will be those who would say of him:
a forest-dwelling bhikkhu who has come to the Sangha is living in the Sangha should be skilled in good behaviour regarding seats.
“When a forest-dwelling bhikkhu comes to the Sangha and is living in the Sangha, he should not enter the village too early or return late in the day.
If he enters the village too early and returns late in the day, there will be those who would say of him:
a forest-dwelling bhikkhu who has come to the Sangha and is living in the Sangha should not enter the village too early or return late in the day.
“When a forest-dwelling bhikkhu comes to the Sangha and is living in the Sangha, he should not go before the meal or after the meal to visit families.
If he goes before the meal or after the meal to visit families, there will be those who would say of him:
a forest-dwelling bhikkhu who has come to the Sangha and is living in the Sangha should not go before the meal or after the meal to visit families.
“When a forest-dwelling bhikkhu comes to the Sangha and is living in the Sangha, he should not be haughty and personally vain.
If he is haughty and personally vain, there will be those who would say of him:
a forest-dwelling bhikkhu who has come to the Sangha and is living in the Sangha should not be haughty and personally vain.
“When a forest-dwelling bhikkhu comes to the Sangha and is living in the Sangha, he should not be rough-tongued and loose-spoken.
If he is rough-tongued and loose-spoken, there will be those who would say of him:
‘What has this venerable forest-dweller gained by his dwelling alone in the forest, doing as he likes, since he is rough-tongued and loose-spoken?’ Since there would be those who would say this of him,
“When a forest-dwelling bhikkhu comes to the Sangha and is living in the Sangha, he should be easy to correct and should associate with good friends.
If he is difficult to correct and associates with bad friends, there will be those who would say of him:
a forest-dwelling bhikkhu who has come to the Sangha and is living in the Sangha should be easy to correct and should associate with good friends.
“A forest-dwelling bhikkhu should guard the doors of his sense faculties.
If he does not guard the doors of his sense faculties, there will be those who would say of him:
a forest-dwelling bhikkhu should guard the doors of his sense faculties.
“A forest-dwelling bhikkhu should be moderate in eating.
If he is not moderate in eating, there will be those who would say of him:
a forest-dwelling bhikkhu should be moderate in eating.
“A forest-dwelling bhikkhu should be devoted to wakefulness.
If he is not devoted to wakefulness, there will be those would say of him:
a forest-dwelling bhikkhu should be devoted to wakefulness.
“A forest-dwelling bhikkhu should be energetic.
If he is not energetic, there will be those who would say of him:
a forest-dwelling bhikkhu should be energetic.
“A forest-dwelling bhikkhu should be established in mindfulness.
If he is unmindful, there will be those who would say of him:
a forest-dwelling bhikkhu should be established in mindfulness.
“A forest-dwelling bhikkhu should be concentrated.
If he is not concentrated, there will be those who would say of him:
a forest-dwelling bhikkhu should be concentrated.
“A forest-dwelling bhikkhu should be wise.
If he is not wise, there will be those who would say of him:
a forest-dwelling bhikkhu should be wise.
“A forest-dwelling bhikkhu should apply himself to the higher Dhamma and the higher Discipline.
“A forest-dwelling bhikkhu should apply himself to those liberations that are peaceful and immaterial, transcending forms;
for there are those who ask a forest-dwelling bhikkhu questions on the liberations that are peaceful and immaterial, transcending forms.
a forest-dwelling bhikkhu should apply himself to superhuman states.”
When this was said, the venerable Maha Moggallana asked the venerable Sariputta: “Friend Sariputta, should these things be undertaken and practised only by a forest-dwelling bhikkhu or by a town-dwelling bhikkhu as well?”
“Friend Moggallana, these things should be undertaken and practised not only by a forest-dwelling bhikkhu, but by a towndwelling bhikkhu as well.”
“Friends, when a forest-dwelling bhikkhu comes to the Sangha and is living in the Sangha, he should be respectful and deferential towards his companions in the holy life.
If he is disrespectful and undeferential towards his companions in the holy life, there will be those who would say of him:
‘What has this venerable forest-dweller gained by his dwelling alone in the forest, doing as he likes, since he does not even know what pertains to good behaviour?’ Since there would be those who would say this of him,
‘What has this venerable forest-dweller gained by his dwelling alone in the forest, doing as he likes, since he enters the village too early and returns late in the day?’ Since there would be those who would say this of him,
‘Surely this venerable forest-dweller, while dwelling alone in the forest, doing as he likes, must be used to making untimely visits, since he behaves thus when he has come to the Sangha.’ Since there would be those who would say this of him,
‘Surely this venerable forest-dweller, while dwelling alone in the forest, doing as he likes, must generally be haughty and personally vain, since he behaves thus when he has come to the Sangha.’ Since there would be those who would say this of him,
a forest-dwelling bhikkhu who has come to the Sangha and is living in the Sangha should not be rough-tongued and loose-spoken.
‘What has this venerable forest-dweller gained by his dwelling alone in the forest, doing as he likes, since he is difficult to correct and associates with bad friends?’ Since there would be those who would say this of him,
‘What has this venerable forest-dweller gained by his dwelling alone in the forest, doing as he likes, since he does not guard the doors of his sense faculties?’ Since there would be those who would say this of him,
‘What has this venerable forest-dweller gained by his dwelling alone in the forest, doing as he likes, since he is not moderate in eating?’ Since there would be those who would say this of him,
‘What has this venerable forest-dweller gained by his dwelling alone in the forest, doing as he likes, since he is not devoted to wakefulness?’ Since there would be those who would say this of him,
‘What has this venerable forest-dweller gained by his dwelling alone in the forest, doing as he likes, since he is lazy?’ Since there would be those who would say this of him,
‘What has this venerable forest-dweller gained by his dwelling alone in the forest, doing as he likes, since he is unmindful?’ Since there would be those who would say this of him,
‘What has this venerable forest-dweller gained by his dwelling alone in the forest, doing as he likes, since he is not concentrated?’ Since there would be those who would say this of him,
‘What has this venerable forest-dweller gained by his dwelling alone in the forest, doing as he likes, since he is not wise?’ Since there would be those who would say this of him,
a forest-dwelling bhikkhu should apply himself to the higher Dhamma and the higher Discipline.
“A forest-dwelling bhikkhu should apply himself to superhuman states,
‘What has this venerable forest-dweller gained by his dwelling alone in the forest, doing as he likes, since he does not apply himself to the higher Dhamma and the higher Discipline?’ Since there would be those who would say this of him,
If he does not apply himself to those liberations, there will be those who would say of him:
‘What has this venerable forest-dweller gained by his dwelling alone in the forest, doing as he likes, since he does not apply himself to those liberations that are peaceful and immaterial, transcending forms?’ Since there would be those who would say this of him,
a forest-dwelling bhikkhu should apply himself to those liberations that are peaceful and immaterial, transcending forms.
there will be those who would say of him:
for there are those who ask a forest-dwelling bhikkhu questions on the superhuman states.
If he does not apply himself to those states, there will be those who would say of him:
‘What has this venerable forest-dweller gained by his dwelling alone in the forest, doing as he likes, since he does not apply himself to superhuman states?’ Since there would be those who would say this of him,
If he does not apply himself to the higher Dhamma and the higher Discipline,
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Vesali in the Great Wood in the Hall with the Peaked Roof.
Now on that occasion the wanderer Vacchagotta was staying in the Wanderers’ Park of the Single White-lotus Mango Tree.
Then, when it was morning, the Blessed One dressed, and taking his bowl and outer robe, went into Vesall for alms.
Then the Blessed One thought: “It is still too early to wander for alms in Vesall. Suppose I went to the wanderer Vacchagotta in the Wanderers’ Park of the Single White-lotus Mango Tree.”
Then the Blessed One went to the wanderer Vacchagotta in the Wanderers’ Park of the Single White-lotus Mango Tree.
Welcome to the Blessed One!
It is long since the Blessed One found an opportunity to come here.
Let the Blessed One be seated; this seat is ready.”
The Blessed One sat down on the seat made ready,
Venerable sir, do those who speak thus say what has been said by the Blessed One, and not misrepresent him with what is contrary to fact? Do they explain in accordance with the Dhamma in such a way that nothing which provides a ground for censure can be legitimately deduced from their assertion?”
“Vaccha, those who say thus do not say what has been said by me, but misrepresent me with what is untrue and contrary to fact.”
“Venerable sir, how should I answer that I may say what has been said by the Blessed One and not misrepresent him with what is contrary to fact? How may I explain in accordance with the Dhamma in such a way that nothing which provides a ground for censure can be legitimately deduced from my assertion?”
“Vaccha, if you answer thus: ‘The recluse Gotama has the threefold true knowledge,’ you will be saying what has been said by me and will not misrepresent me with what is contrary to fact.
You will explain in accordance with the Dhamma in such a way that nothing which provides a ground for censure can be legitimately deduced from your assertion.j 7. “For in so far as I wish, I recollect my manifold past lives, that is, one birth, two births……Thus with their aspects and particulars I recollect my manifold past lives.
“And in so far as I wish, with the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, I see beings passing away and reappearing, inferior and superior, fair and ugly, fortunate and unfortunate, and I understand how beings pass on according to their actions……
“If you answer thus: ‘The recluse Gotama has the threefold true knowledge’ you will be saying what has been said by me and will not misrepresent me with what is contrary to fact. You will explain in accordance with the Dhamma in such a way that nothing which provides a ground for censure can be legitimately deduced from your assertion.”
When this was said, the wanderer Vacchagotta asked the Blessed One: “Master Gotama, is there any householder who, without abandoning the fetter of householdership, on the dissolution of the body has made an end of suffering?”
“Vaccha, there is no householder who, without abandoning the fetter of householdership, on the dissolution of the body has made an end of suffering.”
“Master Gotama, is there any householder who, without abandoning the fetter of householdership, on the dissolution of the body has gone to heaven?”
“Vaccha, there are not only one hundred or two or three or four or five hundred, but far more householders who, without abandoning the fetter of householdership, on the dissolution of the body have gone to heaven.”
“Vaccha, there is no Ajivaka who, on the dissolution of the body, has made an end of suffering.”
“Master Gotama, is there any Ajivaka who, on the dissolution of the’ body, has gone to heaven?”
“When I recollect the past ninety-one aeons, Vaccha, I do not recall any Ajivaka who, on the dissolution of the body, went to heaven, with one exception, and he held the doctrine of the moral efficacy of action, the doctrine of the moral efficacy of deeds.”
“That being so, Master Gotama, this fold of other sectarians is empty even of a chance of going to heaven.”
“That being so, Vaccha, this fold of other sectarians is empty even of a chance of going to heaven.”
The wanderer Vacchagotta saw the Blessed One coming in the distance
and said to him: “Let the Blessed One come, venerable sir!
and the wanderer Vacchagotta took a low seat, sat down at one side,
and said to the Blessed One: 5. “Venerable sir, I have heard this: ‘The recluse Gotama claims to be omniscient” and all-seeing, to have complete knowledge and vision thus: “Whether I am walking or standing or sleeping or awake, knowledge and vision are continuously and uninterruptedly present to me.’“
“And by realising for myself with direct knowledge, I here and now enter upon and abide in the deliverance of mind and deliverance by wisdom that are taintless with the destruction of the taints.
“Master Gotama, is there any Ajivaka who, on the dissolution of the body, has made an end of suffering?”
That is what the Blessed One said.
The wanderer Vacchagotta was satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Rajagaha in the Boar’s Cave on the mountain Vulture Peak.
Then the wanderer Dighanakha went to the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him.
When this courteous and amiable talk was finished, he stood at one side
“This view of yours, Aggivessana, ‘Nothing is acceptable to me’ - is not at least that view acceptable to you?”
“If this view of mine were acceptable to me, Master Gotama, it too would be the same, it too would be the same.”
“Well, Aggivessana, there are plenty in the world who say: ‘It too would be the same, it too would be the same,’
Those are few in the world who say: ‘It too would be the same, it too would be the same,’
“Aggivessana, there are some recluses and brahmins whose doctrine and view is this: ‘Everything is acceptable to me.’ There are some recluses and brahmins whose doctrine and view is this: ‘Nothing is acceptable to me.’ And there are some recluses and brahmins whose doctrine and view is this: ‘Something is acceptable to me, something is not acceptable to me.’
Among these, the view of those recluses and brahmins who hold the doctrine and view ‘Everything is acceptable to me’ is close to lust, close to bondage, close to delighting, close to holding, close to clinging. The view of those recluses and brahmins who hold the doctrine and view ‘Nothing is acceptable to me’ is close to non-lust, close to non-bondage, close to non-delighting, close to non-holding, close to non-clinging.”
When this was said, the wanderer Dighanakha remarked: “Master Gotama commends my point of view, Master Gotama recommends my point of view.”
“ Aggivessana, as to those recluses and brahmins who hold the doctrine and view ‘Something is acceptable to me, something is not acceptable to me’
“Now, Aggivessana, a wise man among those recluses and brahmins who hold the doctrine and view ‘Everything is acceptable to me’ considers thus: ‘If I obstinately adhere to my view “Everything is acceptable to me” and declare: “Only this is true, anything else is wrong,” then I may clash with the two others: with a recluse or brahmin who holds the doctrine and view “Nothing is acceptable to me” and with a recluse or brahmin who holds the doctrine and view “Something is acceptable to me, something is not acceptable to me.” I may clash with these two,
and when there is a clash, there are disputes; when there are disputes, there are quarrels; when there are quarrels, there is vexation.’
Foreseeing for himself clashes, disputes, quarrels, and vexation, he abandons that view and does not take up some other view.
This is how there comes to be the abandoning of these views; this is how there comes to be the relinquishing of these views.
“A wise man among those recluses and brahmins who hold the doctrine and view ‘Nothing is acceptable to me’ considers thus: ‘If I obstinately adhere to my view “Nothing is acceptable to me” and declare: “Only this is true, anything else is wrong,” then I may clash with the two others: with a recluse or brahmin who holds the doctrine and view “Everything is acceptable to me” and with a recluse or brahmin who holds the doctrine and view “Something is acceptable to me, something is not acceptable to me.” I may clash with these two,
and when there is a clash, there are disputes; when there are disputes, there are quarrels; when there are quarrels, there is vexation.’
Foreseeing for himself clashes, disputes, quarrels, and vexation, he abandons that view and does not take up some other view.
This is how there comes to be the abandoning of these views; this is how there comes to be the relinquishing of these views.
“A wise man among those recluses and brahmins who hold the doctrine and view ‘Something is acceptable to me, something is not acceptable to me’ considers thus: ‘If I obstinately adhere to my view “Something is acceptable to me, something is not acceptable to me” and declare: “Only this is true, anything else is wrong,” then I may clash with the two others: with a recluse or brahmin who holds the doctrine and view “Everything is acceptable to me” and with a recluse or brahmin who holds the doctrine and view “Nothing is acceptable to me.” I may clash with these two,
and when there is a clash, there are disputes; when there are disputes, there are quarrels; when there are quarrels, there is vexation.’
Foreseeing for himself clashes, disputes, quarrels, and vexation, he abandons that view and does not take up some other view.
This is how there comes to be the abandoning of these views; this is how there comes to be the relinquishing of these views.
“Now, Aggivessana, this body made of material form, consisting of the four great elements, procreated by a mother and father, and built up out of boiled rice and porridge, is subject to impermanence, to being worn and rubbed away, to dissolution and disintegration. It should be regarded as impermanent, as suffering, as a disease, as a tumour, as a dart, as a calamity, as an affliction, as alien, as disintegrating, as void, as not self.
When one regards this body thus one abandons desire for the body, affection for the body, subservience to the body.
“There are, Aggivessana, three kinds of feeling: pleasant feeling, painful feeling, and neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling.
On the occasion when one feels pleasant feeling, one does not feel painful feeling or neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling; on that occasion one feels only pleasant feeling.
On the occasion when one feels painful feeling, one does not feel pleasant feeling or neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling; on that occasion one feels only painful feeling.
On the occasion when one feels neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling, one does not feel pleasant feeling or painful feeling; on that occasion one feels only neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling.
“Pleasant feeling, Aggivessana, is impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen, subject to destruction, vanishing, fading away, and ceasing. Painful feeling too is impermanent, conditioned, dependency arisen, subject to destruction, vanishing, fading away, and ceasing. Neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling too is impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen, subject to destruction, vanishing, fading away, and ceasing.
“Seeing thus, a well-taught noble disciple becomes disenchanted with pleasant feeling, disenchanted with painful feeling, disenchanted with neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling. Being disenchanted, he becomes dispassionate. Through dispassion his mind is liberated.
When it is liberated there comes the knowledge: ‘It is liberated.’
He understands: ‘Birth is destroyed, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more coming to any state of being.’
“A bhikkhu whose mind is liberated thus, Aggivessana, sides with none and disputes with none; he employs the speech currently used in the world without adhering to it.”
Now on that occasion the venerable Sariputta was standing behind the Blessed One, fanning him.
Then he thought: “The Blessed One, indeed, speaks of the abandoning of these things through direct knowledge; the Sublime One, indeed, speaks of the relinquishing of these things through direct knowledge.”
As the venerable Sariputta considered this, through not clinging his mind was liberated from the taints.
But in the wanderer Dighanakha the spotless immaculate vision of the Dhamma arose: “All that is subject to arising is subject to cessation.”
The wanderer Dighanakha saw the Dhamma, attained the Dhamma, understood the Dhamma, fathomed the Dhamma; he crossed beyond doubt, did away with perplexity, gained intrepidity, and became independent of others in the Teacher’s Dispensation.
Then he said to the Blessed One: “Magnificent, Master Gotama! Magnificent, Master Gotama! Master Gotama has made the Dhamma clear in many ways, as though he were turning upright what had been overthrown, revealing what was hidden, showing the way to one who was lost, or holding up a lamp in the dark for those with eyesight to see forms.
I go to Master Gotama for refuge and to the Dhamma and to the Sangha of bhikkhus.
From today let Master Gotama remember me as a lay follower who has gone to him for refuge for life.”
and said to the Blessed One: “Master Gotama, my doctrine and view is this: ‘Nothing is acceptable to me.’“
- the view of theirs as to what is acceptable is close to lust, close to bondage, close to delighting, close to holding, close to clinging, while the view of theirs as to what is not acceptable is close to non-lust, close to non-bondage, close to non-delighting, close to non-holding, close to non-clinging.
yet they do not abandon that view and they take up still some other view.
and who abandon that view and do not take up some other view.
Now on that occasion the Buddha, the Blessed One, was staying at Uruvelā on the bank of the Nerañjarā River at the root of the Bodhi tree—the tree of awakening—newly fully awakened.
Then he sat at the root of the Bodhi tree for seven days in one session, sensitive to the bliss of release.
Then, in the first watch of the night, he gave close attention to dependent co-arising in forward and reverse order: From ignorance as a requisite condition come fabrications. From fabrications as a requisite condition comes consciousness. From consciousness as a requisite condition comes name-&-form. From name-&-form as a requisite condition come the six sense media. From the six sense media as a requisite condition comes contact. From contact as a requisite condition comes feeling. From feeling as a requisite condition comes craving. From craving as a requisite condition comes clinging/sustenance. From clinging/sustenance as a requisite condition comes becoming. From becoming as a requisite condition comes birth. From birth as a requisite condition, then aging-&-death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, and despair come into play. Such is the origination of this entire mass of suffering & stress.
From the remainderless fading and cessation of ignorance comes the cessation of fabrications. From the cessation of fabrications comes the cessation of consciousness. From the cessation of consciousness comes the cessation of name-&-form. From the cessation of name-&-form comes the cessation of the six sense media. From the cessation of the six sense media comes the cessation of contact. From the cessation of contact comes the cessation of feeling. From the cessation of feeling comes the cessation of craving. From the cessation of craving comes the cessation of clinging/sustenance. From the cessation of clinging/sustenance comes the cessation of becoming. From the cessation of becoming comes the cessation of birth. From the cessation of birth, then aging-&-death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, and despair all cease. Such is the cessation of this entire mass of suffering & stress.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
“As phenomena grow clear
to the brahman—ardent, in jhāna—
his doubts all vanish
when he discerns a phenomenon with its cause.” Ud 1:1
Then, in the middle watch of the night, he gave close attention to dependent co-arising in forward and reverse order: From ignorance as a requisite condition come fabrications. From fabrications as a requisite condition comes consciousness. From consciousness as a requisite condition comes name-&-form. … Such is the origination of this entire mass of suffering & stress. … Such is the cessation of this entire mass of suffering & stress.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
“As phenomena grow clear
to the brahman—ardent, in jhāna—
his doubts all vanish
when he penetrates the ending of requisite conditions.” Ud 1:2
Then, in the last watch of the night, he gave close attention to dependent co-arising in forward and reverse order: From ignorance as a requisite condition come fabrications. From fabrications as a requisite condition comes consciousness. From consciousness as a requisite condition comes name-&-form. … Such is the origination of this entire mass of suffering & stress. … Such is the cessation of this entire mass of suffering & stress.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
“As phenomena grow clear
to the brahman—ardent, in jhāna—
he stands, routing Māra’s army,
as the sun, illumining the sky.” Ud 1:3
The Discussion of the Bodhi is finished.
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Kosambi in Ghosita’s Park.
Now on that occasion the wanderer Sandaka was staying in the Pilakkha-tree Cave with a large assembly of wanderers.
Then, when it was evening, the venerable Ananda rose from meditation and addressed the bhikkhus thus: “Come, friends, let us go to the Devakata Pool to see the cave.”
- “Yes, friend,” those bhikkhus replied.
Then the venerable Ananda went to the Devakata Pool together with a number of bhikkhus.
Now on that occasion the wanderer Sandaka was seated with a large assembly of wanderers who were making an uproar, loudly and noisily talking many kinds of pointless talk, such as talk of kings, robbers, ministers, armies, dangers, battles, food, drink, clothing, beds, garlands, perfumes, relatives, vehicles, villages, towns, cities, countries, women, heroes, streets, wells, the dead, trifles, the origin of the world, the origin of the sea, whether things are so or are not so.
Then the wanderer Sandaka saw the venerable Ananda coming in the distance.
Seeing him, he quieted his own assembly thus: “Sirs, be quiet; sirs, make no noise. Here comes the recluse Ananda, a disciple of the recluse Gotama,
These venerable ones like quiet; they are disciplined in quiet; they commend quiet. Perhaps if he finds our assembly a quiet one, he will think to join us.”
Then the wanderers became silent.
The venerable Ananda went to the wanderer Sandaka
who said to him: “Let Master Ananda come!Welcome to Master Ananda!
It is long since Master Ananda found an opportunity to come here.
Let Master Ananda be seated; this seat is ready.”
The venerable Ananda sat down on the seat made ready,
When he had done so, the venerable Ananda asked him: “For what discussion are you sitting together here now, Sandaka? And what was your discussion that was left unfinished?”
“Master Ananda, let be the discussion for which we are now sitting together here.
Master Ananda can well hear about it later.
It would be good if Master Ananda would give a talk on his own teacher’s Dhamma.”
“Then, Sandaka, listen and attend closely to what I shall say.”
“Yes, sir,” he replied.
The venerable Ananda said this: 6. “Sandaka, these four ways that negate the living of the holy life have been declared by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, and also these four kinds of holy life without consolation have been declared, wherein a wise man certainly would not live the holy life, or if he should live it, would not attain the true way, the Dhamma that is wholesome.”
“But, Master Ananda, what are those four ways that negate the living of the holy life that have been declared by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, wherein a wise man certainly would not live the holy life, or if he should live it, would not attain the true way, the Dhamma that is wholesome?”
“Here, Sandaka, some teacher holds such a doctrine and view as this: ‘There is nothing given, nothing offered, nothing sacrificed; no fruit or result of good and bad actions; no this world, no other world; no mother, no father; no beings who are reborn spontaneously; no good and virtuous recluses and brahmins in the world who have themselves realised by direct knowledge and declare this world and the other world.
A person consists of the four great elements. When he dies, earth returns and goes back to the body of earth, water returns and goes back to the body of water, fire returns and goes back to the body of fire, air returns and goes back to the body of air; the faculties are transferred to space.
Four men with the bier as fifth carry away the corpse. The funeral orations last as far as the charnel ground;
the bones whiten;
burnt offerings end with ashes. Giving is a doctrine of fools.
When anyone asserts doctrine that there is giving and the like, it is empty, false prattle.
Fools and the wise are alike cut off and annihilated with the dissolution of the body; after death they do not exist.’
“About this a wise man considers thus: ‘This good teacher holds this doctrine and view: “There is nothing given…
If this good teacher’s words are true, then here in this teaching I have done my duty by not doing it, here I have lived the holy life by not living it.
Both of us are exactly equal here in this teaching, both have arrived at equality, yet I do not say that both of us are cut off and annihilated with the dissolution of the body, that after death we shall not exist.
But it is superfluous for this good teacher to go about naked, to be shaven, to exert himself in the squatting posture, and to pull out his hair and beard, since I, who live in a house crowded with children, who use Benares sandalwood, who wear garlands, scents, and unguents, and accept gold and silver, shall reap exactly the same destination, the same future course, as this good teacher.
What do I know and see that I should lead the holy life under this teacher?’
So when he finds that this way negates the living of the holy life, he turns away from it and leaves it.
“This is the first way that negates the living of the holy life that has been declared by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, wherein a wise man certainly would not live the holy life, or if he should live it, would not attain the true way, the Dhamma that is wholesome.
“Again, Sandaka, here some teacher holds such a doctrine and view as this: ‘When one acts or makes others act, when one mutilates or makes others mutilate, when one tortures or makes others inflict torture, when one inflicts sorrow or makes others inflict sorrow, when one oppresses or makes others inflict oppression, when one intimidates or makes others inflict intimidation, when one kills living beings, takes what is not given, breaks into houses, plunders wealth, commits burglary, ambushes highways, seduces another’s wife, utters falsehood - no evil is done by the doer.
If, with a razor-rimmed wheel, one were to make the living beings on this earth into one mass of flesh, into one heap of flesh, because of this there would be no evil and no outcome of evil.
If one were to go along the south bank of the Ganges killing and slaughtering, mutilating and making others mutilate, torturing and making others inflict torture, because of this there would be no evil and no outcome of evil.
If one were to go along the north bank of the Ganges giving gifts and making others give gifts, making offerings and making others make offerings, because of this there would be no merit and no outcome of merit.
By giving, by taming oneself, by restraint, by speaking truth, there is no merit and no outcome of merit.’
“About this a wise man considers thus: ‘This good teacher holds this doctrine and view: “When one acts…
If this good teacher’s words are true, then here in this teaching I have done my duty by not doing it, here I have lived the holy life by not living it.
Both of us are exactly equal here in this teaching, both have arrived at equality, yet I do not say that whatever both of us do, no evil is done.
But it is superfluous for this good teacher…
So when he finds that this way negates the living of the holy life, he turns away from it and leaves it.
“This is the second way that negates the living of the holy life that has been declared by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened…
“About this a wise man considers thus: ‘This good teacher holds this doctrine and view: “There is no cause…
If this good teacher’s words are true, then here in this teaching I have done my duty by not doing it, here I have lived the holy life by not living it.
Both of us are exactly equal here in this teaching, both have arrived at equality, yet I do not say that both of us will be purified without cause or condition.
What do I know and see that I should lead the holy life under this teacher?’
So when he finds that this way negates the living of the holy life, he turns away from it and leaves it.
“This is the third way that negates the living of the holy life that has been declared by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened…
“Again, Sandaka, here some teacher holds such a doctrine and view as this: ‘There are these seven bodies that are unmade, not brought forth, uncreated, without a creator, barren, standing like mountain peaks, standing like pillars.They do not move or change or obstruct each other. None is able to arouse pleasure or pain or pleasure-and-pain in another.
What are the seven?
They are the earth-body, the water-body, the fire-body, the air-body, pleasure, pain, and the soul as the seventh. These seven bodies are unmade…
There are these fourteen hundred thousand principal kinds of generation, and sixty hundred kinds, and six hundred kinds; there are five hundred kinds of action, and five kinds of action, and three kinds of action, and action and half-action; there are sixty-two ways, sixty-two subaeons, six classes, eight planes of man, forty-nine hundred kinds of livelihood, forty-nine kinds of wanderers, forty-nine hundred abodes of serpents, twenty hundred faculties, thirty hundred hells, thirty-six elements of dust, seven percipient breeds, seven non-percipient breeds, seven sheathless breeds, seven kinds of gods, seven kinds of men, seven kinds of demons, seven lakes, seven knots, seven kinds of chasms, seven hundred kinds of chasms, seven kinds of dreams, seven hundred kinds of dreams; and there are eighty-four hundred thousand great aeons wherein, by running and wandering through the round of rebirths, fools and the wise both will make an end of suffering.
There is none of this: “By this virtue or observance or asceticism or holy life I shall make unripened action ripen or annihilate ripened action as it comes.”
Pleasure and pain are meted out. The round of rebirths is limited, there is no shortening or extending it, no increasing or decreasing it.
Just as a ball of string when thrown goes as far as the string unwinds, so too, by running and wandering through the round of rebirths, fools and the wise both will make an end of suffering.’
“About this a wise man considers thus: ‘This good teacher holds this doctrine and view: “There are these seven bodies…
If this good teacher’s words are true, then here in this teaching I have done my duty by not doing it, here I have lived the holy life by not living it.
Both of us are exactly equal here in this teaching, both have arrived at equality,
yet I do not say that both of us will make an end of suffering by running and wandering through the round of rebirths.
What do I know and see that I should lead the holy life under this teacher?’
So when he finds that this way negates the living of the holy life, he turns away from it and leaves it.
“This is the fourth way that negates the living of the holy life that has been declared by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened…
“It is wonderful, Master Ananda, it is marvellous,
“Here, Sandaka, some teacher claims to be omniscient and all-seeing, to have complete knowledge and vision thus: ‘Whether I am walking or standing or sleeping or awake, knowledge and vision are continuously and uninterruptedly present to me.’
He enters an empty house, he gets no almsfood, a dog bites him, he meets with a wild elephant, a wild horse, a wild bull, he asks the name and clan of a woman or a man, he asks the name of a village or a town, and the way to go there.
When he is questioned: ‘How is this? ‘ he replies: ‘I had to enter an empty house, that is why I entered it. I had to get no almsfood, that is why I did not get any. I had to be bitten by a dog, that is why I was bitten. I had to meet with a wild elephant, a wild horse, a wild bull, that is why I met with them. I had to ask the name and clan of a woman or a man, that is why I asked. I had to ask the name of a village or a town and the way to go there, that is why I asked.’
“About this a wise man considers thus: ‘This good teacher claims to be omniscient and all-seeing, to have complete knowledge and vision…When he is questioned: “How is this? “ he replies: “I had to…that is why I asked.’“
So when he finds that this holy life is without consolation, he turns away from it and leaves it.
“This is the first kind of holy life without consolation that has been declared by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, wherein a wise man certainly would not live the holy life, or if he should live it, would not attain the true way, the Dhamma that is wholesome.
“Again, Sandaka, here some teacher is a traditionalist, one who regards oral tradition as truth;
But when a teacher is a traditionalist, one who regards oral tradition as truth, some is well remembered and some is wrongly remembered, some is true and some is otherwise.
“About this a wise man considers thus: ‘This good teacher is a traditionalist…
So when he finds that this holy life is without consolation, he turns away from it and leaves it.
“This is the second kind of holy life without consolation that has been declared by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened…
He teaches a Dhamma hammered out by reasoning following a line of inquiry as it occurs to him.
But when a teacher is a reasoner, an inquirer, some is well reasoned and some is wrongly reasoned, some is true and some is otherwise.
“About this a wise man considers thus: ‘This good teacher is a reasoner…
So when he finds that this holy life is without consolation, he turns away from it and leaves it.
“This is the third kind of holy life without consolation that has been declared by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened…
Because he is dull and confused, when he is asked such and such a question, he engages in verbal wriggling, in eel-wriggling: ‘I don’t say it is like this. And I don’t say it is like that. And I don’t say it is otherwise. And I don’t say it is not so. And I don’t say it is not not so.’
“About this a wise man considers thus: ‘This good teacher is dull and confused…
“This is the fourth kind of holy life without consolation that has been declared by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened…
“It is wonderful, Master Ananda, it is marvellous,
But, Master Ananda, what does that teacher assert, what does he declare, wherein a wise man certainly would live the holy life, and while living it would attain the true way, the Dhamma that is wholesome?’“
“Here, Sandaka, a Tathagata appears in the world, accomplished, fully enlightened………he purifies his mind from doubt. 43. “Having thus abandoned these five hindrances, imperfections of the mind that weaken wisdom, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, he enters upon and abides in the first jhana, which is accompanied by applied and sustained thought, with rapture and pleasure born of seclusion.
A wise man certainly would live the holy life with a teacher under whom a disciple attains such a lofty distinction, and while living it he would attain the true way, the Dhamma that is wholesome.
“Again, with the stilling of applied and sustained thought, he enters upon and abides in the second jhana…
“When his concentrated mind is thus purified, bright, unblemished, rid of imperfection, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, he directs it to knowledge of the recollection of past lives.
He recollects his manifold past lives, that is, one birth, two births…{as Sutta 51, §24)…Thus with their aspects and particulars he recollects his manifold past lives.
A wise man certainly would live the holy life with a teacher under whom a disciple attains such a lofty distinction…
A wise man certainly would live the holy life with a teacher under whom a disciple attains such a lofty distinction…
He understands as it actually is: ‘This is suffering’……He understands as it actually is: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of the taints.’
“When he knows and sees thus, his mind is liberated from the taint of sensual desire, from the taint of being, and from taint of ignorance.
When it is liberated there comes the knowledge: ‘It is liberated.’
He understands: ‘Birth is destroyed, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more coming to any state of being.’
A wise man certainly would live the holy life with a teacher under whom a disciple attains such a lofty distinction, and while living it he would attain the true way, the Dhamma that is wholesome.”
“But, Master Ananda, when a bhikkhu is an arahant with taints destroyed, one who has lived the holy life, done what had to be done, laid down the burden, reached the true goal, destroyed the fetters of being, and is completely liberated through final knowledge, could he enjoy sensual pleasures?”
“Sandaka, when a bhikkhu is an arahant with taints destroyed …and is completely liberated through final knowledge, he is incapable of transgression in five cases.
A bhikkhu whose taints are destroyed is incapable of deliberately depriving a living being of life; he is incapable of taking what is not given, that is, of stealing; he is incapable of indulging in sexual intercourse; he is incapable of knowingly speaking falsehood; he is incapable of enjoying sensual pleasures by storing them up as he did formerly in lay life.
“But, Master Ananda, when a bhikkhu is an arahant with taints destroyed… is his knowledge and vision that his taints are destroyed continuously and uninterruptedly present to him whether he is walking or standing or sleeping or awake?”
“As to that, Sandaka, I shall give you a simile, for some wise men here understand the meaning of a statement by means of a simile.
Suppose a man’s hands and feet were cut off. Would he know ‘My hands and feet are cut off’ continuously and uninterruptedly, whether he is walking or standing or sleeping or awake, or would he know ‘My hands and feet are cut off’ only when he reviews this fact?”
“The man, Master Ananda, would not know ‘My hands and feet are cut off’ continuously and uninterruptedly; rather, he would know ‘My hands and feet are cut off’ only when he reviews this fact.”
“So too, Sandaka, when a bhikkhu is an arahant with taints destroyed…his knowledge and vision that his taints are destroyed is not continuously and uninterruptedly present to him whether he is walking or standing or sleeping or awake; rather, he knows ‘My taints are destroyed’ only when he reviews this fact.”
“How many emancipated are there in this Dhamma and Discipline, Master Ananda?”
“There are not only one hundred, Sandaka, or two hundred, three hundred, four hundred or five hundred, but far more emancipated ones than that in this Dhamma and Discipline.”
“It is wonderful, Master Ananda, it is marvellous!
There is no lauding of one’s own Dhamma and no disparaging of the Dhamma of others; there is the teaching of the Dhamma in its full range, and so many emancipated ones appear.
But these Ajivakas, those mothers’ dead sons, laud themselves and disparage others, and they recognise only three emancipated ones, namely, Nanda Vaccha, Kisa Sankicca, and Makkhali Gosala.”
Then the wanderer Sandaka addressed his own assembly: “Go, sirs. The holy life is to be lived under the recluse Gotama.
It is not easy for us now to give up gain, honour, and renown.”
That is how the wanderer Sandaka exhorted his own assembly to live the holy life under the Blessed One.
one of the recluse Gotama’s disciples staying in Kosambi.
and the wanderer Sandaka took a low seat and sat down at one side.
…after death they do not exist.”
…there is no merit and no outcome of merit.”
What do I know and see that I should lead the holy life under this teacher?’
“Again, Sandaka, here some teacher holds such a doctrine and view as this: ‘There is no cause or condition for the defilement of beings; beings are defiled without cause or condition. There is no cause or condition for the purification of beings; beings are purified without cause or condition. There is no power, no energy, no manly strength, no manly endurance. All beings, all living things, all creatures, all souls are without mastery, power, and energy; moulded by destiny, circumstance, and nature, they experience pleasure and pain in the six classes.’
…in the six classes.”
But it is superfluous for this good teacher…
Even those who cut off someone’s head with a sharp sword do not deprive anyone of life;
the sword merely passes through the space between the seven bodies.
Herein, there is no killer, no slaughterer, no hearer, no speaker, no cognizer, no intimater.
fools and the wise both will make an end of suffering.”
But it is superfluous for this good teacher to go about naked, to be shaven, to exert himself in the squatting position, and to pull out his hair and beard, since I, who live in a house crowded with children, who use Benares sandalwood, who wear garlands, scents, and unguents, and accept gold and silver, shall reap exactly the same destination, the same future course, as this good teacher.
“These, Sandaka, are the four ways that negate the living of the holy life that have been declared by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, wherein a wise man certainly would not live the holy life, or if he should live it, would not attain the true way, the Dhamma that is wholesome.”
how the four ways that negate the living of the holy life have been declared by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened…
But, Master Ananda, what are those four kinds of holy life without consolation that have been declared by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, wherein a wise man certainly would not live the holy life, or if he should live it, would not attain the true way, the Dhamma that is wholesome?”
he teaches a Dhamma by oral tradition, by legends handed down, by what has come down in scriptures.
…some is true and some is otherwise.’
“Again, Sandaka, here a certain teacher is a reasoner, an inquirer.
…some is true and some is otherwise.’
“Again, Sandaka, here a certain teacher is dull and confused.
So when he finds that this holy life is without consolation, he turns away from it and leaves it.
thus he engages in verbal wriggling, in eel-wriggling…’
“These, Sandaka, are the four kinds of holy life without consolation that have been declared by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, wherein a wise man certainly would not live the holy life, or if he should live it, would not attain the true way, the Dhamma that is wholesome.”
how the four kinds of holy life without consolation have been declared by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished andfully enlightened…
The venerable ones should know that it is for this reason that there is difference about the meaning and difference about the phrasing;
let them not fall into a dispute.’
let them not fall into a dispute.’
A wise man certainly would live the holy life with a teacher under whom a disciple attains such a lofty distinction…
With the abandoning of pleasure and pain…he enters upon and abides in the fourth jhana.
With the fading away as well of rapture…he enters upon and abides in the third jhana…
“When his concentrated mind is thus purified, bright, unblemished, rid of imperfection, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, he directs it to knowledge of the passing away and reappearance of beings……
let them not fall into a dispute.’
let them not fall into a dispute.’
Thus with the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, he sees beings passing away and reappearing, inferior and superior, fair and ugly, fortunate and unfortunate, and he understands how beings pass on according to their actions.
“When his concentrated mind is thus purified, bright, unblemished, rid of imperfection, malleable, wieldy, steady, and attained to imperturbability, he directs it to knowledge of the destruction of the taints.
let the venerable ones not fall into a dispute.’
let the venerable ones not fall into a dispute.’
When a bhikkhu is an arahant with taints destroyed…he is incapable of transgression in these five cases.”
Then, with the passing of seven days, after emerging from that concentration, the Blessed One went from the root of the Bodhi tree—the tree of awakening—to the Goatherd’s Banyan tree, and sat at the root of the Goatherd’s Banyan tree for seven days in one session, sensitive to the bliss of release.
Then a certain overbearing brahman went to the Blessed One and,
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he stood to one side.
As he was standing there, he said to the Blessed One, “To what extent, Master Gotama, is one a brahman? And which are the qualities that make one a brahman?”
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
“Any brahman who has banished evil qualities,
—not overbearing, not stained, his mind controlled—
gone to the end of wisdom, the holy life completed:
Rightly would that brahman speak the holy teaching.
He has no swelling of pride anywhere in the world.” Ud 1:4
The Discussion of the Goatherd’s Banyan Tree is finished.
Then, with the passing of seven days, after emerging from that concentration, the Blessed One went from the root of the Goatherd’s Banyan tree to the Mucalinda and sat at the root of the Mucalinda tree for seven days in one session, sensitive to the bliss of release.
And on that occasion a great, out-of-season storm-cloud rose up, with seven days of rainy weather, cold winds, & intense darkness.
Then Muccalinda the nāga king—leaving his dwelling place and encircling the Blessed One’s body seven times with his coils—stood with his great hood spread over the Blessed One, “Don’t let the Blessed One be disturbed by cold. Don’t let the Blessed One be disturbed by heat. Don’t let the Blessed One be disturbed by the touch of flies, mosquitoes, wind, sun, & creeping things.”
Then, with the passing of seven days, Muccalinda the nāga king, realizing that the sky had cleared and was free of clouds, unraveled his coils from the body of the Blessed One, abandoned his own appearance and, assuming the appearance of a young man, stood in front of the Blessed One with hands before his heart, paying homage.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
“Blissful is solitude for one who’s content, who has heard the Dhamma, who sees.
Blissful is non-affliction with regard for the world, restraint for living beings.
Blissful is dispassion with regard for the world, the overcoming of sensuality.
But the subduing of the conceit “I am” That is truly the ultimate bliss.”
The Discussion of the Mucalinda is finished.
Then, with the passing of seven days, after emerging from that concentration, the Blessed One went from the root of the Mucalinda to the Rājāyatana and sat at the root of the Rājāyatana tree for seven days in one session, sensitive to the bliss of release.
Now on that occasion the merchants Tapussa and Bhallika were traveling on the road from Ukkalā to that district.
Then a devatā who had been a blood-relative of Tapussa and Bhallika said to the merchants, “There is the Blessed One, my dears, staying at the root of the Rājāyatana tree, newly fully awakened. Go and serve the Blessed One cooked grain-meal and honey balls. That will be for your long-term welfare & happiness.”
Then the merchants Tapussa and Bhallika, taking cooked grain-meal and honey balls, went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, stood to one side.
As they were standing there, the merchants Tapussa and Bhallika said to the Blessed One, “Lord, May the Blessed One accept our cooked grain-meal and honey balls, for that will be for our long-term welfare & happiness.”
Then the thought occurred to the Blessed One, “Tathāgatas do not accept things with their hands.
How shall I accept the cooked grain-meal and honey balls?”
Then the Four Great Kings, having known with their awareness the train of thought in the Blessed One’s awareness, presented four stone bowls from the four directions to the Blessed One, “May the Blessed One accept the cooked grain-meal and honey balls here in the bowls.”
The Blessed One accepted the exquisite stone bowls and the cooked grain-meal and honey balls. Having accepted them, he consumed them.
Then the merchants Tapussa and Bhallika ME: knowing that the Blessed One had finished his meal and withdrawn his hand from the bowl, fell down with their heads at the Blessed One’s feet and said to the Blessed One, “We go to the Blessed One for refuge, & to the Dhamma. May the Blessed One remember us as lay followers who have gone for refuge from this day forward, for life.”
And they were the first two-statement1 lay followers in the world.
The Discussion of the Rājāyatana is finished.
Then, with the passing of seven days, after emerging from that concentration, the Blessed One went from the root of the Rājāyatana tree to the Goatherd’s Banyan tree.
He stayed there at the root of the Goatherd’s Banyan tree.
Then, while he was alone and in seclusion, this line of thinking arose in his awareness: “This Dhamma that I have attained is deep, hard to see, hard to realize, peaceful, refined, beyond the scope of conjecture, subtle, to-be-experienced by the wise.
“But this generation delights in attachment, is excited by attachment, enjoys attachment.
“For a generation delighting in attachment, excited by attachment, enjoying attachment, these things are hard to see: this/that conditionality and dependent co-arising. “This state, too, is very hard to see: the resolution of all fabrications, the relinquishment of all acquisitions, the ending of craving; dispassion; cessation; Unbinding.
“And if I were to teach the Dhamma and if others would not understand me, that would be tiresome for me, troublesome for me.”
Just then these verses, unspoken in the past, unheard before, occurred to the Blessed One:
“Enough now with teaching what only with difficulty I reached.
This Dhamma is not easily realized by those overcome with aversion & passion.
What is fine, subtle, deep, hard to see, going against the flow—
those delighting in passion, cloaked in the mass of darkness, won’t see.”
As the Blessed One reflected thus, his mind inclined to dwelling at ease, not to teaching the Dhamma.
Then Brahmā Sahampati, having known with his own awareness the line of thinking in the Blessed One’s awareness, thought: “The world is lost! The world is destroyed! In that the mind of the Tathāgata, the Arahant, the Rightly Self-awakened One inclines to dwelling at ease, not to teaching the Dhamma!”
Then, just as a strong man might extend his flexed arm or flex his extended arm, Brahmā Sahampati disappeared from the Brahmā-world and reappeared in front of the Blessed One.
Arranging his upper robe over one shoulder, he knelt down with his right knee on the ground, saluted the Blessed One with his hands before his heart, and said to him: “Lord, let the Blessed One teach the Dhamma! Let the One Well-Gone teach the Dhamma!
There are beings with little dust in their eyes who are falling away because they do not hear the Dhamma. There will be those who will understand the Dhamma.”
That is what Brahmā Sahampati said. Having said that, he further said this:
“In the past there appeared among the Magadhans
an impure Dhamma devised by the stained.
Throw open the door to the Deathless!
Let them hear the Dhamma realized by the Stainless One!
Just as one standing on a rocky crag
might see people all around below,
So, O wise one, with all-around vision,
ascend the palace fashioned of the Dhamma.
Free from sorrow, behold the people
submerged in sorrow, oppressed by birth & aging.
Rise up, hero, victor in battle!
O Caravan-leader, wander without debt in the world.
Teach the Dhamma, O Blessed One:
There will be those who will understand.”1
When that was said, the Blessed One said to Brahmā Sahampati, “To me, Brahmā, this thought occurred, ‘This Dhamma that I have attained is deep …’
A second time, the Blessed One said to Brahmā Sahampati, “Brahmā, this thought occurred to me, ‘This Dhamma that I have attained is deep …’
“As I reflected thus, Brahmā, my mind inclined to dwelling at ease, not to teaching the Dhamma.”
A third time, Brahmā Sahampati said to the Blessed One, “Lord, let the Blessed One teach the Dhamma! … Teach the Dhamma, O Blessed One:
Then the thought occurred to the Blessed One, “To whom should I teach the Dhamma first?
Who will quickly understand this Dhamma?
Then the thought occurred to him, “This Āḷāra Kālāma is wise, competent, intelligent. He has long had little dust in his eyes. What if I were to teach him the Dhamma first? He will quickly understand this Dhamma.”
Then an invisible devatā informed the Blessed One, “Lord, Āḷāra Kālāma died seven days ago.”
And knowledge & vision arose within him: “Āḷāra Kālāma died seven days ago.”
The thought occurred to him, “A great loss has Āḷāra Kālāma suffered. If he had heard this Dhamma, he would have quickly understood it.”
Then the thought occurred to the Blessed One, “To whom should I teach the Dhamma first?
Who will quickly understand this Dhamma?”
Then the thought occurred to him, “This Uddaka Rāmaputta is wise, competent, intelligent. He has long had little dust in his eyes. What if I were to teach him the Dhamma first? He will quickly understand this Dhamma.”
Then an invisible devatā informed the Blessed One, “Lord, Uddaka Rāmaputta died last night.”
And knowledge & vision arose within him: “Uddaka Rāmaputta died last night.”
The thought occurred to him, “A great loss has Uddaka Rāmaputta suffered. If he had heard this Dhamma, he would have quickly understood it.”
Then the thought occurred to the Blessed One, “To whom should I teach the Dhamma first?
Who will quickly understand this Dhamma?”
Then the thought occurred to him, “They were very helpful to me, the group of five monks who attended to me when I was resolute in exertion. What if I were to teach them the Dhamma first?”
Then the thought occurred to the Blessed One, “Where is the group of five monks staying now?”
And with the divine eye, purified & surpassing the human, he saw that they were staying near Bārāṇasī at the Deer Park in Isipatana.
Then, having stayed at Uruvelā as long as he liked, the Blessed One set out to wander by stages to Bārāṇasī.
Upaka the Ājīvaka saw the Blessed One traveling on the road between Gayā and the Awakening, and on seeing him said to him, “Clear, my friend, are your faculties. Pure your complexion, and bright.
On whose account have you gone forth?
Who is your teacher?
In whose Dhamma do you delight?”
When this was said, the Blessed One replied to Upaka the Ājīvaka in verses:
“All-vanquishing, all-knowing am I,
with regard to all things, unadhering.
All-abandoning, released in the ending of craving:
having fully known on my own, to whom should I point as my teacher? Dhp 353
I have no teacher, and one like me can’t be found.
In the world with its devas, I have no counterpart.
For I am an arahant in the world; I, the unexcelled teacher.
I, alone, am rightly self-awakened. Cooled am I, unbound.
To set rolling the wheel of Dhamma I go to the city of the Kasis.
In a world become blind, I beat the drum of the Deathless.”
Upaka: “From your claims, my friend, you deserve to be an infinite conqueror.”
“Conquerors are those like me who have reached fermentations’ end.
I’ve conquered evil qualities, and so, Upaka, I’m a conqueror.”
When this was said, Upaka said, “May it be so, my friend,” and—shaking his head, taking a side-road—he left.
Then, wandering by stages, the Blessed One arrived at Bārāṇasī, at the Deer Park in Isipatana, and went to where the group of five monks were staying.
From afar they saw him coming and, on seeing him, made a pact with one another, “Friends, here comes Gotama the contemplative: living luxuriously, straying from his exertion, backsliding into abundance.
“He doesn’t deserve to be bowed down to, to be greeted by standing up, or to have his robe & bowl received. “Still, a seat should be set out; if he wants to, he can sit down.”
But as the Blessed One approached, unable to keep to their pact, the group of five monks went out to greet the Blessed One.
One received his robe & bowl. Another laid out a seat. Another set out water for washing his feet, a foot-stand, and a pebble foot wiper.
The Blessed One sat down on the seat laid out. Having sat down, he washed his feet.
Still, they addressed the Blessed One by name and as “friend.”
When this was said, the Blessed One said to them, “Don’t address the Tathāgata by name and as ‘friend.’
“The Tathāgata, monks, is a worthy one, rightly self-awakened. “Lend ear, monks: the Deathless has been attained. “I will instruct you. I will teach you the Dhamma.
“Practicing as instructed, you will in no long time reach & remain in the supreme goal of the holy life for which sons of good families rightly go forth from home into homelessness, knowing & realizing it for yourselves in the here & now.”
When this was said, the group of five monks replied to Blessed One, “But, friend Gotama, by that practice, that conduct, that performance of austerities you did not attain any superior human states, any distinction in knowledge & vision worthy of a noble one. “So how can you now—living luxuriously, straying from your exertion, backsliding into abundance—have attained any superior human states, any distinction in knowledge & vision worthy of a noble one?”
When this was said, the Blessed One replied to them, “The Tathāgata, monks, is not living luxuriously, has not strayed from his exertion, has not backslid into abundance. “The Tathāgata, monks, is a worthy one, rightly self-awakened.
Lend ear, monks: the Deathless has been attained. I will instruct you. I will teach you the Dhamma.
Practicing as instructed, you will in no long time reach & remain in the supreme goal of the holy life for which clansmen rightly go forth from home into homelessness, knowing & realizing it for yourselves in the here & now.”
A second time, the group of five monks replied to Blessed One, …
A second time, the Blessed One replied to them, …
A third time, the group of five monks said to the Blessed One, “But, friend Gotama, by that practice, that conduct, that performance of austerities you did not attain any superior human states, any distinction in knowledge & vision worthy of a noble one. So how can you now—living luxuriously, straying from your exertion, backsliding into abundance—have attained any superior human states, any distinction in knowledge & vision worthy of a noble one?”
When this was said, the Blessed One replied to the group of five monks, “Monks, do you remember my ever saying this before now?”
“No, lord.”
“The Tathāgata, monks, is a worthy one, rightly self-awakened. Lend ear, monks: the Deathless has been attained. I will instruct you. I will teach you the Dhamma.
Practicing as instructed, you will in no long time reach & remain in the supreme goal of the holy life for which clansmen rightly go forth from home into homelessness, knowing & realizing it for yourselves in the here & now.”
And so the Blessed One was able to convince them.
Then the group of five monks were eager to listen to the Blessed One. They lent their ears and set their minds for the sake of knowledge.
Then he addressed the group of five monks: SN 56:11
“These two extremes are not to be indulged in by one who has gone forth—
“that which is devoted to sensual pleasure in sensuality: base, vulgar, common, ignoble, unprofitable; “and that which is devoted to self-affliction: painful, ignoble, unprofitable.
“Avoiding both of these extremes, the middle way realized by the Tathāgata—producing vision, producing knowledge—leads to calm, to direct knowledge, to self-awakening, to Unbinding.
“And what is the middle way realized by the Tathāgata that—producing vision, producing knowledge—leads to calm, to direct knowledge, to self-awakening, to Unbinding?
Precisely this Noble Eightfold Path: right view, right resolve, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration.
This is the middle way realized by the Tathāgata that—producing vision, producing knowledge—leads to calm, to direct knowledge, to self-awakening, to Unbinding.
“Now this, monks, is the noble truth of stress:
Birth is stressful, aging is stressful, death is stressful; sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair are stressful; association with the unbeloved is stressful, separation from the loved is stressful, not getting what is wanted is stressful.
In short, the five clinging-aggregates are stressful.
“And this, monks, is the noble truth of the origination of stress: the craving that makes for further becoming—accompanied by passion & delight, relishing now here & now there—i.e., craving for sensual pleasure, craving for becoming, craving for non-becoming.
“And this, monks, is the noble truth of the cessation of stress: the remainderless fading & cessation, renunciation, relinquishment, release, & letting go of that very craving.
“And this, monks, is the noble truth of the way of practice leading to the cessation of stress: precisely this Noble Eightfold Path—right view, … right concentration.
“Vision arose, insight arose, discernment arose, knowledge arose, illumination arose within me with regard to things never heard before: ‘This is the noble truth of stress.’
“… ‘This noble truth of stress is to be comprehended.’
“Vision arose, insight arose, discernment arose, knowledge arose, illumination arose within me with regard to things never heard before: ‘ … has been comprehended.’
“Vision arose, insight arose, discernment arose, knowledge arose, illumination arose within me with regard to things never heard before: ‘This is the noble truth of the origination of stress.’
“… ‘This noble truth of the origination of stress is to be abandoned.’
“Vision arose, insight arose, discernment arose, knowledge arose, illumination arose within me with regard to things never heard before: ‘This noble truth of the origination of stress has been abandoned.’
“Vision arose, insight arose, discernment arose, knowledge arose, illumination arose within me with regard to things never heard before: ‘This is the noble truth of the cessation of stress.’
“… ‘This noble truth of the cessation of stress is to be directly experienced.’
“Vision arose, insight arose, discernment arose, knowledge arose, illumination arose within me with regard to things never heard before: ‘… has been directly experienced.’
“Vision arose, insight arose, discernment arose, knowledge arose, illumination arose within me with regard to things never heard before: ‘This is the noble truth of the way of practice leading to the cessation of stress.’
“… ‘This noble truth of the way of practice leading to the cessation of stress is to be developed.’
“Vision arose, insight arose, discernment arose, knowledge arose, illumination arose within me with regard to things never heard before: ‘… has been developed.’
“And, monks, as long as this—my three-round, twelve-permutation knowledge & vision concerning these four noble truths as they have come to be—was not pure, I did not claim to have directly awakened to the right self-awakening unexcelled in the cosmos with its deities, Māras, & Brahmās, with its contemplatives & brahmans, its royalty & commonfolk.
“And, monks, as long as this—my three-round, twelve-permutation knowledge & vision concerning these four noble truths as they have come to be—was not pure, I did not claim to have directly awakened to the right self-awakening unexcelled in the cosmos with its deities, Māras, & Brahmās, with its contemplatives & brahmans, its royalty & commonfolk.
Knowledge & vision arose in me: ‘Unprovoked is my release. This is the last birth. There is now no further becoming.’”
And while this explanation was being given, there arose to Ven. Kondañña the dustless, stainless Dhamma eye— “Whatever is subject to origination is all subject to cessation.”
And when the Blessed One had set the Wheel of Dhamma in motion, the earth devas cried out: “At Bārāṇasī, in the Game Refuge at Isipatana, the Blessed One has set in motion the unexcelled Wheel of Dhamma that cannot be stopped by brahman or contemplative, deva, Māra, or Brahmā, or anyone in the cosmos.”
On hearing the earth devas’ cry, the devas of the Four Kings’ Heaven took up the cry. On hearing the devas of the Four Great Kings’ cry, the devas of the Thirty-three took up the cry. the Yama devas… the Tusita devas… the Nimmānarati devas… the Paranimmita-vasavatti devas… the devas of Brahmā’s retinue took up the cry: “At Bārāṇasī, in the Game Refuge at Isipatana, the Blessed One has set in motion the unexcelled Wheel of Dhamma that cannot be stopped by brahman or contemplative, deva, Māra, or Brahmā, or anyone at all in the cosmos.”
So in that moment, that instant, the cry shot right up to the Brahmā worlds.
And this ten-thousand fold cosmos shivered & quivered & quaked, while a great, measureless radiance appeared in the cosmos, surpassing the deva-effulgence of the devas.
Then the Blessed One exclaimed: “So you really know, Kondañña? So you really know?”
And that is how Ven. Kondañña acquired the name Aññā-Kondañña—Kondañña who knows.
Then Ven. Aññā-Koṇḍañña, having seen the Dhamma, having attained the Dhamma, having known the Dhamma, having fathomed the Dhamma, having crossed over and beyond uncertainty, having no more perplexity, having gained fearlessness, independence of others with regard to the Teacher’s message, said to the Blessed One, “May I receive the Going-forth in the Blessed One’s presence? May I receive the Acceptance?”
“Come, bhikkhu,” said the Blessed One. “The Dhamma is well-taught. Live the holy life for the right ending of stress.” BMC
Such was the venerable one’s Acceptance.
Then the Blessed One taught and admonished the other monks with talk on the dhamma.
Then, being taught and admonished by the Blessed One with talk on the Dhamma, the dustless, spotless eye of Dhamma arose for Ven. Vappa and Ven. Bhaddiya—“Whatever is subject to origination is all subject to cessation.”
They, having seen the Dhamma, having attained the Dhamma, having known the Dhamma, having fathomed the Dhamma, having crossed over and beyond uncertainty, having no more perplexity, having gained fearlessness, independence of others with regard to the Teacher’s message, said to the Blessed One, “May we receive the Going-forth in the Blessed One’s presence? May we receive the Acceptance?”
“Come, bhikkhus,” said the Blessed One. “The Dhamma is well-taught. Live the holy life for the right ending of stress.”
Such was the venerable ones’ Acceptance.
Then the Blessed One, subsisting on food brought back, taught and admonished the remaining monks with talk on the dhamma.
Whatever three monks brought back, having gone on their almsround, with that the group of six sustained themselves.
Then, being taught and admonished by the Blessed One with talk on the Dhamma, the dustless, spotless eye of Dhamma arose for Venerable Mahānāma and Venerable Assaji—“Whatever is subject to origination is all subject to cessation.”
They, having seen the Dhamma, having attained the Dhamma, having known the Dhamma, having fathomed the Dhamma, having crossed over and beyond uncertainty, having no more perplexity, having gained fearlessness, independence of others with regard to the Teacher’s message, said to the Blessed One, “May we receive the Going-forth in the Blessed One’s presence? May we receive the Acceptance?”
Come, bhikkhus,” said the Blessed One. “The Dhamma is well-taught. Live the holy life for the right ending of stress.”
Such was the venerable ones’ Acceptance.
Then the Blessed One addressed the group of five monks: SN 22:59
“Form, monks, is not self.
“If form were the self, this form would not lend itself to dis-ease. It would be possible with regard to form, ‘Let my form be thus. Let my form not be thus.’
“But precisely because form is not self, this form lends itself to dis-ease. And it is not possible with regard to form, ‘Let my form be thus. Let my form not be thus.’
“Feeling is not self.
“If feeling were the self, feeling would not lend itself to dis-ease. It would be possible with regard to feeling, ‘Let my feeling be thus. Let my feeling not be thus.’
“But precisely because feeling is not self, feeling lends itself to dis-ease. And it is not possible with regard to feeling, ‘Let my feeling be thus. Let my feeling not be thus.’
“Perception is not self.
“If perception were the self, perception would not lend itself to dis-ease. It would be possible with regard to perception, ‘Let my perception be thus. Let my form not be thus.’
“But precisely because perception is not self, perception lends itself to dis-ease. And it is not possible with regard to perception, ‘Let my perception be thus. Let my perception not be thus.’
“Fabrications are not self.
“If fabrications were the self, fabrications would not lend themselves to dis-ease. It would be possible with regard to fabrications, ‘Let my fabrications be thus. Let my fabrications not be thus.’
“But precisely because fabrications are not self, fabrications lend themselves to dis-ease. And it is not possible with regard to fabrications, ‘Let my fabrications be thus. Let my fabrications not be thus.’
“Consciousness is not self.
“If consciousness were the self, consciousness would not lend itself to dis-ease. It would be possible with regard to consciousness, ‘Let my consciousness be thus. Let my consciousness not be thus.’
“But precisely because consciousness is not self, consciousness lends itself to dis-ease. And it is not possible with regard to consciousness, ‘Let my consciousness be thus. Let my consciousness not be thus.’
“What do you think, monks? Is form constant or inconstant?”
“Inconstant, lord.”
“And is that which is inconstant easeful or stressful?”
“Stressful, lord.”
“And is it fitting to regard what is inconstant, stressful, subject to change as: ‘This is mine. This is my self. This is what I am’?”
“No, lord.”
“Is feeling constant or inconstant?”
“Inconstant, lord.”
“And is that which is inconstant easeful or stressful?”
“Stressful, lord.”
“And is it fitting to regard what is inconstant, stressful, subject to change as: ‘This is mine. This is my self. This is what I am’?”
“No, lord.”
“Is perception constant or inconstant?”
“Inconstant, lord.”
“And is that which is inconstant easeful or stressful?”
“Stressful, lord.”
“And is it fitting to regard what is inconstant, stressful, subject to change as: ‘This is mine. This is my self. This is what I am’?”
“No, lord.”
“Are fabrications constant or inconstant?”
“Inconstant, lord.”
“And is that which is inconstant easeful or stressful?”
“Stressful, lord.”
“And is it fitting to regard what is inconstant, stressful, subject to change as: ‘This is mine. This is my self. This is what I am’?”
“No, lord.”
“Is consciousness constant or inconstant?”
“Inconstant, lord.”
“And is that which is inconstant easeful or stressful?”
“Stressful, lord.”
“And is it fitting to regard what is inconstant, stressful, subject to change as: ‘This is mine. This is my self. This is what I am’?”
“No, lord.”
“Thus, monks, any form whatsoever that is past, future, or present; internal or external; blatant or subtle; common or sublime; far or near: Every form is to be seen with right discernment as it has come to be: ‘This is not mine. This is not my self. This is not what I am.’
“Any feeling whatsoever that is past, future, or present; internal or external; blatant or subtle; common or sublime; far or near: Every feeling is to be seen with right discernment as it has come to be: ‘This is not mine. This is not my self. This is not what I am.’
“Any perception whatsoever that is past, future, or present; internal or external; blatant or subtle; common or sublime; far or near: Every perception is to be seen with right discernment as it has come to be: ‘This is not mine. This is not my self. This is not what I am.’
“Any fabrications whatsoever that are past, future, or present; internal or external; blatant or subtle; common or sublime; far or near: Every fabrication is to be seen with right discernment as it has come to be: ‘This is not mine. This is not my self. This is not what I am.’
“Any consciousness whatsoever that is past, future, or present; internal or external; blatant or subtle; common or sublime; far or near: Every consciousness is to be seen with right discernment as it has come to be: ‘This is not mine. This is not my self. This is not what I am.’
“Seeing thus, the instructed disciple of the noble ones grows disenchanted with form, disenchanted with feeling, disenchanted with perception, disenchanted with fabrications, disenchanted with consciousness. “Disenchanted, he becomes dispassionate. “Through dispassion, he is released. “With release, there is the knowledge, ‘Released.’ “He discerns that ‘Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done. There is nothing further for this world.’”
That is what the Blessed One said.
Gratified, the group of five monks delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
And while this explanation was being given, the minds of the group of five monks, through lack of clinging/sustenance, were released from effluents.
At that time there were six arahants in the world.
The Discussion of the Group of Five is finished
The first recitation section .
on arrival, exchanged courteous greetings with him.
rather, the person should be examined thus: ‘I shall not be troubled and the other person will not be hurt; for the other person is not given to anger and revenge, he is not firmly attached to his view and he relinquishes easily, and I can make that person emerge from the unwholesome and establish him in the wholesome.’
but it is a much greater thing that I can make that person emerge from the unwholesome and establish him in the wholesome.’
for the other person is not given to anger and revenge, though he is firmly attached to his view and he relinquishes with difficulty; yet I can make that person emerge from the unwholesome and establish him in the wholesome.
but it is a much greater thing that I can make that person emerge from the unwholesome and establish him in the wholesome.’
for the other person is given to anger and revenge, and he is firmly attached to his view and he relinquishes with difficulty; yet I can make that person emerge from the unwholesome and establish him in the wholesome.
but it is a much greater thing that I can make that person emerge from the unwholesome and establish him in the wholesome.’
for the other person is given to anger and revenge, and he is firmly attached to his view and he relinquishes with difficulty; and I cannot make that person emerge from the unwholesome and establish him in the wholesome.’
Thus have I heard. On one occasion the Blessed One was dwelling at Savatthi in Jeta’s Grove, Anathapindika’s Park…. “Bhikkhus, there are these four kinds of nutriment for the maintenance of beings that have already come to be and for the assistance of those about to come to be.17
What four?
The nutriment edible food, gross or subtle; second, contact; third, mental volition; fourth, consciousness.
These are the four kinds of nutriment for the maintenance of beings that have already come to be and for the assistance of those about to come to be.18
These four kinds of nutriment have craving as their source, craving as their origin; they are born and produced from craving.19
This craving has feeling as its source, feeling as its origin; it is born and produced from feeling.
“And this feeling has what as its source…?
Feeling has contact as its source….
And this contact has what as its source…?
Contact has the six sense bases as its source ….
And these six sense bases have what as their source…?
The six sense bases have name-and-form as their source….
And this name-and-form has what as its source…?
Name-and-form has consciousness as its source….
And this consciousness has what as its source-..?
Consciousness has volitional formations as its source….
And these volitional formations have what as their source, what as their origin, from what are they born and produced?
Volitional formations have ignorance as their source, ignorance as their origin; they are born and produced from ignorance.
“Thus, bhikkhus, with ignorance as condition, volitional formations come to be; with volitional formations as condition, consciousness …. Such is the origin of this whole mass of suffering.
But with the remainderless fading away and cessation of ignorance comes cessation of volitional formations; with the cessation of volitional formations, cessation of consciousness…. Such is the cessation of this whole mass of suffering.”
“Bhikkhus, these four kinds of nutriment have what as their source, what as their origin, from what are they born and produced?
“And this craving has what as its source, what as its origin, from what is it born and produced?
THUS HAVE I HEARD.935 On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Savatthi in Jeta’s Grove, Anathapindika’s Park.
There he addressed the bhikkhus thus: “Bhikkhus.”
- “Venerable sir,” they replied.
The Blessed One said this: 2. “Bhikkhus, there are some recluses and brahmins who speculate about the future and hold views about the future, who assert various doctrinal propositions concerning the future.
 Some assert thus: ‘The self is percipient and unimpaired936 after death.’ Some assert thus: ‘The self is non-percipient and unimpaired after death.’ Some assert thus: “The self is neither percipient nor nonpercipient and unimpaired after death.’ Or they describe the annihilation, destruction, and extermination of an existing being at death. Or some assert Nibbana here and now.
“Thus they either describe an existing self that is unimpaired after death; or they describe the annihilation, destruction, arid extermination of an existing being at death; or they assert Nibbana here and now.
Thus these views being five become three, and being three become five. This is the summary of the ‘five and three.’
 “Therein, bhikkhus, those recluses and brahmins who describe the self as percipient and unimpaired after death describe such a self, percipient and unimpaired after death, to be either: material; or immaterial; or both material and immaterial; or neither material nor immaterial; or percipient of unity; or percipient of diversity; or percipient of the limited; or percipient of the immeasurable.937 Or else, among those few who go beyond this, some assert the consciousness-kasina, immeasurable and imperturbable, to be the self.938
‘Those good recluses and brahmins who describe the self as percipient and unimpaired after death describe such a self to be either material…or they describe it to be percipient of the immeasurable. Or else, since the perception “there is nothing” is declared to be the purest, supreme, best, and unsurpassed of those perceptions - whether perceptions of form or of the formless, of the limited or the immeasurable939 -
That is conditioned and gross, but there is cessation of formations.’ Having known ‘There is this,’ seeing the escape from that, the Tathagata has gone beyond that.940
Why is that?
Because they say: ‘Perception is a disease, perception is a tumour, perception is a dart; this is peaceful, this is sublime, that is, non-perception.’
“The Tathagata, bhikkhus, understands this thus: Those good recluses and brahmins who describe the self as non-percipient and unimpaired after death describe such a self, non-percipient and unimpaired after death, to be either material…or neither material nor immaterial.
That any recluse or brahmin could say: “Apart from material form, apart from feeling, apart from perception, apart from formations, I shall describe the coming and going of consciousness, its passing away and re-appearance, its growth, increase, and maturation” - that is impossible.942
That is conditioned and gross, but there is cessation of formations.’ Having known ‘There is this,’ seeing the escape from that, the Tathagata has gone beyond that.
 “Therein, bhikkhus, those recluses and brahmins who describe the self as neither percipient nor non-percipient and unimpaired after death describe such a self, neither percipient nor non-percipient and unimpaired after death, to be either: material; or immaterial; or both material and immaterial; or neither material nor immaterial.943
Why is that?
Because they say: ‘Perception is a disease, perception is a tumour, perception is a dart, and non-perception is stupefaction;944 this is peaceful, this is sublime, that is, neither- perception-nor-non-perception.’ 10. “The Tathagata, bhikkhus, understands this thus:
If any recluses or brahmins describe the entering upon this base to come about through a measure of formations regarding what is seen, heard, sensed, and cognized, that is declared to be a disaster for entering upon this base.945
That is conditioned and gross, but there is cessation of formations.’ Having known ‘There is this’ seeing the escape from that, the Tathagata has gone beyond that.
 “Therein, bhikkhus, those recluses and brahmins who describe the annihilation, destruction, and extermination of an existing being at death947 criticise those good recluses and brahmins who describe the self as percipient and unimpaired after death, and they criticise those good recluses and brahmins who describe the self as non-percipient and unimpaired after death, and they criticise those good recluses and brahmins who describe the self as neither percipient nor non-percipient and unimpaired after death.
Why is that?
All these good recluses and brahmins, rushing onwards, assert their attachment thus: ‘We shall be thus after death, we shall be thus after death.’
Just as a merchant going to market thinks: ‘Through this, that will be mine; with this, I will get that’; so too, these good recluses and brahmins seem like merchants when they declare: ‘We shall be thus after death, we shall be thus after death.’
“The Tathagata, bhikkhus, understands this thus:
Just as a dog bound by a leash tied to a firm post or pillar keeps on running and circling around that same post or pillar; so too, these good recluses and brahmins, through fear of personality and disgust with personality, keep running and circling around that same personali.
That is conditioned and gross, but there is cessation of formations.’ Having known ‘There is this,’ seeing the escape from that, the Tathagata has gone beyond that.
“Bhikkhus, any recluses or brahmins who speculate about the future and hold views about the future, who assert various doctrinal propositions concerning the future, all assert these five bases or a certain one among them.949
Some assert thus: ‘The self and the world are eternal: only this is true, anything else is wrong.’ 950 Some assert thus: “The self and the world are not eternal: only this is true, anything else is wrong.’ 951 Some assert thus: ‘The self and the world are both eternal and not eternal: only this is true, anything else is wrong.’ 952 Some assert thus: “The self and the world are neither eternal nor not eternal: only this is true, anything else is wrong.’ 953 Some assert thus: “The self and the world are finite: only this is true, anything else is wrong’ Some assert thus: “The self and the world are infinite: only this is true, anything else is wrong.’ Some assert thus: ‘The self and the world are both finite and infinite: only this is true, anything else is wrong.’ Some assert thus: “The self and the world are neither finite nor infinite: only this is true, anything else is wrong.’ Some assert thus: ‘The self and the world are percipient of unity: only this is true, anything else is wrong.’ 955 Some assert thus: ‘The self and the world are percipient of diversity: only this is true, anything else is wrong.’ Some assert thus: “The self and the world are percipient of the limited: only this is true, anything else is wrong.’ Some assert thus: ‘The self and the world are percipient of the immeasurable: only this is true, anything else is wrong.’ Some assert thus: ‘The self and the world experience exclusively pleasure: only this is true, anything else is wrong.’ Some assert thus: ‘The self and the world experience exclusively pain: only this is true, anything else is wrong.’ Some assert thus: ‘The self and the world experience both pleasure and pain: only this is true, anything else is wrong.’ Some assert thus: ‘The self and the world experience neither pleasure nor pain: only this is true, anything else is wrong.’
“Therein, bhikkhus, as to those recluses and brahmins who hold such a doctrine and view as this: ‘The self and the world are eternal: only this is true, anything else is wrong/ that apart from faith, apart from approval, apart from oral tradition, apart from reasoned cogitation, apart from reflective acceptance of a view, they will have any pure and clear personal knowledge of this - that is impossible.956
That is conditioned and gross, but there is cessation of formations. Having known ‘There is this’ seeing the escape from that, the Tathagata has gone beyond that.
 “Therein, bhikkhus, as to those recluses and brahmins who hold such a doctrine and view as this: ‘The self and the world are not eternal…both eternal and not eternal…neither eternal nor not eternal…finite…infinite…both finite and infinite…neither finite nor infinite.-.percipient of unity…percipient of diversity…percipient of the limited…percipient of the immeasurable, experience exclusively pleasure, experience exclusively pain, experience both pleasure and pain, experience neither pleasure nor pain: only this is true, anything else is wrong’ that apart from faith, apart from approval, apart from oral tradition, apart from reasoned cogitation, apart from reflective acceptance of a view, they will have any pure and clear personal knowledge of this - that is impossible.
Since they have no pure and clear personal knowledge, even the mere fragmentary knowledge that those good recluses and brahmins clarify about their view is declared to be clinging on their part.
That is conditioned and gross, but there is cessation of formations. Having known ‘There is this’ seeing the escape from that, the Tathagata has gone beyond that.958
That rapture of seclusion ceases in him.
With the cessation of the rapture of seclusion, grief arises, and with the cessation of grief, the rapture of seclusion arises.962
“The Tathagata, bhikkhus, understands this thus:
and with the cessation of grief, the rapture of seclusion arises.
That is conditioned and gross, but there is cessation of formations.’ Having known ‘There is this,’ seeing the escape from that, the Tathagata has gone beyond that.
“Here, bhikkhus, some recluse or brahmin, with the relinquishing of views about the past and the future, through complete lack of resolve upon the fetters of sensual pleasure, and with the surmounting of the rapture of seclusion, enters upon and abides in unworldly pleasure.963 He thinks: ‘This is the peaceful, this is the sublime, that I enter upon and abide in unworldly pleasure.’
That unworldly pleasure ceases in him.
With the cessation of unworldly pleasure, the rapture of seclusion arises, and with the cessation of the rapture of seclusion, unworldly pleasure arises.
Just as the sunlight pervades the area that the shadow leaves, and the shadow pervades the area that the sunlight leaves, so too, with the cessation of unworldly pleasure, the rapture of seclusion arises and with the cessation of the rapture of seclusion, unworldly pleasure arises.
“The Tathagata, bhikkhus, understands this thus:
‘This good recluse or brahmin, with the relinquishing of views about the past and the future…
That is conditioned and gross, but there is cessation of formations.’ Having known ‘There is this’ seeing the escape from that, the Tathagata has gone beyond that.
“Here, bhikkhus, some recluse or brahmin, with the relinquishing of views about the past and the future, through complete lack of resolve upon the fetters of sensual pleasure, and with the surmounting of the rapture of seclusion and unworldly pleasure, enters upon and abides in neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling.964 He thinks: ‘This is the peaceful, this is the sublime, that I enter upon and abide in neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling.’
That neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling ceases in him.
With the cessation of neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling, unworldly pleasure arises, and with the cessation of unworldly pleasure, neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling arises.
Just as the sunlight pervades the area that the shadow leaves, and the shadow pervades the area that the sunlight leaves, so too, with the cessation of neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling, unworldly pleasure arises, and with the cessation of unworldly pleasure, neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling arises.
“The Tathagata, bhikkhus, understands this thus:
That is conditioned and gross, but there is cessation of formations.’ Having known ‘There is this,’ seeing the escape from that, the Tathagata has gone beyond that.
“Here, bhikkhus, some recluse or brahmin, with the relinquishing of views about the past and the future, through complete lack of resolve upon the fetters of sensual pleasure, and with the surmounting of the rapture of seclusion, unworldly pleasure, and neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling, regards himself thus: I am at peace, I have attained Nibbana, I am without clinging.’965
“The Tathagata, bhikkhus, understands this thus:
Yet this good recluse or brahmin still clings, clinging either to a view about the past or to a view about the future or to a fetter of sensual pleasure or to the rapture of seclusion or to unworldly pleasure or to neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling.
And when this venerable one regards himself thus: “I am at peace, I have attained Nibbana, I am without clinging,” that too is declared to be clinging on the part of this good recluse or brahmin.966
That is conditioned and gross, but there is cessation of formations.’ Having understood ‘There is this,’ seeing the escape from that, the Tathagata has gone beyond that.
“Bhikkhus, this supreme state of sublime peace has been discovered by the Tathagata, that is, liberation through not clinging,967 by understanding as they actually are the origination, the disappearance, the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of the six bases of contact. Bhikkhus, that is the supreme state of sublime peace discovered by the Tathagata, that is, liberation through not clinging, by understanding as they actually are the origination, the disappearance, the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of the six bases of contact.”968
That is what the Blessed One said.
The bhikkhus were satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
There is no giving He says this intending that there are no fruits of giving, offering, and liberality.
Then the Blessed One, having understood Brahmā’s invitation, out of compassion for beings, surveyed the world with the eye of an Awakened One.
As he surveyed the world with the eye of an Awakened One, he saw beings with little dust in their eyes and those with much, those with keen faculties and those with dull, those with good attributes and those with bad, those easy to teach and those hard, some of them seeing disgrace and danger in the other world.
Just as in a pond of blue or red or white lotuses, some blue or red or white lotuses—born and growing in the water—might flourish while immersed in the water, without rising up from the water; some might stand at an even level with the water; while some might rise up from the water and stand without being smeared by the water— so too, surveying the world with the eye of an Awakened One, the Blessed One saw beings with little dust in their eyes and those with much, those with keen faculties and those with dull, those with good attributes and those with bad, those easy to teach and those hard, some of them seeing disgrace and danger in the other world. Having seen this, he answered Brahmā Sahampati in verse:
“Open are the doors to the Deathless.
Let those with ears unleash their conviction.
Perceiving trouble, O Brahmā,
I did not tell people the refined, sublime Dhamma.”
Then Brahmā Sahampati, thinking, “I’m the one who created the opportunity for the teaching of the Dhamma by the Blessed One,” bowed down to the Blessed One, circumambulated him, keeping him to his right, and disappeared right there.
The Discussion of the Brahmā’s Request is finished.
“As I reflected thus, Brahmā, my mind inclined to dwelling at ease, not to teaching the Dhamma.”
A second time, Brahmā Sahampati said to the Blessed One, “Lord, let the Blessed One teach the Dhamma! …”
There are beings with little dust in their eyes who are falling away because they do not hear the Dhamma. There will be those who will understand the Dhamma.”
“The Tathagata, bhikkhus, understands this thus:
some assert the base of nothingness, immeasurable and imperturbable, to be the self.
 “Therein, bhikkhus, those recluses and brahmins who describe the self as non-percipient and unimpaired after death describe such a self, noh-percipient and unimpaired after death, to be either: material; or immaterial; or both material and immaterial; or neither material nor immaterial.941
“Therein, bhikkhus, these criticise those recluses and brahmins who describe the self as percipient and unimpaired after death.
“Therein, bhikkhus, these criticise those good recluses and brahmins who describe the self as percipient and unimpaired after death, and they criticise those good recluses and brahmins who describe the self as non-percipient and unimpaired after death.
‘Those good recluses and brahmins who describe the self as neither percipient nor non-percipient and unimpaired after death describe such a self, neither percipient nor non-percipient and unimpaired after death, to be either material…or neither material nor immaterial.
‘Those good recluses and brahmins who describe the annihilation, destruction, and extermination of an existing being at death, through fear of personality and disgust with personality, keep running and circling around that same personality.948
Then the Blessed One addressed the monks, “I am released from all snares, whether human or divine.
“Monks, you are also released from all snares, whether human or divine.
“Wander, monks, for the benefit & happiness of many, out of sympathy for the world, for the welfare, benefit, & happiness of human beings and devas.
“Don’t any two of you go the same way.
“Teach the Dhamma fine in the beginning, fine in the middle, fine in the end. Expound the holy life both in its particulars and in its essence, entirely complete, surpassingly pure.
“There are beings with little dust in their eyes who are falling away because they do not hear the Dhamma. There will be those who will understand the Dhamma.
I will go to the military town of Uruvelā to teach the Dhamma.”
Then Mara the Evil One went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, recited this verse in his presence:
“You’re bound by all snares, human and divine.
You’re bound by a great bond— Contemplative, you’re not freed from me.”
The Buddha: “I’m released from all snares, whether human or divine.
I’m freed from the great bond— You’re struck down, End-maker.”
Māra: ”A snare of the mind, that travels in the air—
I will bind you with it. Contemplative, you’re not freed from me.”
The Buddha: Forms, sounds, aromas and tastes, tactile sensations that delight the mind—
My desire there is gone. You’re struck down, End-maker.”
Then Māra the Evil One—sad & dejected , “The Blessed One knows me; the One Well-Gone knows me”
—vanished right there.
The Discussion of Māra is finished
At that time, the monks were bringing those wanting the Going-forth and those wanting the Acceptance from many countries and many directions, “The Blessed One will give them the Going-forth and the Acceptance.”
That tired the monks, along with those wanting the Going-forth and those wanting the Acceptance.
Then, when the Blessed One was alone in seclusion, this train of thought arose in his awareness: “At this time, the monks are bringing those wanting the Going-forth and those wanting the Acceptance from many countries and many directions, ‘The Blessed One will give them the Going-forth and the Acceptance.’
“That tires the monks, along with those wanting the Going-forth and those wanting the Acceptance.
“Why don’t I allow the monks: ‘Monks, you may now give the Going-forth and the Acceptance in whatever country, in whatever direction’?”
Then, in the evening, rising from seclusion, the Blessed One, having assembled the Saṅgha of monks and given a Dhamma talk with regard to this cause, to this incident, addressed the monks: “Monks, just now, when I was alone in seclusion, this train of thought arose in my awareness: “‘At this time, the monks are bringing those wanting the Going-forth and those wanting the Acceptance from many countries and many directions, ‘The Blessed One will give them the Going-forth and the Acceptance.’ “‘That tires the monks, along with those wanting the Going-forth and those wanting the Acceptance. “‘Why don’t I allow the monks: ‘Monks, you may now give the Going-forth and the Acceptance in whatever country, in whatever direction.’? “I allow you, monks, to now give the Going-forth and the Acceptance in whatever country, in whatever direction. Mv.I.28.3
“The Going-forth and Acceptance should be given like this:
“First—having gotten him to shave his head & beard, to clothe himself in ochre robes, to arrange his robe over one shoulder, to bow down at the feet of the monks, to sit in the kneeling position, and to raise his hands palm-to-palm in front of the heart—he should be told, ‘Say this: “‘“I go to the Buddha for refuge. I go to the Dhamma for refuge. I go to the Saṅgha for refuge. A second time, I go to the Buddha for refuge. A second time, I go to the Dhamma for refuge. A second time, I go to the Saṅgha for refuge. A third time, I go to the Buddha for refuge. A third time, I go to the Dhamma for refuge. A third time, I go to the Saṅgha for refuge.”’
“Monks, I allow the Going-forth and the Acceptance by means of these three goings for refuge.”
The Discussion of Acceptance by Three Goings-for-refuge is finished.
At that time in Bārāṇasī there was a son of a good family named Yasa—delicate, a money-lender’s son.
He had three palaces: one for the cold season, one for the hot season, and one for the rainy season.
For four months, he was entertained in the rainy-season palace by minstrels without a single man among them, and he did not once come down from the palace.
Then the young man Yasa, enjoying himself, provided & endowed with the five strings of sensuality, fell asleep first. Then his retinue fell asleep afterwards. An oil lamp was left burning the whole night.
Then Yasa, waking up first, saw his retinue sleeping—one with a vīṇā under her arm, another with a mudiṅga drum around her neck, another with an āḷambara drum on her chest, another with disheveled hair, another drooling, others babbling in their sleep—like a charnel ground, as it were, right within reach.
Seeing this, the drawbacks became apparent, and his mind became established in disenchantment.
Then Yasa exclaimed: “How distressing! How oppressive! ”
Then Yasa put on his golden slippers and went to the door of the residence.
Non-human beings opened the door, “May there be no obstacle to Yasa’s Going-forth from home into homelessness.”
Then Yasa went to the city gate.
Non-human beings opened the gate, “May there be no obstacle to Yasa’s Going-forth from home into homelessness.”
Then Yasa went to the Deer Park in Isipatana.
At that time, the Blessed One, having gotten up as the night was ending, was walking back and forth in the open.
The Blessed One saw Yasa coming from afar and, on seeing him, got down from the walking path and sat down on a seat laid out.
Yasa, not far from the Blessed One, exclaimed: “How distressing! How oppressive! ”
Then the Blessed One said to Yasa, “Yasa, This isn’t distressing. This isn’t oppressive.
Come, Yasa. Sit down. I’ll teach you the Dhamma.”
Then Yasa, “He says this isn’t distressing, this isn’t oppressive,” thrilled and exultant, took off his golden slippers, went to the Blessed One, and on arrival bowed down to the Blessed One and sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, the Blessed One gave him a graduated talk: talk on generosity, talk on virtue, talk on heaven, talk on the drawbacks, lowliness, and defilement of sensuality, and talk on the rewards of renunciation.
When the Blessed One knew that Yasa’s mind was ready—malleable, free from hindrances, uplifted, and bright—he proclaimed the characteristic Dhamma talk of Buddhas: stress, origination, cessation, and path.
Just as a clean piece of cloth, free from grime, would properly take dye, in the same way the dustless, stainless eye of Dhamma arose for Yasa as he was sitting right there—“Whatever is subject to origination is all subject to cessation.”
Then Yasa’s mother, going up into the palace and not seeing Yasa, went to the money-lender and, on arrival, said to him, “Your son, Yasa, is nowhere to be seen, householder.”
So the money-lender sent horseback messengers out in the four directions and went himself to the game reserve in Isipatana.
He saw the tracks of the golden slippers and, on seeing them, followed them.
The Blessed One saw him coming from afar, and, on seeing him, the thought occurred to him, “Why don’t I fabricate a fabrication of psychic power such that the money-lender householder, sitting here, wouldn’t see Yasa sitting here? ”
Then the Blessed One fabricated such a fabrication of psychic power.
The money-lender householder approached the Blessed One and said, “Could it be, lord, that the Blessed One has seen Yasa the son of a good family? ”
“Now then, householder, sit down. It could be that, sitting here, you might indeed see Yasa sitting here.”
Then the money-lender— “He says I might, sitting right here, see Yasa sitting here,” thrilled and exultant, bowed down to the Blessed One and sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, the Blessed One gave him a graduated talk: talk on generosity, talk on virtue, talk on heaven, talk on the drawbacks, lowliness, and defilement of sensuality, and talk on the rewards of renunciation.
When the Blessed One knew that the money-lender’s mind was ready—malleable, free from hindrances, uplifted, and bright—he proclaimed the characteristic Dhamma talk of Buddhas: stress, origination, cessation, and path.
Just as a clean piece of cloth, free from grime, would properly take dye, in the same way the dustless, stainless eye of Dhamma arose for the money-lender as he was sitting right there— “Whatever is subject to origination is all subject to cessation.”
Then the money-lender, having seen the Dhamma, having attained the Dhamma, having known the Dhamma, having fathomed the Dhamma, having crossed over and beyond uncertainty, having no more perplexity, having gained fearlessness, independence of others with regard to the Teacher’s message, said to the Blessed One, “Magnificent, lord! Magnificent! Just as if he were to place upright what was overturned, to reveal what was hidden, to show the way to one who was lost, or to carry a lamp into the dark so that those with eyes could see forms, in the same way has the Blessed One—through many lines of reasoning—made the Dhamma clear.
“I go to the Blessed One for refuge, to the Dhamma, & to the Saṅgha of monks.
“May the Blessed One remember me as a lay follower who has gone for refuge from this day forward, for life.”
And so he was the first three-statement lay disciple in the world.
As Yasa’s father was being taught the Dhamma, and as Yasa was reflecting on the level as he had seen and known it, his mind was, through lack of clinging/sustenance, released from effluents.
Then the thought occurred to the Blessed One, “As Yasa’s father was being taught the Dhamma, and as Yasa was reflecting on the level as he had seen and known it, his mind was, through lack of clinging/sustenance, released from effluents.
“It would be impossible for Yasa to revert to the lower life and indulge in sensuality as he did before, as a householder. Why don’t I make that fabrication of psychic power subside? ”
Then the the Blessed One made that fabrication of psychic power subside.
The money-lender saw Yasa sitting there and on seeing him said to him, “Yasa, my son, your mother is lamenting and full of grief. Give your mother her life ! ”
Then Yasa looked up at the the Blessed One.
Then the Blessed One said to the money-lender, “What do you think, householder: For Yasa, who has seen and known the Dhamma with the knowledge and vision of one in training—just as you have—
whose mind, as he reflected on the level as he had seen and known it, was through lack of clinging/sustenance released from effluents:
Would it be possible for him to revert to the lower life and indulge in sensuality as he did before as a householder? ”
“No, lord.”
“Householder, Yasa has seen and known the Dhamma with the knowledge and vision of one in training, just as you have.
“Reflecting on the level as he had seen and known it, his mind was, through lack of clinging/sustenance, released from effluents.
“It would be impossible for Yasa to revert to the lower life and indulge in sensuality as he did before as a householder.”
The money-lender: “Lord, it’s a gain for Yasa, a great gain for Yasa, that his mind is, through lack of clinging/sustenance, released from effluents!
“May the Blessed One acquiesce to my meal tomorrow, with Yasa as your attendant monk.”
The Blessed One acquiesced with silence.
Then the money-lender, understanding the Blessed One’s acquiescence, got up from his seat, bowed down to him, circumambulated him, keeping him to his right, and left.
Then Yasa, not long after the money-lender had left, said to the Blessed One, “May I receive the Going-forth in the Blessed One’s presence? May I receive the Acceptance? ”
“Come, monk.” Said the Blessed One. “The Dhamma is well-taught. Live the holy life.”
Such was the venerable one’s Acceptance.
At that time there were seven arahants in the world.
 Yasa’s Going-forth is finished.
Then the Blessed One, early in the morning, adjusted his under robe and—carrying his bowl & robes, with Venerable Yasa as his attendant monk—went to the money-lender’s residence and, on arrival, sat down on a seat laid out.
Then Venerable Yasa’s mother and former wife went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down, sat to one side.
The Blessed One gave them a graduated talk: talk on generosity, talk on virtue, talk on heaven, talk on the drawbacks, lowliness, and defilement of sensuality, and talk on the rewards of renunciation.
When the Blessed One knew that their minds were ready—malleable, free from hindrances, uplifted, and bright—he proclaimed the characteristic Dhamma talk of Buddhas: stress, origination, cessation, and path.
Just as a clean piece of cloth, free from grime, would properly take dye, in the same way the dustless, stainless eye of Dhamma arose for them as they were sitting right there—“Whatever is subject to origination is all subject to cessation.”
Then they, having seen the Dhamma, having attained the Dhamma, having known the Dhamma, having fathomed the Dhamma, having crossed over and beyond uncertainty, having no more perplexity, having gained fearlessness, independence of others with regard to the Teacher’s message, said to the Blessed One, “Magnificent, lord! Magnificent! Just as if he were to place upright what was overturned, to reveal what was hidden, to show the way to one who was lost, or to carry a lamp into the dark so that those with eyes could see forms, in the same way has the Blessed One—through many lines of reasoning—made the Dhamma clear. “We go to the Blessed One for refuge, to the Dhamma, & to the Saṅgha of monks.
“May the Blessed One remember us as lay followers who have gone for refuge from this day forward, for life.”
They were the first three-statement female lay disciples in the world.
Then Venerable Yasa’s mother, father, and former wife, with their own hands, served & satisfied the Blessed One and Venerable Yasa with exquisite staple & non-staple food. When the Blessed One had finished his meal and withdrawn his hand from the bowl, they sat to one side.
The Blessed One, having instructed, urged, roused, & encouraged Yasa’s mother, father, and former wife with Dhamma talk, got up from his seat and left.
Yasa’s four householder friends, Vimalo, Subāhu, Puṇṇaji, and Gavampati—sons of wealthy and moderately wealthy families in Bārāṇasī—heard that, “Yasa, they say, has shaved off his hair and beard, clothed himself in the ochre robes, and gone forth from the home life into homelessness.”
Having heard that, the thought occurred to them, “It must not be lowly, this Dhamma and Discipline, nor lowly this Going-forth, in which Yasa—having shaved off his hair and beard and clothed himself in ochre robes—went forth from home into homelessness.”
They went to Ven. Yasa and, on arrival, bowed down to him and stood to one side.
Then Ven. Yasa, taking his four householder friends, went to the Blessed One. On arrival, he bowed down to the Blessed One and sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, Ven. Yasa said, “Lord, these are my four householder friends, Vimalo, Subāhu, Puṇṇaji, and Gavampati—sons of wealthy and moderately wealthy families in Bārāṇasī.
“May the Blessed One teach and admonish them.”
The Blessed One gave them a graduated talk: talk on generosity, talk on virtue, talk on heaven, talk on the drawbacks, lowliness, and defilement of sensuality, and talk on the rewards of renunciation. When the Blessed One knew that their minds were ready—malleable, free from hindrances, uplifted, and bright—he proclaimed the characteristic Dhamma talk of Buddhas: stress, origination, cessation, and path. Just as a clean piece of cloth, free from grime, would properly take dye, in the same way the dustless, stainless eye of Dhamma arose for them as they were sitting right there—“Whatever is subject to origination is all subject to cessation.”
Then they, having seen the Dhamma, having attained the Dhamma, having known the Dhamma, having fathomed the Dhamma, having crossed over and beyond uncertainty, having no more perplexity, having gained fearlessness, independence of others with regard to the Teacher’s message, said to the Blessed One, “May we receive the Going-forth in the Blessed One’s presence? May we receive the Acceptance? ”
“Come, monks.” Said the Blessed One. “The Dhamma is well-taught. Live the holy life for the right ending of stress.”
Such was the venerable ones’ Acceptance.
Then the Blessed One taught and admonished the monks with talk on the Dhamma.
Being taught and admonished by the Blessed One with talk on the Dhamma, their minds were, through lack of clinging/sustenance, released from effluents.
At that time there were eleven arahants in the world.
The Four Householder Friends’ Going-forth is finished.
Ven. Yasa’s fifty householder friends from the countryside—sons of prominent and moderately prominent families—heard, “Yasa, they say, has shaved off his hair and beard, clothed himself in the ochre robes, and gone forth from the home life into homelessness.”
Having heard that, the thought occurred to them, “It must not be lowly, this Dhamma and Discipline, nor lowly this Going-forth, in which Yasa—having shaved off his hair and beard and clothed himself in ochre robes—went forth from home into homelessness.”
They went to Ven. Yasa and, on arrival, bowed down to him and stood to one side.
Then Ven. Yasa, taking his fifty householder friends, went to the Blessed One. On arrival, he bowed down to the Blessed One and sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, Ven. Yasa said to the Blessed One, “Lord, these are my fifty householder friends from the countryside—sons of prominent and moderately prominent families.
“May the Blessed One teach and admonish them.”
The Blessed One gave them a graduated talk: talk on generosity, talk on virtue, talk on heaven, talk on the drawbacks, lowliness, and defilement of sensuality, and talk on the rewards of renunciation.
When the Blessed One knew that their minds were ready—malleable, free from hindrances, uplifted, and bright—he proclaimed the characteristic Dhamma talk of Buddhas: stress, origination, cessation, and path. Just as a clean piece of cloth, free from grime, would properly take dye, in the same way the dustless, stainless eye of Dhamma arose for them as they were sitting right there—“Whatever is subject to origination is all subject to cessation.”
Then they, having seen the Dhamma, having attained the Dhamma, having known the Dhamma, having fathomed the Dhamma, having crossed over and beyond uncertainty, having no more perplexity, having gained fearlessness, independence of others with regard to the Teacher’s message, said to the Blessed One, “May we receive the Going-forth in the Blessed One’s presence? May we receive the Acceptance? ”
“Come, monks.” Said the Blessed One. “The Dhamma is well-taught. Live the holy life for the right ending of stress.”
Such was the venerable ones’ Acceptance.
Then the Blessed One taught and admonished the monks with talk on the Dhamma.
Then, being taught and admonished by the Blessed One with talk on the Dhamma, their minds were, through lack of clinging/sustenance, released from effluents.”
At that time there were sixty-one arahants in the world.
The Fifty Householder Friends’ Going-forth is finished
The Discussion of Going-forth is finished
“Bhikkhus, there are some recluses and brahmins who speculate about the past and hold views about the past, who assert various doctrinal propositions concerning the past.
This circumstance too was not recognised by you.”
“Also, this circumstance was not recognised by you: ‘Many recluses and brahmins of other sects have taken up residence at Savatthi for the Rains, and they too will know me thus: “The bhikkhu named Bhaddali, an elder disciple of the recluse Gotama, is one who does not fulfil the training in the Teacher’s Dispensation.’“
Why is that?
That is how it is with one who fulfils the training in the Teacher’s Dispensation.
With the fading away as well of rapture…he enters upon and abides in the third jhana…
With the abandoning of pleasure and pain…he enters upon and abides in the fourth jhana…
‘It would be good if the venerable ones examine this bhikkhu in such a way that this litigation against him is not settled too quickly.’
‘It would be good if the venerable ones examine this bhikkhu in such a way that this litigation against him is settled quickly.’
… now as he used to show compassion towards it in the past.”
We think of the Blessed One in this way: ‘The Tathagata has abandoned the taints that defile, bring renewal of being, give trouble, ripen in suffering, and lead to future birth, ageing, and death. That is why the Tathagata uses one thing after reflecting, endures another thing after reflecting, avoids another thing after reflecting, and removes another thing after reflecting.”
At that time, having spent the Rains, the Blessed One addressed the monks, ”It was from appropriate attention and appropriate right exertion that I attained unexcelled release, that I realized unexcelled release.
”From appropriate attention and appropriate right exertion, you, too, attain1 unexcelled release—realize unexcelled release.”
Then Mara the Evil One went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, recited this verse in his presence:
“You’re bound by Māra’s snares, human and divine.
You’re bound by Māra’s bond— Contemplative, you’re not freed from me.”
The Buddha: “I’m released from Māra’s snares, whether human or divine.
I’m freed from Māra’s bond— You’re struck down, End-maker.”
Then Māra the Evil One—sad & dejected , “The Blessed One knows me; the One Well-Gone knows me”
—vanished right there.
The Second Discussion of Māra is finished
Then the Blessed One, having stayed near Bārāṇasī as long as he liked, set out wandering to Uruvelā.
Coming down from the road, the Blessed One went to a certain forest grove, plunged into it, and sat down at the root of a certain tree.
At that time, the Auspicious Group of thirty friends, were entertaining themselves with their wives in the forest grove.
One of them had no wife, so, for that purpose, they brought a prostitute along.
As they were heedlessly entertaining themselves, the prostitute took his belongings and ran off.
Then the other friends, as they were helping him out—searching for the woman and wandering around in the forest grove—saw the Blessed One sitting at the root of a certain tree.
On seeing him, they went to the Blessed One and on arrival said to him, “Could it be, lord, that the Blessed One has seen a woman?”
“Young men, what do you want with a woman?”
“Just now, lord, we, the Auspicious Group of thirty friends, were entertaining ourselves with our wives in the forest grove.
“One of us has no wife, so, for that purpose, we brought a prostitute along.
“Then, as we were heedlessly entertaining ourselves, the prostitute took his belongings and ran off.
“So we were helping our friend out—searching for the woman and wandering around in the forest grove.”
“What do you think, young men, which is better for you: that you search for a woman, or that you search for the self?”
“Surely, lord, it’s better for us to search for the self1.”
“In that case, young men, sit down. I’ll teach you the Dhamma.”
Responding, “Yes, lord” to the Blessed One, the the Auspicious Group of friends bowed down to the Blessed One and sat to one side.
The Blessed One gave them a graduated talk: talk on generosity, talk on virtue, talk on heaven, talk on the drawbacks, lowliness, and defilement of sensuality, and talk on the rewards of renunciation. When the Blessed One knew that their minds were ready—malleable, free from hindrances, uplifted, and bright—he proclaimed the characteristic Dhamma talk of Buddhas: stress, origination, cessation, and path. Just as a clean piece of cloth, free from grime, would properly take dye, in the same way the dustless, stainless eye of Dhamma arose for them as they sat right there—“Whatever is subject to origination is all subject to cessation.”
Then they, having seen the Dhamma, having attained the Dhamma, having known the Dhamma, having fathomed the Dhamma, having crossed over and beyond uncertainty, having no more perplexity, having gained fearlessness, independence of others with regard to the Teacher’s message, said to the Blessed One, “May we receive the Going-forth in the Blessed One’s presence? May we receive the Acceptance?”
“Come, monks.” Said the Blessed One. “The Dhamma is well-taught. Live the holy life for the right ending of stress.”
Such was the venerable ones’ Acceptance.
The story of the Auspicious Group of Friends is finished.
The second recitation section .
Then the Blessed One, traveling by stages, arrived at Uruvelā.
At that time, three coiled-hair ascetics were staying in Uruvelā: Uruvelakassapa, Nadīkassapa Kassapa of the River, and Gayākassapa.
Among them, Uruvelakassapa was the leader of five hundred coiled-hair ascetics—their trainer, foremost, and chief.
Nadīkassapa was the leader of three hundred coiled-hair ascetics—their trainer, foremost, and chief.
Gayākassapa was the leader of two hundred coiled-hair ascetics—their trainer, foremost, and chief.
Then the Blessed One went to Uruvelakassapa’s ashram and, on arrival, said to him, “If it’s not a burden for you, we would stay one night in your fire-hall.”
“It’s not a burden for me, great contemplative. But there is a fierce nāga king there—powerful, with poisonous fangs, terrifyingly poisonous—may he not harass you.
A second time, the Blessed One said to Uruvelakassapa, “If it’s not a burden for you, we would stay one night in your fire-hall.”
“It’s not a burden for me, great contemplative. But there is a fierce nāga king there—powerful, with poisonous fangs, terrifyingly poisonous—may he not harass you.”
A third time, the Blessed One said to Uruvelakassapa, “If it’s not a burden for you, we would stay one night in your fire-hall.”
“It’s not a burden for me, great contemplative. But there is a fierce nāga king there—powerful, with poisonous fangs, terrifyingly poisonous—may he not harass you.”
“Perhaps he wouldn’t harass me. Please, Kassapa, allow the fire-hall.”
“Stay as you like, great contemplative.”
Then the Blessed One, having entered the fire-hall and laid out a grass mat, sat down cross-legged with his body erect, establishing mindfulness to the fore.
The nāga saw that the Blessed One had entered and, on seeing him, upset and disgruntled, emitted smoke.
The thought occurred to the Blessed One, “Why don’t I—without damaging his outer skin, inner skin, flesh, tendons, bones, or bone marrow—consume fire with fire?
Then the Blessed One fabricated such a fabrication of psychic power that he emitted smoke.
The nāga, unable to bear the insult, blazed up.
The Blessed One entered the fire property and blazed up.
With both of them all ablaze, it was as if the fire-hall were on fire—flaming and blazing.
Then the coiled-hair ascetics surrounded the fire-hall and thought, “That fine-looking great contemplative is being harassed by the nāga!”
Then, as the night was ending, the Blessed One, having consumed fire with fire—without damaging his outer skin, inner skin, flesh, tendons, bones, or bone marrow—put him in his bowl and showed him to Uruvelakassapa the coiled-hair ascetic, “Here, Kassapa, is your nāga. His fire was consumed by fire.”
The thought occurred to Uruvelakassapa, “He’s powerful, the great contemplative, and mighty, in that, with his own fire, he consumed the fire of the fierce nāga king—powerful, with poisonous fangs, terrifyingly poisonous! But still, he’s not an arahant like me.”
At the Nerañjarā, the Blessed One said to the coiled-hair ascetic Uruvelakassapa,
“If it’s not a burden, Kassapa, I’ll stay a day in your fire-refuge or: fire-hall.”
“It’s no burden, great contemplative,
but desiring your comfort, I forbid it.
A fierce nāga king is there,
powerful, with poisonous fangs, terrifyingly poisonous.
I don’t want him to harass you.”
“Perhaps he won’t harass me.
Come now, Kassapa, allow me the fire-hall.”
Knowing that, “It’s given,”
fearless—beyond fear—he entered.
Seeing the seer enter, the nāga-snake, disgruntled, emitted smoke.
With a joyous mind, a confident mind, the nāga1 among men also emitted smoke.
Not bearing the insult, the nāga-snake blazed up like an inferno.
Skilled in the fire property, the nāga of a man blazed up right there as well.
With both of them ablaze,
the fire-hall was burning, flaming and blazing.
The coiled-hair ascetics stared—
“That fine-looking great contemplative,
is being harassed by the nāga!” they said.
Then at the night’s end
the nāga-snake’s flames were no more.
But the many-colored flames
of the Powerful One remained.
Blue, and also red,
crimson, yellow, and the color of quartz,
on the body of the Radiant One:
Many-colored were the flames.
Putting him in his bowl,
he showed the nāga snake to the brahman.
“This is your nāga, Kassapa,
his fire by fire consumed.”
Then Uruvelakassapa, the coiled-hair ascetic, impressed at this marvel of psychic power of the Blessed One, said to him, “Stay right here, great contemplative. I’ll provide you with regular meals.”
First marvel.
So the Blessed One stayed in a certain forest grove not far from the ashram of Uruvelakassapa the coiled-hair ascetic.
Then, in the far extreme of the night, the Four Great Kings, their extreme radiance lighting up the entirety of the forest grove, went to the Blessed One, and on arrival, bowed down, and stood in the four directions like great masses of fire.
As the night was ending, Uruvelakassapa went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, said to him, “It’s time, great contemplative. The meal is ready.
“But who were they, whose extreme radiance lit up the entirety of the forest grove in the far extreme of the night, and who went to you, and on arrival bowed down, and stood in the four directions like great masses of fire?”
“Those, Kassapa, were the Four Great Kings, who came to me to listen to the Dhamma.”
The thought occurred to Uruvelakassapa, “He’s powerful, the great contemplative, and mighty, in that even the Four Great Kings come to him to listen to the Dhamma. But still, he’s not an arahant like me.”
Then the Blessed One ate the meal provided by Uruvelakassapa and stayed on in the forest grove.
Second marvel.
Then Sakka, King of the Devas, in the far extreme of the night, his extreme radiance lighting up the entirety of the forest grove, went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, bowed down and stood to one side, like a great mass of fire—more extreme and refined than the previous radiances of color.
As the night was ending, Uruvelakassapa went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, said to him, “It’s time, great contemplative. The meal is ready.
“But who was that, whose extreme radiance lit up the entirety of the forest grove in the far extreme of the night, and who went to you and, on arrival, bowed down and stood to one side like a great mass of fire—more extreme and refined than the previous radiances of color?”
“That, Kassapa, was Sakka, King of the Devas, who came to me to listen to the Dhamma.”
The thought occurred to Uruvelakassapa, “He’s powerful, the great contemplative, and mighty, in that even Sakka, King of the Devas, comes to him to listen to the Dhamma. But still, he’s not an arahant like me.”
Then the Blessed One ate the meal provided by Uruvelakassapa and stayed on in the forest grove.
Third marvel.
Then the Brahmā Sahampati, in the far extreme of the night, his extreme radiance lighting up the entirety of the forest grove went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, bowed down and stood to one side, like a great mass of fire—more extreme and refined than the previous radiances of color.
As the night was ending, Uruvelakassapa went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, said to him, “It’s time, great contemplative. The meal is ready.
“But who was that, whose extreme radiance lit up the entirety of the forest grove in the far extreme of the night, and who went to you and, on arrival bowed down, and stood to one side like a great mass of fire—more extreme and refined than the previous radiances of color?”
“That, Kassapa, was the Brahmā Sahampati, who came to me to listen to the Dhamma.”
The thought occurred to Uruvelakassapa, “He’s powerful, the great contemplative, and mighty, in that even the Brahmā Sahampati comes to him to listen to the Dhamma. But still, he’s not an arahant like me.”
Then the Blessed One ate the meal provided by Uruvelakassapa and stayed on in the forest grove.
Fourth Marvel.
At that time, Uruvelakassapa had prepared a great sacrifice. the whole area of Magadha and Aṅga wanted to come, bringing along lots of staple and non-staple food.
Then the thought occurred to Uruvelakassapa, “Right now I have prepared a great sacrifice, and the whole area of Magadha and Aṅga will come, bringing along lots of staple and non-staple food.
“If the great contemplative performs a marvel in front of the large crowd of people, his gains and honor will increase while my gains and honor diminish.
“Oh, I hope the great contemplative doesn’t come tomorrow!”
Then the Blessed One, having known with his awareness the train of thought in Uruvelakassapa’s awareness, went to the northern Kuru country and, taking almsfood from there, consumed it at Anotatta Unheated Lake and spent the day right there.
As the night was ending, Uruvelakassapa went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, said to him, “It’s time, great contemplative. The meal is ready.
“Why didn’t you come yesterday, great contemplative?
“And we even thought of you, ‘Why isn’t the great contemplative coming?’
“Your share of staple and non-staple food was set aside.”
“Didn’t it occur to you, ‘Right now I am preparing a great sacrifice, and the whole area of Magadha and Aṅga will come, bringing along lots of staple and non-staple food. “‘If the great contemplative performs a marvel in front of the large crowd of people, his gains and honor will increase while my gains and honor diminish. “‘Oh, I hope the great contemplative doesn’t come tomorrow!’?
“Kassapa, having known with my awareness the train of thought in your awareness, I went to the northern Kuru country and, taking almsfood from there, consumed it at Anotatta Lake and spent the day there.”
The thought occurred to Uruvelakassapa, “He’s powerful, the great contemplative, and mighty, in that he knew awareness with awareness. But still, he’s not an arahant like me.”
Then the Blessed One ate the meal provided by Uruvelakassapa and stayed on in the forest grove.
Fifth Marvel.
At that time a cast-off cloth accrued to the Blessed One.
He thought, “Where could I wash this cast-off cloth?”
Then Sakka, King of the Devas, having known with his awareness the train of thought in the Blessed One’s awareness, dug a reservoir with his hand and said to the Blessed One, “Lord, may the Blessed One wash the cast-off cloth here.”
The Blessed One thought, “What will I scrub the cast-off cloth on?”
Then Sakka, King of the Devas, having known with his awareness the train of thought in the Blessed One’s awareness, placed a large rock nearby, “Lord, may the Blessed One scrub the cast-off cloth here.”
The Blessed One thought, “What will I hold on to to come out ”
Then the deva living in the kakudha1 tree, having known with her awareness the train of thought in the Blessed One’s awareness, bent down a branch, “Lord, may the Blessed One hold on here and come out ”
The Blessed One thought, “What will I spread out the cast-off cloth on ?”
Then Sakka, King of the Devas, having known with his awareness the train of thought in the Blessed One’s awareness, placed a large rock nearby, “Lord, may the Blessed One set out the cast-off cloth here .”
Then, as the night was ending, Uruvelakassapa went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, said to him, “It’s time, great contemplative. The meal is ready.
“Why is it, great contemplative, that before there wasn’t a reservoir here, and now there is a reservoir here?
“Before this rock wasn’t placed here.
“Who placed this rock here?
“Before the branch of this kakudha tree wasn’t bent down—now it’s bent down.”
“Just now, Kassapa, a cast-off cloth accrued to me.
“I thought, ‘Where should I wash this cast-off cloth?’
“Then Sakka, King of the Devas, having known with his awareness the train of thought in my awareness, dug a reservoir with his hand and said to me, ‘Lord, may the Blessed One wash the cast-off cloth here.’
“Kassapa, this reservoir was dug with a non-human hand.
“I thought, ‘What will I scrub the cast-off cloth on?’’
“Then Sakka, King of the Devas, having known with his awareness the train of thought in the my awareness, placed a large rock nearby, ‘Lord, may the Blessed One scrub the cast-off cloth here.’
“Kassapa, this rock was placed by a non-human being.
“I thought, ‘What will I hold on to to come out ’
“Then the deva living in the kakudha tree, having known with her awareness the train of thought in my awareness, bent down a branch, ‘Lord, may the Blessed One hold on here and come out ’
“This kakudha tree was brought to my hand.
“I thought, ‘What will I set out the cast-off cloth on ?’
“Then Sakka, King of the Devas, having known with his awareness the train of thought in the my awareness, placed a large rock nearby, ‘Lord, may the Blessed One set out the cast-off cloth here .’
“Kassapa, this rock was placed by a non-human being.”
The thought occurred to Uruvelakassapa, “He’s powerful, the great contemplative, and mighty, in that Sakka, King of the Devas, performed services for him. But still, he’s not an arahant like me.”
Then the Blessed One ate the meal provided by Uruvelakassapa and stayed on in the forest grove.
As the night was ending, Uruvelakassapa went to the Blessed One and, on arrival said to him, “It’s time, great contemplative. The meal is ready.
Sending away Uruvelakassapa: “You go on, Kassapa. I’m coming,” he took a fruit from the rose-apple tree after which the Rose-apple Continent1 is named, arrived first and sat down in the fire-hall.
Uruvelakassapa the coiled-hair ascetic saw the Blessed One sitting in the fire-hall and said to him, “By which road did you come, great contemplative?
“I set out before you, but you, arriving first, are sitting in the fire-hall.”
“Just now, Kassapa, sending you away and then taking1 a fruit from the rose-apple tree after which the Rose-apple Continent is named, I arrived first, and am sitting down in the fire-hall.
“This is the rose-apple, consummate in color, consummate in aroma, and consummate in flavor.
“Eat it if you like.”
“Enough, great contemplative, you yourself brought1 it, you eat it yourself.”
The thought occurred to Uruvelakassapa, “He’s powerful, the great contemplative, and mighty, in that he, sending me away first, took a fruit from the rose-apple tree after which the Rose-apple Continent is named, arrived first and sat down in the fire-hall. But still, he’s not an arahant like me.”
Then the Blessed One ate the meal provided by Uruvelakassapa and stayed on in the forest grove.
As the night was ending, Uruvelakassapa went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, said to him, “It’s time, great contemplative. The meal is ready.
Sending away Uruvelakassapa: “You go on, Kassapa. I’m coming,” he took a mango from not far from the rose-apple tree after which the Rose-apple Continent is named, … … a myrobalan from not far from it … … a yellow myrobalan from not far from it … … having gone to the Thirty-Three he took a coral tree flower, arrived first, and sat down in the fire-hall.
Uruvelakassapa the coiled-hair ascetic saw the Blessed One sitting in the fire-hall and said, “By which road did you come, great contemplative?
“I set out before you, but you, arriving first, are sitting in the fire-hall.”
“Just now, Kassapa, sending you away and then going to the Thirty-Three, I took a coral tree flower, arrived first, and am sitting down in the fire-hall.
“This is the coral tree flower, consummate in color and consummate in aroma.”
The thought occurred to Uruvelakassapa, “He’s powerful, the great contemplative, and mighty, in that he, sending me away first, went to the Thirty-Three, took a coral tree flower, arrived first, and sat down in the fire-hall. But still, he’s not an arahant like me.”
At that time the coiled-hair ascetics, wanting to tend to the fires, were unable to split the firewood.
It occurred to the coiled-hair ascetics, “No doubt it’s the psychic power of the great contemplative that we are unable to split the firewood.”
Then the Blessed One said to Uruvelakassapa, “Kassapa, May the firewood be split!”
“May it be split, great contemplative!”
At once, five hundred pieces of firewood were split.
The thought occurred to Uruvelakassapa, “He’s powerful, the great contemplative, and mighty, in that the pieces of firewood were split. But still, he’s not an arahant like me.”
At that time the coiled-hair ascetics, wanting to attend to the fires, were unable to light the fires.
It occurred to the coiled-hair ascetics, “No doubt it’s the psychic power of the great contemplative that we are unable to light the fires.”
Then the Blessed One said to Uruvelakassapa, “Kassapa, May the fires be lit!”
“May they be lit, great contemplative!”
At once, five hundred fires were lit.
The thought occurred to Uruvelakassapa, “He’s powerful, the great contemplative, and mighty, in that the fires were lit. But still, he’s not an arahant like me.”
At that time the coiled-hair ascetics, having attended to the fires, were unable to put out the fires.
It occurred to the coiled-hair ascetics, “No doubt it’s the psychic power of the great contemplative that we are unable to put out the fires.”
Then the Blessed One said to Uruvelakassapa, “Kassapa, May the fires go out!”
“May they go out, great contemplative!”
At once, five hundred fires went out.
The thought occurred to Uruvelakassapa, “He’s powerful, the great contemplative, and mighty, in that the fires went out. But still, he’s not an arahant like me.”
Then at that time, the coiled-hair ascetics, in the cold, winter “Eight In-between1” days, the time of snowfall—were emerging and submerging in the Nerañjarā River—doing submerging-and-emerging.
The Blessed One materialized five hundred charcoal heaters, where, having come out, the coiled-hair ascetics warmed up lit: unsewed.
It occurred to the coiled-hair ascetics, “No doubt it’s the psychic power of the great contemplative that these charcoal heaters have materialized.”
The thought occurred to Uruvelakassapa, “He’s powerful, the great contemplative, and mighty, in that he materialized so many charcoal heaters. But still, he’s not an arahant like me.”
At that time, a great, out-of-season storm-cloud rained down, and a great flood was produced.
The place where the Blessed One was staying was inundated with water.
He thought, “Why don’t I push back the water all around and walk back and forth in the middle on dusty ground?”
Then the Blessed One pushed back the water all around and walked back and forth in the middle on dusty ground.
Then Uruvelakassapa, “May the great contemplative not be carried away by the water!” went by boat with several coiled-hair ascetics to the place where the Blessed One was staying.
Uruvelakassapa saw the Blessed One, having pushed back the water all around, walking back and forth in the middle on dusty ground. On seeing him, he said, “Are you here, great contemplative?”
 “Yes, It’s me, Kassapa,” the Blessed One rose up into the air and came down in the boat.
The thought occurred to Uruvelakassapa, “He’s powerful, the great contemplative, and mighty, in that he wasn’t carried away by the water. But still, he’s not an arahant like me.”
Then the thought occurred to the Blessed One, “For a long time this worthless man keeps having the thought, ‘The great contemplative is powerful and mighty. But still, he’s not an arahant like me.’ “What if I were to terrify this coiled-hair ascetic?”
So he said to Uruvelakassapa, “You’re not an arahant, Kassapa. You’re not even endowed with the path to arahantship.
“You don’t even have a practice by which you would become an arahant, or become endowed with the path to arahantship.”
Then Uruvelakassapa, putting his head down at the feet of the Blessed One, said, “Lord, may I receive the Going-forth in the Blessed One’s presence? May I receive the Acceptance?”
“Kassapa, you are the leader of five hundred coiled-hair ascetics—their trainer, foremost, and chief.
“Inform them of this, they will do what they think .”
Then Uruvelakassapa went to the coiled-hair ascetics and on arrival said to them, “Sirs, I want to live the holy life under the great contemplative. “May you do what you think .”
“For a long time, sir, we have been highly impressed with the great contemplative. If you are going to live the holy life under the great contemplative, all of us will likewise live the holy life under the great contemplative.”
So the coiled-hair ascetics, having let the water carry away the mixed-up mess of their hair, their coils, their ritual vessels and carrying poles and their fire-worship paraphernalia, went to the Blessed One. On arrival, having put their heads at the Blessed One’s feet, they said to him, “May we receive the Going-forth in the Blessed One’s presence? May we receive the Acceptance?”
“Come, monks.” said the Blessed One. “The Dhamma is well-taught. Live the holy life for the right ending of stress.”
Such was the venerable ones’ Acceptance.
Then Nadīkassapa the coiled-hair ascetic saw the mixed-up mess of hair, coils, ritual vessels and carrying poles and fire-worship paraphernalia being carried away by the water. On seeing them he thought, “I hope my brother hasn’t met with disaster!”
So he sent the coiled-hair ascetics, “Go to find out about my brother.”
And he himself went with the three hundred coiled-hair ascetics to Ven. Uruvelakassapa. On arrival, he said to Ven. Uruvelakassapa, “Is this better, Kassapa?”
“Yes, friend, it’s better.”
So the coiled-hair ascetics, having let the water carry away the mixed-up mess of their hair, their coils, their ritual vessels and carrying poles and their fire-worship paraphernalia, went to the Blessed One. On arrival, having put their heads at the Blessed One’s feet, they said to him, “May we receive the Going-forth in the Blessed One’s presence? May we receive the Acceptance?”
“Come, monks.” Said the Blessed One. “The Dhamma is well-taught. Live the holy life for the right ending of stress.”
Such was the venerable ones’ Acceptance.
Then Gayākassapa the coiled-hair ascetic saw the mixed-up mess of hair, coils, ritual vessels and carrying poles and fire-worship paraphernalia being carried away by the water. On seeing them he thought, “I hope my brothers haven’t met with disaster!”
So he sent the coiled-hair ascetics, “Go to find out about my brothers.”
And he himself went with the two hundred coiled-hair ascetics to Ven. Uruvelakassapa. On arrival, he said to Ven. Uruvelakassapa, “Is this better, Kassapa?”
“Yes, friend, it’s better.”
So the coiled-hair ascetics, having let the water carry away the mixed-up mess of their hair, their coils, their ritual vessels and carrying poles and their fire-worship paraphernalia, went to the Blessed One. On arrival, having put their heads at the Blessed One’s feet, they said to him, “May we receive the Going-forth in the Blessed One’s presence? May we receive the Acceptance?”
“Come, monks.” Said the Blessed One. “The Dhamma is well-taught. Live the holy life for the right ending of stress.”
Such was the venerable ones’ Acceptance.
By the Blessed One’s determination, five hundred pieces of firewood were not split and then split, fires were not lit and then lit, fires couldn’t be put out and then were put out, and five hundred charcoal heaters were materialized.
By this reckoning, there were three and a half thousand marvels.
Then the Blessed One, having stayed near Uruvelā as long as he liked, set out for Gayā Head1 with a large Saṅgha of monks—a thousand monks, all of them former coiled-hair ascetics.
And the Blessed One stayed right there at Gayā Head with the thousand monks.
There the Blessed One addressed the monks: SN 35:28
“Monks, the All is aflame.
“What All is aflame?
“The eye is aflame. “Forms are aflame. “Consciousness at the eye is aflame. “Contact at the eye is aflame. “And whatever there is that arises in dependence on contact at the eye—experienced as pleasure, pain or neither-pleasure-nor-pain—that too is aflame.
“Aflame with what?
“Aflame with the fire of passion, the fire of aversion, the fire of delusion. “Aflame, I tell you, with birth, aging & death, with sorrows, lamentations, pains, distresses, & despairs.
“The ear is aflame. Sounds are aflame…
“Aflame with what?
“Aflame with the fire of passion, the fire of aversion, the fire of delusion. “Aflame, I tell you, with birth, aging & death, with sorrows, lamentations, pains, distresses, & despairs.
“The nose is aflame. Aromas are aflame…
“Aflame with what?
“Aflame with the fire of passion, the fire of aversion, the fire of delusion. “Aflame, I tell you, with birth, aging & death, with sorrows, lamentations, pains, distresses, & despairs.
“The tongue is aflame. Flavors are aflame…
“Aflame with what?
“Aflame with the fire of passion, the fire of aversion, the fire of delusion. “Aflame, I tell you, with birth, aging & death, with sorrows, lamentations, pains, distresses, & despairs.
“The body is aflame. Tactile sensations are aflame…
“Aflame with what?
“Aflame with the fire of passion, the fire of aversion, the fire of delusion. “Aflame, I tell you, with birth, aging & death, with sorrows, lamentations, pains, distresses, & despairs.
“The intellect is aflame. Ideas are aflame. Consciousness at the intellect is aflame. Contact at the intellect is aflame. And whatever there is that arises in dependence on contact at the intellect—experienced as pleasure, pain or neither-pleasure-nor-pain—that too is aflame. Aflame with what? Aflame with the fire of passion, the fire of aversion, the fire of delusion. Aflame, I say, with birth, aging & death, with sorrows, lamentations, pains, distresses, & despairs.
“Aflame with what?
“Aflame with the fire of passion, the fire of aversion, the fire of delusion. “Aflame, I tell you, with birth, aging & death, with sorrows, lamentations, pains, distresses, & despairs.
“Seeing thus, the instructed disciple of the noble ones grows disenchanted with the eye, disenchanted with forms, disenchanted with consciousness at the eye, disenchanted with contact at the eye. And whatever there is that arises in dependence on contact at the eye, experienced as pleasure, pain or neither-pleasure-nor-pain: With that, too, he grows disenchanted.
“He grows disenchanted with the ear… “He grows disenchanted with the nose… “He grows disenchanted with the tongue… “He grows disenchanted with the body… “He grows disenchanted with the intellect, disenchanted with ideas, disenchanted with consciousness at the intellect, disenchanted with contact at the intellect. And whatever there is that arises in dependence on contact at the intellect, experienced as pleasure, pain or neither-pleasure-nor-pain: He grows disenchanted with that too. “Disenchanted, he becomes dispassionate. “Through dispassion, he is released. “With release, there is the knowledge, ‘Released.’
“He discerns that ‘Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done. There is nothing further for this world.’”
And while this explanation was being given, the minds of the 1,000 monks, through lack of clinging/sustenance, were released from effluents.
The Fire explanation is finished.
The third recitation section, on the Marvels at Uruvelā, is finished.
Then the Blessed One, having stayed at Gayā Head as long as he liked, set out on a wandering tour toward Rājagaha with the large Saṅgha of monks—a thousand monks—all of them former coiled-hair ascetics.
Traveling by stages he arrived at Rājagaha.
And there at Rājagaha the Blessed One stayed at the Suppatiṭṭha Shrine in the Sapling-forest Park.
King Seniya Bimbisāra of Magadha heard, “Master Gotama the contemplative—a son of the Sakyans, having gone forth from the Sakyan clan—has arrived at Rājagaha and is staying at the Suppatiṭṭha Shrine in the Sapling-forest Park.
“And of that master Gotama this fine reputation has spread: ‘He is indeed a Blessed One, worthy & rightly self-awakened, consummate in clear-knowing & conduct, well-gone, an expert with regard to the cosmos, unexcelled trainer of people fit to be tamed, teacher of devas & human beings, awakened, blessed.
“‘He makes known—having realized it through direct knowledge—this world with its devas, Māras, & Brahmās, its generations with their contemplatives & brahmans, their rulers & commonfolk;
“‘he explains the Dhamma admirable in the beginning, admirable in the middle, admirable in the end; he expounds the holy life both in its particulars & in its essence, entirely perfect, surpassingly pure.’
“It is good to see such a worthy one.”
Then King Seniya Bimbisāra of Magadha, accompanied by 120,000 Magadhan householders and brahmans, went to the Blessed One. On arrival, he bowed down and sat to one side.
Some of the 120,000 Magadhan householders and brahmans also bowed down to the Blessed One and sat to one side. Some of them exchanged courteous greetings with the Blessed One, and after an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, sat to one side. Some of them, having raised their hands palm-to-palm in front of the heart to the Blessed One, sat to one side. Some of them, after announcing their name and clan in the Blessed One’ presence, sat to one side. Some of them, staying silent, sat to one side.
Then the thought occurred to the 120,000 Magadhan householders and brahmans, “Is the great contemplative living the holy life under Uruvelakassapa or is Uruvelakassapa living the holy life under the great contemplative?”
The Blessed One, having known with his awareness the train of thought in the awarenesses of the 120,000 Magadhan householders and brahmans, addressed Uruvelakassapa in verse:
“Having seen what, while living at Uruvelā, has the teacher of ascetics, abandoned the fire?
I ask you about this matter, Kassapa: Why has your fire oblation been abandoned?”
Uruvelakassapa: “Forms, sounds, and flavors too,
Sensuality and women—sacrifices promise these.
Having known of acquisitions: ‘This is stained,’
I no longer delight in oblations or sacrifices.”
The Buddha to Kassapa: “Now your mind doesn’t delight,
in forms, sounds, or flavors.
Then, in the world with its humans and devas,
what is your mind’s delight? Explain it to me, Kassapa.”
Uruvelakassapa: “Having seen the state of peace,
without acquisitions, having nothing, unattached in sensuality and becoming,
the state unchanging, leading to nothing else,
I no longer delight in oblations or sacrifices.”
Then Ven. Uruvelakassapa got up from his seat, arranged his upper robe over one shoulder, and putting his head down at the Blessed One’s feet, said, “The Blessed One is my teacher. I am his disciple. The Blessed One is my teacher. I am his disciple.”
Then the thought occurred to the 120,000 Magadhan householders and brahmans, “Uruvelakassapa is living the holy life under the great contemplative.”
Then the Blessed One, having known with his awareness the train of thought in the minds of the 120,000 Magadhan householders and brahmans, gave them a graduated talk: talk on generosity, talk on virtue, talk on heaven, talk on the drawbacks, lowliness, and defilement of sensuality, and talk on the rewards of renunciation.
When the Blessed One knew that their minds were ready—malleable, free from hindrances, uplifted, and bright—he proclaimed the characteristic Dhamma talk of Buddhas: stress, origination, cessation, and path.
Just as a clean piece of cloth, free from grime, would properly take dye, in the same way, the dustless, stainless eye of Dhamma arose for 110,000 Magadhan householders and brahmans, headed by Bimbisāra, as they were sitting right there—“Whatever is subject to origination is all subject to cessation.”
 10,000 declared themselves lay-followers.
Then King Seniya Bimbisāra of Magadha, having seen the Dhamma, having attained the Dhamma, having known the Dhamma, having fathomed the Dhamma, having crossed over and beyond uncertainty, having no more perplexity, having gained fearlessness, independence of others with regard to the Teacher’s message, said to the Blessed One, “Lord, before, when I was still a prince young man, I had five aspirations. They are now fulfilled for me.
“Lord, before, when I was still a prince, I thought, ‘O! may I be consecrated as king!’ That, Lord, was my first aspiration. Now it is fulfilled for me.
“‘And may an arahant, rightly self-awakened, alight in my kingdom!’ This, Lord, was my second aspiration. Now it is fulfilled for me.
“‘And may I attend on that Blessed One!’ That, Lord, was my third aspiration. Now it is fulfilled for me.
“‘And may that Blessed One teach me the Dhamma!’ That, Lord, was my fourth aspiration. Now it is fulfilled for me.
“‘And may I understand that Blessed One’s Dhamma!’ That, Lord, was my fifth aspiration. Now it is fulfilled for me.
“Lord, before, when I was still a prince, I had these five aspirations. They are now fulfilled for me.
“Magnificent, lord! Magnificent! Just as if he were to place upright what was overturned, to reveal what was hidden, to show the way to one who was lost, or to carry a lamp into the dark so that those with eyes could see forms, in the same way has the Blessed One—through many lines of reasoning—made the Dhamma clear.
“I go to the Blessed One for refuge, and the Dhamma and the Saṅgha of monks.
“May the Blessed One remember me as a lay follower who has gone for refuge from this day forward, for life. “And may the Blessed One acquiesce to my meal tomorrow, along with the Saṅgha of monks.”
The Blessed One acquiesced with silence.
Then King Seniya Bimbisāra of Magadha, understanding the Blessed One’s acquiescence, got up from his seat, bowed down to him, circumambulated him, keeping him to his right, and left.
As the night was ending, King Seniya Bimbisāra of Magadha, having ordered exquisite staple & non-staple food prepared, had the time announced to the Blessed One: “It’s time, Lord. The meal is ready.”
Then the Blessed One, early in the morning, adjusted his under robe and—carrying his bowl & robes, entered Rājagaha with the large Saṅgha of monks—a thousand monks—all of them former coiled-hair ascetics.
Now at that time, Sakka, King of the Devas, assuming the form of a brahman youth, went along ahead of the Saṅgha of monks, headed by the Buddha, singing this verse:
“The Tamed One, with the tamed— with the former coiled hair ascetics! The Thoroughly Released One, with the thoroughly released!
The color of golden ginger, The Blessed One entered Rājagaha.
The Released One, with the released— with the former coiled hair ascetics! The Thoroughly Released One, with the thoroughly released!
The color of golden ginger, The Blessed One entered Rājagaha.
The One who has Crossed Over, with those who have crossed over— with the former coiled hair ascetics!
The Thoroughly Released One, with the thoroughly released!
The color of golden ginger,
The Blessed One entered Rājagaha.
The Peaceful One, with the peaceful ones— with the former coiled hair ascetics!
The Thoroughly Released One, with the thoroughly released!
The color of golden ginger,
The Blessed One entered Rājagaha.
He has ten spheres of influence, ten powers— knower of ten Dhammas, possessing ten—
surrounded by ten hundreds, the Blessed One entered Rājagaha.”
On seeing Sakka, King of the Devas, the people said, “How handsome, that brahman youth. How good-looking, that brahman youth. How inspiring, that brahman youth.”
“Whose is that brahman youth?”
When that was said, Sakka, King of the Devas, addressed the people in verse:
“That Enlightened One, everywhere tamed,
that pure, matchless individual, worthy, well-gone in the world— his attendant am I.”
Then the Blessed One went to King Seniya Bimbisāra of Magadha’s residence and sat down on a seat laid out, along with the Saṅgha of monks.
Then King Seniya Bimbisāra of Magadha, with his own hands, served & satisfied the Saṅgha of monks, headed by the Blessed One, with exquisite staple & non-staple food. When the Blessed One had finished his meal and withdrawn his hand from the bowl, the king sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, the thought occurred to him, “Where should the Blessed One stay,
that would be neither too far from the village nor too close, accessible, where interested people could come out, not crowded by day, with few noises or sounds of voices at night, far from wind and crowds, private from human beings, and appropriate for seclusion?”
The thought occurred to him, “I have this Bamboo Grove Park, which is neither too far from the village nor too close, accessible, where interested people could come out, not crowded by day, with few noises or sounds of voices at night, far from wind and crowds, private from human beings, and appropriate for seclusion
“What if I were to give the Bamboo Grove Park to the Saṅgha of monks, headed by the Blessed One?”
So King Seniya Bimbisāra of Magadha, taking a golden water vessel1 made this offering to the Blessed One, “I give this Bamboo Grove Park to the Saṅgha of monks, headed by the Blessed One.”
The Blessed One accepted the monastery.
The Blessed One, having instructed, urged, roused, & encouraged King Seniya Bimbisāra of Magadha with Dhamma talk, got up from his seat and left.
Then the Blessed One, having given a Dhamma talk with regard to this cause, to this incident, addressed the monks: “Monks, I allow a monastery.”
The Discussion of the Meeting with Bimbisāra is finished.
Now at that time Sañjaya the wanderer was staying in Rājagaha with a large assembly of wanderers—250 in all.
And at that time Sāriputta and Moggallāna were living the holy life under Sañjaya.
They had made this agreement: “May whoever attains the Deathless first inform the other.”
Then, early in the morning, Ven. Assaji adjusted his under robe and—carrying his bowl & robes, entered Rājagaha for alms: gracious in the way he approached and departed, looked forward and behind, drew in and stretched out ; his eyes downcast, his every movement consummate.
Sāriputta the wanderer saw Ven. Assaji going for alms in Rājagaha: gracious in the way he approached and departed, looked forward and behind, drew in and stretched out ; his eyes downcast, his every movement consummate.
On seeing him, the thought occurred to him: “Surely, of those monks in this world who are arahants or have entered the path to arahantship, this is one.
“What if I were to go to him and question him: “‘Friend, on whose account have you gone forth? Or who is your teacher? Or in whose Dhamma do you delight?’”
But then the thought occurred to Sāriputta the wanderer: “This is the wrong time to question him. Having entered among houses, he is going for alms.
“What if I were to follow behind this monk? The path is found by those who seek it.”
Then Ven. Assaji, having gone for alms in Rājagaha, took his almsfood and left.
Then Sāriputta the wanderer went to Ven. Assaji and, on arrival, exchanged courteous greetings with him. After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies he stood to one side.
As he was standing there, Sāriputta the wanderer said to Ven. Assaji, “Clear, my friend, are your faculties—pure your complexion, and bright.
“Friend, on whose account have you gone forth? Or who is your teacher? Or in whose Dhamma do you delight?”
“There is a great contemplative—a son of the Sakyans, gone forth from the Sakyan clan—I have gone forth on account of that Blessed One. That Blessed One is my teacher, and I delight in his Dhamma.
“What is your teacher’s doctrine? What is his teaching?”
“I am new, friend, not long gone-forth, and have just recently come to this Dhamma and Discipline. I can’t teach the Dhamma in detail, but I will tell you the essence of it in brief.”
Then Sāriputta the wanderer said to Ven. Assaji, “May it be so, friend—
“Speak a little or a lot, but tell me just the gist.
The gist is what I want. What use is a lot of verbosity?”
So Ven. Assaji spoke this Dhamma-explanation to Sāriputta the wanderer:
“Whatever phenomena arise from cause: their cause
& their cessation. Such is the teaching of the Tathāgata, the Great Contemplative.”
Then, when he had heard this Dhamma-explanation, the dustless, stainless eye of Dhamma arose for Sāriputta the wanderer—“Whatever is subject to origination is all subject to cessation.”
Narrator addressing Sāriputta the wanderer: “Just this Dhamma, even if just this much, and you experienced the sorrowless state—
unseen, neglected, for many ten-thousands of eons.”
Then Sāriputta the wanderer went to Moggallāna the wanderer.
Moggallāna the wanderer saw Sāriputta the wanderer coming in the distance, and said to him, “Clear, my friend, are your faculties—pure your complexion, and bright.
“Have you attained the Deathless, friend?”
“Yes, friend, I have attained the Deathless.”
“But, friend, how did you attain the Deathless?”
“Just now, friend, I saw the monk Assaji entering Rājagaha for alms: gracious in the way he approached and departed, looked forward and behind, drew in and stretched out ; his eyes downcast, his every movement consummate.
“On seeing him, the thought occurred to me: ‘Surely, of those monks in this world who are arahants or have entered the path to arahantship, this is one.
“‘What if I were to go to him and question him: “Friend, on whose account have you gone forth? Or who is your teacher? Or in whose Dhamma do you delight?”’
“But then the thought occurred to me: ‘This is the wrong time to question him. Having entered among houses, he is going for alms. What if I were to follow behind this monk? The path is found by those who seek it.’
“Then the monk Assaji, having gone for alms in Rājagaha, took his almsfood and left.
“I went to the monk Assaji and, on arrival, exchanged courteous greetings with him. After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies I stood to one side.
“As I was standing there, I said to the monk Assaji, ‘Clear, my friend, are your faculties—pure your complexion, and bright.
“‘On whose account have you gone forth? Who is your teacher? In whose Dhamma do you delight?”
“‘There is a great contemplative—a son of the Sakyans, gone forth from the Sakyan clan—I have gone forth on account of that Blessed One. That Blessed One is my teacher, and I delight in his Dhamma.’
“‘What is your teacher’s doctrine? What is his teaching?’
“‘I am new, friend, not long gone-forth, and have just recently come to this Dhamma and Discipline. I can’t teach the Dhamma in detail, but I can tell you the essence of it in brief.’
“Then I said to the monk Assaji, ‘May it be so, friend—
“‘Speak a little or a lot, but tell me just the gist.
The gist is what I want. What use is a lot of verbosity?’
“So the monk Assaji spoke this Dhamma-explanation:
“‘Whatever phenomena arise from cause: their cause
& their cessation. Such is the teaching of the Tathāgata, the Great Contemplative.’”
Having heard this Dhamma-explanation, the dustless, stainless eye of Dhamma arose for Moggallāna the wanderer—“Whatever is subject to origination is all subject to cessation.”
Narrator addressing Moggallāna the wanderer: Just this Dhamma, even if just this much, and you experienced the sorrowless state—
unseen, neglected, for many ten-thousands of eons.
Then Moggallāna the wanderer said to Sāriputta the wanderer, “Let’s go to the Blessed One’s presence. the Blessed One is our teacher.”
Sāriputta: “There are these 250 wanderers who live here in dependence on us and look up to us. Let’s inform them of this.
“They will do whatever they think .”
So Sāriputta and Moggallāna went to the wanderers and, on arrival, said to them, “Friends, we are going to the Blessed One’s presence. The Blessed One is our teacher.”
“We are living here in dependence on the venerables and look up to the venerables. If the venerables are going to live the holy life under the great contemplative, then we will all live the holy life under the great contemplative.”
Then Sāriputta and Moggallāna went to Sañjaya the wanderer and, on arrival, said to him, “Friend, we are going to the Blessed One’s presence. The Blessed One is our teacher.”
“Enough, friends. Don’t go. Let all three of us look after this group.”
A second time … A third time Sāriputta and Moggallāna said to Sañjaya the wanderer, “Friend, we are going to the Blessed One’s presence. The Blessed One is our teacher.”
“Enough, friends. Don’t go. Let all three of us look after this group.”
Then Sāriputta and Moggallāna, taking along the 250 wanderers, went to the Bamboo Grove.
But Sañjaya the wanderer coughed up hot blood from his mouth right there.
The Blessed One saw Sāriputta and Moggallāna coming in the distance, and on seeing them addressed the monks, “Monks, these two friends who are approaching, Kolita and Upatissa:
They will by my highest, most auspicious pair of disciples.
Deep their range of knowledge, unsurpassed in the destruction of acquisitions,
released, they’ve arrived at the Bamboo Grove. Then the Teacher said of them:
“These two friends are who approaching, Kolita and Upatissa:
They will by my highest, most auspicious pair of disciples.”
Then Sāriputta and Moggallāna went to the Blessed One and, on arrival,
put their heads at the Blessed One’s feet and said, “May we receive the Going-forth in the Blessed One’s presence? May we receive the Acceptance?”
“Come, monks.” Said the Blessed One. “The Dhamma is well-taught. Live the holy life for the right ending of stress.”
Such was the venerable ones’ Acceptance.
At that time, many sons of well-known Magadhan families were living the holy life under the Blessed One.
People criticized and complained and spread it about, “The contemplative Gotama is practicing for the sake of heirlessness. The contemplative Gotama is practicing for the sake of widowhood. The contemplative Gotama is practicing for the sake of cutting off family lineages. Now the thousand coiled-hair ascetics have been given the Going-forth by him, and also these two hundred and fifty wanderers of Sañjaya.
And many many well-known sons of Magadhan families are living the holy life under him.
It got so bad that on seeing monks, they would taunt them with this verse:
“The great contemplative has come, to the mountain pasture of Magadha,
Having led away all of Sañjaya’s, who will he lead away now?”
The monks heard the people criticizing, complaining, and spreading this about.
Then the monks reported the matter to the Blessed One. “Monks, the noise won’t last long. After seven days it will disappear.
Monks, in case anybody taunts you with this verse,
“‘The great contemplative has come, to the mountain pasture of Magadha,
Having led away all of Sañjaya’s, who will he lead away now?’
“counter the taunt with this one:
